
“Although everyone believed you were dead, she is the only one who didn’t give up on you. Before she confirms it with her own eyes, she believes you are still alive. Even now, she’s still fighting in the Orcus Great Dungeon. Even though Amanokawa-kun and the others are only going to the dungeon for training, her only purpose is to search for you.”



“… Is Shirasaki okay?”



After a long silence, Hajime asked Aiko. Hajime who took an indifferent attitude towards them, began to ask about another with words of concern. Aiko, who discovered that the original Hajime still existed, displayed a joyful expression.



“Y-Yes. Although the Orcus Great Dungeon is a dangerous place, her ability has developed well, and she continues to conquer the dungeon. Sometimes letters come from her. Are you curious about her? Nagumo-kun and Shirasaki-san got along after all.”



Aiko talked with a bright smile, but Hajime only expressionlessly looked back over his shoulder without denying or affirming anything.



“Although I didn’t mean it like that… it’s good if you tell her this when you exchange letters. What she should be cautious of is not the demonic beasts in the dungeon. It’s her companions.”



“Eh? What do you…”



“Sensei, I can already guess the situation from the attitude of Tamai and the others today. The cause of me falling in battle against the Behemoth, you think it was just an accident « … », right?”



“Th-That’s… Yes. Some magic went out of control and resulted in accidental friendly-fire… Nagumo-kun still holds a grudge against everyone after all…”



“I don’t think of anything like that. The thing I want to say is this. Friendly fire? That’s wrong. That was a magic bullet clearly specifically cast with me as target.”



“Eh? Specifically cast? Targeted, you say?”



Aiko’s expression said she couldn’t understand what he meant. But, Hajime left words that mercilessly pushed Aiko’s worry further.



“It means, a classmate was trying to kill me.”



“Kh!?”



Aiko was stunned and her face paled, “I only know that the culprit is someone related to Shirasaki, it’s someone who’s able to kill another person out of envy. Because she is still okay, it’s good to advise Shirasaki to be careful of an attack from behind.” After leaving this message, Hajime went out of the room.



Shin, there was an illusion of cold wind blowing inside the room, and Aiko embraced her own body with both arms. There was a possibility that one of her precious students tried to kill a companion. Furthermore, they used a cowardly method by aiming at his back when he was at the brink of death. For Aiko, who treasured her students, it was something she couldn’t accept easily. But, she couldn’t deny Hajime’s words without any evidence. Her mind that wanted to believe her students clashed with each other.



With her worries deepening, Aiko’s sleepless night increased.





Volume 6 Chapter 7




Daybreak.



With the waning moonlight, the eastern sky began to lit up. Hajime, Yue, and Shia, these three people completed their travel preparations, and soon they would leave the “Water Fairy Inn.” In their hands were packaged riceballs that could be eaten as they move. Even though it was still early in the morning, no one wore unpleasant faces as Foss prepared their breakfast. It was just as expected of a high-class inn. Its management was admired even by Hajime and his party, as they thanked him without reserve once they received the breakfast.



Within the morning mist, Hajime and his party faced towards Ul’s northern gate. There was a highway that stretched from this place to the northern mountain range area. It would take at least a full day by horse, but they would arrive in three to four hours using the magic-driven two-wheeler.



It was the fifth day since they had lost contact with Will Kudeta and his party, who had gone to investigate northern mountain range area. Survival was hopeless. Hajime also thought Will and his party’s odds of survival were low, but there was still a chance. Ilwa’s image of Hajime would climb to a pinnacle if he brought him back alive, which was why he began searching as soon as possible. Fortunately, the weather was good. An ideal day to search for someone.



With sounds of activity beginning to resound inside the buildings, they advanced towards the northern gate, and could finally see the gate. He narrowed his eyes because he could sense signs of people near the northern gate. They didn’t move or anything, but only hung around the gate.



What he saw through the morning mist… … were Aiko and the six students.



“… … Although I can guess what you want, let me hear it anyway… … What are you doing?”



Hajime and his party looked at Aiko and the students with half-opened eyes. For a moment, Aiko twitched from the pressure in the atmosphere, but she still faced Hajime with a firm attitude. After having a discussion, the students; Sonobe Yuka, Sugawara Taeko, Miyazaki Nana, Tamai Atsushi, Aikawa Noboru, and Kawahara Akira, drew near Aiko.



“We are also going. You’re searching for missing people, right? It’s better to have more people.”



“No. I am okay with you going. But, I refuse to go together.”



“Wh-Why?”



“Simply because our pace is different. I don’t want to match your slow speed.”



If one were to look closely, they would notice that there were several horses readied behind Aiko and the others. For a moment they thought, “Was it because he cannot ride horses?”, as they doubted Hajime. Since it was trivial, he just let it go through their heads. No matter whether he could ride it or not, its speed couldn’t compare to the magic-driven two-wheeler, after all. However, the virtual leader of Ai-chan’s royal guard who loved her; Sonobe Yuka, snapped at Hajime’s objection. Apparently, she had forgotten her debt and intimidation from Hajime yesterday because of the strength of her love towards Ai-chan.



“Wait, how could you say that? Even if Nagumo doesn’t think well of us, there’s no need to involve Ai-chan sensei.”



Because of the incredibly irrelevant objection, Hajime let out, “Haa?”, with an amazed expression. Hajime thought it’d be a hassle to explain, so he silently took out the magic-driven two-wheeler from “Treasure Box”.



Suddenly, a big bike appeared from the void, Aiko and the students could only let out stupefied looks.



“Do you understand now? Yesterday I said that I absolutely don’t care about whatever you guys want to do. That’s why there’s no need to snarl at me. It’s just like I said before, our speed is different.”



The magic-driven two-wheeler’s profound form, and maybe because it was an existence that didn’t belong in this different world, made Aiko and the onlooking students speechless. There, the bike-lover in the class; Aikawa asked Hajime while somewhat excited.



“D-Did Nagumo make this just like the gun from yesterday?”



“Something like that. We are going now, so move aside.”



Hajime answered him perfunctorily as he was about to embark, but Aiko kept standing still. Aiko wanted to tag along with Hajime and his party no matter what it took. She had two reasons. One was to search for the truth about what Hajime said last night. Aiko couldn’t just overlook the words, “A classmate was trying to kill him”, so she wanted find out if it was the truth or just Hajime’s misunderstanding. If it was the truth she wanted to know what Hajime was going to do. She wanted to hear more details from Hajime for the sake of avoiding any accidents that might happen in the future. Once the search ended, she didn’t know when she’d be able to meet Hajime and his party again, so she mustn’t miss this chance.



The other reason was, because Shimizu Yukitoshi was currently still missing. Although they had tried to find any scrap of information without leaving even a stone unturned, there were no sightings of him in any of the nearby towns and villages. However, because there was no one living in the northern mountain range area in the first place, she remembered there was no information gathered there. Even if it was on his own accord or by accident, she naturally never thought he’d enter the northern mountain range area. But with the thought he’d left on his own, she thought of searching for Shimizu’s trail while Hajime and his party looked for the missing people.



By the way, it was partly a coincidence that Sonobe and the other students were here. Aiko had wanted to go to the gate earlier than Hajime, in order to ambush him, so she tried to leave the inn before dawn, only to be seen by Sonobe Yuka who was going to the toilet. Because Aiko equipped herself with travelling gear and tried to leave at such an unreasonable time, Sonobe Yuka of Ai-chan’s bodyguards questioned her without letting her tell a lie. As the result, because they couldn’t just leave Ai-chan to the changed Hajime. Sonobe woke up all of the students and tried to join the search mission. It should be noted that they had left a letter to the Knights, telling them to watch the house, since it seemed like they would only strike up more trouble if they went with Hajime and his party. Though it wasn’t known how they’d react…



Aiko drew near Hajime and whispered her decision to him. Hajime moved his face close to Aiko’s because he didn’t want the contents and only the contents to be heard by others, but when he looked carefully he noticed she used thick makeup to conceal dark shadows. Surely, she was hardly able to sleep having heard Hajime’s story.



“Nagumo-kun, because sensei is a teacher, it’s necessary to hear the details from Nagumo-kun. That’s why, I won’t let you go until you tell me everything, I’ll chase you if you try to run away. For Nagumo-kun, won’t that be troublesome? I don’t care if you tell me while we are travelling or when we are searching, so will you spare some time? If you do that, then it’ll be as Nagumo-kun said, it’ll be good bye after this town… … for the time being.”



Hajime could see the light of determination in Aiko’s eyes, and he slightly regretted his last words from last night resulted in this failure. He understood Aiko’s ability to take action (Although she’s often idle). If he tried to deceive her or run away, she’d likely use the Guard Knights to search for him.



He averted his gaze from Aiko and looked up at the sky, which was becoming more and more bright. Without throwing away the possibility of Will’s survival, he regretted time had passed while they argued. Hajime let out a deep sigh. He admitted that he’d just reaped what he’d sown, and faced Aiko again.



“Okay. I’ll let you go with us. Even though I say that, I don’t have time to speak with you…”



“I don’t care. I only want to hear it from Nagumo-kun’s mouth.”



“Haa, geez, sensei won’t give up at all. Whatever and wherever, always a teacher, huh.”



“Of course!”



Aiko, “Munh!”, stuck out her chest with a joyful look when Hajime gave up. Because it seemed the negotiations had gone well, the students showed relieved looks.



“… … Hajime, are you going to bring them?”



“Aa, this person is a “teacher” even here. She will not compromise anything regarding her students. If I just leave her, it’ll absolutely become troublesome in the future.”



“Ho~, she is a good teacher who thinks of her students~”



Because Hajime had given up, Yue and Shia were surprised and asked him. Following that, having heard Hajime’s words accompanied with a bitter smile, the eyes with which they looked at Aiko, had changed slightly. They were filled with some respect. Even Hajime thought Aiko’s attitude as their “teacher”, which couldn’t be shaken at all was not a bad thing. For example, she didn’t find any value in categorizing the classmates and students, so he thought of her as an adult who should be respected.



“But, this bike can only hold three people, right? What should we do?”



What Sonobe pointed out was the truth. It was out of the question in regards to time, to match the horses’ speed, and it was impossible to leave Yue or Shia behind to bring Aiko instead. Reluctantly, Hajime put the magic-driven two-wheeler into “Treasure Box”, and pulled out the magic-driven four-wheeler in its stead.



Pinpon, Hajime made it vanish and at the same time a big object appeared, probably because they knew he’d used an artifact, Aiko and the students were not surprised at all. Having seen the current Hajime, who on Earth could imagine he was once called “incompetent.” Sonobe and the students received the message “Those who are unable to get on will be in the carrier”, looked at Hajime who quickly got on the driver’s seat with complicated expressions.



* * *



They moved forward on the road expanding straight into the northern mountain range area using the hummer-like magic-driven four-wheeler. Even though the highway was a bad road, thanks to the suspension and ground transmutation feature it shared with the two-wheeler, most of the impact was nulled. Naturally, the male students, aboard the hard metal luggage carrier attached to the back didn’t seem to be in discomfort.



By the way, although there was the “Treasure Box”, the reason he specifically installed the carrier was because it was a set with the gatling that’d be used while driving, it was his aspiration. A small commitment from Hajime.



For the seating inside the vehicle, Hajime naturally sat in the driver’s seat, while Aiko sat at his side and Yue was next to her. Aiko sat beside Hajime for the sake of hearing his story. Although Aiko seemed to not have told it to the other students, she wanted to hear about it sooner.



Originally, the seat next to Hajime belonged to Yue, but Yue already knew the contents of the story Hajime would tell, so reluctantly, she gave her seat to Aiko. But, Aiko and Yue were small, so there was still a considerable amount of space in the seat.



In contrast, Shia who was seated in the back seat looked slightly cramped. Shia aside, Sonobe and Sugawara had voluptous bodies, so they took up a lot of space. The slender Miyazaki looked so uncomfortable.



But, the one who felt the most uncomfortable was Shia. She had been placed between Sonobe and Sugawara for a while now, and they interrogated her about her relationship with Hajime. Love between different races in another world was something female high schoolers wouldn’t miss hearing. They were so curious that they repeatedly asked Shia, and the flustered Shia tried her best to answer their questions.



On the other side, Hajime and Aiko’s conversation also reached its climax.



Having heard the situation in detail about that time from Hajime, while she knew the possibility of magic being fired intentionally was high, Aiko was still unable to believe it and was troubled by it. When he heard her, Hajime only snorted as his reply.



For now, he already guessed it was someone like Hiyama, and although Hajime’s guess was closest to the right answer, he only said this was one of the possibilities. After all, Aiko wouldn’t be able to arrive at such a conclusion, and even if the culprit could be specified, how could she restore the mind of someone who attempted murder? How could one compensate for that? She was troubled, with those thoughts on her mind.



She groaned because she was troubled by this, but due to the soft seat and vibrating vehicle inviting her to sleep Aiko started off on her journey to the world of dreams before she was aware of it,zuruzuru, her body slipped until she fell onto Hajime’s lap.



Normally, he’d send her flying because it’s a hindrance, but because he felt it awkward to act rude toward Aiko, he hesitated over what to do, then he decided to leave her as is. After all, Hajime’s information was the main cause of Aiko’s sleep deprivation. So if it’s just this, he felt that it couldn’t be helped, as he displayed unusual generosity.



“… … Hajime is gentle to Aiko.”



“… … Well, it is someone I’m indebted to, so something like this is okay.”



“… … Fu~n.”



“Yue?”



“… …”



“Yue-san, please don’t ignore me.”



“… … Next, I will also use the lap pillow.”



“… … Okay.”



Even though Aiko was still lap pillowed, Hajime and Yue were able to enter a world of their own. In the back seat, the female high schoolers watched them while going “kya kya,” followed by a sulking rabbit-eared girl. From now on, they were entering a dangerous zone where unknown accidents might occur but no one thought about it as they made such a noise.



* * *



The northern mountain range area.



Several mountains extended with altitudes ranging from 1000 to 8000 meters. Plants and trees were somehow able to grow there. It was a mysterious place with a scattered environment. The colour would make one remember the mountains of Japan in autumn, and the other area was filled with trees with fresh green leaves, just like in mid-summer, but there were also places with withered trees in contrast.



Moreover, even if one could see past the mountain range, another mountain range stretched out beyond it. There were more and more of them to the north. Currently four such mountain ranges were confirmed, and beyond that was a completely unknown area. As to how far it went, a certain adventurer aimed to cross the fifth mountain range, however, demonic beasts got stronger and stronger with every passing mountain range, and in the end, there was no sign of success.



Incidentally, the highest mountain was the “God Mountain”. Currently, the place Hajime and the others had first arrived in when they came into this world was 1,600 kilometers east of the God Mountain. The vivid colors of red and yellow of the fresh leaves on the trees made them easy on the eyes. If a knowledgeable person were to look carefully, he would find spices and edible plants in the area. They were what enriched Ul town, a truly bountiful mountain.



Hajime and the others stopped the four-wheeler at the foot of the mountain, and were charmed by the artistic display of nature’s magnificent colors for a while. One of the girls let out a “Ho~”. Some time ago, Aiko was apologizing while blushing, after making the blunder of sleeping in a student’s lap. But having seen the fresh scenery, she succeeded in placing the ‘black history’ into the far recesses of her mind.



Hajime also wanted to slowly appreciate this, so he put the four-wheeler back into the “Treasure Box”, and pulled out certain things in its stead.



Those were, imitation models of birds which spanned 30 cm each, and a ring with a small crystal embedded on it. Each of the models had a gray crystal buried in a part of their heads.



Hajime put on the ring, took out four identical models, and slowly threw them into the air. With that, one would assume they’d fall due to gravity. However, these fake birds were floating in place. Aiko and the students let out an “Ah”.



The four mechanical birds began to turn around on their spots and flew towards the mountain.



“Umm, those are….”



Having seen the model birds flying away without any sound, Aiko represented the other students and inquired something of him.



Hajime answered her with “Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes”, and just like the vehicles and gun, they were items that were out of place in this different world..



The imitation model of birds called “Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes”, were something Hajime made in reference to the remotely operated Golem Knights from Raisen’s Great Dungeon. They were also produced using the materials he got there. Using Creation magic, he granted minerals Gravity magic because he didn’t have the aptitude for using the magic himself, and they became minerals capable of neutralizing gravity as they floated. And thus, gravity stones were created. Furthermore, the induction stones which used to control the Golem Knights were used. In addition, Farsight crystals were also installed in each part of their heads. The mineral used in the eyes of Golem Knights were Farsight stones. Similar to induction stones, it was a mineral capable of reflecting scenes witnessed by other fragments of the crystal, regardless of distance, so long as the same type of magical power was supplied to them. It seemed this was what Miledi used to determine the detailed position of Hajime and his party. Hajime installed the farsight crystal inside his magic eye, and he became capable of seeing scenery the “Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes” could see.



In the first place, there’s a limit to the processing performance of a human’s brain, using four simultaneously was the limit, allowing them to move around in the sky. It’s a complete mystery as to how Miledi was able to operate 50 Golems at once.



Tentatively, His brain’s processing performance had been boosted when he awakened the”Light Speed”, if he only had to control one plane, he could do precise movements. Moreover, when he uses “Light Speed”, he could make seven planes do precise movements within a certain time limit.



This time, he took out the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes because being able to search from the air is useful, since the scope of search was too vast. Having watched the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes fly far away, Aiko and the students tried to stop being surprised by Hajime’s actions, however, it was a vow that might never be fulfilled.



Hajime and the others advanced into the mountain using the same path used by the adventurers. The sighting information of demonic beasts were just slightly beyond the other side of mountain path. It’s in the vicinity of the sixth and seventh mountain. Because of that, Will’s party of adventurers should be investigating around those parts. Having thought of this, they quickly advanced through the mountain path at a high pace, after Hajime released the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes in that area.



Hajime and the others reached the sixth mountain in almost an hour, and stopped. The reason was because it was necessary to search for any traces around the area…



“Haa haa, i-is it a break… … kehoh, haa haa.”



“Zee— zee— Are you okay… … Ai-chan sensei, zee— zee—”



“Ueppu, is it okay to rest now? Haa haa, it’s okay, right? I’ll take a break now, kay?”



“… … Hyuu— Hyuu.”



“Geho geho, Nagumo-kun and his party are monsters….”



Aiko and her students had less physical strength than what he had expected, so it was necessary to take a break. Naturally, Aiko and her students’ statuses were originally several times higher than the average people of this world, so they didn’t get exhausted until they climbed the sixth mountain. It’s just that the movement speed of Hajime and his party was just too fast, that’s why they climbed the mountain using all their might, and when they noticed it, their physical strength was exhausted and their legs became wobbly.



Aiko and her students desperately gasped for breath on all fours, and Hajime glanced at them with a somewhat troubled look. In any case, he had decided it was necessary to search the surroundings, as they went to the nearby river to let them rest. He was able to determine the location because of the information from the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes. After stating the location to Aiko and her students, who were still breathing roughly, he and his party advanced towards the river. The probability of Will’s party having rested there was also high.



With Yue and Shia in the lead, they strayed from the mountain path and onto the mountain. Rustle, rustle. The sound of fallen leaves was enjoyable as they continued to walk between the trees, and before long they could hear the sound of a river. It was a sound pleasing to the ears. Shia’s ears swayed happily.



Finally Hajime and his party reached the river. It was at a bigger scale compared to a small river. Shia, who held the highest search ability, observed the surroundings while Hajime once again used the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes to search for any presences, and there was no sign of demonic beasts nearby. They relaxed for now. Hajime and the others were sitting on the rock in the riverbank, then they talked about their search plans. Yue took off her shoes and put her feet into the river after saying “Just a little”. It was her selfishness to enjoy the moment. Hajime overlooked it because Aiko and her students still hadn’t caught up to them. He’s a man who spoiled Yue. Shia also took this chance.



Having thought of a possibility, they moved upstream along the riverbank. Hajime moved the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes upstream while he looked at Yue, pasha pasha, playing with the river water with her bare feet. Although Shia was also barefooted, she only put them in the water. The feeling of the river flowing seemed to tickle her.



Aiko and her students, who finally regained their breaths, arrived. They stayed in place as they stared at Hajime and his party. However, the three male students shouted “Is this Heaven?”, with sparkling eyes as they saw the barefooted Yue and Shia, while the female students returned to look at them with cold eyes. It made the male students shudder. When they noticed the gazes from Tamai and the others, Yue and Shia got out of the river.



Aiko and her students were diligently replenishing their moisture in the riverbank. Because of the displeasing gazes from Tamai and the male students a while ago, Yue and Shia returned slight glares, and the male students trembled as they averted their gazes. Having seen such a spectacle, Aiko and the female students looked at Hajime with warm eyes. Especially Sonobe and the female students. Since they had heard various things from Shia, they wore very annoying expressions.



“Fufu, Nagumo-kun truly treasures Yue-san and Shia-san.”



Aiko said such things while smiling. Hajime wanted to say something, but stopped and just shrugged his shoulders when he saw the depressed Sonobe and the other male students. Yue was the one who took action in his stead. As if it were the most natural thing in the world, she suddenly sat on Hajime’s lap.



“… Nn.”



She was so pleased that she entrusted all of her weight to Hajime. It could also be called her proof of trust. Seeing that, Shia, who looked lonely, embraced Hajime from behind. Aiko’s cheeks immediately blushed because a pink-colored space was generated. Sonobe and the female students were shouting, “Kya— kya—”, in excitement. Tamai and the male students ground their teeth.



Hajime being Hajime, without shaking the two off, just averted his gaze. He seemed to be slightly embarrassed. However, Hajime’s expression suddenly sharpened in the next moment.



“… … That is.”



“Nn… … did you find something?”



Having heard Hajime’s muttering while he was looking far into the distance, Yue asked him. Because of his appearance, Aiko and the others blinked their eyes wondering what happened.



“On the river’s upstream… … is that a shield? Also, there are bags… … it looks like they’re still new. It might be a hit. Yue, Shia, let’s go.”



“Nn….”



“Yes!”



Hajime and his party harmoniously stood up and began to prepare for departure. Aiko and the students actually still wanted to rest, and although they knew they were overdoing it, they couldn’t just stand still once they saw that Hajime had found some clues. They laborously raised their still exhausted waists and once again desperately tried to follow Hajime and his party, who were advancing upstream with blistering speed.



At the location Hajime and his party arrived at, just as he confirmed with the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes, small round shields made of metal and bags were scattered around. However, there were dents on the round shields, and the bags were torn up in the middle with their strings pulled out.



Hajime and his party carefully examined their surroundings. Then they found some nearby trees with their barks peeled off of them They were roughly at the two meters of height. It was apparent that the bark was in such state because something had scratched it off, and at that height, it clearly wasn’t the work of humans. Hajime instructed Shia to use her search ability to the fullest, while also using his own perception skill as they approached the barkless trees.



Advancing ahead, they found signs of combat one after another. There were trees and branches that were broken in half. There were also plants that had been trampled, and furthermore, there were fragments of blades and blood scattered around. Everytime they found such traces, the expressions on Aiko and the students’ faces stiffened. For a while, they chased after the signs of combat, and Shia suddenly found something shining.



“Hajime-san, this, isn’t this a pendant?”



“Nn? Aa… … it’s probably something they left behind. Let me confirm it.”



After he washed off the dirt from the pendant he had received from Shia, he noticed it was not just a pendant but also a locket. He removed the clasp and saw what was inside, it was a woman’s photograph. Perhaps, she was someone’s lover or wife. Even though it was not a significant clue, it was not an old one but a recent one… … it could belong to someone from the adventurers’ party. That’s why it’d be kept for now.



Afterwards, they found more articles of the deceased or so they called them, but they only collected items that would allow one to identify their owners. Having searched around for a while, eventually day turned into night, and the time for them to set up camp was approaching.



Even now, there were no signs of life aside from the wild animals. Although they were cautious because of how Will and his party encountered and were attacked by demonic beasts, there were no sign of demonic beasts in their immediate surroundings. Their current location was between the eighth and ninth mountain. From what was said about crossing the mountains, usually, they would encounter one or two demonic beasts, so Hajime and the others could feel the eeriness of this situation.



After a while, the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes once again found a location with abnormalities. There were leftovers of great destruction 300 meters to the east. Hajime urged everyone to rush to that location.



There was a big river. A small waterfall could be seen upstream, and the volume of water was immense, with a violent current. Originally, it was likely to flow straight towards the foot of the mountain, but currently, there was a large and small river branching along the way. It was as though it was gouged by a laser or something, from the flank.



The reason they had such impressions was because the gouged part was a straight line, while the surrounding trees and ground were scorched. Furthermore, as if they had received a big impact, a lot of trees were partly broken and thrown tens of meters to the side. On the riverside, there were big footprints measuring more than 30 centimeters.



“It seems the real combat happened here… … These footprints were of large bipedal demonic beasts… … Surely, there were demonic beast called Brutal beyond the second mountain after this. But, the way the ground was gouged….”



What Hajime described as Brutals were something similar to the Orcs and Ogres in RPG. Although they didn’t have high intelligence, they took action as group. Because they had a weaker version of the peculiar magic; “Vajra”, called “Strong Wall,” they were recognized as quite powerful enemies. They usually descend into the second mountain of the mountain range, but these demonic beasts never came into towns. In addition, they didn’t have any attacks that could make such river tributaries.



Hajime thought of the Brutal as he observed the footprints, he hesitated whether to go upstream or downstream. Although Will’s party had likely to escaped upstream, he thought it would be hard for them to run upstream after such combat. He doubted that they would physically and mentally run further from town.



Hajime decided to direct the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes upstream while they head downstream. Even though the Brutals’ footprints were on the riverside, the possibility of Will and his party jumping into the river was high. If so, he thought they’d likely be swept away because of physical exhaustion.



The others also agreed with Hajime’s speculations, and descended towards downstream on the riverside.



Afterwards, they encountered a much more splendid waterfall compared to the one from before. Hajime and the others nimbly descended from the cliff on the side of the waterfall and landed on the vicinity of the basin. The refreshing wind peculiar to a waterfall healed their minds and bodies which were exhausted from a day of searching. Then, Hajime felt a reaction from his “Sign Perception.”



” ! This is….”



“… … Hajime?”



Yue immediately reacted and asked him. For a while, Hajime concentrated while closing his eyes. Following that, while slowly opening his eyes, he let out a surprised voice.



“Oi oi, seriously. The Sign Perception picked up something. From the feeling, I can say it’s a human. The location is… … in the interior of waterfall’s basin.”



“You mean there are survivors!”



Hajime nodded towards Shia’s words of confirmation. He answered, “Only one person”, when Yue asked for the number of people. Aiko and her students were also surprised. It was something natural. Although the odds of survival were not zero, they actually didn’t expect any at all. It was the fifth day since Will’s party had gone missing. It was a miracle for even one of them to remain alive.



“Yue, please.”



“… … Nn”



While watching the waterfall basin, Hajime called Yue. Yue was able to guess Hajime’s intentions from just those few words, and she shook her right hand as the magic’s trigger.



“”Wave Castle,” “Wind Wall”.”



Then, the water in the waterfall and its basin began to split in two just like the Red Sea in Moses’ legend. Moreover, the scattered water was perfectly brushed off by the wall of wind. It was the result of water magic making a high-pressure wall of water called “Wave Castle,” and wind magic called “Wind Wall.”



Without chanting, magic of two different attributes were activated at the same time. Having seen how they were used, Aiko and her students, although they didn’t remember how many times they had done it, dropped their jaws in astonishment. Surely, the Hebrew people also displayed such expressions.



Because her magic power was not infinite, Hajime urged Aiko and the others on, as he led them into the interior of the waterfall basin’s cave. The cave they entered immediately curved upward, and they arrived at quite a large cavity. Water and light poured down from the ceiling, and the fallen water flowed into the water pool below. The reason it didn’t overflow was surely because they continued flowing inside.



They discovered a man lying down in the innermost part of the cave. When they arrived at the man’s side, they confirmed that he was a young man, around 20 years of age. Although he looked like a noble, he currently looked pale and displayed the complexion of a dead person. However, there was no large injury, and because there was food remaining inside his bag, he was simply sleeping. His bad complexion was surely related to how he was the only one here.



Having seen the anxious Aiko, and because Hajime wanted to immediately identify the young man’s identity, he used his artificial arm, while restraining his power to the limit, to flick the sleeping young man’s forehead.



BACHIKONh!!



“Guwah!!”



He screamed as he woke up, the young man writhed while covering his forehead with both hands. Aiko and her students shuddered because of the powerful and merciless forehead flick. Hajime ignored Aiko and the students, and approached the young man with teary eyes to ask his name.



“You, are you Will Kudeta? The third son of Count Kudeta.”



“Ah, eh, you are, just how on earth did you guys get here…”



Because the young man only blinked as he couldn’t grasp the situation, Hajime once again made a stance to flick his forehead and slowly aimed at it.



“Answer my question. I’ll increase the power by 20 percent every time you say something other than the answer.”



“Eh, eh!?”



“You, are you Will Kudeta?”



“Umm, uwah, yes! That’s right! I am Will Kudeta! Yes!”



For a moment, when the young man hesitated in answering, Hajime’s eyes gave off a dangerous light, and he immediately thrust out his left hand. The panicked young man immediately announced his name. Apparently, he was truly the person in question. He seemed to have miraculously survived.



“I see. I am Hajime. Nagumo Hajime. I have come here on the request of the head of Fhuren’s branch guild, Ilwa Chang. (For my convenience) It’s good that you’re alive.”



“Ilwa-san!? Is that so. Once again… … I am indebted to that person… …Umm, I am thankful to you. You must be a remarkable person to receive a request directly from Ilwa-san.”



Will voiced gratitude with respectful eyes. It seemed he didn’t mind the forehead flick with unbelievable power from a little while ago. If so, he might be an unexpectedly good person. A great difference than a pig from somewhere. After that, having introduced everyone, they heard the story of what happened to Will.



This was the summary.



Five days ago, Will’s party came to the vicinity of the upper part of fifth mountain using the mountain path just like Hajime and the others. Suddenly, they encountered ten Brutals. As expected, they couldn’t win against the number of Brutals they encountered, so Will’s party tried to withdraw. But, the number of attacking Brutals kept increasing, and they were by the river of the sixth mountain when they noticed it. Then, the Brutals encircled them, so for the sake of escaping from the encirclement. Two people; trifling and unimportant soldiers, were sacrificed After that, when they arrived at a big river, despair appeared.



It appeared to be a jet-black Dragon. As soon as Will’s party came along the river bank, the Black Dragon let out breath, and Will was blown off into the river by the attack. From what he saw while being swept away, one person vanished because of the breath, while the other two were attacked from both sides, by Brutals from the back and the Dragon from the front.



Will fell into the basin of the waterfall after he was swept away as is, he went into the cave he had found by chance, and he seemed to have been hiding here ever since.



Somehow, it sort of resembled what may or may not have happened to a certain someone.



Will, as he told them that, was feeling proud of it, and then suddenly started to sob. It was not something unreasonable, the senior adventurers taught him the know-how for adventurers and took care of him even though one of them wore a displeased face. Without confirming their safety, the pathetic him was only able to tremble in fear and wait for help to come, the him who felt relieved because his rescue came while his companions were dead, various feelings continuously emerged and his tears overflowed.



“I-I am d wost. Wuu, aljo evyone ish ded, I din’t ju anyching. Hikk, fer me chu be d cole curvibor… oso, sniff… chu fil relif… I—!”



(I am the worst. Wuu, although everyone is dead, I didn’t do anything. Hikk, for me to be the sole survivor… Also, sniff… to feel relieved… I—!)



Will’s wails echoed inside the cave. No one could say anything to him. Toward the Will who blamed himself with tears flowing down his face, they didn’t know which words would be good for him. The students looked at Will with sorrowful expressions, while Aiko gently patted Will’s back. Yue was expressionless as usual, while Shia looked troubled.



But, at the moment Will found himself at a loss for words, an unexpected person moved. It was Hajime. Hajime, approached Will and gripped Will’s collar. He used his inhuman strength to hang him mid-air. Following that, towards the Will who was in pain because he couldn’t breathe, Hajime spoke with an unexpectedly permeating voice.



“What is wrong with wanting to live? What is wrong with being glad because you’re alive? That wish and feeling are something natural and inevitable. Even more so because you’re a human.”



“B-but… … I was….”



“Even so, if you’re worried about those who died… … then continue to live. From now on keep living as you struggle, and struggle as if you’re going to die. If you do that, someday… … there might come a day when you understand the reason why you survived today.”



“… … Keep living.”



Even while crying, Will repeated Hajime’s words in blank surprise. Hajime violently threw Will down, he tsukkomi’ed himself with, “What have I done,” his words just now, more than half of them were directed towards himself. Will’s situation was a little similar to his, and for him to belittle his own life was like saying, “It’s wrong for you to survive,” towards Hajime, so he was inadvertently angered.



Of course it was just his persecution complex. More than half of it was said on an outburst of anger, so it wasn’t different from a child’s tantrum. Even though he had seen through various things, Hajime was still a 17 year old boy, and there was still more for him to learn. Hajime knew he had fallen into slight self-loathing. Having seen such a Hajime, Yue came to his side and grasped Hajime’s hand tightly.



“… … It’s okay, Hajime isn’t wrong.”



“… … Yue.”



“… … Live to your best. Keep living on. Together with me, right?”



“… … Haha, ah of course. I’ll keep on living no matter what might happen… … so, don’t leave me alone.”



“… … Nn.”



They left Will who was still talking to himself, then Hajime and Yue created a world with just the two of them. He couldn’t match Yue, and Hajime gently stroked Yue’s cheek, while Yue was also being spoiled and let his hand stroke her cheek. Not understanding what happened to cause such a development, Aiko and her students could only blink, while Shia watched Hajime and Yue with half-opened eyes.



The chaotic situation continued for a while (thanks to Hajime’s recklessness), and somehow everyone managed to regain their senses. The party then decided to immediately descend the mountain. There was still more than an hour before sunset, so if they hurried, they would likely reach the foot of the mountain by the time the sun set.



Although they were concerned about the Brutals and the jet-black Dragon, those were outside Hajime and his party’s mission. It was unthinkable to continue the investigation while having to protect those with low combat potential. Will also understood that he would just be a hindrance, so he understood that they must withdraw. Although the students insisted on continuing the investigation because of their slight sense of justice that came from the troubled townspeople, Aiko stubbornly refused to investigate because of the great danger the Black Dragon and Brutals posed. In the end, they descended the mountain.



However, nothing proceeds smoothly. Once again, they were passionately welcomed when the party got out of the waterfall basin with Yue’s magic.



“GUuRURURURU.”



Letting out a low groan, with its whole body covered in jet-black scales, its golden eyes glared at them in mid-air while fluttering its wings… … it was the “Dragon.”





Volume 6 Chapter 8




The dragon’s length was at least seven meters. With its whole body covered in jet-black scales, there were five sharp claws on each of its long forelegs. Big wings grew from its back which were slightly shining as they were clad with magic power. Every time it flapped the wings an unbelievable gust of wind appeared, even after taking the size of it’s wings into account. However, its most impressive feature was its golden eyes that floated in the night like moons. Its eyes that closed vertically like a reptile’s, were dangerously narrowed as they released beautiful light.



The golden eyes were glaring at Hajime and the others from the air. A low groan was leaked from the Black Dragon’s throat. Its overwhelming power couldn’t be compared to the Hyveria he saw at the bottom of Raisen Grand Canyon’s ravine. Although Hyverias themselves were generally recognized as troublesome, high level demonic beasts, when compared to the Black Dragon before them, it was as if they were small birds. Its majestic appearance made it suited as the king of the sky.



Just like a frog being stared at by a snake, Aiko and the others stiffened. Will was especially pale faced and gatagata, trembled as if he would collapse at any moment. Inside his mind, he might be having flashback from when he was attacked.



Hajime had already seen the claw marks from the Black Dragon’s attack that created branches off the river. He thought it must be a very strong demonic beast, but feeling the magic power and pressure from the Black Dragon in front of his eyes, he revised that it was three times of what he had imagine. Remembering the demonic beasts in the Abyss, it was not as strong as the Hydra, but he could feel that it had the same power as class of demonic beasts from 90th floor.



The Black Dragon confirmed Will’s appearance and girori, sharpened its glare. Following that, in front of the stiffened humans, it slowly lifted its head and concentrated its magic inside the opened jaws where sharp fangs lined up.



KYUuWAaAAA!!



A mysterious timbre began to dye the sunset and reverberated throughout the mountains. Inside Hajime’s mind, he remembered the Breath attack that erased the adventurers on the river.



“Kh! Evacuate!”



Having issued the warning, Hajime immediately leaped away from his location to evacuate. Yue and Shia followed after him. However, some people were unable to react to his warning, no, in this case it could be said most of them.



Aiko, the students, and even Will were stiffened and didn’t move from their spots. Aiko and the students’ bodies were unable to keep up with such a sudden event, while Will was bound by fear that made him unable to even avert his gaze.



“Tch!!”



“Hajime!”



“Hajime-san!”



Hajime issued an order to Yue and Shia using “Telepathy,” then he suddenly returned to his previous location using “Ground Shrinker” and stood between Aiko’s party and the dragon. Normally, he’d just leave. He didn’t feel bad about abandoning Aiko, rather, he didn’t understand why she came here to search for Will who miraculously survived. But, his “job” was to bring him back if he was alive. That’s why Hajime couldn’t abandon him.



Hajime took out a two meters, coffin-like, large shield from the “Treasure Box” into the empty space, he thrust his left arm and linked it to the shield. As he poured his magic power, on the lower part of the shield gashun!, a stake appeared. Following that, it mightily pierced the ground.



Immediately, a straight, black, laser-like Breath fired from the dragon. The Breath didn’t let out any sound and immediately reached Hajime’s large shield. The impact accompanied by a tremendous roar and the heatwave released melted the ground around the large shield.



“Guu! Ooooo!!”



Hajime let out a roar filled with spirit as he resisted the Breath’s pressure. Before one was aware, Hajime’s body and the large shield let out bright red light. It came from Hajime’s “Vajra.” However, the Breath seemed to carry greater power, so after he resisted it for a while, his defense was penetrated as the large shield received a direct hit.



Even so, the large shield still endured the Breath. Power that penetrated Hajime’s “Vajra” and heat gradually melted its surface, and it’d fall apart at any time, but Hajime used “Transmutation” to restore it. He wouldn’t let any more breakthrough than this.



The stake that penetrated the ground to fix his location was defeated by the pressure, as he gradually pushed back. Hajime transmuted his soles into spikes, and once again, Hajime used Vajra to resist the Breath. The large shield was connected to his outstretched left arm, and he also affixed his right arm to it.



The large shield Hajime took out was using Taur ore as its main material while Star ore was placed in-between and the exterior was coated with Azanthium. Because Hajime was a Transmutation Master, even with an attack that exceed Azanthium’s durability, it’s possible to restore it if it could endure even for a few seconds. Even if that was penetrated, the Star ore in the second layer had a nature to strengthened if supplied with magic power, and Hajime’s magic power wouldn’t allow anymore penetration.



That’s why, the Breath that could exceed Azanthium wouldn’t be able to destroy the large shield. However, it couldn’t be said that power wouldn’t be able to blown the large shield’s user away. In fact, Hajime who possessed inhuman power was gradually pushed back. On the ground were the gouged out marks from the large shield’s stake that pierced it and Hajime’s feet.



If this keep up, Hajime who equipped with large shield and “Vajra,” along with his inhuman endurance wouldn’t receive considerable damage. But if Hajime lost the shield, Aiko and the others would fall prey to the breath, and disappear from this world without even leaving a speck of dust behind.



When Hajime became somewhat impatient, an unexpectedly soft feeling was transmitted to his back. As he stole a glance over his shoulder, somehow, Aiko had jumped towards his back and supported him desperately. Apparently, while Hajime was resisting the Breath, she regained her senses and jumped to support Hajime who was gradually being pushed back. Having seen that, the students and Will also jumped to support Hajime, in panic.



The Breath continued even now. The surrounding water in the river was evaporated by the heatwave, the soil and stones on the riverbank were blown away by the impact and in awful state. From the time he received the direct hit from the Breath, a little time had passed. Hajime felt it had happen for an eternity, but actually no longer than ten seconds had passed. While he grit his teeth and thought about it, finally, he heard the long-awaited voice.



“”Cursed Sky”.”



At the moment the magic’s name was announced, a black, swirling orb of four meters in diameter appeared above the Black Dragon. The deep darkness that could suck in anyone who saw it, immediately fell and crushed the Black Dragon into the ground.



“GuuRUaAAA!?”



A roar came as the Black Dragon sprawled on the ground, and its Breath was interrupted when it raised a scream from the impact. However, the swirling orb, as if saying that’s not enough, didn’t disappear and exerted extreme pressure on the Black Dragon, sinking it into the ground.



“Cursed Sky”



It was Yue’s Gravity magic. By creating a swirling gravity ball, it crushed its target using supergravity that was proportional to the amount of consumed magic power. It was a convenient magic that could change its direction using the gravitational force.



The Gravity magic didn’t consume much magic power if targeted towards the caster itself. However, if the gravity ball was used to attack things, space, and other people, just like what happened just now, it consumed huge amount of magic power and Yue at the least need ten seconds to prepare it. Because Yue herself still hadn’t completely master this magic, the invocation time and magic consumption could still become much more efficient by training.



The sky king was crucified on the ground, it painfully braced its limbs to somehow escape from the pressuring attack. But, immediately following that were the rabbit ears that came fluttering from the sky and Shia was shouting, “Stop~!”, as she fell together with Doryukken. Holding the sledgehammer which was further accelerated by outburst, she used the high-stance aimed at the Black Dragon’s head.



DOoGAaAAA!!!



The impact was incomparable to any impact that had happened before. At the moment of impact, the ground burst and flew radially, accompanied by a thundering sound, it created a crater that looked like a result of a bombing. That was thanks to Doryukken’s remodelling by Hajime. Gravity magic was granted to the compressed Azhantium that was the main material. However, it was not the one that “neutralized” like the ones in the unmanned reconnaissance planes, but the opposite where the ore could “increase its weight.” The weight increased according to the amount of magic power supplied. The current Doryukken was just like *****ton Hammer!, just like the one inside the manga.



Furthermore, those who received the ultra-heavy blow wouldn’t be able to escape from serious damage. That’s right, if it was directly hit….



“Guruaaa!!”



Together with the Black Dragon’s roar, a flame bullet approached Yue at tremendous speed from inside the dust that scattered by Doryukken. Yue immediately did an emergency evasion by “falling” to the right. However, the gravity ball magic was canceled instead.



The dust was cleared up as the after-effect of the previous flame bullet, and there was the Black Dragon who managed to evade Doryukken which sunk to the ground by a paper-thin margin. At the moment of impact, it seemed to somehow evade using the peculiar strength of a dragon. Having its restraints removed, the Black Dragon did one rotation in high-speed as if trying to dispel its grudge and its large mass of a tail hit Shia who was just pulling out Doryukken.



“Agh!!”



By a hair’s breadth, Shia used Doryukken as a shield and jumped back to kill the impact, because she was greatly blown away at the same time, she disappeared into the trees.



The Black Dragon used the momentum from the rotation and recovered its posture, and its golden eyes were glaring at Hajime… … not, just passed towards Will behind him. Hajime immediately put the large shield back into “Treasure Box,” then pulled out Donner-Schlag and fired them. Many roars resounded, accompanied by flashes that cut through the sky and attacked the Black Dragon. Without being able to evade, the Black Dragon received direct hits from the storm of destruction, blown away from its spot, and thrown into the river with a tremor, creating a magnificent sprays.



Because Hajime thought it’d be bad for Will to be in its line of fire, he charged at the Black Dragon. Using gunspin in mid-air to reload Donner-Schlag in his hands, he repeatedly fired in succession just like before. However, the Black Dragon got up accompanied with roar that scattered the river’s water, somehow, it ignored Hajime and fired a flame bullet that was aimed at Will.



“Kh!”



Because it aimed at Willl, Hajime dared to approach it and tried to attack furiously to gain its attention. But, the Black Dragon acted as if it didn’t even care if Hajime was there, continue to target Will.



“Yue!”



“Nh “Wave Castle”.”



“Hih!”, was the miserable scream that came from the cowering Will, and in front of him was high-density wall of water. The flame bullet was obstructed by the rampart-like wall of water created by Yue and disappeared. And, at that time, the students finally regained their senses from this raging development and began to chant their magic. They were trying to support the party. Quickly, fire bullets and wind blades rushed towards the Black Dragon as they created archs.



However….



“GOoAAA!!”



The impact from the dragon’s roar dispersed the attacks. Moreover, having heard the tremendous roar and stared by the golden eyes, Will let out similar “Hih,” scream as he backed away and fell on his butt, reaching the female students’ spot.



Hajime, who completely judged her to be outside of the combat assets, shouted at Aiko to escape. Aiko was hesitating. Hajime was also Aiko’s student after all, so to left him in front of this powerful demonic beast made her hesitate as a teacher.



At that time, the Black Dragon began to flap its wings and flew into the sky while blowing the surroundings river water away. In addition, it rapidly shot flame bullets at Will.



Although Hajime had fired the railguns in quick succession, he couldn’t get its attention at all. The Black Dragon’s scales, similar to scorpion-like thing that boasted its hardness in the past, was only slightly scratched even after receiving direct hits from the railguns.



The Black Dragon stubbornly targeted Will. It was as if it was being manipulated by something. It faithfully obeyed the order like a robot. It kept trying to kill Will even after being restrained by gravity before, it seemed to think nothing of those who tried to obstruct it.



Although Hajime didn’t understand why it obstinately targeted Will, it was a convenient thing, since its target was already decided, so he gave out an instruction to Yue.



“Yue! Protect Will! I’ll defeat this guy!”



“Nh, leave it to me!”



Hearing Hajime’s instruction, Yue immediately “fell” towards Will, and stood in front of him. When she snuck a look at her back, irritation surfaced when she saw Aiko and the students who couldn’t move well in this situation and she muttered in displeasure.



“… … If you don’t want to die, hide behind me.”



The students were trivials, but regarding Aiko, Hajime was at least concerned about her, so she let out those words to not let her die. Incidentally, she had already forgotten how Aiko became a hindrance to them.



The students moved closer to Yue without particularly reacting to Yue’s cold words. They realized by Yue’s side was the safest place, thanks to the rampart of ice that chantlessly constructed using the surrounding moisture.



Normally, they’d have the ability to fight some more. But, no matter even if they knew Hajime was alive, the day they were almost killed by the Behemoth and Traum Soldiers as well as how Hajime fell to his “death” into the abyss still traumatized their minds. They followed Aiko because even if they couldn’t join the hero group in the dungeon, they couldn’t just half ass things.Even so, their magic was ineffective against the Black Dragon, coupled with the roar filled with killing intent, made their heart completely withered. Their mental state was completely unsuited for combat.



Because Yue was there, Hajime was assured of Will’s safety, and concentrated on attacking. The flying Black Dragon was concentrating on destroying Yue’s defensive wall, as it targeting Will on the other side of the wall, even now. However, flame bullets were incapable of penetrating the wall, then it raised its head in an arch again as it realized it. It began to focus magic power inside its mouth.



“Hah, it’s the first time I’ve been ignored this far… … that’s why, I’ll do anything to make you not ignoring me!”



As Hajime put back Donner into its holster, he took out Schlagen from the “Treasure Box.” Immediately after he activated “Lightning-clad,” the three meters weapon with an atrocious form let out bright red sparks. As expected, the Black Dragon realized Hajime’s next move was a dangerous one, and it turned its mouth, aiming at Hajime. It was just like Hajime had predicted: it couldn’t ignore him.



At the same time the Black Dragon fired the death spreading Breath, Hajime’s Schlagen finished the loading and fired.



They let out the same extreme flash. They became a storm of death. Black and red aurora were clashing against each other. At the moment of collision, a terrific shock wave was generated and the surrounding trees were blown away. Just by power alone, they were probably equal. However, the two auroras clearly divided between the victor and the loser from their nature. Although the Breath continued to let out an excellent aurora, Schlagen was specialized in penetrating through a single point. Therefore, the Breath was inevitably broken through, and that power reached the Black Dragon.



The head of the Black Dragon which fired the Breath suddenly curved upward. The full-metal jacket made out of star ore penetrated the Breath and hit the dragon’s opened mouth. However, the wound was far from a mortal one. With the bending of the Breath’s trajectory and power, several of its sharp fangs evaporated and as it nearly passed through the side of its head, it stopped before one of its wings on its back was blown off.



“GURUaAAA!!”



The Black Dragon fell as it spun towards the ground and let out a pained scream. Hajime was fortunately able to evade the Breath using “Aerodynamic,” and while he was upside down in mid-air he used “Aerodynamic”‘s “Ground Shrinker.” As he dived at high-speed, he used “Grand Leg” to attack the Black Dragon’s abdomen.



ZUDONh! The lower abdomen let out a roaring sound from the impact, and the Black Dragon’s body folded. The ground was radially cracked by the impact. It couldn’t be said that the damage was considerable even though the Black Dragon let out a scream. Its armor was capable of enduring the Railguns after all. However, having assumed that, Hajime attacked further as he greatly held out the artificial left arm. KIiIIIII!!! Machine-like sounds came from the artificial arm. The “Oscillation Smash” he used before fell down.



It was Hajime’s fist of destruction that was thrust in high speed and was capable of pulverizing a large boulder in a single blow, and it mercilessly attacked the Black Dragon’s abdomen.



DOoGUuUU!!



Along with the muffled sound, the scales on the abdomen were cracked. With the purpose of transmitting the impact, its insides received considerable damage from this attack, and the Black Dragon raised a pained voice again as it vomited large amounts of blood from its mouth. Maybe because it thought it’d be dangerous if this kept up, the Black Dragon poured its magic power in one of its wings and a windstorm appeared, then it tried to forcefully regain its posture. Once again, Hajime used “Aerodynamic” to evade. He didn’t forget to leave a parting gift.



At the moment the Black Dragon turned its golden eyes towards Hajime who escaped into the air, a big explosion occurred under its abdomen. The dragon’s gigantic figure flew two meters from the surface from the impact. Hajime’s parting gift was a “Grenade.”



“KUuWAaAA!!”



Receiving an impact at the same place as before, it couldn’t be helped that it was unable to raise a scream and only let out a muffled groan. With its head drooped to endure it, blood was flowing from the Black Dragon’s mouth. Somehow, its groan weakened.



Maybe because the Black Dragon recognized Hajime as a threat, it looked away from Will towards Hajime and rapid-fired flame bullets from its mouth. The flame bullets flew through the air as if they were anti-aircraft fire. However, none of the fire hit Hajime. Hajime was using “Aerodynamic” and “Ground Shrinker” simultaneously to freely run in the sky, leaving after-images, Hajime knocked down the Black Dragon using Hit & Away tactic.



He fired Donner-Schlag from medium range at nasty places such as the claws, gums, eyes, tail’s base, and butt. In the next moment, he drew closer and used the combo of “Oscillation Smash” from the shotshell outburst + “Grand Arm” to hit the head and flank.



“KURUu, GUWANN!”



Somewhat, no, the Black Dragon certainly began to give out a weeping voice. With its scales cracked all over the place, a large amount of blood dripped from its mouth.



“Incredible….”



Having watched Hajime’s fight, Tamai Atsushi spontaneously muttered that from the safety area behind Yue. Without having to say it, the other students and Aiko were silently agreeing as they nodded, and they were unable to look away from the overwhelming fight. As for Will, he intensely watched Hajime with sparkling eyes as if he didn’t remember he was trembling in front of the Black Dragon before.



By the way, unbeknownst to them Shia had returned and tried to enter combat, only to be stopped by Yue who had guessed Hajime’s intentions. Currently, she watched him together with Yue by her side. Having been blown away at the beginning, she actually felt somewhat depressed.



Hajime didn’t immediately pull out Schlagen, Orkan, and the others because he thought it was a good chance to show off his fighting prowess to Aiko and the students. Although the Black Dragon was certainly sturdy and the power of one of its attacks was to be feared, it’s easier to attack its huge body if one fought calmly, and its attacks were monotonous. So, it was possible for him to put into practice “no matter what, it won’t hit,” after all it was an opponent Hajime could go easy on. Because he’d separate from Aiko and the students, to put a hard-line so the Church and Kingdom wouldn’t be relaxed when the heroes received the information from Aiko, he thought of showing off his true power to them.



Because of that, although Hajime completely knocked down the pitiful Black Dragon, he held gratitude towards it in his mind. Even though there were cracks all over the place, none of the scales were completely crushed in the least. Truly significant durability. Because he remembered the scorpion-like thing, to be sure of it, he used “Mineral Appraisal” on the scales and because there was no reaction, it seemed it was a mineral that couldn’t be transmutated.



Slowly, because he thought it was enough to make them understand his true strength, it was about time for the finishing blow. He slipped onto the Black Dragon’s chest in an instant, and kicked with “Grand Leg” to roll him back towards its abdomen. Following that, he pulled out the Pile Bunker from the “Treasure Box” on the Black Dragon’s abdomen.



From the direction of Will and the others, he could hear a clamor but decided to ignore it. The anchors fired, and the arms fixed its location on the Black Dragon. Following that, he released “Lightning-clad.” The reason he chose the Pile Bunker was because he couldn’t pull out all of its power inside the Raisen Great Dungeon, so he wanted to do an actual combat test.



The stake which coated in Azanthium started to rotate intensely inside, and the Pile Bunker let out bright red sparks. If this kept up, the four ton stake would mercilessly end the Black Dragon’s life.



However, just like the proverb “a cornered rat will bite the cat,” a wounded beast was something one should be cautious of. It was the same as the Black Dragon.



“GUuGAaAAAA!!!”



Along with the Black Dragon’s roar, a violent blast was generated towards all directions. It was an explosion made of pure magic power. In addition, using a moment to strengthen its body to the limit and the explosive power from its muscles, the anchors that pierced the ground to fix the Pile Bunker were raised and at the same time it pried open the arms with its muscles. Following that, it turned around in an instant to shake Hajime off.



“Uoh!?”



Hajime instinctively stepped back. The heavy Pile Bunker was, the Pile Bunker that was on the verge of firing was turned to target the sky, and the stake that was accelerated to its max launched into the sky. A straight line that made ones narrow their eyes ascended through the sky, and Hajime who put the Pile Bunker into the “Treasure Box” confirmed the Black Dragon used its last struggle to move towards Will.



“Tch, Shia!” “Y-Yes”



As he clicked his tongue towards this blunder, Hajime called Shia. Shia, having realized his intentions, jumped towards the sky using the rampart of ice, and let out a yell so she wouldn’t be blown away this time. With the free fall and the outburst from the shotshell, she fell towards the Black Dragon just like a meteor.



If it was the normal Black Dragon, it’d be able to avoid it, but the Black Dragon that was literally in its last struggle didn’t have room for that, it was unable to avoid the hammer. Shia, who held the ultra-heavy Doryukken in a high-stance, further poured her magic power to explosively increase its weight. Subsequently, it directly hit the crown of the Black Dragon’s head without missing an inch as it let out a thundering sound.



The Black Dragon’s head sank to the ground, and its lower body floated as it stood on its hands because it was in the middle of a charge. After a moment of stillness, it finally fell down and made the earth tremor.



Shia, who pulled out Doryukken from the Black Dragon’s head that was on the ground, was surprised by what she saw. It was something natural. Although the Black Dragon’s head was smashed and considerably cracked, it wasn’t completely broken. It was truly dreadful durability.



Hajime came towards the Black Dragon from behind. Also, the stake launched from the Pile Bunker pierced the ground between Hajime and the Black Dragon. Hajime knew the sprawled dragon wasn’t dead by percepting its presence, next, he suddenly recalled the talk with Mottou about the Ryujin race from before. The one about “kicking a dragon’s ass.”



Hajime pulled out the stake that pierced the ground using “Grand Arm” and carried it on his shoulder as he positioned himself before the base of the Black Dragon’s tail. Following that, he made a stance just like a javelin thrower. Naturally, in his hand was the Pile Bunker’s stake.



Everyone there was able to guess what Hajime was going to do, and their cheeks convulsed. Even though the scales were troublesome, it shouldn’t be a good thing to thrust it there(··). Even though Yue, Shia, and the others floated expressions of horror towards Hajime’s mercilessness, Hajime only thought of that as blowing wind.



And finally, Hajime’s Pile Bunker mightily pierced the Black Dragon’s “bleep” and zuburi sound resounded. At that moment,



“Ah— — — nanojyaaaaa — — — !!!”



With its eyes immediately opened wide, the Black Dragon let out a heartbreaking scream as it woke up. In truth, having thrust half of the stake and using his fist to make it pierce further, as expected, even Hajime was surprised by the scream that obviously came from the Black Dragon, and he inadvertently removed his clasped fist.



“Ass is~, this one’s ass is~”



Because of the Black Dragon’s grieving, painful, and somewhat excited tone, everyone let out a “What the heck is this!?” in amazement as they stared at the Black Dragon while stunned.



Apparently, it didn’t end as just a normal dragon subjugation.





Volume 6 Chapter 9




“I-it’s pulling~, it’s pulling out this one’s ass~”



On the mountain side of the northern mountain range, where trees were mowed down and the dried up river was in ruins, a truly miserable voice rang out. It was a woman’s voice. A voice that was not spoken, but rang out just like a wide area version of telepathy. Because a dragon’s vocal chords and mouth were incapable of speaking human words, it definitely used a method to transmit words through air vibrations.



However, it was impossible for demonic beasts to speak in human words in the first place. Currently, the only confirmed case was the human-faced fish from somewhere. Even among the general population, there shouldn’t be an existence such as a demonic beast capable of understanding human language. Furthermore, the existence of the Black Dragon right before their eyes was strange in and of itself. It was the first thing to ever endure so many shots of Hajime’s railguns excluding the ones in Great Dungeons. Moreover, although there were powerful demonic beasts that could fire such Breath, they shouldn’t exist around this place. If they lived here, then the danger should already be widely known.



Therefore, he deduced two possibilities as to why it’s here. First: it was possible this Black Dragon came from further than the fifth mountain range, a completely unknown demonic beast. Following that, the other one was….



“You… … don’t tell me, are you from the Ryuujin race?”



“Mu? Indeed. This one came from the prideful Ryuujin race. Isn’t that great? Isn’t that amazing? That’s why, although this one wants to pull it out of this one’s ass… … this one’s magic power is about to be cut off. If this one returns to original form in this situation… … it’ll be awful… … this one’s ass will.”



Hajime thought it couldn’t be possible, but the Black Dragon replied, saying he was correct. Hajime was surprised in the “edge” of his mind. Just how many times since he coming to this world did he meet “rare existences.” Yue was from the Vampire race that should have been annihilated in the wars 300 years ago. Shia was the current generation’s atavism, and right before his eyes was the Black Dragon who came from the Ryuujin race, which was believed to have been annihilated more than 500 years ago.



“… … Why are you in this place?”



While Hajime was still surprised, Yue continued to ask the Black Dragon. The Ryuujin race was a legend even for Yue. She was interested in whether or not it was the only living one of its race, just like her. The light of curiosity dwelled in her eyes.



“Well, more importantly, the ass… … the amount of magic power remaining is about… … eh, ah, please stop! Poking it is not good! The stimulation—! The stimulation—~!”



Because the Black Dragon ignored Yue’s question, speaking with a delinquent-like attitude, Hajime said, “You dare to ignore Yue’s question, Aa?,” while using his fist to drive in the stake sprouting from the Black Dragon’s butt. With the shock directly spreading inside its body, the Black Dragon let out a scream as it writhed. Its dignified appearance as if it was a death god when they first met was just like an illusion because not even a bit of that remained.



“Just why would the should be perished Ryuujin race be here, attacking mere adventurers… … I also want to hear about that. Normally, I’d just pierce your ass as is, but I’ll delay that to hear your story. Well then, tell me briefly.”



Hajime thought the actions of this legendary Ryuujin race were too unnatural. Normally he’d be merciless, but he slightly delayed that as he urged it to speak. And he continued to grind the stake with his hand.



“Ah, kuh, stop grinding it~ nanojya~. I-I’ll tell you!”



Hajime’s action astonished the surrounding others, but Hajime didn’t mind them. Because it couldn’t talk if he kept it up, Hajime stopped the grinding. However, his hand was still affixed to the stake. The Black Dragon was relieved when the grinding stopped as it let out a sigh. Following that, it began to talk about its circumstances in a somewhat hurried tone. The captivated tone must be just their imagination.



“This one was being manipulated by someone. This one didn’t have any intention to attack thou. The temporary master ordered this one to find the young man over there and his companion and kill them.”



The Black Dragon turned its gaze towards Will. Will was twitching for a moment and his body trembled, then he firmly returned the Black Dragon’s gaze. Having seen Hajime’s fight, he must have settled something.



“What do you mean?”



“Umu, this one will talk in order. This one….”



When the Black Dragon’s talk was summarized, it became something like this.



It seemed this Black Dragon went out of the Ryuujin race’s hidden town for a certain purpose. Its purpose was to investigate the visitors from another world. Although the details were omitted, there was a person with high magic perception inside the Ryuujin race, and it seemed that person perceived a huge magic discharge and some things arrived to this world several months ago.



Although the Ryuujin race had a law which prevented from involving themselves on the surface stage, but just as expected, to leave the the matter of unknown visitors as an unknown was something that’d be dangerous, even for them. After some discussion, they decided to start the investigation.



The Black Dragon before them left the hidden town with the purpose of investigation. Normally, it’d turn into human form after passing the mountain range, then it’d work hard in secretly gathering information, but it thought to rest a little before that, and it seemed to have taken a rest in the vicinity of first and second mountain range. Naturally, it used the Ryuujin race’s peculiar magic; “Dragon Form” and turned into the Black Dragon because there were demonic beasts in the surroundings.



And then a man completely covered in black robe from head to toe appeared in front of the sleeping Black Dragon. That man gradually gnawed on the thoughts and mind of the sleeping Black Dragon using the using a variety of brainwashing and suggestion magic from the dark magic system.



Naturally, if that happened it’d usually counterattack. But the Ryuujin race had a bad habit. That’s right, it was the one that became the origin of that proverb. Ryuujin race that entered deep sleep in dragon form wouldn’t be easily awaken. However, it was as long as no one kicked its ass. Even so, Ryuujin race boasted the toughness of their willpower, so it shouldn’t be easy to manipulate it.



Then, for how it was able to be perfectly manipulated. That was….



“That man is frightening. His aptitude in dark magic can be called the level of a genius. That man continuously used magic for one full day. So no matter how strong this one is, this one couldn’t endured it after all….”



It’s the greatest mistake of this one’s life!, was the feeling that came from the Black Dragon’s sorrowful voice. However, Hajime just tsukkomi’ed that with cold eyes.



“In other words, having come here to investigate, how can you not notice magic being used for a full day, just because you’re fast asleep?”



Everyone’s eyes look somewhat foolish. The Black Dragon turned its gaze towards the day after tomorrow, and it continued its story as if nothing happened. By the way, the reason it knew it took a full day was because it was still conscious even after the completion of brainwashing, and heard the culprit grumbling, “For it to take one full day….”.



Afterwards, obeying the robed man, it helped brainwash the demonic beasts in the second mountain range. Then, on a certain day, the Brutal army was moved to the first mountain range, and they encountered Will’s party who were undertaking the investigation request. Having received the order to kill any witnesses, it chased after them. This one alone reported to the robed man. For some reason, it seemed it’d be bad if the fact he had brainwashed a lot of demonic beasts was revealed, so he ordered the Black Dragon to do a complete search.



Then, by the time it’d noticed it, it was already knocked down by Hajime, and panicked because she’d be dead if this kept up. That’s why it exploded its magic power.



Following that, at the time it was going to do suicide attack according to instructions ingrained in its brainwashed brain. Its consciousness was blown away after Shia’s attack. In the next moment, its mind immediately woke up from an indescribable stimulation and impact to its ass. It didn’t know whether it was the blow to its head or its ass that made it regain its senses.



“… … Stop playing around.”



Towards the Black Dragon who finished its story came a shaking voice that was desperately trying to suppress its fury. Everyone turned their glances towards that person. With his fists clenched, Will’s aimed his anger filled eyes towards the Black Dragon.



“… … Just because you were manipulated… … Gale-san was—, Navarre-san was—, Lento-san was—, Waslee-san was—, Kurt-san was—! Killed but that couldn’t be helped you say!”



Apparently, he was angry because he understood why the adventurers were killed. He raised a voice filled with fury towards the Black Dragon.



“… …”



The confronted Black Dragon didn’t raise any rebuttal. It just received all of Will’s words with calm eyes as it gazed at him. He was unable to stomach that attitude.



“In the first place, your story can’t be proven to be true! You most likely made it up because you didn’t want to die!”



“… … What was spoken just now is the truth. For the Ryuujin race’s pride doesn’t allow this one to lie.”



Now, Will tried to argued vehemently. But, Yue intervened.



“… … Surely, it didn’t lie.” “Kh, what’s your basis for saying that….”



Having glanced at the snapped Will, Yue began to talk as she looked at the Black Dragon.



“… … The Ryuujin race is noble and honest. I’ve lived much longer from everyone here. That’s why I am more familiar with the legend of the Ryuujin race. This one said “For its pride.” That’s why, it is surely not a lie. Furthermore… … I know if someone has the eyes of a liar.”



Yue slightly moved her gaze away from the Black Dragon as she looked at the distance sky. Surely, she was reminded of the event 300 years ago. For the aloof princess, her surroundings had set her up and remembering the result, surely there were a lot of lies involved. Even the most familiar person to her could be called “liars.” The result of her constantly looking away from that fact was the “betrayal.” Therefore, for Yue, who had experienced the bitterness called the “study of life,” her eyes were sensitive to “liars.” Although the reason she entrusted herself when she first met Hajime was because there was no other way, and although Hajime never lied to her, when she was reminded of that time, her sensitivity to liars might have been the biggest contributing factor after all.



“Fumu, for someone to still know of the Ryuujin race’s ideals… … No, didn’t thou say a long time ago?”



For someone to still know the ideals of the existence called the Ryuujin race, the Black Dragon’s tone was somewhat joyous.



“… …Nn. I am a survivor of the Vampire race. 300 years ago, I was heard the Ryuujin race was the ideal example of nobility.”



“Wow, Vampire race’s… … Moreover 300 years ago… … Indeed, although this one heard they were dead, thou are the Vampire princess. Surely thy name is….”



Apparently, the Black Dragon was alive for more or less the same amount of time as Yue. Moreover, its words implied that it knew of what had happened in the world. Even now, they might still hide their identities and are investigating the world. But, the Black Dragon seemed surprised that the Vampire Princess had survived. The surrounding, Will, Aiko, and the students were also looked at Yue with eyes of astonishment.



“Yue… … that’s my name. It’s the name I got from my most important person. So, I’d like you to call me that.”



Yue gestured as though she were embracing something closely with both hands as her cheecks blushed faintly. For Yue, the Ryuujin race was an existence that should be taken as an example. So, the edge of her spoken words were filled with respect. That feeling must also have been involved in how she stopped Will’s disparagement.



In Yue’s surroundings, an aura of happiness somehow drifted around. Because of the abrupt love talk, the female students wore expressions as though they had eaten something sweet, while the male students were blushing because of Yue’s charm as they looked at her. Even Will seemed to have lost some of his vigor.



However, he continued to speak because he still regretted what had happened to the senior adventurers.



“… … Even so, that doesn’t change the fact that it killed them,… … but even I don’t know what should be done… … Even so—! Gale-san was going to propose when this job ended… … their regrets…”



He knew in his head that the Black Dragon’s words weren’t a lie. However, he couldn’t help but blame it. His heart just couldn’t accept it. Inside Hajime’s mind, “Once again, a splendid flag was raised huh,” with weird admiration. Then he recalled the locket pendant they had picked up on the way.



“Will, is this that Gale’s belonging?”



As he said that, he threw the locket pendant to Will. Will received it, he looked at it then he smiled as if he was truly happy.



“This, this is my locket pendant! I thought I had lost it, but you picked it up. Thank you very much!”



“Huh? It’s yours?”



“Yes, it’s not a mistake because there’s mama’s photograph!”



“Ma-Mama?”



His expectation came off splendidly, and the answer even made Hajime’s cheeks cramp inadvertently.



Because the woman in the photograph should be in the first half of her twenties, he was doubtful but he heard, “After all, the photograph of mama in her youth is the best.” as Will answered as if it was some kind of divine revelation. Everyone there realized, “Aa, mama-con huh,” as they wore subtle expressions. The females looked more and more subtle….



By the way, Gale’s other party seemed to be a “man.” Following that, Gale’s fullname was Gale Homoluca. It was just as the say that the name influenced the body.



Maybe because he regained his mother’s photograph, Will considerably calmed down. It’s effectiveness was truly an unknown. But, even if he was calmed down, his grudge and pain didn’t disappear. Will, calmly, insisted to kill the Black Dragon. Moreover, even though it said it was brainwashed, he reasoned that it was completely faking it. His main reason should be revenge.



Then, as if to repent, the Black Dragon spun its words that contained guilt in its voice.



“Even if this one was manipulated, it is true that this one is guilty for plucking the precious life of people. To make up for it, this one will obediently received the judgement. However, this one want you to delayed that for a while. At the very least, until that dangerous man is stopped.That man is trying to make an army of demonic beasts. Although Ryuujin race’s law doesn’t allow any interference against the continent’s fate, this one was responsible. This one can’t just leave it… … This one know it is just this one’s selfishness. But, please somehow overlook that.”



Hearing the Black Dragon words, everyone in that place were surprised when they heard about the army of demonic beasts. Naturally, everyone’s gazes focused on Hajime. These members were naturally looked at their leader. Actually, because Hajime was the one who stopped piercing the Black Dragon, they naturally entrusted the decision to him.



Hajime’s answer was,



“Well, I don’t really know about your circumstance. But, it’ll be a troublesome so I’ll ignore it. Die as an apology.”



He swung the fist of his artificial arm as he said that.



“Wait—! Th-Thou, with the flow of the talk, thou shouldn’t have done the finishing blow as if no discussion is necessary! Please! This one will apologize without fail! This one don’t mind whatever thou do when that matter is over! That’s why delay it for now! The afterlife will—!”



Hajime continue to swung his fist as he ignored the Black Dragon’s words with cold eyes. However, he couldn’t finished that. At the moment he swung it, Yue clung on to Hajime’s neck. Surprising him, Yue whispered to Hajime’s ears as she instinctively held him.



“… … Are you going to kill?”



“Eh? Well, we were trying to kill each other….”



“… … But, it’s not an enemy. Killing intent and malice were never turned towards us. It was deprived of it’s will.”



Apparently, Yue didn’t wanted the Black Dragon to die. For Yue, Ryuujin race was something she yearned for, so she respected it.



Moreover, even though he said they were trying to kill each other, from the beginning, the Black Dragon never turned its killing intent and malice towards Hajime and the others. They understood the reason now. With it’s will literally deprived, it only did as ordered just like a machine. Even so, there was no change with how they tried to kill each other. However, in the first place, Will was the only one in the Black Dragon’s eyes, and the reason it battled Hajime was because the Black Dragon confronted Hajime’s intent to kill.



Further saying, Hajime would be inconvenienced if Will was dead, so certainly it was an enemy because it aimed at Will, but the one behind the Black Dragon was the robed man. Then, if he were to talk about who the enemy was, it’d be more likely to be that man.



Also, there was a reason for her to stop him.



Yue knew Hajime’s stance. But, in Yue’s eyes, “enemy” that should be killed and the Black Dragon weren’t the same thing. Because she was the ruler of the Vampire race, having experienced such things, her eyes wouldn’t be mistaken about a person. In Yue’s eyes, there were no essence of “enemy” inside the Black Dragon’s mind. For Yue, she at least didn’t want Hajime to kill things other than the “enemy,”



After all,



“… … If one compromised on the important rule imposed to themselves, one would be broken. Wouldn’t your rule changed if you kill the Black Dragon?”



She was worried that Hajime would be “broken” if he killed things beside the “enemy.”



Having received Yue’s words, Hajime could guess her mind, and he thought more and more carefully if the Black Dragon was the “enemy” as he slightly inclined his neck. Even if it was manipulated, Hajime was not so naive to considered that in a fight to death. He would have most likely killed it without mercy.



However, after it regained its mind and the brainwashing was dissolved, to purposely execute it with “enemies will be killed,” he thought, isn’t that a deviation?



As she clung on Hajime’s neck, Yue was watching him closely and looked like they’d kiss at any moment, and having thought of that, unexpectedly, it spoke with a quiet desperate tone.



“This one is sorry to intrude on such good atmosphere, but even if thou feel lost, at the very least could thou pull out the stake from this one’s ass? If this keep up, this one will be dead no matter what will happened.”



“Nn? What do you mean?”



“Having received the external thing while in dragon form, at the time this one returned to original form, it’d influence the body as is. Try imagining it. The scene of this stake piercing a woman’s ass… … Do you think this one will survive that?”



Everyone in the area imagined the scene that the Black Dragon said, then “Uwa~,” their expressions cramped. Especially the females, they hold their butts as they turned pale.



“Well, although the dragon form could be maintained using magic power, this one’s magic power almost exhausted. In a minute… … although it isn’t bad to go to a new world, please pardon this one from that kind of death. The afterlife without it unplugged—”



Somewhat, its words seemed anxious, and its tone weakened as if its limit was truly close, and apparently Hajime didn’t have more time to think.



Hajime embraced Yue with his right arm, and decided rather than hesitating, he’d go along with his partner words as is. For people, they wouldn’t be able to understand their own selves. That’s why, it wouldn’t be a mistake to choose the direction where his trusted partner wouldn’t feel uneasy.



Having thought that, Hajime carefully put his hand on the stake which was stucked in the Black Dragon’s ass. Following that, he used his strength to pull it out.



“Haaan! P-Please do it slowly. This one still inex- afuuun. Yah, how intense! If this— Aanh! Comingg, something is coming~” Because it stuck hard inside, he twisted it for so many times, and he put considerable power while twisting it to pull it out, but somehow the Black Dragon began to let out a captivated voice as it panted. Hajime ignored that voice and pulled it out without any mercy.



ZUBOh!!



“Ahiii— — —!! A-amazing… … Even though this one said to do it gently, to be treated without any mercy… … This is the first time….”



As the Black Dragon muttered unknown things, immediately, its body completely wrapped with cocoon-like, jet-black magic power, and its big size began to decreased. Following that, after it reached the size of a human, the magic power immediately disappeared.



In the place of the black-colored magic power was something collapsed on its feet, and while using one hand to support its body, the other hand was holding its butt. With blushing cheeks, it was a black-haired, golden-eyed beautiful girl. Her glossy, straight, black hair reached her waist and her cheeks dyed bright red, Haa haa, she breathed roughly as if she was in a trance.



Her appearance was in the first half of her twenties, and her height might be around 170 cm. With a splendid proportion one could be proud of. Every time she breathed, a pair of hills were intensely shook as they peeped from inside the clothes’ collar that became disordered as it hanged on her, and it looked like they’d came out at any moment. If Shia was melon, the Black Dragon was watermelon….



The Black Dragon’s real form was a captivating beauty and the males were especially reacted grandly to that. The three male students in adolescent were somewhat slouching. If this keeps up they’d likely go on all fours. The female students were looking at them with eyes as if they were no different from cockroaches.



“Haa haa, umuu, this one still alive… … Although there is still a sense of discomfort on the ass… … this one’s whole body is hurting in all places… … Haa haa… … for pain to be this sweet….”



The Black Dragon wore a dangerous expression and let out a dangerous words for some reason, then she pulled herself together as she immediately straightened her sitting position and began to introduce herself in such cold atmosphere. Still, she sometimes panted, haa haa, and messed various things, but….



“This one have troubled thou. With all of this one’s might, this one apologize. This one’s name is Tio Clarce. A person that came from the last tribe of Ryuujin race, Clarce tribe.”



The Black Dragon introduced herself as Tio Clarce, next, she talked on how the black robed man was going to attack the town with an army of brainwashed demonic beasts. Their number had reached around 3,000 to 4,000. Also, from the second mountain range, the leaders of groups of demonic beasts were already brainwashed, so he could use the groups more efficiently as his subordinates.



When she said about controlling demonic beasts, it reminded Hajime and the others about the new power of the one called Demon Race in this world. Maybe because Aiko and the students also thought of that, they guessed the black robed man was actually from Demon race.



However, their guess was easily refuted by Tio. After all, the black robed man was black-haired, black-eyed human, and still at the age of a boy. Moreover, from the mouth of the Black Dragon called Tio, who was made as a subordinate to him came the settling words, “That person introduced himself as a hero,” with a tone filled with considerably grudge against the so called hero.



A black-haired, black-eyed human boy, moreover he was someone with genius-like talent on dark magic. With this much hints, a certain person came to their minds. Aiko and the students muttered, “That, can’t be…,” at the same time as they showed mixed and complexed expressions. Though it didn’t limited to pure black, they said as they didn’t wanted to believed it.



And, Hajime suddenly leaked a mutter, “Ooh, this is…,” as he looked at the distance. If ones asked, having heard Tio’s story, he seemed to have looked for the groups of demonic beasts and the black robed man using the unmanned probes.



Following that, the unmanned probes finally discovered a certain place where the demonic beasts army was. They numbered….



“That’s, not at the level of 3,000 to 4,000, you know? It’s at the level which one more digit should be added.”



Everyone opened their eyes wide after they heard Hajime’s report. Moreover, the army had started their march. The direction was surely towards Ul town. As they were, they’d came out of the mountain in a half day, and they’d likely reached the town in a day.



“W-We must quickly inform the town—! Tell them to take shelter, called the rescue from Imperial capital,… … then, then….”



Because it was a serious situation, Aiko desperately tried to arranged her words in confusion. No matter if the enemies were tens of thousand demonic beasts, even with their cheat-like specs, the students carried a trauma. Aiko didn’t have any combat experience, while Will, who inspired to be an adventurer, and Tio who exhausted her magic power wouldn’t even became an obstacle for the enemies. That’s why, just as Aiko had said, they must quickly inform the town of the emergency, then it’d be the best to run away until the rescue from the Imperial capital came.



And, among everyone who was shaken, Will suddenly muttered.



“Umm, if it’s Hajime-dono something can be….”



With those words, everyone looked at Hajime. Their eyes were dyed in expectation of the possibility. Having stared at like that, Hajime shook her hand gloomily, and replied with a feeling of abandonment.



“Don’t look at me with such eyes. My work is only to take Will back to Fhuren. As if I will take the object of protection into a war. That’s why you should stop that and immediately return to the town to report.”



The students and Will could feel the antipathy from Hajime’s unmotivated attitude. Among them, Aiko asked a question with an expression as if she remembered something.



“Nagumo-kun, did you find the black robed man?”



“Nn? Well, although I am checking the groups since a while ago, I didn’t see any human’s shadow.”



Having heard Hajime’s words, Aiko looked down again. Following that, potsuri, she said she wanted to remained here to confirmed if the black robed man was Shimizu Yukitoshi who currently missing or not. It was because Aiko always thought of her student. She’d likely unable to do anything if the current situation was caused by her own student, after all.



However, they couldn’t leave Aiko at the place where several ten thousands of demonic beast were, so Sonobe and the students desperately tried to persuade Aiko. But, Aiko still hesitated. Among them, then how if Nagumo also goes… … they began to think like that. Already, Hajime thought the talk about returning and not returning as they stopped in this place as a hassle, so he turned a cold look towards Aiko.



“Remain here if you want. We are going to take Will along to the town.”



As he said that, he gripped Will’s collar and dragged him as he began to descended the mountain. Will, Aiko, and the students tried to object in a panic. Their reason, they couldn’t leave the army of demonic beasts as is, they wanted to confirmed who the black robed man was, and the army could be defeated by Hajime….



Hajime let out a sigh and looked back Aiko and the others with somewhat irritated look.



“Didn’t I already said it, my job is to protect Will. Taking along the protection target into battle against that army is something I won’t do.. For example, even if I have to do it, the obstacle would be too big and it’d be a battle of annihilation for me alone. By no means would I want to suffer like that. Furthermore, if you go to confirm the black robed man’s identity, then who will report this matter to the town? If by chance we are annihilated, the town will be devoured by a surprise attack, you know? By the way, the magic-driven two-wheeler can only be moved by me, so it’d be impossible for the others to return earlier if I fight, kay?”



Having heard the logical counter to their demands, Aiko and the others were speechless as he pointed how futile their demands were.



“Well, just as Mas—… … Kohonh, just as he said. Because this one has exhausted her magic power, this one can do nothing. So, the top priority is to inform the town about the emergency. If this one rests for one day, this one will recover considerably.”



Because everyone kept silent, Tio spoke to back him up. Just a little, she called Hajime in a strange way… … but it must have been their imagination. Aiko also knew that it’d be the best to temporary stopped worrying about Shimizu, and she decided to give priority to secure the safety of the students by her side.



Tio was unable to moved due to magic power exhaustion, so Hajime dragged her by her neck root. Actually, the male students said someone should carried Tio on their backs as they grandly scattered sparks among themselves, but that was rejected by the female students. And because Tio herself have wished it, she was somehow carried by Hajime.



However, rather than on his back, it was Hajime’s characteristic to not hold her. As he frowned because it was a hassle, he suddenly gripped Tio’s foot and began to dragged her.



Because of the protests from Aiko and the others, he reluctantly changed it to gripping her neck root, and dragged her just like before. No matter what Hajime did, it resulted in Tio, who somehow floated an ecstatic expression that made the surroundings shuddered, and they descended the mountain as is.



The party, with dark cloud and an army behind them, rushed to return to the Ul town





Volume 6 Chapter 10




The magic-driven four-wheeler dashed out at faster speed than when they’d departed, but the land-leveling function couldn’t keep up, so Tio, who was crucified on the ceiling, received the impact. The male students in the carrier received a mixer-like shaking.



Then, at that time, he discovered the fully-armed bodyguard Knights who fiercely drove their horses in the area between the town of Ul and northern mountain range. Hajime’s “Farsight” could see David in the lead wearing an oni-like expression while Chase who was beside him couldn’t hide his frustration as they swiftly rode.



Having ran for a while, they discovered a black object that created a clamor as it moved. It was natural for them to think what they saw was a demonic beast. With their weapons drawn, they changed their formation. Their response speed was fast, and indeed, it was clear how they were praised as the VIP’s bodyguards.



In particular, even if he was going to be attacked, Hajime didn’t have any problem to just charge past them, but Aiko didn’t know that because she thought it’d be a serious matter if Tio, who raised a bewitching and charming scream, and the pale male students were exposed to such attacks. She showed her face through the sunroof and desperately waved her hands as she shouted at David to notice her.



As they drew near, David tried to invoke his magic. He narrowed his eyes as he could see a human-like figure suddenly spring up above the black object that came in high speed. Normally, he’d do a preemptive strike as there was nothing to argue about, but something inside him told him to stop. It could be said that it was his sixth sense exclusive to Aiko, the so-called high-sensitivity Aiko sensor.



With his hand held out, he sent his subordinates the signal to stop their attacks. Although the subordinates were suspicious about it, they became wide-eyed as they heard the familiar voice from the human-like thing that grew out of the top of the black object as it approached them. David had already displayed an expression as if he couldn’t believe it and muttered, “Aiko?”



For a moment, don’t tell me Aiko’s lower half was eaten by that demonic beast!?, as David and the others became pale, but Aiko waved her hands energetically and said, “David-sa~n, it’s me! Please don’t attack us~!”, with a voice full of life.



They understood that they had misunderstood the situation, and they let out joyful expressions at this reunion because the one on the black object was undoubtedly the person they held dear. As if he was drunk on the situation, David greatly spread his arms with an expression that said “Come! Jump into my arms!” Chase and the others at his sides also spread their arms as if saying, “Jump to me—!”



Seeing the Knights’ appearances with their hands spread, Hajime looked displeased. Although Aiko and the students thought Hajime would obviously stop before David and the Knights… Hajime suddenly poured more magic power, and they accelerated.



Because they were at a distance where deceleration was absolutely necessary, the Knights became stupefied when the black object accelerated further, and moved away in panic.



Hajime’s magic-driven four-wheeler just passed David and the Knights who spread their hands in smiles. Aiko could only shout, “Why?,” that became smaller because of the Doppler effect, while David and the Knights just hardened and smiled as is. After that, in the next moment they screamed, “Aikoo~!,” just like those separated from their lovers, and began to fiercely run after the four-wheeler.



“Nagumo-kun! Why, why did you do such a dangerous thing!?”



Aiko became angry, getting back into the vehicle and fiercely protested against Hajime.



“There’s no reason to stop, Sensei. If we stop, they’d likely ask about the situation. Do we have such time? We’ll explain the situation in town after all, so there’s no need to do it twice, right?”



“Uh, th-that’s true…”



She was somewhat convinced, the things about them slipping out without permission and Hajime’s four-wheeler would certainly take too much time, so Aiko shut her mouth. Yue, who got back into her seat, drew her face to Hajime’s ear and asked him.



“… Real intention?”



“Those smiling Knights made me feel unpleasant.”



“… Nn, same here.”



By the way, right behind the Aiko poking her face out of the sunroof, was Tio tied up on the vehicle. An expression of ecstasy floated across her face because her damaged body continued to be stimulated by the vibration of vehicle’s frame, but it seemed the Knights and Aiko didn’t see her.



In addition, when they arrived at the town, Yue who knew of Tio’s disgraceful behavior said “… is this, the Ryuujin race?,” as she raised a slightly shocked expression. Since the first time Tio released her Dragon Form at the Northern Mountain range, she was in a subtle mental state and seemed to “feel” the pain, that’s why Yue finally broke free from her illusion-like respect and yearning towards the Ryuujin race.



* * *



Arriving at the town of Ul, Hajime and his party calmly walked, while Aiko and the others were running towards the town headman’s place. Hajime thought of parting with Aiko and the students here and quickly taking Will back to Fhuren, but he reluctantly followed them because Will had started running before Aiko and the students.



The town was full of liveliness. The dishes came in wide varieties and abundantly, and the town was near a lake. It was the location where people and nature gathered. No one would ever dream that this town would be trampled by an army of demonic beasts in a day. Hajime and his party were looking at such a town, remembering they didn’t have any meals since yesterday, so they advanced towards the town hall as they enjoyed skewers from a stall.



Hajime and his party finally arrived at the town hall, and the place was already in a commotion. The branch head of Ul’s town guild, town executives, and the priests from the church were gathered and in a state of uproar. All of their expressions showed they couldn’t believe and didn’t want to believe the information brought by Aiko, the students, and Will as they closely questioned them.



Normally, they’d just put it off as nonsense from a madman if they heard tomorrow the town would be annihilated, but they were words that came from Aiko the “God’s Apostle,” and also known as the “Goddess of Good Harvest.” That was followed by the recent fact that the Demon race was capable of manipulating demonic beasts, so they couldn’t just ignore this information.



By the way, from the discussion inside the vehicle, Aiko and the students had agreed to hide Tio’s true form and there was a possibility of Shimizu Yukitoshi being the mastermind behind this. It’s undesirable for the Ryuujin race’s existence to be exposed, so Tio asked them to stay silent about this, and the mastermind’s identity was just a possibility, so Aiko didn’t want to carelessly convey it.



Aiko somehow or another agreed to conceal the information about the existence of the Ryuujin race because the race is something half-taboo for the Church of Saints, and it’d only cause chaos followed by the formation of a subjugation unit.



Within such commotion, Hajime came towards Will. He only thought of the surrounding chaos as blowing wind.



“Oi, Will. Don’t just run all of a sudden. Remember that you’re under my protection. If you’re done reporting, let’s quickly go back to Fhuren.”



With Hajime’s words, Will, Aiko and the others were surprised as they looked at Hajime. The others, the town leaders seemed to feel displeased as they looked at Hajime interrupting the emergency discussion, as if saying “Who the hell is this?”



“Wh-What are you saying? Hajime-dono. It’s a time of emergency now, right? Don’t tell me, you’re going to desert the town…”



Will started arguing with Hajime with an expression as if he couldn’t believe what he’d just said, and Hajime replied with an expression as if he expected this hassle.



“Deserting or whatever it is, in the end, aren’t you also going to abandon the town, take shelter, and wait for rescue to come? I’m already aware of this town’s defenses from sightseeing… if you want to take shelter, it’d be okay to go to Fhuren. For a while now you’ve only talked about quickly evacuating the people.”



“Th-That’s… right… but, I can’t just run away by myself in such a serious situation! Even I should have something I can help with. Even Hajime-dono…”



“Hajime-dono, please cooperate too,” was the continuation of Will’s words, but his words were interrupted as he was frozen by Hajime’s cold eyes.



“… Do I need to speak more clearly to make you understand? My job is to take you back to Fhuren. I don’t have anything to do with this town. Listen, I won’t hear your opinion. If you still don’t want to go… I’ll just crush your limbs and drag you back.”



“Wh—, th-that’s…”



From Hajime’s atmosphere, Will guessed those words were serious as he turned pale. His expression said he couldn’t believe it. Hajime, who could overwhelm the dragon that easily annihilated veteran adventurers like Gale’s party, looked a little like a hero to Will. That’s why even if he was merciless, Will unconditionally believed Hajime would somehow help the townspeople under such an emergency. That’s why Will felt betrayed by the cold words thrown out by Hajime..



As he was at a loss for words, Will unconsciously distanced himself from Hajime, but Hajime decided to approach him. Because of such a strange atmosphere, the surrounding people could only alternate looks between Hajime and Will without moving. Then someone suddenly moved and blocked Hajime.



It was Aiko. She immediately looked up straight at Hajime with a resolute expression.



“Nagumo-kun. If it’s you… can’t you do something about the army of demonic beasts? No… you can do it, right?”



Aiko’s voice carried conviction, he can do something if it’s Hajime. In other words, she declared he would be able to save the town. With those words, the surrounding town leaders started to make noise.



If they were to believe the reported threat from Aiko and the others, the enemies were tens of thousands of demonic beasts. Furthermore, they gathered from several mountain range areas. That meant it was on the scale of a war. Consequently, an individual wouldn’t be able to influence the war. That’s common sense. To overturn such common sense, there was a special existence even among the ones summoned from another world, that’s a Hero. But, it didn’t really mean he could win alone against an army. What it meant was leading the human race and together with his companions, simply using quantity. That’s why they couldn’t believe the boy in front of them who wasn’t even a Hero could do something, even if those words came from Aiko. Even if they were words from the “Goddess of Good Harvest”



Towards Aiko’s powerful gaze, Hajime waved his hands gloomily as he tried to deceive her by denying it.



“No no, Sensei. Isn’t that impossible? Aren’t there more than 40,000 of them? It’ll be very, very—…”



“But, at that time in the mountain, you didn’t say it was “impossible” when Will-san asked if Nagumo-kun could do something about it. Also, didn’t you say “the obstacle would be too big and it’d become a fight till the last one standing for me alone”? To put it plainly, there’s a possibility it’d become a fight till the last one standing, right? Did I hear it wrong?”



“… What good memory”



Because of Aiko’s good memory, Hajime’s face distorted as he awkwardly said that. He didn’t regret what he’d said. Aiko requested with a more serious expression to Hajime who averted his face.



“Nagumo-kun. Can’t you somehow lend us your power? If this keeps up, not only will this beautiful town be destroyed, a lot of lives will surely be lost.”



“… How unexpected. I thought you held students as your top priority. Even all the things you’ve done were inevitably because there’s the possibility it’d be able to return you even a bit earlier, right? Nevertheless, for the sake of unfamiliar people, you are trying to send a student to his death? You don’t have the intention, but it’s as though you’re just like those guys from the church who tried to spur us to war, you know?”



Hajime’s words were full of ridicule, but Aiko was still the same. Her expression was not the worried expression from just a minute ago, it was a resolute and “teacher”-like expression. There were priests from the church who listened to Hajime and Aiko’s conversation nearby. They frowned and watched him with narrowed eyes because Hajime’s words were full of disdain towards the church. That’s why Aiko didn’t move from her spot as she straightened her gaze and posture.



“… If there’s a method to return to our original world, I’d quickly return the students, and my feelings haven’t changed even now. But, if that’s impossible… then, we are living in this world now, the words we exchanged and the people who smiled at us, at the very least I don’t want to abandon the people within my reach. Thinking like this is natural as a human. Of course because sensei is a teacher, my priority will not change even under such an emergency…”



Aiko spun her words of confirmation one by one.



“Nagumo-kun, you’re calm even now, that’s why I think you’ve experienced something beyond our imagination, to become like this. That’s why I feel that you have the composure to think about other people. The words of a teacher who couldn’t be by your side when you were most hurt… might be too light for you. But, please hear me out, somehow.”



Hajime kept quiet as is, and he returned Aiko’s gaze, urging her to continue.



“Nagumo-kun. Last night, didn’t you say you’ll absolutely return to Japan? Then, Nagumo-kun. Are you going to return to Japan with everyone important to you except the ones who obstruct you? Are you going to leave everyone who becomes a hindrance to you? Will you be able to live like that in Japan? When you return to Japan, will you change your way of life? The reason sensei didn’t want the students to actively fight is because I am concerned if they would be able to return to their old lives when they returned to Japan. Killing is… , I don’t want you to become accustomed to that.”



“…”



“Nagumo-kun, you have your own sense of values, your choice for the future is your own. In addition, you don’t have the obligation to hear the words from sensei’s mouth. But sensei thinks that no matter what kind of future you choose, the way of living which casts others away, other than those important to you… is a truly “lonely” one. Surely, that way of living will not make you and the ones important to you happy. If you wish for happiness, at least for those within your reach… please don’t forget how to sympathize with them. From the very beginning, that’s the important and priceless thing you once had… so don’t throw it away.”



One by one, Aiko spun words filled with her feelings, and she tried to convey all of them in front of Hajime. The leaders of the town and even the students heard Aiko’s words in silence. Especially the students. They looked down as if they were scolded as they felt bad they got carried away by their power. At the same time, because Aiko was serious about bringing them back even now, and even thought about how they’d live afterwards. With newfound feelings, they could be seen smiling happily as if something tickled them.



For Hajime, even if he crossed the worlds, no matter what the situation would be and even if the students had completely changed. Aiko who didn’t even deviate from a “teacher” made him smile wryly inside. It wasn’t out of contempt, but admiration. Aiko was treated special because of her rare value. She didn’t experience Hajime’s hardships, so he’d easily refute her with “Even though you don’t know anything!,” or “Don’t spout things as if you know them!” In a way it’s just like what Aiko had said, her words were “light.”



But, Hajime couldn’t do that. Even now the “teacher” was looking straight at him, so to refute them as “light” words would be too unsightly. Moreover, Aiko hadn’t even once pressured him about the “right” thing to do. All of her words were only for the sake of wishing for Hajime’s future and happiness.



Hajime immediately turned his gaze towards Yue at Aiko’s side. Yue somehow looked at Aiko as if feeling nostalgic. However, when she noticed Hajime’s gaze, she immediately matched him straight with a serene gaze. Her eyes said that she’d adhere to whatever answer Hajime gave.



Inside the Abyss, she was his precious person who held his humanity right before he “fell,” that’s why Hajime certainly wished for her happiness. He thought it’d be okay if he did it by himself, but if he were to believe Aiko’s words, Hajime’s way of life wouldn’t be able to make Yue happy.



When he changed his gaze further, he found the rabbit-eared girl who looked at him worriedly. Towards his world which narrowed to only Yue and him, she was the girl who brought liveliness. No matter how many times Hajime treated her unkindly, she desperately chased after him curiously, and now she was just like Yue, someone he loved as a friend and companion. For Hajime to accept Shia, didn’t it bring happiness to Yue?



For Hajime, this world was like a prison. A cage that obstructed him from returning to his hometown. Therefore, it was extremely difficult for him to accept the people and everything in this world. Inside the Abyss, he discarded everything for the sake of returning, it wouldn’t be an easy thing to change the sense of values carved in his mind which wouldn’t forgive those who obstructed him. But even if it was difficult to “sympathize with other people,” he could do it. As a result, his precious things… if that’d bring happiness to Yue and Shia, he wouldn’t be that stingy to pitch in and help.



Hajime didn’t agree to all of Aiko’s words. Even so, it was a serious “scolding” from “his teacher.” To disregard it as nonsense would be too childish. WIth this time’s rampage, the possibility of the trouble of Hajime’s existence being published would suddenly become bigger, but it’d be okay to work hard as just “Aiko-sensei”‘s student. Whatever he chose, he already knew he’d be marked sooner or later. He had prepared to strike all of the troublesome things, he decided not to respect this world. That’s why it wouldn’t be bad to flashily show off his power.



With that, he thought a while for an excuse, then Hajime looked at Aiko again.



“… Sensei, no matter what happens after this, are you still my teacher?”



What Hajime implied was if she’d be his ally.



“Of course.”



Towards that, Aiko replied without hesitating.



“… Whatever my decision? That’s, even if the result isn’t what sensei hoped?”



“That doesn’t have to be said. Sensei’s role isn’t to decide the students’ future. I’ll just help to make a better decision. Nagumo-kun has heard sensei’s talk, so I won’t refute your decision”



Hajime watched Aiko for a while to confirm whether there was a lie in her words. For him to intentionally have such commitment was because Hajime himself didn’t want to become hostile towards Aiko. After he confirmed there’s neither lie nor deception in Aiko’s eyes, Hajime turned towards the entrance. Yue and Shia immediately followed after him.



“Na-Nagumo-kun?”



Seeing such a Hajime, Aiko panickedly called him. Hajime looked back, he shrugged his shoulders and replied, having been beaten by Aiko’s “teacher style.”



“As expected, to take on a huge crowd of tens of thousands as opponents, I’ll need some time to prepare. Continue your discussion without me.”



“Nagumo-kun!”



Aiko’s face shone because of Hajime’s reply. Hajime could only smile wryly at such an Aiko.



“It is advice from the best “teacher” I’ve ever known. Moreover, if it’s connected to these girls’ happiness… I only need to consider it a bit. Anyway, I’ll just kick those guys around for now.”



As he said that, he patted Yue and Shia’s shoulder, then once again he turned his heels and went out of the room. Yue and Shia raised a truly joyful atmosphere, and began to run after Hajime in small steps.



Patan, the sound of the door being closed, the leaders of the town who shut their mouth after being drowned by the atmosphere between Aiko and Hajime, and immediately asked about the situation from Aiko.



Aiko, whose shoulders were shaken, stared at the door which Hajime went out of. Her face didn’t transmit any joy towards Hajime. What she said to Hajime were Aiko’s true feelings, that his way of life was a sad one.



But, in the end, there’s no denying that she made an important student confront an army of demonic beasts. While she said she didn’t want them to grow accustomed to using their power, she was conscious of the contradiction she’d made by sending him off to fight. She thought she wanted Hajime to rethink his way of life, but she also thought of wanting to help the townspeople of Ul. As a result, both of them seemed to be fulfilled… but she wanted to search for better ways. Aiko secretly let her shoulders droop because of her helplessness as a teacher.



She prayed, for all of her students to not lose their hearts, and to return to their homes… but, Aiko’s wish couldn’t be fulfilled. After hearing Hajime’s story last night, Aiko herself felt that her wishes were already just an illusion. However, she couldn’t stop wishing for it.



Surrounded by the leaders who raised a ruckus and the students who looked at her in respect and affection, Aiko didn’t realize she let out a sigh.



By the way, Tio who had come to the town hall with Hajime and his party muttered, “Although this one is an important witness… i-is this neglect play… as expected of Mas—”, with a flushed expression, and she was naturally ignored.





Volume 7 Chapter 1




Ul town. The mountain range area in the North and Uldeia lake in the West brought abundant resources to the town. Currently, the town was encircled by an “outer wall” that didn’t exist last night as the town was wrapped in a strange atmosphere.



This “outer wall” was something Hajime instantly built. Using the magic-driven two-wheeler, he ran around the town’s outer circumference and transmuted the “outer wall” without leveling the land. First of all, the wall’s height was only four meters tall because it was the range limit of Hajime’s transmutation, it was not a really tall one. If it was a big-sized demonic beast, it would easily be able to climb over the wall. Tentatively, there’s no problem because it made the people feel better in such an emergency. To begin with, Hajime wouldn’t depend on such a wall.



The thing about the approaching army of tens of thousands of demonic beasts was already known to the townspeople. Considering the demonic beasts’ movement speed, the vanguard would arrive right before evening. Naturally, the townspeople panicked. People began to insult the town leaders including the mayor; others cried and collapsed on where they were, people closely embraced the person next to them, some scrambled to escape even among companions, and there were those who started to blame each other. Tomorrow, this town would be destroyed and they knew they’d lose their lives if they stayed here, so they didn’t have the luxury to remain calm. The way they were acting couldn’t be helped.



But there was someone who made them regain their composure. It was Aiko. Finally arriving at the town, the guard Knights received the briefing and they shouted “Goddess of Good Harvest.” With her dignified appearance showing she didn’t fear anything, coupled with her originally high popularity made the people regain their composure for now. Hatayama Aiko, in a certain way, was more hero-like than a hero.



The people who regained their composure divided into two groups. Those who wouldn’t throw away their hometown and would share the same fate as this town; the stay-behind group. The other one was as planned in the beginning, escaping to safety until rescue came; the shelter group. Even among the stay-behind group, a lot of women and children were put into the shelter. They believed Aiko’s words that the demonic beasts would be repulsed, and they wondered if they could help somehow and the stay-behind men decided to help while the wives and children would stay inside the shelter in case of an emergency. Although it passed midnight, the appearance of people embracing each others for separation in tears could be seen everywhere.



The shelter group went out of the town while carrying their luggages before dawn. The sun had raised high now, the people were divided between those who prepared for the battle and those who took a nap. Most of the stay-behind group believed in the “Goddess of Good Harvest”‘s party, even so, we will protect our town ourselves!, we’ll do what we can!, they were filled with such strong spirits.



Even if the people had decreased, there was more liveliness than usual so Hajime sat on the instant rampart behind the town, it was unknown where he was looking as he looked at the distance. Naturally, by his sides were Yue and Shia. They sat beside Hajime, they thought of something, then the two quietly drew closer to him.



Them, Aiko, the students, Tio, Will, David, and several guard Knights arrived there. Even though he noticed Aiko and the others approaching, he didn’t turn around and made David and the Knights frown, but Aiko called on him earlier than them.



“Nagumo-kun, how are your preparations? Did you need something else?” “No, there’s no problem, sensei.”



Of course Hajime simply answered so without turning around. Unable to endure his attitude, David snapped on him.



“Oi, you. What’s with your attitude towards Aiko… towards your honored teacher. Normally, I wouldn’t overlook the details about the artifact you carry and the details about your method of repulsing the army of demonic beasts, but I didn’t do that because Aiko had asked me earnestly, you know? At least…”



“David-san. Can you keep quiet for now?”



“Uh… affirmative…”



However, when Aiko told him to “shut up” he dejectedly shut his mouth. His appearance was just like a dog. Even though he wasn’t a demi-human, one could see dog-ears and a tail. Now, those things seemed to hang down dejectedly because the owner was angry.



“Nagumo-kun. About the black-robed man…”



Apparently, that’s the subject. Anguish oozed out from Aiko’s words.



“Are you going to confirm his identity? Even if I find him, you’re telling me to not kill him, right?”



“… Yes. It’s necessary to confirm his identity. That’s… if it’s an unreasonable thing for Nagumo-kun…”



“For the time being, I’ll just bring him here.”



“Eh?”



“I’ll bring the black robe to sensei. Sensei is thinking as a teacher… so I’ll do just that.”



“Nagumo-kun… thank you very much.”



Aiko was a little surprised because of the unexpected cooperation from Hajime. Hajime didn’t even turn around even now, and thinking Hajime had a lot to think about, she decided to receive his goodwill. She muttered I am powerless as she sighed secretly, then Aiko said her gratitude with a bitter smile.



It looked like Aiko’s talk was over, and this time Tio moved forward and called Hajime.



“Fumu, I wonder if it’s okay. This one mas-… gohonh! matter to talk… is a request, will you hear it?”



“? … Tio huh”



“Th-Thou, don’t tell me that this one’s existence was forgotten… haa haa, there’s also something like this…”



Because it was an unfamiliar voice, Hajime inadvertently looked over his shoulder, and there was black clothes with golden embroidery which resembled a kimono and splendidly slipped down, white and smooth shoulders together with an enchanting valley, followed by the beautiful leg which peeped from the cut from the knee; a black-haired, golden-eyed beautiful woman. For a moment, his eyes seemed dubious and he remembered with “Aa, now that you mention” then called her name. Obviously, Tio whose existence was forgotten was far from getting angry, she was blushing and her breathing became rough. Her “something like this” was unknown, but it’d be better to not asked her about it.



“Nnh, nnh! That’s, after this battle end and thou sent Will back, art thou going to continue to travel?”



“Aa, that’s so.”



“Fumu, this one’s request is that… this one want to accompany thou…”



“I refuse.”



“… Haa haa. I-Immediate answer just as expected. As expected of mas-…kohonh! Of course it’s not for free! I’ll call thou “Master” from now own, and dedicated all of this one to thee! Body and mind, all of them! How is it?”



“Just return, rather just return into the ground.”



While spreading her arms, Tio declared to become Hajime slave with an expression of ecstasy, and Hajime, who looked at her as if looking at a filth, immediately casted her away. Tio’s body shook again. Her cheek became rose-colored. No matter who saw her, they’d thought of her as a pervert. Even the surrounding people were taken aback. Especially Yue who had strong yearning and respect towards Ryuujin tribe, her noh mask-like expression crumbled with all of her feelings.



“That’s… cruel… Master was the one who turned this one’s body into this… this one want thou to take the responsibility!”



Everyone became “Eh!?” as they looked at Hajime. As expected, he couldn’t just leave that ridiculous and false accusation alone, Hajime immediately looked at Tio’s direction and he glared at her with veins popped. His glare asked what she meant by that.



“Au, to be seen as filth by those eyes again… haa haa… gulp… that’s, look, isn’t this one strong?”



Her body shuddered again because of Hajime’s glare, then Tio began to explain her thought process that reached extraordinary conception to declared herself as Hajime’s slave.



“Even in my hometown, this one only have one, two fights, and this one’s particular endurance surpassed them. That’s why, to be held down by other and even to felt pain-like pain never happened until now and only until now.”



Because the guard Knights nearby didn’t know Tio came from Ryuujin tribe, Tio’s words trickle down with some omission.



“That’s why, when this one fought Master, it’s the first time this one was knocked down, being held down, and tasted the pain and defeat for the first time. That’s right, that fist which resonated with this body’s core! The impacts that always aimed at unpleasant points! The pain that could felt throughout this one’s body… haa haa”



Although Tio said that herself, the Knights who didn’t know she was from Ryuujin race turned their gaze towards Hajime as if they looked at a criminal. If ones heard it objectively, it was a completely like a woman assaulting case. “How could you assaulted such beautiful woman!,” was the noise raised by the Knights. They didn’t plainly blamed him because they felt pity on the victim; Tio. Rather, the Knights with strong sense of justice were perplexed because she look so happy.



“… In other words, Hajime opened a new door for you?”



“That’s it! This one’s body is already useless without Master!”



“… Gross”



Yue’s expression was distorted as if she saw something unpleasant, her tone no longer carried respect when Tio said her agreement. Spontantly, Hajime revealed his feeling. He was completely taken aback.



“Furthermore…”



Tio’s perverted look suddenly changed as she began fidgeting while she held her hip with her hands in embarrassment.



“… This one’s first time was stolen already.”



With those words, everyone’s faces showed their surprise as they looked at Hajime. Hajime said “There’s no such thing,” as he shook his neck while his cheeks were convulsing.



“This one had decided to only admit stronger man than this one as companion… but, there’s no such person in this one’s hometown… To be defeated, and to be held down like that… was the first time… to suddenly used this one’s ass… Moreover, such intensity… that’s why thou art this one’s Master. This one want thou to take responsibility.”



Tio’s eyes were moistened as she looked at Hajime while holding her butt. The Knights’ eyes said, “This guy just a criminal after all!,” and continued with “To suddenly attacked the ass-,” as they talked and floated shuddering expressions. Even Aiko and the others who knew the truth glared at Hajime with blaming eyes. Even Yue and Shia’s expressions by his side said, “That’s a little-,” as they averted their gazes. Even before the approaching of the army, Hajime was dragged into a situation where he was surrounded by enemies on all sides.



“Y-You, didn’t you have things to do? That’s why you went out from your hometown.”



Because Yue and the others averted their gazes, Hajime replied desperately about “Ryuujin race’s investigation.”



“Umu. There’s no problem. It absolutely will become more efficient if this one is beside Master. It’s just like hitting two birds with one stone… look, aren’t there various things happened in travel? It’s okay to let out the frustration on this one, okay? It’s also okay to do it stronger. Isn’t that a good thing for Master?”



“There’s only demerit with a pervert by my side.”



Tio clung to him, but Hajime just cast her away. It followed by the guard Knights’ resentment, female students who saw Hajime as a maggot, male students who felt a complex about women from different world as they looked at Hajime with envy, Aiko who started to preach about illicit sexual relationship, and Will who somehow looked at Hajime with eyes of respect. Inside such chaotic situation, the army kept approaching them, and when Hajime started to became tired of it, they finally came.



” ! … They’ve arrive huh.”



Hajime suddenly turned his gaze towards the mountain range area in the north. He displayed his narrowed eyes as he looked at the distance. Even though they weren’t in location that could be seen by naked eyes, Hajime could clearly saw it from the image from Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes which displayed on his “Magic Eye Crystal.”



There was a crowd of demonic beasts who completely wrapped the ground. Beside human-type demonic beasts like Brutal, there were three-four meter big and black wolf-like demonic beasts, and there were also lizard-like demonic beasts with six legs, phyton-like demonic beasts with needles protruded from their backs, mantis-like demonic beasts with four scythes, huge spider-like demonic beasts with numerous tentacles grown all over their bodies, and there were pure white, two headed snakes. It truly a rich variation of demonic beasts and their march made the ground trembled as cloud of dust was scattered by their tremendous force. Their number seemed to have increased further since the time he confirmed it at the mountain. It was a large army of around 50,000-60,000.



In addition, there were also flying-type demonic beasts above the large crowd. They could be compared to the Pteranodon. One of the tens of pteranodon-fakers was especially big, and a person shadow could slightly be seen on it. It was probably the black robed man. Although Aiko’s manner showed she didn’t want to believe it, it was Shimizu Yukitoshi 8 or 9 out of ten cases.



“… Hajime.” “Hajime-san.”



Yue and Shia noticed something approached them from the change in Hajime’s atmosphere. They called out to Hajime. Hajime turned his gaze towards the two and he nodded once, following that he turned his glance towards Aiko and the others whose faces filled with tension behind him.



“They’ve come. Although it’s considerably earlier than the schedule, it’ll be 30 minutes until their arrival. The number are more than 50,000. They are mix of more than two kind of demonic beasts.”



Hearing the number of demonic beasts had increased further, Aiko and the others turned paler. Towards Aiko and the others who looked uneasy, Hajime jumped above the wall and he displayed a fearless smile over his shoulder.



“Don’t make that face, sensei. There’ll be no problem because there’s only addition of several tens of thousand. Just as planned, those who can fight should stand by the “wall side” in case of emergency. Well, there’ll be no turn for them though.”



Without any fighting mood, Hajime told them to leave it to him, and Aiko narrowed her eyes as they slightly sparkling.



“I understand… though I don’t know what I can do just by standing here just as you’ve said… somehow please be safe…”



As Aiko said that, the guard Knights said, “I wonder if it’s okay to leave it to Hajime” and “Even though it’s too late, we should go to the shelter,” as they ran while carrying the information towards the town. Even the students looked at Hajime with complexed eyes once, then ran after Aiko. Beside Hajime and his party, the remaining were only Will and Tio.



Will was talking about something to Tio, then he ran after Aiko and the others after he bowed to Hajime. Tio answered Hajime’s questioning face with a wry smile.



“Because this one will use all of this one’s power to overcome this incident, then at the very least this ones wanted Will-boy to forgive this one about the adventurers, that kind of talk… that’s why this one will help thee. What, even if this one’s magic power isn’t recovered enough for Dragon Form, this one’s flame and wind are quite the real deal, kay?”



Ryuujin race was called odd existence by the church, and although they could be considered as demi-human race, they could directly manipulated magic power just like demonic beasts. Therefore, even though she wasn’t an all attribute, chantless, no magic circle genius like Yue, there were attributes she excelled at, and she seemed to be capable to do it chantless just like Yue.



Tio self-claimed that as she vehemently stuck out her chest to deliberately emphasized it, but Hajime just silently throw a ring made of magic-crystallization stone. Although Tio showed a questioning look, she opened her eyes wide when she understood it was a magic power tank made of God Crystal, then she looked at Hajime with moistened eyes and speak with a shaking voice.



“Master… to propose right before a fight… this one, of course, this one’s answer is…”



“As if. I am only lending it to you because you have the duty as the battery, no more, no less. Rather, did you just tried to be the fool like a certain someone just now?”



“… I see, that black history.”



Yue dropped her shoulders with unpleasant expression because her thought pattern was somewhat similar to this pervert. Hajime’s objection was completely ignored as Tio put the ring on her finger and gazed at it with a grin while she was also being ignored by him, and finally the large group of demonic beasts could be seen by naked eyes. People with bows and magic arrays in their hands gathered on the “outer wall.” The ground began to tremor, and demonic beasts’ roars could be heard together with dust storm in the distance. Some people started to pray to the god and some people wore expressions as if they’d be dead at any time.



Having seen that, Hajime came forward. Using transmutation, he created the speech stand by piling up the ground. He didn’t thought of easing people’s anxiety because it’d simply turned into panic if friendly fire happened.



Something suddenly climbed on the foundation outside the wall, and the people who thought it was one of the approaching demonic beasts were glaring at it, but they were bewildered because where their gazes gathered was a white-haired, eye-patched boy.



After he confirmed everyone’s gazes were turned to him, Hajime inhaled then speak with a voice that could reached the heaven.



“Listen! O brave people of Ul town! Our victory is nothing but confirmed!”



Wondering what was suddenly said, the townspeople looked at each other. Hajime looked at their confusion with narrowed eyes and continued his words.



“If you ask for the reason, it is because the Goddess has taken side with us! That’s right, it’s the “Goddess of Good Harvest” everyone know; Aiko-sama!”



Hearing those words, everyone began to raised noises with, Aiko-sama? Goddess of Good Harvest?. Aiko whose accompanied by the guard Knights behind and had been helped guiding the people became stupefied.



“As long as Aiko-sama is beside us, we are unbeatable! Aiko-sama is the living god send by the heaven as an ally to humanity, and brought to us “Good Harvest” and “Victory”! I am Aiko-sama’s sword and also her shield, I am here to answer her desire to protect everyone! Look! This is my power which guided by Aiko-sama!”



As he said that, Hajime pull out Schlagen from the void and anchors from its barrel pierced the ground to fixed its position. Following that, he crouched and the townspeople observed him as he aligned his sight towards the vanguard of demonic beasts, the pteranodon-fakers… and he pulled the trigger.



A bright red spark released from Schlagen and accompanied with killing intent, a blinding light ran through the sky in an instant. It crushed one of the pteranodon-fakes which was several kilometers away, and several others on the surrounding descended into the ground because their wings were pulverized by the after-effect. As is, Hajime continued to fired for the second and third times, and the demonic beasts in the sky were exterminated. Then, he purposely altered his aim and the rather huge pteranodon-fake started to fall as it was confused by what happened, moreover the black robed man who rode on it was blown by the after-effect. The black robe blown into the air and he tried to resist the fall.



He didn’t have the time to bring the black robe to Aiko until all of the demonic beasts were dealt with, so he choose to defeat the fastest ones to escape for now. Although Aiko would be angry if she heard he shot him down, he didn’t care at the least if that person was hurt after all. At least Aiko might not noticed it because he shot it down while they were still far away.



Hajime finished exterminating the demonic beasts in the sky and he calmly turned around. There were the appearances of the townspeople who became dumbfounded and slack-jawed.



“All hail Aiko-sama!”



Hajime raised words of praise for Aiko as his last duty. Then, in the next moment…



“”””””All hail Aiko-sama! Long live Aiko-sama! Cheers for Aiko-sama! All hail Aiko-sama!”””””” “”””””All hail Goddess! Long live Goddess! Cheers for Goddess! All hail Goddess!””””””



Inside Ul town, it was no longer just her nickname, a true goddess was bornt. Apparently, their anxiety had blown away as everyone in the town raise shouts of praise as their shining eyes looked towards Aiko, the goddess; their hope. In the distance, Aiko’s face turned crimson as she trembled. Her eyes immediately turned towards Hajime and her small mouth moved as it said, “What.Do.You.Mean.By.This!”.



Hajime turned towards the large crowd of demonic beasts again. Hajime pushed such façade to Aiko because he had his own reason. First, Hajime’s activity would surely make the Church and the Kingdom move in the future, and because Aiko would confronted them if they tried to harm Hajime, it’d be better for her words as “Goddess of Good Harvest” carried power at that time. If they could overcome the town’s emergency with Aiko-sama(…)’s power, then the townspeople would started their own rumour and the name “Goddess of Good Harvest” would surely grabbed people’s hearts further. At that time, she wasn’t only a useful talent for the kingdom but also the goddess that people supported, so the Church and the Kingdom couldn’t easily put their hands on her as her words carried more power.



The second reason was simply because the townspeople would only become frightened and hostile if they were shown a big power. That’s why even if they showed their power, the townspeople’s wonder and fear would be relieved when they remembered it came from the goddess who supported them, and the hostility could be changed to goodwill. Even if they were chased by the Church, there’d be people who cooperated with them… and that’s a good thing.



The third reason was simply to declare that he’d took the full brunt of everything aimed towards “Nagumo Hajime’s teacher.”



His number one reason was so that the townspeople would not panicked and did something wrong, and he immediately thought to do that. Afterwards Aiko would told him various things, but there were also merits for Aiko and she should overlook it because it was the result of her decision… it’d be okay to just escape once everything’s over.



With townspeople’s shouts that they wouldn’t be defeated by demonic beasts because of Aiko on his back, along with Aiko’s piercing glance, and the guard Knights floated smiles as they muttered “Just what, that guys understood well what we meant” and looked at him, Hajime took out two Metherai’s ammunition belt from “Treasure Box” and put them on his shoulders as he advanced ahead.



On her right was Yue as always, on his left was Shia with Orkan on her shoulder which Hajime loaned to her, and beside him was also Tio who absent-mindedly staring at the ring of magic crystallization stone. On the horizon, the pteranodon-fakers who fell to the ground as if they weren’t related to all of this and demonic beasts who marched single-mindedly filled their view.



Hajime looked at Yue. Yue returned Hajime’s gaze and silently nodded. Hajime looked at Shia. Shia with her rabbit ears stood straight nodded full of confidence. Tio on his side… he just put her aside.



Hajime returned his gaze towards the large crowd and floated a smile, and he mutter without any eagerness.



“Then, let’s do it.”





Volume 7 Chapter 2




(What’s with this… what the heck THIS IS!!)



The large crowd of tens of thousand demonic beasts came to attack Ul town from the rear side. The instantly built moat, and the boy, Shimizu Yukitoshi, who desperately shrunk his trembling body as he hysterically invoked barrier, could only flapped his mouth as he couldn’t believed the disastrous scene in front of him. An unbelievable spectacle, and the reality he didn’t want to believe, he repeatedly cursed with words that wouldn’t come out.



That’s right, the one behind the large crowd of demonic beasts was unmistakably Aiko’s missing student, Shimizu Yukitoshi. By the contract he exchanged with a certain man, he planned to frame Aiko and the others for Ul’s annihilation. However, the townspeople whom he thought would be easily twisted and crushed were still unharmed by the completely unforeseen and threatening ambush. Rather, the current progress brought forth was just like a painting of hell for Shimizu’s side.



DOuRURURURURURURURURU!!! DOuRURURURURURURURURU!!!



As such peculiar sounds resounded in the battlefield, numerous flashes filled with enough killing intent speeded along the sky. The flashes reached their target without giving any time to wink. No matter how strong the several species of demonic beasts who roared and made the earth rumbled were, they were changed into lump of meat in a moment without any chance to resist. The 12,000 death per minute became a merciless “wall” as they approached and they pierced their targets without such lukewarm words of “one bullet one body” as they went through several tens of more demonic beasts in the back.



The pierced demonic beasts, ignoring the law of inertia, were burst and collapsed on the spots in general. The demonic beasts immediately spreaded out to left and right to escape the trail of deaths. But the shooter, Hajime, naturally wouldn’t let them escape as he fired the second round from Metherai just like a folding fan. The “barrage” released and it approached all of the demonic beasts just like a rampart. In the blink of time, the mountain of corpses and river of blood were built.



In addition, on Hajime’s left side was Shia with Orkan on her shoulders and shouted, “Fly however you want~,” as she pulled the trigger. Pashu rang out in succession as the rocket launcher fired.



On the contrary of those stupid sounds, the warheads passed into the middle of demonic beasts as they leave trails of sparks and caused huge explosions which blown the demonic beasts within ten meters. The demonic beasts’ bodies near the ground zero were turned into pieces while the intense shock waves damaged the bones and internal organs of the ones farther. Furthermore, the demonic beasts that were incapable of even standing up were treaded and crushed to death.



Even though she exhausted all of the ammo, Shia reloaded it with the piles of warheads on her side from Hajime and fired them successively. The fired rockets exploded overhead the demonic beast just like grenades, and numerous brightly burning flames were scattered below. Just like incendiary grenade, the liquid tars which kept burning at 3,000 oC were extracted from Flame Crystal and poured down just like a great rain towards the demonic beasts whose bodies were burnt to ashes. They screamed and struggled as the flame which carried scorching destruction spreaded and swallowed the surroundings demonic beasts. Comparing the number of demonic beasts that exploded and the ones turned to ashes, in the area Shia was in charge of… were two against one.



Tio was positioned at Shia’s right side. Her outstretched hands were releasing black aurora which scorched the surrounding air since a while ago. It was the Breath from her dragon form. Apparently, she was capable of shooting it even in human form. The black flame which was capable to press on Hajime’s full power, defense flew and instantly penetrated the large crowds in the rear into annihilation. As is, Tio moved her arms horizontally and the black bombardment moved according to her arms and annihilated everything.



After the bombardment was stopped, nothing remained except the gouged ground. In exchange, it should be considerably exhausting. Tio’s shoulders were dropped as her body trembled. However, she immediately straightened her posture after she kissed the ring in her finger. She was taking out magic power’s stock inside the ring of magic crystallization she stone received from Hajime. Because of Breath attack, the vanguard demonic beasts around the area she was in charge of were annihilated, and Tio who could take it easy used magic with comparatively smaller consumption rate.



“Wind which blowing wildly, the torrent which burn in crimson, “Worldly Flame Tempest”.”



For the sake of suppressing magic power consumption rate, she chanted and heightened her concentration. Following that, flame tornado magic was released. Its scale was the same as F4 class tornado on earth. The swirling flame of ten meters in diameter advanced towards the group of demonic beasts and the surrounding demonic beasts were blown up. The demonic beasts thrown up into the air didn’t have any way to struggle and they jumped into the flame as is. Following that, what was thrown out from the crimson tornado were ashes scattered like gray snow. The tornado which turned everything into ashes was trampling the battlefield without reserve.



Yue’s annihilation power on Hajime’s right side surpassed them. Even though Hajime and the others started the attack, Yue stood still and had her eyes closed. The demonic beasts, who realized the attack from the right side was thinner, gathered there to escape the storm of destruction and invaded from the right-wing. The marching demonic beasts were crowding and came charging. At the moment, their distance was about 500 meters. Yue opened her eyes and slowly raised her right hand, and with two whispered words, she recited the name of the powerful magic as if declaring it to the world.



“”Threat Destroyer””



It was the trigger to invoke the Age of God’s magic. It was the magic granted by Miledi Raisen which interfere with one law of the world, “gravity movement.” For the vampire princess who held the natural talent for magic, she needed a “long time” to control her magic power and to fix the image because it was a difficult magic she couldn’t invoke immediately, yet.



Along with Yue’s chant, the same swirling, dark orb just like the one when they fought the black dragon appeared above the approaching demonic beasts. However, there were differences as the orb shape was changed. The orb became thinner and thinner until its length reached 500 meters squarely above the demonic beasts. Following that, the dark ceiling which blocked the sunlight immediately fell before the demonic beasts.



In the next moment, it could be said “the demonic beasts were annihilated from the world.” In truth, the Ul’s townspeople behind the wall could only dumbfoundedly watch what Hajime and his party did as a trampling play; there’s no other way to look at it.



The truth they seen made it looked like a simple thing. The dark ceiling fell into the the group of demonic beast, the demonic beast sunk into the ground as is, and a 10 meter crater with length of 500 meters was created. The demonic beasts that crowding and charging didn’t have the time to understand what happened as all of their bodies were crushed and became stains at the bottom of the ground. In an aspect, it became just like the dump for demonic beasts’ corpses. With only an attack from Yue, nearly 2,000 demonic beasts were killed in an instant, they were unfortunate as the demonic beasts’ bodies were turned into pieces with their entrails scattered with this above the borderline technique.



The following demonic beasts fell one by one into the huge hole where the ground suddenly disappeared. Unable to null their charging momentum, they were pushed from the back. In the blink of time, several thousands of demonic beasts fell into the huge hole, then Yue once again interfere with gravity using magic power which taken out from magic crystallization stone. Demonic beasts’ corpses were piled on top of demonic beasts’ corpses.



The blowing wind carried the smell of the trampled demonic beasts’ blood towards the town. Such strong smell made the townspeople one by one unable to suppressed their nausea, even so the townspeople raised an uproar because of the unreal “overwhelming power” and “trampling play.”WAaAAA——, shout of joy raised all over the town.



The town leaders and the guard Knights remained dumbfounded as they saw Hajime and his party’s power for the first time. The students who once again witnessed that power could strongly feel the “differences” between them as they showed expressions with mixed feelings. Originally, they were going protect the people from such demonic beasts, at leasts they first objected to defending from the same location as the townspeople where they could only see the back of a classmate that was looked down as an “incompetent.” That’s why their mind became complexed.



Aiko was only praying single-mindedly. For the safety of Hajime and his party. At the same time, her expression was distorted because the things about her had became too late to repair. With such gruesome battlefield in front of her, the contradiction with her sweetness strike on people’s hearts.



Before long, the number of demonic beasts were remarkably decreased and the northern ground which was hidden by the large crowd could be seen, and Tio finally fell. Having exhausted the magic power from magic crystallization stone, she couldn’t move because of magic power exhaustion.



“Muu, this one will stop here… already, no fireball can be made… sorry.”



While she collapsed in prostration, only her face looked at Hajime which filled with apologizes and Tio’s complexion had passed from blue as it turned white. Literally, the consumption of magic power she did could brought about her death.



“… It’s enough. Looks like you aren’t just a pervert. Leave the rest to me and sleep as is.”



“… For Master to be gentle… though I thought I’d be insulted… No, about the whipping after this over… can I expect it?”



“Just die as is.”



With her face looked like the dead whose blood was extracted, Tio’s body began to trembling by Hajime’s words. Her expression was one of a satisfaction. Hajime looked at her as if he saw something disgusting and clicked his tongue, then he returned his gaze towards the group of demonic beasts.



Now, their number with scale of 10,000 had been reduced by 8,000 to 9,000. If remembering the large crowd in the beginning, the damages could be stated as a total annihilation. However, the demonic beasts were still made reckless charges. To be accurate, it seemed some of the demonic beasts were giving them commands. The ordinary demonic beasts completely obeyed them, following the commands from the leader of various species, and they charging in perplexion. Hajime was able to noticed that because their number had fallen.



Assuming Shimizu Yukitoshi as the culprit behind this incident, even if he carried some cheats, in truth, Hajime felt suspicious about it as he thought if he really could brainwashed such large crowd just like Tio. But, not all of the tens of thousands demonic beasts were brainwashed, by brainwashing the leaders of various species, he made the subordinates followed those leaders. It was quite efficient. However, there was still the doubt on how he gathered such number in a short time…



For now, he’d put that doubt aside. Because the leaders movements were monotonous and slow, even though there were some flexibilities along with the composition of demonic beasts who obeyed the repeated reckless commands, it’d be better for him to quickly kill those leaders. If he did that, the demonic beasts that faithful to their instinct would run away into the northern mountain because the difference of force from Hajime and his party was already carved into their body.



Hajime stared at the extermination weapon, Metherai, in his hands. Two smokes were raised and it seemed the cooling wouldn’t make it in time. If he continued to attack more than this, it’d fell apart somewhere. Of course there was the possibility to restore it, but he couldn’t do it instantly because it was a delicate objects. It was necessary to took some time to work precisely on it. That’s why, because it’d be a hassle, he switched to more appropriate method of attack.



“Yue, your remaining magic power?”



“… Nn, only two of magic crystallization stones left… the consumption rate of that gravity magic was more than expected. Training is needed.”



“No no, didn’t you just kill more than 20.000 alone? That’s enough. I’ll just pinpoint attack the leftover. Please cover me.”



“Nnh.”



Even though Hajime’s words were few, Yue immediately nodded in acknowledgement and carried it out. They were in harmony. Satisfied by that, Hajime talked to Shia.



“Shia, did you understand the difference in the demonic beasts?”



“Yes, The manipulated demonic beasts just like Tio at that time and the weak-kneed demonic beasts, right?”



“Weak-kneed… yup, well, that’s right. Probably, those demonic beasts that look like Tio’s are the leaders of the groups. The others will run away if they are killed.”



“I see, because I don’t have any ammo left, it’s direct killing!”



“… Ah, aa. What can I say, you’ve become sturdier…”



“Of course. It is for the sake of being by the side of you two.”



Towards the smiling Shia, Hajime returned a wry smile which somehow feel like a gentle smile. However, he tightened his expression as he put Metherai inside the “Treasure Box” and took out Donner-Schlag. At the same time, Shia also put Orkan away and her hand reached Doryukken on her back.



The leaders of demonic beasts numbered around 100. Perhaps, because of the suicide assault, they began to lost their leadership on the subordinate demonic beasts as majority of them fall back.



The attacks from Metherai and Orkan, followed by Tio’s magic might made them thought they had lost their chance, and the demonic beasts began to march back.



To cover Hajime and Shia’ attack, Yue invoked her magic.



“”Thunder Dragon””



Immediately a dragon of thunder that created violent sparks and raised roars of thunderbolts appeared from the heaven which shrouded by dark cloud, and it infringed the frontline from the right to the left. The golden dragon opened its huge mouth, and seeing the group of demonic beasts annihilated as they voluntarily jumped, the following demonic beasts once again flinching. At that chance, Hajime and Shia charge at the crowd at once.



DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh!



Hajime used “Ground Shrinker” as he dashed on the ground and successively fired Donner-Schlag. His eyes grasped the appearances from the small gap on the crowd, he fired the flashes of death and they reached the targets through the small gap as they hit right at the vital points without mercy.



Without even glancing at the demonic beasts in the frontline, somehow only the leaders in the back were mysteriously burst open one after another which made the surrounding demonic beasts halted. Then, a shadow suddenly appeared above one of the demonic beasts. Immediately, the demonic beasts looked up at the sky and there was a girl with fluttering rabbit ears and carrying a gigantic warhammer literally fell from the sky and jumped into the scene.



That girl was Shia, she stepped on the demonic beasts’ heads and hopping just like a rabbit above the crowd. The last demonic beast’s head she stepped on was crushed as she jumped grandly and she flew at once into the sky using Gravity magic to lightened her weight.



Following that, she turned around as she passed the zenith, she increased her weight several times at once and fall with tremendous power. Her targeted point was of course the location where several leaders were stiffened. Her free fall speed was accelerated further as the reaction from the outburst when she pulled Doryukken’s trigger, and she used body strengthening to the limit to put the highest power into her attack. Then, the hammer that could be called the destruction incarnated fall down without even losing its momentum.



“RYAaAAAA!!!”



DOoGAaAAAA!!!



The attack which accompanied with lovely shout was just like a meteorite. The Brutal-type leader who received the direct hit was crushed to death as its head immediately reached the ground while flesh and blood were scattered by the violent impact. The flesh and blood slipped into the ground and stones which blown by the impact and returned to the ground as fertilizer. Following that, the same fate visited the crowding demonic beasts in the surroundings. Doryukken’s overwhelming impact made the ground and stones flew just like bullets and scattered the fleshes which also returned into the ground just like before.



Shia was in the bottom of the crater she made herself and she used the reaction from the outburst to pull Doryukken which buried on the ground and at the same time she used the high-speed movement to move towards the demonic beasts and once again attacked each group’s leader.



As expected, she didn’t have the heart to just naively let the demonic beasts that did whatever they please away, and Shia crushed the surrounding meat wall to death. Shia used Doryukken’s designed gimmick to further extended the handle by more than one meter and used the outburst to do high-speed revolution just like a spinning top. Following that, Doryukken which carried enough centrifugal force blown away the approaching mixed wall of meat.



Countless Brutals fluttered as they were blown away radially. The girl with delicate appearance easily blown away the many times bigger demonic beasts as if they were pingpong ball. The spectacle was just like a joke. Shia restored her body pose from the flow of gyration and she became depressed when she saw the targeted leaders were crushed from the gap of the blown away Brutals.



Then, in that moment, her rabbit ears caught a sound of something new approaching in high speed from the right rear. Without panicking, Shia timingly rotated her body and used Doryukken to intercept the ambush. But, the newcomers, demonic beasts with black-fur, four ruby-like eyes, and looked like wolves, were already expecting that as they immediately decelerated and splendidly avoid Shia’s attack.



If they were normal demonic beasts, in theory they’d continued the attack and became corpses by the swung weapon. Actually, Shia also had thought of that as she concentrated her body strengthening on her legs, and she’d won by immediately jumping overhead the raid.



However, Shia’s expectation was betrayed. Somehow the four-eyed wolves weren’t jumped at Shia but Doryukken with their strong jaws as they used all of their might to pushed the ground to seal it. Of course such demonic beasts couldn’t beat Shia’s body strengthening. But, because she was surprised by the unexpected, her movement was sealed for a moment.



Thus the black, four-eyed wolves had enough time. The same kind of demonic beast was approaching as it opened its mouth filled with sharp fangs from Shia’s back with a perfect timing. Shia opened her eyes wide and immediately released the body strengthening which concentrated on her legs towards her whole body. That because she was preparing to received the attacks.



At the moment those sharp fangs almost drenched by Shia’s blood, something interrupted between Shia and the four-eyed wolf. With length of 60 cm and width of 40 cm, it was a metallic cross which middle part was just like a round shield. That cross prevented the demonic beast’s mouth from biting Shia.



Gari gari sound resounded and the demonic beast desperately tried to crunch the foreign object that jumped out all of a sudden, but the cross that emitted weak red light wasn’t daunted at all. In the next moment, the demonic beast’s lower jaw was blown off accompanied with roaring sound.



“GUuRUaAA!!!”



The cross soundlessly moved overhead the screaming and writhing demonic beast and a bullet pulverized the demonic beast’s head accompanied with another roaring sound. In addition,



ZUDONh!!



Hearing the firing sound, Shia lightened her grip on Doryukken. Shia looked back at the four-eyed wolves who temporary closed off her path and their abdomens and heads were also shot through as they crumbled by another two crosses which floating mid-air.



“”Shia, don’t relax your guard. Among the demonic beasts, there were some whose movement are obviously different. There’s not only brainwashed ones and the subordinates of demonic beasts. Take three of the Cross Bits with you. Annihilate the 27 on the right. The frontline will hold for five minutes for Yue.””



Shia finally caught up that she had escaped from the pinch and he received the “Telepathy” from Hajime. Hah, Shia who regained her senses was straightening herself and answered through the telepathy stone on her choker (Shia never thought of it as a collar).



“Roger! Also, I am saved. Thank you very much!”



“Ou, be careful.”



“… Fufu, recently, Hajime-san’s attitude becoming more and more softened. It is just one step away from it to become an accomplished fact!”



Having confirmed the communication was cut, Shia muttered that to herself as she smiled because the floating “Cross Bits” in the surroundings were as if they were protecting her. Following that, she psyched up and readied Doryukken, then she set out to annihilate the cautious leader which had different fur color from the demonic beasts from a while ago.



“Fuu, just as usual, she always got into some trouble, this girl…”



Muttering that, Hajime exterminated the demonic beasts with overwhelming force. There were four cross floating around Hajime.



“Cross Bit” was how Hajime called the floating crosses, they moved by the same principle as the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes and their type specialized in attacking. Inside were loaded with gun and rifle bullet, they were operated using the bracelet where seven induction stones were installed. Moreover, the surface was covered with mineral which endowed with “Vajra” using Creation magic, so they could become strong shields as they reacted on the magic power from induction stone.



Hajime, who used Gun=Kata as he pleased while manipulating the Cross Bits at the same time, unfolded a storm of attacks without any room of escape. Already, 40 of the demonic beasts’ leaders were killed and there were demonic beasts who began to escape from the full-powered “Pressure.”



Then, a human’s shadow who screaming something towards the escaping demonic beasts in the distance was seen by Hajime at the edge of his view. Because it only put out its head from the ground, for a moment he thought it was someone’s severed head, but Hajime used “Farsight” and he certainly saw it move. That head was covered with black robe.



The black robed man, Shimizu was throwing a tantrum just like a child as he shouted at the escaping demonic beasts, then he began to recite something as he held up the artifact staff received in Imperial Palace. Of course, because there was no obligation to wait for the chant completion, Hajime fired Donner in his spare time and the staff was blown off in the middle. As the after effect, Shimizu was knocked and collapsed into the hole on the ground.



Thus although he didn’t know what Shimizu was trying to do, the black, four-eyed, wolf-type demonic beasts who were hidden inside the crowd and patiently waiting for the decisive gap around Hajime jumped at once. As expected, they had the potential of coordination ability that couldn’t be compared to the surrounding demonic beasts. It made him remembered the two-tailed wolf from before.



Actually, Hajime feel they could be a good match if they fight against the two-tailed wolf. Although they didn’t have peculiar magic to manipulate thunder and simply had inferior offensive power compared to the two-tailed wolf, sometime, they evaded the location Hajime attacked as if they knew about it, so their peculiar magic must be something along “Prediction” system. Following that, their coordination would make them the same level as the two-tailed wolf… in other words, it wasn’t strange for the demonic beasts to be in the so-called low layer of the Abyss.



Why such demonic beasts here?, though there was such a doubt, he undertaking attacks, so it was just unnecessary thought for now. Hajime temporarily averted his thought from eliminating the leaders of the demonic beasts and concentrated on defeating the 12 black, four-eyed wolves.



Front, back, left, and right, furthermore there were black, four-eyed wolves who began to attack from above, so he rotated his body like a top and successively fired Donner-Schlag. They used “Prediction” to evaded from their spots, and Hajime also used “Prediction” to attack their next location. Even so, he was surprised that there were some that still capable to evade. Similar to the two-tailed wolf, they must have a method of communication like telepathy among their companions, and there might be some who looked over the battlefield.



Avoiding Hajime’s shots, the four-eyed wolf leaped from the back because of the small gap when he reloaded mid-air, and one of the Cross Bits expanded just like flower petal and blown it away. Using that demonic beasts as stepping stone was another four-eyed wolf as it jumped, and the Cross Bit immediately became a shield to obstructed it, then he shoot out the Shotgun from the elbow of his artificial left arm.



Inside the rain of flesh and blood, two Cross Bits concentrated barrage at one corner towards the encircling four-eyed wolves. When the encirclement opened by force, he slipped through using “Ground Shrinker” and shot to death the four-eyed wolves from the back which followed by Donner-Schlag further slaughtering another two because they had finished reloading.



Then, there was one that thrown away its body since the start and hurled its attacked body as it jumped towards Hajime. Hajime evaded by jumping sideway, shot the lower part of the demonic beast that came flying and blown off the four-eyed wolf that charging from its back. Taking a passive approach, Hajime immediately stood up and the four-eyed wolves opened their big mouths as if they had waited for this moment, then they tried to crunch Hajime with their fangs. It was a perfect timing. If seen from the side, it unmistakably could be seen that the four-eyed wolves’ mouths had settled on Hajime’s body.



However, at that time Hajime’s appearance started to sway and the four-eyed wolves’ mouths onlygachin!, let out such sounds as they bit the empty space. Unbeknownst to them, Hajime’s body had advanced one step. Hajime shot through the abdomens of the four-eyed wolves he just passed through.



Furthermore, another four-eyed wolves leaped at Hajime, but it became the same as before, the place they attacked was wrong by a step. In each case, Hajime shot and blown them away as they passed each other.



The black, four-eyed wolves were as if they mistaken their eyes measurement and the chain of event completely became like that. It was the skill derived from Hajime’s “Sign Interception” called “+Phantom Step”. The effect was at the time he intercepted his presence and he’d leave his presence in the spot before he intercepted it for a few seconds. Because the real body’s presence was intercepted, it’d be mistaken that he was still on his former location. Of course, because he merely shifted his presence, it was comparatively easier to notice if ones carefully observed him. But, in a fight which few comma of seconds could decided between victory and defeat, it was difficult for them to not be puzzled. The validity increased if the enemies were particularly sensitive towards presence.



Naturally, Hajime used “Light Speed” to control the Cross Bits, so no matter even if the black, four-eyed wolves were demonic beasts with Abyss-class power, they naturally weren’t enemies for him. In the end, although the four-eyed wolves were probably Shimizu’s trump card, they couldn’t even grazed Hajime and annihilated in two minutes.



Hajime scattered the Cross Bits which killed the leaders with raging force. From the information the Cross Bits he put beside Shia in separated location, only several left before it ended in the other side. Even the demonic beasts that tried to charge towards the town were completely disallowed to drew near by Yue’s thunder dragon.



After about two minutes, Hajime confirmed that they succeeded in eliminating the brainwashed demonic beasts. Then, having confirmed that, suu— he greatly inhaled and roared which coupled with “Magic Power Emission.”



“KAaAAAAAAAAAAA!!!”



The huge roar and the surge of magic power ran through the battlefield. The overwhelming pressure attacked and shocked the demonic beasts’ minds and they feel huge instinctive fear. Following that, they noticed their groups’ leaders were already non-existence. After a moment of stiffening, they began to turn on their heels and desperately escaping towards the north while making a detour around Hajime.



The groups of demonic beasts which like a water current was as if parted by a rock on the river which was Hajime. Hajime confirmed his appearance with a sharp gaze, when he discovered Shimizu who seemed trying to escape using the last four-eyed wolf in the moment of confusion.



Hajime kneeled and firmly set Donner with both hands and successively pulled the trigger. The bullets ran through the air with miraculous time lag, the four-eyed wolf sneak a glance towards the sign of turbulence felt by “Prediction” and avoid the first attack, but it collapsed as the second attack shot through its big thigh. The impact made Shimizu blown away. Because his body’s specs were high, he immediately got up even though his body was struck hard. He rushed and shouted something towards the four-eyed wolf then he started to kick its head.



He probably shouted something about it should quickly stand up. He was obviously hysteric. After a while, maybe he was hinted by something to force the wolf to move, he began to chant as he put his hand on the black, four-eyed wolf’s head.



Hajime saw that, fired the railgun without the need to discuss, and pierced where the black, four-eyed wolf was stopped. Shimizu who once again blown away because of the after effect was moving his limbs in panic, and this time he escaping by himself as he began to run towards the north just like the demonic beasts.



Hajime took out magic-driven two-wheeler, accelerated at once and caught up to Shimizu in the blink of the time. Shimizu looked back towards the KIiIII! sound behind him and he frantically moved his limbs to escape as he became stupefied by the bike which shouldn’t be existed in this different world.



“What! What the hell! That’s impossible! If it’s true, the same hero as I- GUPEh!?”



The back of the head of Shimizu who frantically running while cursing was struck by Hajime’s artificial arm with two-wheeler’s momentum as is. Shimizu’s face dived into the ground and slipped on the ground for several meters with killer whale-like posture before he stopped.



“Well then, what should I say to sensei? About this guy… and according to the situation, mine will…”



Hajime said that to himself as he tied up Shimizu using the wire from his artificial arm and return towards the town as is. The appearance of Shimizu who was dragged by the two-wheeler as he was painted by the scattered blood and fleshes of demonic beasts while creating a dust storm on the ruined ground… could be correctly said as a defeated soldier.





Volume 7 Chapter 3




For Shimizu Yukitoshi, to be summoned to a different world was the dream he yearned for. Because he knew that was impossible, every day he was dreaming by a reading book in his hand or web novels. In his dream, he saved a lot of worlds, though he didn’t know if he went towards the Happy End with the heroines. Inside Shimizu’s room, the walls couldn’t be seen as they were buried by posters of beautiful girls, and inside the glass rack at one of the walls were his favorite beautiful girl figures with improper poses lined up in such a cramped place. His bookshelf was filled with manga, light novels, thin books, and eroges, while the ones that couldn’t be put there were all over the room as they made towers.



That’s right, Shimizu Yukitoshi was a genuine otaku. However, there’s no one among the classmates who knew that fact. That’s because Shimizu himself thoroughly hid it. There was no need to talk about his reasons. He had seen the classmates’ attitude towards Hajime, that’s why there was no way he could become an open otaku.



Inside class, it could be said he was just a mob character by those who knew him well. There was no one he was especially close to, and he always quietly read a book in his seat. If he was talked to, he would give the minimum answer in a small mutter. To begin with, he kept the quiet attitude because he was bullied in junior high school. Maybe because it was the natural flow, he became a truant and stayed inside his own room every day, and he inevitable tried to create books and games to kill time. Even though his parents always worried about him, he brought otaku goods into his room every day which made his big and little brother annoyed. They even showed that in their attitudes and words, which made Shimizu feel that the comforting house became worse, the so-called losing his place to stay. With such a gloomy environment, Shimizu thought of doing devious things to others inside his mind without letting it out on the surface. Thus he became more and more devoted into delusions and book creation.



Because he was like that, when he understood the summoning to a different world was the truth, his mind’s state was as if shouting, “Here it come–!!”. Even at the time Aiko protested fiercely against Ishtar, or when Kouki passionately decided to help humanity win and return to their original world, inside Shimizu’s head were only the delusions of the real him doing spectacular things in this different world. He was elated because the delusions he thought as impossible had become truth, and the pattern of being summoned to a different world where the protagonist was being unreasonably demanded was driven away from his mind.



Thus it actually became just as he expected, there was a conflict in this different world life for real. First, Shimizu certainly kept a certain cheat-like spec as a secret, but that was the same thing for the other classmates. Furthermore, Kouki was the “hero,” not him and maybe because of that the women only kept coming near Kouki, and it became the saying that “he was just one of the many additional people.” With this, nothing changed from the time he was in Japan. Though his wish was fulfilled, the reality that didn’t become just like he hoped for made Shimizu increase his deviousness, and his dissatisfaction was increasing in his mind.



Just why am I not the hero? Just why do the women only surround and desire Kouki? Just why is it not I, but Kouki who always gets treated as special? Even though I can do better if I am the hero. Then, the girls will accept me if I approach them… this, this satisfying condition is everyone’s fault, I am the only special one,that’s the egoistic idea which gnawed on Shimizu’s mind.



At that time. The combat practice held in the « Orcus Great Dungeon ». Shimizu thought of it as his chance. I won’t mind about anyone else. It was the same even if they are here or not. Those classmates that treated me as background will surely notice my skill, Shimizu tried to use this opportunity… however, there was something he noticed.



He wasn’t a special existence at all, there was no opportunity-like development, and he certainly would become a “dead” person in the next moment. As he was about to be killed by the Traum Soldier, he saw the “hero” who fought with a more brutal monster in the distance, and his fantasy about a different world crumbled as it made a rattling sound.



Then he witnessed the classmate who fell to “death” into the abyss, and his heart was broken. He only interpreted things on his own convenience and his mind always kept seeing others inferior than him, so naturally his heart was not strong.



When he returned to the royal palace, Shimizu once again shut himself in his own room. However, the literacies that could cheer him up just like in his room in Japan were not here. That’s why Shimizu naturally spent his time reading books around the skills and magic concerning his class, “Dark Magic-user.”



Dark magic system was a magic system which acted on the others’ minds and senses, it was recognized as magic that basically give bad statuses to the target in battle. Shimizu’s aptitude were such as altering the others’ recognition, showing illusions, interfering with the image of the completed magic to disrupt the invocation, and with further mastering, he could make disorder in one’s body control.



Thus the depression in his heart was completely blown away as he read the books, and Shimizu immediately recalled something. Can I brainwash someone if I master dark magic?, something like that. Shimizu was excited. If his assumption was correct, he could do whatever he wants to anyone. That’s right, whatever he wants. The stagnating darkness spread in Shimizu’s mind. Since that day, he zealously trained with undivided attention.



However, it didn’t easily go his way. First, for something with strong ego like a human, he needed to continuously apply the spell for several hours or else he could not do the brainwashing. Naturally, that was if there was no resistance. As expected, there’s no one who wouldn’t react if he put the spell. It was necessary for him to put the target in a sleep-like state. If the target was a human, it would be too hard for him to hide and control brainwashing, circumstance-wise and time-wise. As he thought of what happened when he was found out, Shimizu couldn’t help but abandoning this because of the high risk.



Shimizu drooped his shoulders, but he immediately recalled about the reason he was summoned, the demon race could control demonic beasts. He wondered if he could brainwash the demonic beasts who moved by instinct and have small egos compared to humans. To confirm it, Shimizu went outside the Imperial Capital and repeatedly experimented on small fry demonic beasts. As the result, he proved that it was far easier to brainwash them compared to humans. To begin with, he could only do it because Shimizu was one of the cheaters and had an extremely high talent in dark magic. Previously, Ishtar had said that even if the people of this spent much time, they could only control 1-2 things.



Shimizu who had finished the experiments in the Imperial Capital’s outskirts thought it’d be good if he could control strong demonic beasts. However, he felt intimidated to go towards the dungeon frontline just like Kouki’s party. Then at the time he was at lost of what to do, he heard the talk about Aiko’s bodyguards. If he joined them, he’d be able to encountered a good demonic beast or so he thought.



In the end, Aiko’s party came to Ul town, then he heard about the demonic beasts in the mountain ranges area in the north and he was lost in greed when he thought to make them his subordinates. In their next meeting, everyone would be in awe and respect towards his great achievement, and he’d be treated as special or so his delusion went.



Normally, for the short amount of time of around two weeks, no matter if Shimizu was a genius in dark magic, and he used the efficient method by only brainwashing the leader of the groups, 1,000 was the limit. Moreover, it would only be those in Brutal’s level in the second mountain range.



However, he was helped by a certain existence, and he was able to control Tio, who gave her power to Shimizu to efficiently brainwash even the demonic beasts in the fourth mountain range by chance. And at the same time, that certain existence promised him to reinforce him with troops of demonic beasts every day, and Shimizu’s bound of reasoning completely came off. Finally, as he was soaked in joy that he was indeed special, the large crowd in his full control was turned towards the town.



Thus as the result…



He was turned into such misery for those who saw him, and he was made to kneel in front of Aiko and the others. By the way, the reason why he looked like a defeated soldier was because Hajime dragged him using magic-driven two-wheeler on the ground which covered with demonic beasts’ flesh and blood coupled with the fluttering cloud of dust. Shimizu was unconscious with the white of his eyes displayed, and when they saw he was brought to the town with his head repeatedly hitting the ground, Aiko and the others’ expressions were cramped.



By the way, their current location was in the outskirts and in this location were only Aiko, the students, several people from the bodyguard Knights and town leaders, Will, and Hajime’s party. As expected, if the mastermind behind the attack was brought to the town, the commotions would become bigger and it’d be difficult to hold a conversation or so their reason. The town leaders which remained inside the town were currently busy with post treatment.



Aiko had stepped up towards Shimizu who was collapsed with the white of his eyes shown. His appearance which wearing a black robe, following by the fact he was dragged back directly from the battlefield became unassailable proofs that he was the culprit behind the attack. It was a fact she didn’t want to believe as Aiko’s expression warped in sadness, and she shook Shimizu to woke him up.



David and the others told her to stop it because it was dangerous, but she shook her head to refuse them. The same thing happened with the restraint. It was released because she wouldn’t be able to hold a good talk with Shimizu with that on. In the end, Aiko was only wanted to talk as a teacher and a student.



Before long, Shimizu’s consciousness begin to return from Aiko’s call. He looked at the surrounding with a blank look, and maybe because he understood his situation, Hah, he raised his upper body. He immediately tried to distance himself, but maybe because the damage on the back of his head, he staggered and fell on his butt, then backed away as is. With caution and abjection, he had a mixed expression with irritation excluded, and he looked around.



“Shimizu-kun, please calm down. There is no one here that will harm you… sensei only want to talk with Shimizu-kun. Just why did you do that… I don’t mind if we talk about something else. Will you, let sensei hear Shimizu-kun’s feelings?”



Because Aiko matched her gaze to Shimizu, he stopped looking around. Following that, he averted his eyes and looked down then spoke with voice that couldn’t be heard easily… rather he started cursing.



“Why? You still don’t understand that. That’s why this guys and that guys are so incompetent. Treating me like an idiot… the hero, that hero is annoying. Even though I could do better if it’s me… unnoticed, and treated like a mob character… honestly, there are only idiots… that’s why I thought of showing my worth…”



“You… know your place! You almost destroy the town!”



“That’s right! If you are talking about idiot, it is you!”



“Think how much you made Ai-chan-sensei worried!”



Far from reflecting, Shimizu was cursing out his dissatisfaction to the surrounding, so Tamai, Sonobe, and the other students were angry and said their objection one after another. Maybe because he was pressured by their momentum, Shimizu looked more and more down and assumed silence.



Because Aiko couldn’t stand Shimizu looked like that, she tried to held down the further heating up students, and questioned Shimizu with a voice which carried as much warm as possible.



“I see, you have a lot of dissatisfaction… however, Shimizu-kun. If it’s about triumphing over everyone, that made sensei don’t understand it even more. Why, did you tried to attack the town? If you attacked the town as is… a lot of people will be dead… aside on how you subdued a lot of demonic beasts, that cannot show your “worth.””



Aiko’s justifiable question made Shimizu slightly looked up and his dreary, dark eyes turned towards Aiko from the gaps of his dirtied forelock which hanged down, then he floated a faint smile.



“… I can show it… if it’s to the Demon race.”



“Wh-!?”



Those unexpected words which came out from Shimizu’s mouth made not only Aiko, excluding Hajime and his party, everyone in that place were shocked. Shimizu raised a satisfied expression when he saw their appearances, and though it was the same as before, he began to talk with a voice that stronger than the previous pressure which made him shut up.



“To capture the demonic beast, I went to the mountain range area in the north alone. At that time, I met a person from demon race. At the beginning, of course I was cautious… but that Demon race wanted to talk to me. Then, we came to an understanding. That guy know my true worth. That’s why I came to that guy… demon race’s side and made a contract.”



“A contract… you say? What do you mean?”



Aiko was shaken by the fact he was connected to the Demon race, their enemy in war, but she was sure that the Demon race must have coaxed her student and she asked that while restraining her anger.



Looking at Aiko, Shimizu was grinning as if he saw something amusing, then he said the impactful words.



“… Hatanaka-sensei… it is to kill you.”



“… Eh?”



For a moment, Aiko didn’t understand what he had said as she spontaneously let out that silly voice. The same thing happened to everyone there, they became stupefied for a moment, they understood the meaning earlier than Aiko, and stared at Shimizu with fury in their eyes.



Shimizu ducked for a moment from the piercing glares which filled with strong anger from the students and the guard Knights, but he stopped mid-way and continued his words as if to shake off their glares.



“What’s with that expression. Did you think I was used by the demon race? In certain ways, you’re a more troublesome existence than the hero… “Goddess of Good Harvest”… if I make it looked like you killed the townspeople, I will be welcomed to demon race’s side as a “hero.” It’s that kind of contract. My ability is amazing after all. They said it’d be too wasteful for me to be under that hero. As expected, the one who understands it will understand. Actually, they also lent me strong demonic beasts, and I was able to create an army that exceeded my imagination… that’s why, that’s why I thought can absolutely kill you! What’s with that! What the heck was that! Why an army of 60,000 was defeated! Why those weapons existed in this different world! You, just what on earth are you!”



Because of the ridicule at the beginning, Aiko could only stare blankly at Shimizu, her student when he said the word “kill,” and maybe because he was agitated as he spoke, he began to shout when he looked at Hajime. Inside his eyes were something more than melancholy and abjection, the irritation because nothing went according to his desire, the hatred towards Hajime who obstructed him, following that, the envy towards that power were mixed, mixed and created his madness.



Apparently, Shimizu didn’t notice the gray-haired, eye-patched boy before him was Nagumo Hajime, his classmate. To begin with, it could be said it couldn’t be helped because he never talk to him…



Shimizu kept glaring and cursing at Hajime as if he would attack him at any moment, and Hajime who suddenly became the target could hear Shimizu cursing as “Even though you’re just a chuuni character,” and actually he got a considerably deep damage as he looked at the distance to escape the reality. His attitude could be seen as, “I don’t think anything of you,” so it caused Shimizu to agitated further.



Having guessed Hajime’s feeling, his back was patted by Yue and her kindness made him want to cry again.



Maybe thanks to Hajime ignoring the serious mood and entering his own world(?), Aiko was given the time to regain her sense from the impact, she took one deep breath and even without any courage to confront his rage, she didn’t move from her spot then grasped Shimizu’s hand, and talked quietly.



“Shimizu-kun. Please calm down.”



“Wh-What’s with you! Let go!”



He was surprised by the sudden touch and Shimizu immediately tried to shake her off, but Aiko said she wouldn’t let go and further increased the power of her grip. Maybe because Shimizu couldn’t look back at Aiko’s serious gaze, he gradually calmed down as he looked down again, and his expression was hidden by his forelock.



“Shimizu-kun… I have understood your feelings. You want to be “special.” Your feelings aren’t mistaken. It was a natural wish for a human. Following that, you surely can become “special.” After all, although your method was mistaken, it is the truth that you can do that much… however, don’t go to the demon race’s side. Having heard your story, that demon race was just trying to use your desire. Sensei, can’t entrust her important student to that kind of person at all… Shimizu-kun. Let’s do it over, okay? I don’t want anyone to fight, but if Shimizu-kun wish for it, sensei will support you. If it is you, you definitely can fight as equal with Amanogawa-kun and the others. Then, some day, let’s return together when we found the method to return to Japan, okay?”



Shimizu heard Aiko speaking in silence, and before one knew it his shoulders trembled. Even the students and the guard Knights thought Shimizu was shaken by Aiko’s words and began to cry. Actually, Sonobe Yuka, who famous to be easily moved to tears in the class, was already crying when she saw Aiko and Shimizu.



However, it wasn’t something sweet as it wouldn’t simply went her way. Aiko patted the trembling Shimizu’s head with gentle expression, but Shimizu suddenly gripped the outstretched hand in return and pulled her, then he turned her over and coiled his arm around Aiko’s neck. Aiko unintentionally groaned because her arm was bound behind her and he took out a 10 cm long needle from god-knows where, then he pointed it at back of her neck.



“Don’t move! Or I will pierce it!”



Shimizu shouted hysterically. His expression was twitching in convulsion, in his eyes had the same madness when he was cursing Hajime. His previously trembling shoulders was apparently from laughter.



Aiko looked in pain because she was unable pull apart Shimizu’s arm which coiled on her throat. The surrounding people desperately stopped their movement after they received Shimizu’s warning. From Shimizu’s appearance, they understood he would seriously do that for real. Everyone worriedly called Aiko’s name with regretting tone, and Shimizu continued to ridicule them.



Incidentally, Hajime finally returned to reality at this time. Because he was on the trip to escape the reality up until now, his face said, “Oya? Since when…,” because of the sudden development.



“Listen, this is a poisonous needle I got from a demonic beast in the northern mountain range! She’ll only suffer for a few minute before she die if I pierce it! If you understand, then everyone must throw away their weapons and raise your hands!”



With the words from the maddened Shimizu, the surrounding people turned pale. Shimizu was grinning at the students and guard Knights who completely couldn’t move, and he turned his glance towards Hajime.



“Oi, you, chuuni bastard, you! Not on your back! I am talking about you! Don’t take me for a fool, you bastard! If you keep joking around, I’ll really kill her! If you understand, give me your gun! The other arms too!”



Because the way Shimizu called him was too cruel, he inadvertently looked back appealing, “It’s not me,” which ended as futile, and Hajime face looked so unpleased. In spite of the tense situation, his attitude didn’t change as he was calm, and Shimizu lost his temper because he thought he was taken for a fool again. Thus hysterically, he demanded Hajime to hand over his firearms.



Hajime returned to look at Shimizu with extremely cold eyes when he heard that.



“Well, you, to say you won’t kill her… to begin with, you can’t go to the demon race’s side if you don’t kill sensei, so you’re going to kill her anyway, right? That’s why I won’t hand them over.”



“Shut up, shut up, shut up! Just be quiet and hand them over! An idiot like you should just do what I said! Th-That’s right, hehe, oi, give me your slave too. Let her carry the firearms!”



With his calm returning, Shimizu shouted some more. Because he was too cornered, he couldn’t do a normal judgement anymore. Shia, who marked down by Shimizu, was trembling and her expression displayed her disgust.



“Even if I fired three times in succession to shut you up, you’ll only become more creepy… rather, Shia, even if you’re disgusted don’t hide behind me. He isn’t that dreadful.”



“But, he is really disgusting… it can be said my mind can’t accept it… just look, those pimples. It’s impossible to not feel disgust.”



“Well, though he wish to be a hero, his lines were the same as the thief that was killed easily by the protagonist in the very beginning after all.”



Though the person in question couldn’t hear because they lowered their volumes, everyone could hear them because as her disgusted eyes and their volumes were becoming louder. Shimizu could only flapped his mouth and his complexion gradually dyed in red, then it changed to blue, and in the end it turned white. It was an example of the change in complexion because of the anger which became too high.



Shimizu began to mutter, “I am a hero, I am special, this guys and that guys are just idiots, everything are those guys’ fault, there’s no problem, everything will go as I wished, I am a hero after all, I am special,” with hollow eyes, following that, he suddenly let out a high-pitched laugh as if he was shaken free of something.



“… Shi-Shimizu-kun… let us talk… after all… everything is okay…”



Even though Aiko was in pain as she was exposed to Shimizu’s crazed antique, she let out those words, and at the moment he heard that, Shimizu completely stopped his laugh and strangled Aiko further.



“… How annoying. Stop trying to be a good person, you hypocrite. Just shut up and become a tool for me to escape from here.”



Shimizu muttered that with a dark tone and he looked at Hajime again. Without any agitation or other expressions, he looked at Hajime with eyes filled with negative feelings, next he saw the gun in the holster on his thigh. What he wanted was transmitted without the need for words. If he falter here, he could just disregard his life and death and, no, his good future would be only a dream if he didn’t harm Aiko.



Hajime leaked a sigh, he thought to fire the wire when he passed the gun and used “Lightning-clad” even if Aiko got involved, but he slowly reached Donner-Schlag so as to not stimulated Shimizu. Because Aiko body was small, she couldn’t become a shield, and it was possible for Hajime to hit Shimizu before he realize with his drawing speed, he thought it’d be okay to be looked by Aiko with slightly hurt eyes.



But, at the moment Hajime started to drop his hand, the situation suddenly changed.



“Kh!? Don’t! Avoid it!”



As she shouted that, Shia strengthened her body to the best of her ability and momentarily achieved a high-speed movement on Ground Shrinker level, and she jumped towards Aiko.



Because of the abruptness, Shimizu immediately tried to pierce the needle into Aiko. Shia was doing the impossible by pulling Aiko and twisted her body to protect her from something, then a blue colored water current penetrated through Shimizu’s chest and that laser-like thing passed over the place in which Aiko’s head where a while ago almost simultaneously.



Hajime, who was inside the trajectory, used Donner to defend against the laser of water that probably the offensive magic called “Break” from water system. Then about Shia, she vigorously charged as she embraced Aiko closely, as is, she slipped and dived into the ground with her shoulder. She raised a dust storm, and Shia who finally stopped, “Uguh,” raised a pained groan and remained lying.



“Shia!”



Among everyone who was stiffened by the sudden development, Yue ran with all of her might as she called Shia’s name. Following that, she took a position to protect Shia and the woman she embraced, Aiko from another attack.



Hajime didn’t say anything and only thanked and praised Yue in his mind because she moved just as he hoped for, then he held Donner with both hand while he used “Farsight” to trace the trajectory of that “Break.” Immediately, he saw a black clothed man with pointed ears and swept-back hair who rode on a huge bird-like demonic beast in the distance.



DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh! DOPANh!



In a flash, Hajime successively fired the railgun towards the flying demonic beast and the silhouette. The man with swept-back hair, as if he had anticipated the attack, made the bird-like demonic beast desperately evade by doing barrel roll as he confirmed Hajime’s location. It was quite an agile demonic beasts, but it couldn’t evaded everything and one of the bird-like demonic beast’s leg was blown off, the swept-back man’s shoulder was also blown off. Even so, rather than falling, its speed didn’t slowed and it aimed to escape at full speed. It could only said the way it escape from the series of attacks as nothing but splendid.



Hajime guessed that the man probably the person from Demon race from Shimizu’s talk. The man already detoured to the town in low altitude as if he was making the town as a shield, then vanished. From the method he used to escape from Hajime’s bullets, it seemed the information about Hajime and his party were already known by the Demon race which made Hajime raised a bitter expression. Because he escaped towards Uldeia lake, it’d be too difficult to pursuit him using unmanned reconnaissance plane if he escaped through the forest. Above all, that’s not his current priority.



“Hajime!”



Maybe because Yue had also guessed the enemy escaped, she called Hajime with a voice which contained impatience unlike the usual.



Hajime put Donner back into the holster, and ran up to Shia without even looking at the collapsed Shimizu. Shia was faced-up as she was rested on Yue’s laps and her expression warped in pain. Aiko beside her also showed similar expression as she was embraced by Yue.



“Ha-Hajime-san… ukh… I… am… okay… p-please, sensei-san was… grazed by the poisonous needle…”



There was a hole with three centimeters in diameter in Shia’s flank. Even though the bleeding was suppressed by body strengthening, it could be understood that she was in considerable pain from the amount of sweat flowed in her face. However, she floated a forced smile and told to give priority to Aiko with a shaking voice.



When he saw Aiko, her complexion was completely paled, and her limbs began to convulse. Maybe because she heard Shia and Hajime’s conversation, Aiko desperately shook her neck, appealing to let Shia treated first. She couldn’t let out any word because the poison had already spreaded. If Shimizu’s words were correct, she only had several minutes, no, it’d be less than a minute looking from Aiko’s appearance. She didn’t want to make more trouble as it was already too late.



Hajime averted his gaze away from Aiko and unhesitatingly nodded at Shia, then he let out a vial from “Treasure Box.” At that time, the surrounding people finally ran up towards Hajime and the others with uneasy expressions as they let out cries from their mouths. The students, David, and the Knights were particularly shaken, they were half in panic. They were asking Hajime about her safety, stepped back when they saw her appearance, and tried to cast recovery magic which was ineffective… towards such people, Hajime’s one word, “Silence,” with killing pressure made them stepped back and keep silent.



Even Hajime was slightly surprised by what he had said. His anger because Shia’s injury was more than he expected. Apparently, without him noticing it, he had recognized her as an important companion deep in his heart. Therefore, he was unbearably angry towards the Demon race that came in contact with Shimizu and himself who had forgotten the possibility of him still nearby.



If he do something to Aiko and the others when Hajime’s party went to the frontline, the possibility it become a chaos was high. However, because he actually didn’t do anything, he was convinced that he didn’t want to do it directly, without any basis to it.



As a matter of fact, that demon race person have thought to assassinate Aiko when Shimizu was on rampage, but he lost the chance because he was stupefied by Hajime’s party which was out of the normal. Afterwards, as he was looking for a chance, the talk between Shimizu and Aiko started. Thus he thought to leave killing Aiko to Shimizu as he looked from the distance, but he guessed that Aiko would be recaptured in the last moment by the unstandard Hajime, so he cast a magic which specialized in penetration to pierce Shimizu and Aiko.



However, even though the Demon race was quick to see that opportunity, there was one miscalculation. That was, if thing went well the trajectory would make it hit Hajime and the others, erasing those risk factors at the same time, but Shia’s peculiar magic was activated. That was “Foresight.” Shia who was behind Hajime naturally would be hit by the trajectory along with Shimizu, Aiko, and Hajime, so she dashed out to “break” the future she saw.



Thanks to that, the future where the attack went through Aiko’s head and she immediately died was avoided. Shia had put her body in the line to change that future. Even though he was doubtful on why she put her life for Aiko who wasn’t not intimate with her, Hajime would not treat an important companion who had worked her best coldly. Therefore, he unhesitatingly used the scarce “Holy Water” for Aiko. Because there was no time, it was the most certain thing to use.



Hajime held Aiko who was supported by Yue, put the vial in her mouth and poured the holy water little by little. Aiko looked at Hajime who didn’t take Shia as the top priority with criticizing glare, but ignored by Hajime. Currently, he prioritized Shia’s will than Aiko’s or his own intention. That’s why he just poured the holy water as discussion wasn’t necessary. However, Aikos’ whole body began to convulse and couldn’t be moved as she desired, so she couldn’t swallow the water. Rather, it was possible to enter the lungs and made her vomit.



Hajime judged it was impossible for Aiko to swallow the holy water by herself, he put the remaining holy water inside his mouth, and he unhesitatingly poured it directly into Aiko’s mouth.



“Kh!?”



Aiko opened her eyes wide. Next, screams and angry voices raised by everyone in Hajime’s surrounding. However, Hajime ignored all of those and he twined his tongue that invaded Aiko’s mouth, then he forcefully poured the holy water. Hajime’s expression didn’t contain any shame or guilt, there was only seriousness about doing what had to be done.



Before long, Aiko’s throat moved as to swallow and the holy water flowed inside her body. Following that, the pain which attacking her body and the cold feeling as her life was going to be washed away were blown away as if a fire was lighted in her core and started to spread around. Aiko remembered the feeling of being soaked inside the hot spring in the cold winter, and her body shook. It was just as expected of the holy water. It was a miraculous water that prevent his body broken from eating the flesh and blood of demonic beasts. The effect was preeminent.



Not long after, the mouth to mouth ended just in the blink of time, and Hajime separated his mouth from Aiko’s. Silver colored string appeared between the two. Hajime observed Aiko. His purpose was to ascertain that she had escaped from the crisis. On the other side, Aiko was still looking at Hajime blankly as her eyes were unfocused.



“Sensei.”



“…”



“Sensei?”



“…”



“Oi! Sensei!”



“Fue!?”



Hajime called Aiko to ask her condition, but Aiko keep blankly looked at him and unmoving. Hajime was irritated, so he lightly slapped her cheek and raised his volume, then she raised an indescribably lovely voice and regained her senses.



“How’s your body? Are there any sense of incompatibility?”



“Heh? A, um, that’s, I am o-o-o-okay. There is no abnormality, rather I feel good… wait, th-that’s wrong! By no mean that, th-that thing feel good, what I mean was the medicine’s effect-”



“I see. Then, that’s good.”



Hajime looked as if he’d lose his temper, and answered simply towards Aiko who said there was no abnormality in her physical condition, then he simply removed the hand which supported Aiko and moved towards Shia.



Although she was stupefied by Hajime’s attitude, Aiko didn’t stay in that spot and she had run towards Shia before she aware of it.



Hajime took out another holy water and poured half of it directly into Shia’s wound, and the other half was brought close to Shia’s mouth to let her drink it. The injured parts make a small shuu- sound and recovered rapidly, but somehow Shia didn’t want to drink the holy water and shook her head.



“Ha-Hajime-san…”



“Shia, wha-…”



“Me too… it’ll be better… guh… to do it mouth to mouth…”



“Y-you are always like this…”



As she was drenched in sweat because of the pain, Shia leaked out her desire. Even if I am rolled around, I won’t get up until you do that!, she said those kind of demand, and even Hajime was amazed by this. As expected, there’s no need to purposely do mouth to mouth because it was unnecessary, so he ignored the silent complaint from Yue who was nice to Shia recently and thrust the vial into Shia’s mouth.



“Muguh!? … gulp gulp… puhah… Uu~, Hajime-san is unfair… I am jealous of sensei-san…”



“Hajime… bad.”



“Fue!? Sh-Shia-san, you’re wrong! That’s a lifesaving action! It is different from what Shia-san want! I am a teacher after all!”



She received sulky gaze and words from Shia and scolding from Yue to read the mood, but Aiko whose face redden purposely made excuses, and Hajime could only let out, “Haa~”, a profound sigh which contained both relief and amazement.



Following that, the outfielders who had guessed thing had settled began to make noise again because, everyone probably recalled the pitiful existence which had been forgotten. It was particularly important for Aiko. So Aiko probably didn’t forget him and just didn’t understand what had happened all of a sudden.



Hajime called out to a guard Knight who was nearest to Shimizu.



“… You, is Shimizu still alive?”



With those words, everyone went “Ah,” with expressions as if they just remembered about him and they looked at the collapsed Shimizu. Only Aiko displayed a perplexed look and said, “Eh? Eh?,” as she looked around, she might’ve recalled the situation when Shia snatched her. With mixed complexion, she panicky run towards Shimizu.



“Shimizu-kun! Aa, this is… so cruel.”



In Shimizu’s chest was a hole similar to Shia’s. The bleeding was intense, and there was a big pool of blood… he probably only had a few minutes left.



“I-I don’t want to die… h-help… if it’s like this… no… I can’t believe it…”



Shimizu spoke to Aiko who held his hand by his side, it was just monologue of words which couldn’t be understood in a muttering whisper. Aiko looked at the surrounding for help, but all of them averted their eyes. It was already hopeless. Moreover, the expressions of not wanting to help vividly appeared on them.



Aiko clinged to the last straw as she looked back and shouted to the Hajime who was there.



“Nagumo-kun! That medicine from before! If it is now-! Please!”



Hajime had expected Aiko’s words and muttered, “It really came to this…,” along with a sigh, then he moved towards Aiko and Shimizu. Following that, he questioned Aiko even though he know what the answer would be.



“Do you want to help him, sensei? He was going to kill you, you know? I think it had crossed the limit no matter how much a “teacher” you are.”



He was someone who tried to kill her, but she protected him just because he was her student, just how many people could became a “teacher” like her in such desperation. She might already be at an abnormal level for a “teacher.” Aiko accurately read the meaning behind his question, her eyes shaken for a moment, then she answered in a firm expression.



“Certainly, it might be as you had said. No, it is surely as you had said. However, I just want to be that (…) kind of teacher. I will be the students’ ally no matter what happen, I have vowed to become that kind of teacher. Therefore, Nagumo-kun-…”



Hajime became ill-humored as he scratched his head because the answer just as he expected, and he sighed in reluctance because that’s just how Aiko-sensei was. Following that, he looked at the sky as he thought of something for a while, he took one deep breath and went towards Shimizu’s side with a resolute expression.



“Shimizu. Can you hear me? I have something that can save you.”



“!”



“However, there’s something I want to ask first.”



“…”



Hearing the words he could be saved, Shimizu responded by stopping his mutters and his wandering eyes were staring at Hajime. In a beat, Hajime asked a simple question.



“… Are you… an enemy?”



Shimizu immediately shook his head without any hesitation. Following that, he floated a smile of abjection and began to plead for his life.



“I-I am not your enemy… I-I won’t do… anything… I will do whatever you want… so help me, I-I’ll even give you an army… and even… brainwash the women… I-I swear… I swear to be loyal… I’ll do anything… so help me…”



With those words, Hajime became expressionless. Following that, he could be seen looking into Shimizu’s eyes quietly as if trying to confirm his real intention. Shimizu who thought he was seeing the depth of his heart immediately looked away. However, Hajime was able to confirm it. There’s darkness and impurity more than before inside Shimizu’s eyes. They were saturated by hatred, anger, envy, desire, and other negative feelings, they were just like the deep sea where the light did not reach.



Hajime was convinced. Aiko’s words didn’t even reach Shimizu’s mind. Therefore Shimizu would surely become their enemy. He had determined that. For a moment, his gaze matched Aiko’s. Aiko was also looking at Hajime and their gaze met. Following that, Aiko was immediately able to guess what Hajime was going to do. Her expression changed and she jumped out to stop Hajime.



“DON’T!”



However, Hajime was much faster.



DOPANh! DOPANh!



“Kh!?”



The sound where a breath was taken away. It wasn’t known who let that out. One in the head and one in the heart. The bullets which accurately shot made Shimizu’s body jumped for a moment, and they awarded him with death.



Inside the lingering gunshot, no one let out a word, and they could only watch Hajime silently looking at the corpse with a gun in one hand that raised white smoke, in blank surprise. Silence ruled their vicinity, within those who could not move, a mutter was leaked.



“… Why?”



It was Aiko. In a blank surprise, she watched the remains of Shimizu who had began his travel to the death, and she raised that question. Hajime looked away from Shimizu and he looked at Aiko. At the same time, Aiko matched Hajime’s gaze again. Inside her eyes, anger, sadness, distrust and others feelings were raised and disappeared, then they raised and disappeared once again.



“He is an enemy after all.”



Hajime’s answer towards Aiko’s question was truly simple.



“That! Shimizu-kun is-…”



“Reforming? Sorry to burst your bubble, I am not so good natured to believe that, above all my eyes aren’t clouded at all.”



When he asked the last question, Shimizu’s eyes was telling him that he had “fall.” Before death, his mind still moved towards killing Aiko, Hajime thought Shimizu could slightly change his way of life because just like the time when Hajime almost fell, there’s Yue’s existence that was capable of holding and retaining him, so… he questioned Shimizu with that thought in mind. If that was so, he had consider to give Shimizu a chance by putting into him a collar and letting Aiko take custody of him. However, even before death, Shimizu’s eyes didn’t even show such sign.



Aiko should also feel that. However, Aiko was the “teacher,” by no means could she abandon him. She just couldn’t do that.



“Therefore, rather than killing him-! If he is kept inside the royal palace, and returned together with us to Japan, possibly… there’s the possibility-!”



“… Even if I tried to give you a reason, I know sensei won’t agree to it at all. I have killed sensei’s important student. It’s okay for sensei to decide whatever you want to do about me.”



“… Such a thing is-”



“‘A lonely way of life.’ I’ve thought of various things because of sensei’s words. However, in this world where a person’s life is cruelly light, I thought of not showing any mercy towards my enemy… and I won’t change that. I don’t think I want to change that. I have no time for that.”



“Nagumo-kun…”



“I’ll do the same thing from now on. At the times I think it is necessary… I’ll pull the trigger no matter how many times it’ll be. If you thought I was mistaken… sensei only has to do what you want… however, I want you to remember one thing. Even if it’s sensei or the other classmates… I’ll pull the trigger if you become my enemy…”



Aiko looked down as she bit her lip. It was no one but Aiko who said, “Having heard my talk, I won’t refute whatever your decision is.” No more word coming out. Hajime looked at such Aiko and he turned his feet because the things needed to be done here had finished. Yue and Shia quietly nestled close to him. Accompanied with Pressure, Hajime looked at Will, Aiko, and the other’s appearances, and because there’s also the matter of post treatment, they silently followed Hajime in painful reluctance.



The town leaders and Knights’ had a purpose to detain Hajime and his artifacts, but because of the overflowing “Pressure” and remembering the previous monster-like fight, they withdrew their hands and swords.



“Nagumo-kun!… Sensei is… sensei is…”



Even if her words weren’t continued, he called out Hajime’s name because of her pride as a “teacher.” Hajime stopped for a while and spoke to Aiko over his shoulder.



“… Sensei’s ideal is already a fantasy. However, we are glad that sensei remains as our teacher even if the world had changed… if possible, please don’t give up.”



Following that, this time he didn’t stop and came off from the surrounding circle, he took out magic-driven four-wheeler and escaped from there when everyone had boarded it.



Afterwards, what remained was the clamor from the town that was joyed for their survival and the the indescribably subtle mood.





Volume 7 Chapter 4




The magic-driven four-wheeler dashed onto the highway while raising a storm of dust, with the Northern Mountain Ranges at its back. Because it was a road treaded by many people over the span of many years, it was in far better condition compared to the road from UI town to the Northern Mountain Ranges area. Thanks to the suspensions he installed, the vibrations were dulled and the four-wheeler advanced smoothly towards Fhuren.



Shia was seated in the front seat and her rabbit ears were flapping in the wind thanks to the fully opened windows. She looked somewhat displeased since she liked the two-wheeler more than the four-wheeler. After all, she liked the feeling of her rabbit ears cutting through the wind and embracing Hajime while resting her face on his shoulder.



Naturally, Hajime was the driver. The seat beside him was, of course, Yue’s. Will was seated in the back seat.



Will anxiously asked Hajime, while slightly leaning his body forward, “Excuse me~, was it really okay to leave them like that? If you only spoke a little more about it… especially towards Aiko-dono…”



Without turning his head, Hajime answered indifferently, “Nn~? Not really, everything is okay. After all, there would be only more trouble if I stay there… Sensei can also make good decisions even if I am not there.”



“… It’s probably as you said, but…”



“You… setting aside whether or not you’re a good person… aren’t you too concerned about others?”



Even though he heard Hajime’s words, Will still wore an anxious expression, which made Hajime smile wryly. To truly be in pain and crying for the dead adventurers, not to mention remaining in an unrelated town about to be attacked by a large crowd of demonic beasts which was normally thought of as suicidal. To forgive Tio, who was the object his grudge, and now he was worried about the relationship between the one who half-threatened him; Hajime and Aiko and the others. He was a noble from the Kingdom, and he was extremely eccentric, as he was aiming to become an adventurer. However, even more than that, he was a good-natured person who cares about everything.



“… A good person.”



“A good person~.”



“Umu, a good fellow.”



Will showed a complex expression towards those words said simultaneously. Although he was praised, it was an indescribably subtle evaluation for women to think of a man as “a good person.”



“P-Please stop talking about me… I only wanted to ask you for a full explanation of your reasoning…”



“… Reasoning?”



With no more than a subtle expression while he scratched his cheeks, Will continued to talk. However, Hajime’s eyebrows twitched in reaction to Will’s words.



“That’s right. About Aiko-dono, who was probably left with ill-feelings and about why the boy called Shimizu was killed… The reason for your actions.”



“…Didn’t I explain it already? He was an enemy…”



“That’s the reason you “killed” him and not the reason why you “can’t save” him, right? After all, he had already received a mortal wound at that time, and he would be dead in a few minutes if you just left him… There should be a reason as to why you purposely killed him, right?”



“… You unexpectedly observed the situation rather well.”



What Will pointed out hit the bullseye. He was a classmate, so the impact when Hajime killed him while Aiko pleaded for help was too strong. Thus, the fact that it wasn’t necessary for Hajime to kill him was well hidden. Will, who noticed that fact, could be said to carry the “eyes” of a noble. Hajime’s tone carried admiration towards Will who wasn’t deceived.



Even Shia, who had her face out the window to enjoy the wind said, “Now that you mentioned it, I also noticed that,” and she turned to look at Hajime, who was driving, with a knowing look. Hajime hesitated a little on how to answer the question, but Yue answered them before he could say anything.



“… Hajime is a tsundere.”



“…”



“””Tsundere?”””



Maybe because Yue hit the nail on the head, Hajime kept a poker face and continued his silence. The other members could only parrot her.



“… Repaying Aiko? In other words, you were just worried about her?”



“… That’s just a coincidence.”



From how Hajime curtly answered and looked the other way, it seemed like Yue’s guess was right on the mark, so Shia and the others asked for an explanation.



Because Hajime didn’t want to answer them, Yue answered in his stead. In short, he tried to avert Aiko’s mind from feeling responsible for Shimizu’s death.



Shimizu had said it before. The purpose of meeting the demonic race was to kill “Goddess of Good Harvest,” Aiko. In other words, Shimizu was used to kill Aiko. Even the last attack went through Shimizu’s body to kill Aiko.



Of course, Aiko wasn’t responsible for Shimizu’s death. Shimizu sold his soul to the demon race on his own will, which resulted in his death. Because it was the result of his own decision, Shimizu himself was responsible for it. Even if he wasn’t responsible for it, it was the responsibility of the one from demon race who mortally wounded Shimizu.



However, would Aiko agree to it? After all, the last attack was aimed at Aiko. That was the reason why she felt strongly responsible. Aiko always thought of her students first. Shimizu died because she involved him. In effect, wasn’t it her fault Shimizu was dead?, she might think in such a way. Thus he thought, can Aiko’s mind endure it?; Hajime felt a slight fear.



Even Aiko should feel unease and fear as human who was summoned to a different world. Although she didn’t lament as she cowered and trembled in fear, the reason she could work so hard was because she had her pride as a “teacher.” In addition, there were “students” who occupied Aiko’s mind as a “teacher.”



And a student had died because of her. The impact was greater than when she had heard Hajime had died, or the time when Hajime said the cause was the backstabbing of a classmate. It would be a much stronger blade to damage Aiko’s heart. It might even break her.



Hajime calculations would be affected if Aiko was broken, but he was definitely worried about her. Hajime had felt that Aiko’s words were an impossible ideal, because they gave birth to a lot of contradictions.



Even so, the words said by Aiko made him think it was definitely be necessary for Yue and Shia’s future happiness. That’s why even if the world had changed, and even if Hajime had changed, the “preaching” of Hajime’s “teacher” made him feel indebted to her.



Therefore Hajime killed Shimizu even though he would die soon enough even if he was left alone. Making a strong impression, emphasizing that Shimizu was an “enemy”. This was followed by making an impression of Hajime being the one who killed Shimizu. Aiko’s heart shouldn’t break down. He thought it was his duty so his “teacher” wouldn’t change.



“So that’s what happened… Fufu, what a tsundere Hajime-san is.”



“So that’s what happened…”



“Indeed~, Master is unexpectedly cute.”



Yue finished her explanation to the other members, and their eyes carried warmth as they looked at Hajime, but Hajime kept looking the other way.



“… But, I think Aiko noticed it.”



“…”



Hajime silently turned his gaze to Yue. Yue returned Hajime’s glance with gentle eyes.



“… Aiko is Hajime’s teacher. A person whose words remained in Hajime’s heart. That’s why there’s no way she didn’t notice…”



“… Yue.”



“… It’s okay, Aiko is strong. The situation will definitely end how Hajime desired it.”



“…”



Apparently Yue trusted Aiko because Aiko could at least have Hajime focus on himself. Something she couldn’t do. Towards Yue who watched him with an upward gaze, Hajime responded by gently narrowing his eyes. Because of Yue’s words, his worries about Aiko and future developments which clouded his mind cleared.



“Haa~, to create the world where only the two of you existed… no matter how much time passes, I will also create such atmosphere…”



“Th-This, what can I say… I somehow feel something sweet in my mouth…”



“Muu~ this one wants thee to abuse this one, but… even this kind of situation isn’t bad…”



Will and the others felt uncomfortable because of Hajime and Yue’s sweet atmosphere. Shia in particular was puffing her cheeks and pouting in distaste.



Yue noticed Shia and shifted her gaze towards her, and once again matched Hajime’s gaze to silently appeal to him. The content was none other than “Shia’s reward.” Without Shia’s peculiar magic; “Foresight” and her desperate action, Aiko would have become someone who couldn’t return because of a hole in her head. Shia had saved Hajime’s teacher.



Because he understood, Hajime let out an “Uh,” moved his gaze away from Yue, looked at Shia and said, “… Shia. That’s, well, you saved us. Though it’s belated,… thank you.”



“… Who?”



The result of him saying his gratitude while enduring his embarrassment were those words along with astonished expression. Though veins popped on Hajime’s forehead, he endured it because it was the consequence of his deeds.



“… Well, I think it couldn’t be helped for you to take such attitude… Even so, I am seriously expressing my gratitude, you know?”



Hajime matched his gaze with Shia, who was looking at him firmly expressing his gratitude with a “Thank you.” Because of Hajime straightforward words, Shia’s body trembled as though an electric shock ran through her whole body, and she became restless. Her gaze excitedly wandered around while her cheeks were dyed in deep red. Her rabbit ears were swaying here and there.



“Th-that’s, well, i-it’s not like I’ve done something amazing, and it’s okay if you don’t say thank— A-agh! What’s with this suddenness. Somehow, it feels really embarrassing… ehehe.”



Hajime smiled wryly while looking at Shia’s embarrassed state, and he asked of the doubts he had.



“Shia. Though I was just a little curious about it,… why did you unhesitatingly jump out at that time? You had never talked about anything important with sensei, right? I also can’t remember a timewhen you got along with her…”



“That is… because she is someone Hajime-san worried about.”



“… That’s all, huh.”



“?… Yes, I think that’s all?”



“… I see.”



Because of Shia’s astonished expression, Hajime expression ascertained that he couldn’t say anything more. Certainly, Aiko was Hajime’s teacher. His classmates would be impacted if she was gone.



He was honestly glad she didn’t die. However, he remembered he didn’t show it through his speech and behavior. Nevertheless, Yue and Shia seemed to be able to read what was in Hajime’s heart; they were people who always knew his heartfelt emotions. Though he only thought of it now, they had crossed the boundaries of being companions. Such understanding had crossed his mind.



Thus, even if Yue didn’t say anything, he thought to repay Shia with something. And so, Hajime who was still embarrassed spoke to her.



“Shia. Is there something you want?”



“Heh? Something… I want?”



“Ah. You can say it’s a thanks or a reward… Well, something like that. Of course it’s only something within my ability, okay?”



Shia was a little perplexed because of the sudden words. Since she thought what she had done was a natural thing to do for companions, she thought it was a little exaggerated. “U-U~n,” she groaned and when she casually saw Yue at his side.



Yue was watching Shia with a gentle expression, and then she nodded. Her gaze told her was it was okay for Shia to honestly receive Hajime’s gratitude, Yue was urging her. Shia, who accurately read the situation, let out a forced laugh. After thinking about a little, and she turned her gaze from Yue who revealed a smile while nodding towards Hajime.



“Then, please take my first—”



“Rejected”



“… Why? No matter how much I think, finally the dere time has COMEEE!!! It is that kind of time, right? Right? Please read the mood!”



“I said, ‘within my ability’.”



“That’s quite within your ability! Even though you always casually keep me away, you did it with Yue-san! I know it happened! My heart felt empty whenever I found out about your liaison! Woo, when we arrive at Fhuren, I’ll once again go on errand alone, and you will make love during that time, right? Sob Again, I alone… Killing time alone,… then I’ll pretend to not see Yue-san beaming… damn it…”



“No, pl—, there’s nothing to cry about… I am in love with Yue, and about you, well, I think of you as an important companion, but it’s not love… For me to embrace someone else is…”



“… Sob… Hajime-san, you good for nothing!”



“… Oi.”



“A wuss! A bastard who tricks a maiden’s heart! A good for nothing! You perverted voyeur!”



The time has come!, and she was about to say her wish with joyful expression, but Shia became indignant because she was rejected even before she finished voicing request. She let out all of her dissatisfaction up until now as she curses Hajime while weeping.



From the back seat, “Pfft… The man who annihilated several tens of thousands of demonic beasts is… a good for nothing… Pfft.”



“Unexpectedly, Master has a pure heart, if thou still haven’t been in that kind of relationship… it means this one whose ass’s first time was deprived has a step in the lead…”



Those words were heard although it said in whisper. Hajime seriously thought, should I throw them out of this car?, for a moment. However, Yue who was sitting by his side was somehow looking at him with a criticizing gaze, and he let out a “Guh”.



Following that, he spoke to Shia again with cramped cramped cheeks. In addition, he swore in his heart to punish Will later. About the other voice… he would leave her as is because he didn’t want to be her companion.



“Shia. Please lower the hurdle. If it’s another thing…”



“… Hajime, you can’t?”



For some reason, Yue hugged Shia. Shia said with a miserable voice as she clung to Yue, “Yue-saa~n”.



Obviously, Yue seemed to allow Hajime to embrace Shia. Recently, Yue has been truly spoiling Shia. Hajime had thought it was because of a deep friendship, but somehow it became similar to a big sister helping her troubled little sister. Moreover, the elder one was a sis-con.



His beloved woman was asking him to embrace another woman. Seriously, Hajime who didn’t know what this situation meant could only hold his head with both hands. However, Hajime also had something he wanted to say.



“… I, what my heart wants is Yue, only you. I don’t hate Shia, I think of her as an important companion, but… I can’t treat her the same as Yue. You know, I carry the desire to monopolize Yue. No matter what reason it is, I won’t allow her to be beside another man. You can think of it as being a narrow-minded or selfish, but… I want Yue to think the same as me, it’s something I desire. That’s why, even if it was Shia, could you pardon me from starting a relation with another woman?”



“… Hajime.”



With Shia clinging to her arm, Yue’s cheeks blushed and she looked straight at Hajime with moistened eyes. Hajime once again gently stroke Yue’s cheek with his hand as he returned her gaze, and the two formed a sweet atmosphere anew. Even the air’s color seemed to have turned pink.



The two watched each other faces as they gradually drew closer, then…



“… It seems I… have been completely forgotten… even though it was the talk about my reward…”



Shia was scowling with a dangerous tone as she stared at Hajime and Yue who almost reached the climax. Then the two finally noticed their surroundings and hurriedly distanced themselves. Yue, who still felt embarrassed, was timidly twirling her beautiful hair to calm down.



Hajime, who confessed his feelings, had his heart thrown out of order because of the surprise attack. His expressionlessness crumbled, and his mouth naturally stammered for an excuse. The words of him wanting to monopolize her and to be monopolized, were heavy responsibility for a person, but Yue was extremely happy. Her heart shivered and she inadvertently forgot about everything except Hajime.



“… I see, I somehow understand the relationship between the three of you… Shia-dono has it hard.”



“Annoyed… The bond with Yue is deep… though that’ll be a hindrance to this one… Well, as long as this one will be abused, then it’s…”



Will’s expression looked as if he would vomit sugars as he tried to guess the relationship between the three. They didn’t want to know of the existence of the pervert who started panting as she imagined something.



“… Hajime, I am sorry. But, Shia is also important… I want to repay her. So, please go out with her for a day inside the town… Can you?”



“Yue-saa~n.”



Now, Yue was asking Hajime for Shia’s sake. Shia, whose heart was broken had her head patted, and was now spoiledly pressing and rubbing her face against Yue. Hajime who saw their appearance answered with a wry smile.



“That’s okay, I don’t mind if it’s just that much. It’s not because Yue asked for Shia, okay? Even if Shia was the one who asked for it, I’ll at least go out with her.”



“Hajime-san… no, there’s no need to be concerned about it, it’s okay as long as it can become an established fact!”



“… Seriously, you are…”



“Well, because that’s still impossible, I’ll endure it for now by increasing the favorability through the date. Once we arrive at Fhuren, please take me to the Sightseeing Ward, okay?”



“Ah, ah, okay.”



Because of that idea, Hajime thought to once again remind her that Yue was the only special one for him. However, Shia probably already knew, but she didn’t get discouraged. With a complex expression, Hajime thought, Well, it’s okay to let Shia do what she wants, as he acknowledged their date. There was no change to the fact that Shia was already an important existence for Hajime, and he could not be reluctant about it because it was something Yue asked of him. Thus, he confirmed he wanted to reward her for her hard work.



“What’s with this feeling of being an outsider. It’s the same feeling of slipping into another family’s get-together.”



“Hmm. This kind of ‘Ignoring play’ doesn’t make this one feel happy at all… Only lonely… Rather, isn’t it about the time someone responds to this one? Is it really okay for this one to be here?”



Will, who was sitting behind the front seat where the flirting and heartwarming scene had occurred, looked so uncomfortable. In addition, although no one talked to her, Tio whom participated in the previous conversation, unbeknownst to them, had boarded the carrier as she placed her head on the window where the carrier was connected to the vehicle.



Before the fight, she had asked permission to follow Hajime. In the end, she was left behind because her existence was forgotten, so she jumped into the carrier of the magic-driven four-wheeler in a panic. The look of her panting because of her cruel treatment, while peeping into the vehicle via the window, took everyone inside the vehicle aback, and decided to treat it as though there was nothing there.



At first, he tried to shake her off by doing reckless movements with a wild-like speed just like the one in the movies, but she used magic to her advantage to stick to them. Moreover, because she became more and more excited with ecstasy, they decided to just ignore her. The pervert: the more one reacts to her, the more pleased she became.



Because of the situation where no one responded to her, Tio was excited because she thought of it as some kind of play to ignore her. However, she began to feel the emptiness from the interaction of Hajime and the others, and finally complained to them. Even so no one respond to her, so Tio creeped into the vehicle from the window connecting the vehicle and the carrier. With her black and long hair hanging down, her appearance who slowly creeping inside was just like Sada**-san from a certain movie called ‘The Ring’.



As expected, Will couldn’t ignore the eeriness as he shouted, “Uwah!,” and retreated to the side window. Reacting to his voice, Hajime and his party looked at the back seat.



“Ah? Ahh~, th-this one is stuck. The breasts have become hindrances… Can’t get in. Sorry, Will-boy, but can thou pull this one in?”



Her breasts, which were far bigger than Shia’s, were resisting the pull as they continued to change shapes because of the window frame. Tio asked, “Please pull this one, okay?,” as she stretched her hands towards Will. Hajime, who saw the situation, silently pulled Schlag from his left holster. His hand moved over his shoulder and shot without any hesitation.



DOPANh!



“HMMmm!?”



The gunshot and the projectile flew outside, hitting the Tio’s forehead, and the force of impact blew her back into the carrier. A clamoring and slamming sound resounded from the carrier.



“Wh-What have thou done. To suddenly do that… wouldn’t it make this one excited?”



With flushed cheeks, she rubbed her forehead with a somewhat happy expression. She complained… not. Tio, from the Ryuujin tribe, said no more than a perverted remark. Maybe because she wanted to enter with her legs first, she thrusted them into the vehicle window. However, this time, her plump butt was stuck on the window frame, and her fascinating buttock somehow managed to get inside after some struggling.



Hajime silently fired Schlag in succession. And although he wanted to blow Tio’s ass out of the vehicle, she was considerably stuck and thus didn’t blown away thanks to the plump meat of her buttocks cushioning the impact. However, because she let out R18 moaning every time a bullet shot was into her butt such as “Ah, an!”, “How intense!”, or “Masterr~”. With cramped cheeks, Hajime reluctantly stopped shooting. As expected, it was better to not become an acquainted to a pervert.



Yue, who idolized the Ryuujin race, felt that the image she had of them was nothing but a fantasy, and had pushed them to the back of her head, and was now covering her eyes in shock.



Tio who guessed the gunfire had stopped, somehow held her butt and breasts, letting out a sigh “Fuu~,” as she finally got inside the vehicle.



“Haa, haa, geez… how indiscriminating. A Master who can’t be helped. But don’t worry, this one will receive any kind of love. That’s why… it’s okay to do more of it, you know? Even more intense is okay, too, you know?”



“Shut up, pervert. Don’t lean forward and do not come here. If possible, open the door and jump outside now.”



“Kh!? Haa haa… for Master to know what’s best for this one… but, this one refuses. This one has already decided to follow Master. There’s also the duty as Ryuujin race, and the thing about taking responsibility, there’s no reason to separate. No matter what Master will say, this one will follow thee. This one definitely won’t go away.”



Tio who finally entered the vehicle spewed perverted words one after another, and when Hajime coldly answered her, Tio’s expression looked like she was further charmed by him. However, she firmly insisted to remain. Though it was spoiled by her own expression.



“Stop joking. What responsibility. It’s nothing but the continuation of a fight to the death. Just be glad you weren’t killed. Besides, your duty as Ryuujin race is about that Hero. The guy is the center of this summoning, so go to him.”



“Don’t want to. Definitely don’t want to. Though this one doesn’t know what kind of person that Hero is, this one thinks he wouldn’t be able to ruthlessly and mercilessly punish this one just like Master! Beside, don’t belittle this one! This one has decided whom this one would call “Master.” This one not so frivolous to be able to change the feelings towards this one’s master.”



With her eyes fully open, Tio insisted while clenching her fists. Though it was said in a good manner, she eventually made a perverted declaration that she was happy to be treated mercilessly by Hajime.



“This one would chase thee even if thou art runs away, okay? When this one goes all over towns with the story about this one’s first being snatched away. About this one’s body that could no longer live without Master, doing different this and that kinds of things, it will be told along with Master’s description as this one walks, okay?”



“… You are~”



With veins popped, Hajime dangerously narrowed his eyes as he thought of her as a seriously annoying fellow. Though he thought to just kill her, she wasn’t an enemy and Yue would stop him, so he thought to just keep hitting her until she lost her memory. Nevertheless, she had an authentic sturdiness, and it got nowhere because she would just feel happy rather than being blown away along with her memory.



As the result, he could do nothing but glare at her with a disgusted expression from the bottom of his heart. However, his gaze only made Tio’s body convulsed even more. Her condition was already irrecoverable.



“Please don’t make such disgusted face, Master. This one will surely be useful. Though Master’s party are outside of the norm, didn’t this one has shown the proof during that fight? Even if this one doesn’t know Master’s objective, please let this one accompany Master. Please, Master.”



“That’s physiologically impossible.”



“Ah!!!? Haa, Haa… Nnh! nnh!”



Towards Hajime’s words that completely stopped the flow of conversation, Tio was embracing herself with both arms as though she was enduring something while she was fidgeting. Seeing Tio in such a manner, not only Hajime but everyone inside the vehicle displayed disgusted faces. After a while, Hajime let out a deep sigh and his expression looked somewhat exhausted.



“… Although I want to say something, but it’ll be useless no matter what I say, right? Just do whatever you want as long as you don’t become a hindrance to us. I have no more energy to think about what to do with you…”



“Oh? Oo~, that’s so, that’s so! Hmm, then please take care of this one from now on, Master, Yue, and Shia. Just call this one Tio! Fufufu, it looks like it’ll be a fun journey…”



“… Argh.”



“P-Please take care of me too…”



Hajime sighed again when he looked at a happy Tio with his narrowed eyes. Yue groaned in dissatisfaction, and the perplexed Shia returned her greeting.



A new companion. A pervert from Ryuujin race; Tio, had joined them. And the party advances towards Neutral Commercial City of Fhuren.





Volume 7 Chapter 5




Three days had passed since Hajime and his party left Ul.



Although there were vexing problems; such as how to dispose of the corpses of the demonic beasts, and how to repair the roughened ground, the townspeople were unhurt. A result that could only be considered nothing but a miracle. The good news was immediately spread to the people who took shelter, peripheral towns, and even the Imperial Capital. The returning townspeople met their lovers and families. Some were hugging their close friends, and the joy of their safeties wrapped Ul in a festival-like clamor.



The protective wall Hajime left behind was surrounded the town as is, and the people who were talking about the details of the fight were gesturing how it exceed the common sense similar to how storytellers talked about a myth as they looked at the roughened ground outside of the protective wall.



The people who took shelter, especially the children, had sparkling eyes when they heard the story. Without losing this opportunity, the merchants were already calculating on how to make money by turning Hajime’s protective wall into the town’s new specialty.



Thus, the townspeople who didn’t know anything about Hajime and Aiko believed Hajime and his party were dispatched by the “Goddess of Good Harvest,” and Hajime’s wall was named “Goddess’s Shield” to honor it. Furthermore, the white-haired, eye-patched boy; Hajime, was called “Goddess’s Sword” and “Goddess’s Knight” in respect. However, it was a different story when David and the other Knights, or rather the real bodyguard Knights, recalled what was said about Aiko and Hajime. They would rampage while shouting, “As expected, I hate that guy!!!” In the future, Hajime would writhe in agony whenever he hears his name, but that’s another story.



It was somewhat a miscalculation that resulted in earning himself some embarrassing nicknames, but just as Hajime thought, Aiko’s fame and popularity were through the roof. When she walked into town, all the people would turn around and focus their gazes on her. Among them, there were also some who began to worship her while saying things such as “Bless us~.” In this town Aiko, who saved the people, was certainly seen as nothing less than a “Goddess.” The rumor had also already spread to the surrounding towns. At the very least, it might be correct to say that Aiko’s words carried more weight than the Church of Saints’ bishop, in the town of Ul.



The rumored Aiko was… safely supporting the town leaders in the town’s reconstruction, but although she acted cheerful around people close to her, her mind wasn’t there. The cause was the various impacts of the shocking truths Hajime had revealed before the fight. But above all, it was how Hajime killed Shimizu. The scene of that moment consumed her mind and gnawed at her heart.



Even today, after they finished their day duty and it was time for dinner, the students and bodyguard Knights were dining at “Water Fairy Inn,” Aiko just mechanically carried the food into her mouth and blankly looked some place else without registering the conversation of the others in her mind, only answering with the same reply.



“Ai-chan sensei… Ai-chan sensei’s magic is amazing after all! Even those roughened ground recovered quickly… Looks like it’ll return to normal in just a week!”



“… I see… that’s good.”



Sonobe Yuka, who noticed Aiko’s mind was somewhere else, intentionally talked to her cheerfully. She tried to somehow encourage Aiko, since she knew the source of her abnormal state. However, even Sonobe’s cheerful words only received an indifferent answer in return, like pre-typed-like words. Sonobe drooped her shoulders as she said “Still won’t do, huh~.”



“Aiko… did the mayor or the bishop said anything today? If you’re really troubled by it, I won’t forgive them for troubling Aiko, even if it’s the bishop. I am Aiko’s Knight after all. No matter when, only I will be Aiko’s ally.”



“… I see… that’s good.”



It was unknown whether David said those words to encourage Aiko or to seduce her. The remark on how he was willing to go up against the bishop was considerably dangerous as a Templar Knight, although it might not be important to David; the warrior of love. The “I” part was emphasized. In regards to going against anyone… it was also considered by the surrounding Knights, as they agreed with him while they directed sharp glares at their commander who casually made his advance.



However David’s casual appeal was easily tossed aside like the words coming from a certain long running TV program during daytime. It was doubtful as to whether or not she heard him. The expression on the student’s faces were saying “Serves you right~” to David who drooped his shoulders. The same expression was on the other Knights’ faces.



Without taking any notice of the students and the Knights, Aiko indifferently continued to eat without responding.



(…If, if only I had talked to Shimizu-kun more… If only I had noticed his feelings earlier… If I did, then something like that wouldn’t have happened… If, if he relied on his classmates… If, if I didn’t get taken as a hostage… If only… I died… then he wouldn’t have found it necessary to kill Shimizu-kun…



Why did he kill him… Even though they were classmates… Was it simply because he was an enemy?… Could killing someone be so simple because of such a reason? Was it so simple to kill a person?… How could it be done so naturally?…



That’s strange… Humans aren’t demonic beasts. To be able to kill without any hesitation… He,… was he someone who could easily kill a human?… If I left him alone, would he have been a danger to the other children?… Will the other children be safe since he’s gone?… As long as he’s not… Kh?!? What did I just think of!?… Stop. It’s not good to think about this any further!)



Presently, regret and self-condemnation repeated themselves in Aiko’s mind… Thus, if she thought of it unconsciously, the buds of fear and grudges towards Hajime would appear, she would deny them in a panic, and she would once again return to her first thoughts, repeating the process. There was too much she wanted to think about, and there were also a lot things she didn’t want to think of. Aiko’s mind was similar to a library where the bookshelves had crumbled and unorganized information were scattered around in a chaotic manner.



Suddenly, a calm and warmth voice reached Aiko. “Aiko-sama. About today’s dish, is it not up to your taste?”



“Eh?”



It was Foss Selo, the owner of “Water Fairy Inn.” His voice was far from loud, it was actually said in a rather small voice. However, there was no one inside the inn who missed Foss’s words. His calm and deep voice would reach anyone without fail. Even now, Aiko whose mind was caught in whirpool of thought easily heard his words, and it made her senses return to reality.



When she noticed she had cried out in a rather strange and loud voice, Aiko’s cheeks flushed slightly as she turned towards the smiling Foss.



“U-Umm, what was it? I’m sorry, I was daydreaming for a moment.”



“No, no, don’t worry about it. I just thought the dish was not to your taste because you didn’t raise your face. If so, I thought of sending out another dish…”



“N-No need! The food is really delicious. I was just thinking about something…”



Although Aiko said the food was very delicious, she herself couldn’t remember what it tasted like. When she looked at her surroundings, her students and the Knights were looking at her with a somewhat anxious expression. She noticed what was on their minds, and she thought she mustn’t continue the way she has been acting as she pulled herself together and continued on with her meal. However, she coughed in a panic when food entered her lungs.



Because Aiko was coughing with teary eyes, the students and the Knights were panicked. Seeing the situation, Foss casually prepared napkin and water.



“I-I am sorry. To trouble yo-…” “It is not a trouble at all.”



Although Foss saw Aiko’s blunder, he kept a calm smile which made Aiko feel grateful and relieved. Seeing Aiko’s current state, Foss narrowed his eyes and thought of something. He spoke with a small and still calm voice.



“Umm. Aiko-sama. Though it might be presumptuous, may I ask one thing?”



“Eh? Ah, yes. What is it?”



“Why can’t Aiko-sama believe what you want to believe?”



“Heh?”



Unable to understand Foss’s words, Aiko tilted her head as a question mark floated above her head. Because of that, Foss continued with a wry smile, “Looks like those words were too lacking.”



“Apparently, Aiko-sama’s mind is currently in serious confusion. There are too many things you want to think about, there are also things you don’t want to think of, and you don’t know what should you do. What’s best is to do what you want, even if you’re not sure of what you want yet. There are many things you don’t understand, which only increases your impatience, and become the impetus towards the vicious circle of confusion. Am I wrong?”



“H-How…”



Because he had correctly guessed what she was thinking of, Aiko instantly became speechless. Seeing her reaction, Foss calmly explained with a smile, “I’ve seen a lot of guests, after all.”



“During such times, it’s better to just ‘believe in what you want to believe in’ for now. But then again, people will overlook things if they only want to believe what they want, those words also came with such warning. That saying is correct. However, in my opinion, people only act in what they believe in. That’s why, I feel that during times when one ‘can’t move on,’ it isn’t a bad thing to ‘believe in what you want to believe in’.”



“… To believe in what I want to believe in.”



Aiko contemplated in Foss’s words. Aiko’s mind was currently filled with regret and guilt which became a bud of doubt in Hajime as the hatred swirled around. Hajime was certainly Aiko’s important student, but Shimizu who was also a similarly an important student to her was murdered. The moment she understood he was an existence who, according to situation, would deprive the other students of their lives. She recognized Hajime as a threat who would deprive her of her important people. Even so, Hajime was also her student, she couldn’t simply cast him away. It was the same reason why she couldn’t just abandon Shimizu, who tried to commit mass murder. That’s why she was confused since because didn’t know what to do. Though Aiko herself thought she had a difficult personality, she couldn’t help it. Hatayama Aiko was a ‘teacher,’ after all.



Foss didn’t know what happened to Aiko. He didn’t know she was, in a certain sense, believing too much in what she wanted to believe in. Even so, he could see she had committed a large blunder since she couldn’t move on after what she believed in had collapsed.



While he was lost in thought, Aiko’s hands had stopped from partaking of her meal and began to get absorbed in her thoughts.



(To believe in what I want to believe in. I wonder… what is it that I want to believe in? One of the things is that I want all of the students to return to Japan. However, it’s something that can no longer be fulfilled. Now what I want to believe in is for it to be possible to return home without any more losses…



His story. His story where a classmate tried to kill him. I do not want to believe it… he even said he will kill us if we were to become a hindrance to him. Towards a human who unhesitatingly murdered a person… Towards the enemy who threatened the students…



Even so, I do not want to believe it. Nevertheless, he actually killed him… killed Shimizu-kun without any hint of hesitation. That’s why he’s already… no, I must believe in what I want to believe in.)



Aiko closed her eyes as she tried to hold down the resurfaced dark feelings. The surrounding people were anxiously looking at her as she moved slightly while thinking of something.



(‘Because he’s an enemy’ is what he said, and ‘I have no time for that’. He also feared Shimizu-kun will once again attack him and his important people if he let him live. That was something anyone would have thought of.



In reality, Yue-san and Shia-san wouldn’t put so much trust in him if he was a cruel man. He only wanted to cut off the source of anxiety for the future of those children… It was why he couldn’t let him live. In other words, he thought I wouldn’t be able to do anything about Shimizu-kun…



To let Shimizu-kun live would mean I should have at least showed him I could reform Shimizu-kun, in which I didn’t… In the end, I was powerless… Shimizu-kun was… Even so, to be killed in that manner… It meant Shimizu-kun was already weakene—… Kh.)



There was a clear reason why Hajime shot Shimizu dead. He was not a broken human who would think nothing of murder. He was not a monster who couldn’t be understood. He wasn’t an enemy who blindly harm the students. Aiko decided to believe in him because he was a ‘student’, and her words could still reach him. With such thinking process, she recalled the shocking scene where a student shot another student to death, and she tried to search for the reason behind it.



(That’s right. I had forgotten it until now. To begin with, I was the one who asked him to help the dying Shimizu-kun, and that was the result. Shimizu-kun would have died even if he didn’t do anything. It was completely unnecessary for him to purposely shoot him! So why?! Why did he do that?! To make sure he dies? No, there’s no need for him to do such a thing. That child only had a few minutes left to live, it was why I asked him for his help, but there’s nothing more left to be done. After all, there was nothing I could do… Shimizu-kun was shot because of me— Kh!?)



Aiko opened her eyes widel She was aghast by the truth she had just noticed.



(… That’s right. Shimizu-kun received the wound from the attack aimed at me. If nothing was done during that time, I would have surely died. It was my fault he had to die! But everyone was convinced Shimizu-kun was killed by him! He was the one who convinced us of it!)



It was her fault, it was her who killed her own student. Just like Hajime feared, Aiko finally realized the truth and paled in an instant. The existence of her students were Aiko’s supporting pillars. The fact that she was the cause of one of her student’s death broke Aiko’s mind. The impact of the fact made her mind unintentionally turn on its defensive mechanism, and Aiko’s mind blanked out. With her outlook wrapped in darkness, she thought of giving herself to the darkness. However, the words Hajime left behind revived her mind.



“If possible, please don’t get demoralized.”



At that time, her mind didn’t understand it because of consecutive impacts. Even though it was troublesome to think well of the meaning behind those words, they were simple words if she thought hard enough.



(If, if he said those words because he had predicted my situation… Wasn’t he worrying about me?… I, he noticed I would break down because I realized I was the cause of Shimizu-kun’s death. That was the reason why… he unnecessarily shot him… to convince us it was he who killed him… so I wouldn’t be crushed by guilt… to keep being a teacher…)



Aiko understood Hajime’s sense of values. Therefore, she didn’t think it was done entirely for her sake. Even so, there’s no denying Hajime had rushed into action because he thought of Aiko. The closing of the door in Aiko’s mind was immediately stopped right before it completely shut, and it began to slowly open once again. Her narrowed view once again broadened. Though there was still the cold feeling like one of the coldest season inside her mind, but at the same time, there certainly was a small fire present.



(Looks like I was being protected by him… No, not only him, but a lot of people have protected me. The children by my side are protecting me even now. I only thought of protecting him, but I didn’t realize I was also being protected… How immature of me. That’s now’s not the right time for me to keep trying to be independent…)



Aiko wore a resolute expression. However, her thoughts involving Shimizu-kun and the fact that she was the reason he was killed wouldn’t disappear for the rest of her life. Even so, she couldn’t just stand still because there were students who adored and relied on her as their teacher; she didn’t want to. Aiko renewed her vow to do the things she could do as a ‘teacher’, even if the world had changed. In addition, she also engraved in her mind to not let her current ideals be shaken. There is already, without a doubt, fear or grudge against Hajime.



(He’s a clumsy one… He understood I might hold a grudge against him, or I might even become his enemy… Now that I think about it, he received my words and it looked like he thought it over seriously… Could this possibly be his way of returning a favor?



When I think back, I’ve only been saved by him. He told me the truth, and in the end, he even saved this town. Moreover, during the battle, he fulfilled his promise and brought Shimizu-kun back. If I reconsidered those things, I’ve only been unreasonable. I only talked of my ideals… and I’ve pressured him with that… How truly immature of me. Even so, he saved us… even though his way of thinking is cold… Looks like parts of his previous self still remained… No, at the very least, he regained some of them, right? Could it be because of those girls?)



Once again, Aiko smiled wryly as she thought of becoming indebted to him. Even though her immaturity was shameful as teacher, she smiled as remembered the Hajime who had sluggish status in the beginning, transforming into a truly dependable man. Thus, even though Hajime had completely changed, she felt happy when she caught a glimpse of his previous self.



But at the moment, she guessed the reasons were Yue and Shia, the girls who were always close to Hajime’s side. Aiko somehow felt a pain in her heart. Aiko inclined her neck, but she immediately thought of it as nothing but her imagination.



(Incidentally, I still haven’t said my thanks to Shia-san who protected me. Even though she is someone I owe my life to… Next time, I must properly make sure to thank her… In addition, I also owe my life to him…)



About the poison and the raging development, Aiko reflected. She had not thanked Shia, and the other benefactor of her life, Hajime. It was only now that she recalled something sealed in the corner of her memory, and she blushed as though fire came out of her face.



(Th-That’s just an artificial respiration! A lifesaving measure! There’s absolutely nothing more than that! I-It’s not like such an intense thing was my first time. I never thought of it as pleasant! Yup, I absolutely never thought of it like that!)



When she thought of the reason behind her flushed face, Aiko suddenly began to beat the table. She repeated her excuse to no one in particular.



In addition, even though Aiko was an adult, she didn’t have any experience in love. Even so, it was true that with her lovely looks, speech, and behavior changed, becoming like someone who was seriously in love. After all, in Japan, there were only ‘gentlemen,’ who treated her seriously because of her teenage-like appearance. Aiko knew there were a lot of men who thought of her appearance as good, but most of them ended up as good friends because none of them wanted to experience shame in being labeled as something beginning with ‘Lo’.



Since it was not unusual for people in their earlier teens to marry in this world, no one was bothered by Aiko’s short height and childish face; the so-called a little girl’s appearance. So even though David and the other Knights were serious,… her small experience in love and her small stature made her believe no man would be interested in her, since she didn’t even notice the love call clearly sent by men from this different world.



Thus, the mouth to mouth life-saving measure Hajime had quite the impact on Aiko. She calmed her mind, and once again recalled the things that wouldn’t get out of her head.



(… To begin with, he already has girlfriends named Yue and Shia… There were already two, so it doesn’t matter if it increases by one. Just what I am saying?! I am a teacher! He’s a student! Wait, that’s not the problem! It’s not like he thinks of me like that! Besides, he somehow managed to casually two-time! Illicit sexual relationships are forbidden! That’s insincere! Love should only be one way!… To have two at the same time… Kh, how shameless! I won’t allow such immoral relationships! Hmph, I won’t allow it!)



The sound of her beating the table became louder.



(… But his feelings towards Yue-san is quite special. Though her style isn’t so different from me… Could it be that h-he likes child-like women? F-For example, like me? No, no, no, what am I thinking! So what if I know his tastes! To begin with, he is eight years younger… Now that I think about it, aren’t people from the Vampire race like Yue-san have a long lifespan? In other words, he likes child-like older woman? Wait, so what if I knew that! Return to your senses, Hatayama Aiko! You are a teacher! He is a student! You are disqualified as a teacher if a little kiss makes you confused!)



Maybe because she was done beating the table, she held her face with both hands, began shaking her head while saying ‘No, no’, once again she beat the table, continued with another ‘No, no’, and finally she shouted “I am a teacher—!!,” as she began to pound the table with her forehead.



As expected, even the students and bodyguard Knights; the group who loves Aiko, was taken aback by her eccentric behavior. When Foss noticed Aiko, who started a one-man show, he said, “Oh my, looks like you’ve cheered up,” with his unchanging calm smile. What a big person.



Afterwards, Aiko was able to come to terms with her feelings towards Hajime about this and that, and self-concluded that was only a temporary hesitation caused by unstable emotion. Thus, there’s no change, Hajime was her student. While it was necessary to deliver information about Hajime to the top management in Church of the Saint and the Kingdom, she also needed to be prepared to protect Hajime from them in case of emergency, since she was determined to return to the Kingdom.



Aiko didn’t notice it. The thing about Hajime wasn’t concluded, it was just put on hold. While she called the students in her mind as “that child,” only Hajime was called “he.”



Thus the feeling began to bud. The time when Aiko finally took notice of it would be a little bit more in the future…





Volume 7 Chapter 6




There was no change in liveliness of Neutral Commercial City, Fhuren.



From the other side of the tall and gigantic wall, the town’s clamor reached considerable distance, all the way to outskirts. There was also no change with the long lines on the gates. From tourists to merchants who were visiting because of business, and there were also all kinds of listless people because of the torment of waiting for their turns.



There was a man who gave off a gaudy feeling standing at the end of the line of people by the entrance where the inspection was taking place. He was accompanied by two flashy women, one on each side, who were also listless as they waited for their turn in dissatisfaction while sweating. For the time being, would it be better to ask them what happened or just watch them? — they gave off such a mood. Then, they talked about silly things such as how to improve their waiting condition to reach their turn faster when suddenly; the gaudy man heard an unfamiliar sound to his ears.



SCREECH!!!



In the beginning, the gaudy man ignored it as he tried to lift the mood of the two women by his side. However, when the merchants and two women beside him became pop-eyed while looking behind him, coupled by the sound getting gradually louder, he turned towards the highway and said, “What!”



Thus he also became pop-eyed as he saw the scene of a black box running on the highway as it created raging storm of dust. The people quickly raised a ruckus. Though there were those who tried to run away as they shouted ‘Demonic beast!’, the speed of the box-like object was more than they could imagine, and it immediately reached them before they noticed it.



The gaudy man stiffened. The people in the line thought: It is hopeless already!, with despair reflecting in their eyes.



At the time, when it almost collided into them, the box-like object, creak, creak, creak, half rotating as its rear part shook, and it immediately stopped while raising a dust storm.



People were staring at the stationary object, the magic-driven four-wheeler. Within the confusion of what had happened, the four-wheeler’s doors opened. The ones who got off while ignoring and not thinking anything of the surprised people, were of course Hajime and his party. Yue, Shia, and even Tio were ignoring the gazes of the people. Only Will was saying, Sorry for the commotion!, as he bowed.



However, the people couldn’t even hear Will’s apology. It could be said they didn’t even care about the fact that people were coming out from the never before seen object. Their eyes were glued to the beautiful girls and a woman who “U~n”, stretched before them. When Yue, Shia, and Tio moved, “Hou,” sighs of admiration of the people entranced by them could be heard.



Hajime was sitting on the four-wheeler’s bonnet and said, The distance from here to the entrance, it looks like we need to wait for around an hour, huh~, as he narrowed his eyes. His muscle had stiffened because of the long time spent inside the car, so he went outside in a carefree way when they reached the gate. Because magic-driven four-wheeler was mobile with the use of Hajime’s direct magic manipulation, it was possible to move it without sitting on the driver seat, though the control difficulty was higher.



Hajime released the stiffness in his shoulders as his neck made cracking sounds. Yue got on the bonnet just like Hajime, went behind him, and began to rub his shoulders. Apparently she wanted to massage him. Hajime relaxed his body while smiling.



Maybe because Shia became lonely, she also sat down and drew closer to Hajime’s side. When Tio saw them, she said, “Muh, this one will also participate!,” as she emphasized her huge breasts and tried to cling onto Hajime’s arm but… she was slapped by Hajime and she fell down. However, there should be no problem as she displayed a very happy expression under Hajime’s feet.



“Hajime-san. Is it really okay to drive the four-wheeler until here? At the very least, I think we should hide it…”



“Nn? Honestly, isn’t it already too late? We have already rampaged so flashily. In a week, it will spread to even remote regions. Besides, I already had a thought that such a day would eventually come… It’s just earlier than what I had predicted.”



“… Nn, there is no more need for such prudence.”



Hajime answered Shia’s question as he shrugged his shoulders. Even though he planned to put a little effort, so that it will allow them to avoid any trouble, the battle in the Ul town should be spread quickly. So whatever his plan was, it should be useless now. That’s why, it was just as Yue had said, he stopped trying to not display his artifacts as much as possible, and decided to no more going about with such cautiousness.



“U~n, so that’s it. Well, because there will surely be actions by the Church and the Kingdom, it certainly is too late, huh. Though it’ll be better if we can get support from Aiko-san or Ilwa-san…”



“Well, in the end, those are just insurances. It is at the degree where it will be good if they demonstrate a good effect. To begin with, I have resolved myself to fight anything that might show up no matter what they are. Regardless what happens, I will just mow them down and move forward. That’s why it’s okay for you, Shia, to no longer act as a slave, you know? Do you want me to remove that collar?”



He thought the troublesome preparations made against the Church and the Kingdom related to Ilwa and Aiko would be something good if they would take effect in the end. Hajime didn’t think much about it. As the topic quickly came to a close, he said it was okay for Shia to stop acting as a slave while poking her collar. Outstretching his hand, he implicitly said it was no longer necessary to hold back to avoid troublesome things.



However Shia who quietly stroked and touched the collar, shook her head to refuse with somewhat blushing cheeks.



“No, it is okay to stay as is. After all, it was the first thing I got from Hajime-san… Besides, it is the proof I am Hajime-san’s… and I recently took a liking to it… That’s why, it is okay to stay as is.”



Shia said such things. Her rabbit ears moved about from embarrassment. Her appearance of when she was looking down, coupled with her being shy was truly cute. The men in the edge of Hajime’s view were pressing their nose as to suppress the dripping blood.



While Shia was still looking down, Hajime held her chin and made her look up. Because of his actions, Shia’s face became a deeper shade of red. That followed by the ground under the men’s feet also being dyed in red. Hajime took out a crystal with a beautiful hue from the “Treasure Box,” and placed it on Shia’s collar. To be more precise he used “transmutation” on the crystal.



Shia’s collar was to display that she was Hajime’s slave so it was of a boorish fashion. The telepathy stone and the other stones were installed without regards to any design as it was made in unostentatious manner. To begin with, it was made as temporary thing to not attract any trouble inside the town, so he disregarded the design.



However, if Shia liked it and wanted to keep wearing it, just a little, it could be said it was too boorish. Also, compared to the time he gave her the collar, Hajime’s feelings towards Shia had become gentler. That’s why Hajime thought to make the collar to suit Shia.



As the result, white and blue ornaments were geometrically installed on the black material and, the fragment of God’s Crystal was processed into a small cross that radiated blue light, installed on the front side which resulted in a mysterious-like collar… A choker even more fashionable than the ones sold on earth. There’s already no impression left of a dog collar used to restrain.



Hajime showed a satisfied expression towards his workmanship. Shia, who was entranced because of the feeling from Hajime’s fingers that sometimes brushed her neck, was startled when Hajime passed a mirror to her. Following that, she readily confirmed the choker on her neck with the mirror. There was certainly a choker with mysteriously beautiful ornaments. The cross made out of God Crystal was indeed beautiful and suited Shia’s eyes.



Shia was poking the cross with her finger and her mouth loosened in a wide smile. Afterwards, she embraced Hajime’s arm as a truly happy smile floated across her face while rubbing her forehead on his arm, and continued with her thanks. Incidentally, her rabbit ears were also nestled on Hajime.



While Shia on his shoulder raised an expression of happiness, Yue on his back smiled slightly and stroked Shia’s rabbit ears nestled on him. Tio who crept up once again received a slap.



Because of the pink-colored space that appeared out of nowhere, the people who returned from the impact of the unknown object and the appearances of the super beautiful girls, women began to pay attention to Hajime and his party with various feelings. The majority of the women didn’t even envy Yue and the others’ beauty as they let out warm sighs. On the other side, the men divided into those captivated by Yue and the others, those looking at Hajime with envy and killing intent, and those who licked their lips as they found out the commodity value on Hajime’s artifacts and the girls.



However, no one faced Hajime and his party directly even now. The merchants seemed to restrain each other as they looked for a right timing to speak. Amongst them, was the gaudy man from earlier; he displayed a mortified expression as he compared the two women beside him with Yue and the others, and clicked his tongue. Thus he recklessly approached Hajime and his party.



“Yo, ladies. If it’s okay, can— ”



“Who do you think you are trying to touch without permission? Huh?”



“Hii!”



The gaudy man casually called out to Yue and the others while ignoring Hajime. If it was only calling them, Hajime’s “pressure” wouldn’t end up guiding him to fainting course. But, of all things, the gaudy man was trying to touch Shia’s cheek.



Just from one look, the gaudy man was quite a good looking one. Therefore, he must have thought any women would fall for him if he touched and seduced them. However, Shia’s gaze was cold and though she thought to deal with him before he touched her, Hajime’s arm grabbed the gaudy man’s head ahead of her. Moreover it was coupled with a thick killing intent.



The gaudy man immediately ducked his body and leaked a miserable scream. Hajime just ignored the gaudy man’s appearance and threw him off towards the highway. The gaudy man reached the ground in tremendous speed 30 meters away. With his face shaving the ground, he ended up in a pose just like Nagoya’s Shachihoko. And after advancing for ten meters more with only his head, he fell and was completely unmoving.



Within cloud of sand, the gaudy man laid on the earth without even twitching. The people who saw were dumbfounded because they just saw a person flew in an impossible orbit, and they turned their gazes to Hajime who created the spectacle. The two women who attended the gaudy man were timidly looking at Hajime, who glared at the surrounding with absolute zero eyes which made them shudder, and they disappeared somewhere while screaming.



The merchants who tried to restrain each other while saying, “You guys, I won’t let you go ahead,” from a while ago were now saying, “Please go ahead,” as they mutually compromised with each other. Hajime said clearly, Who’s next?, while glaring.



Because no one came forward, Hajime smiled in satisfaction, and he looked away from the surrounding people as he lost interest.



“Whoa, Hajime-san was angry for me~ Is this how he expresses his desire to monopolize me? Just one more step until that thing happens, right!”



“… Shia, do your best.”



“Yue-saa~n. Okay. I will work hard~!”



“Hmph, it is of no matter how much thou art is valued~ Master. Isn’t it okay to value this one, too? Please throw this one just like that man, please?”



Because Hajime was angry towards the one who tried to touch her, happiness spread through Shia’s whole body. Actually, Hajime just couldn’t forgive him for trying to touch Shia as though she was his thing. There was no desire to monopolize her, but it was too late to correct her, though it was true that his action was because he thought Shia as someone important to him.



Incidentally, because Tio who looked at the blown away gaudy man with envying eyes tried to nestle close to him, Hajime still responded with a slap. “Aan!,” Tio who collapsed happily after saying with a captivating voice was glared at by Hajime with a truly cold gaze. However, she became even happier as she “Haa, haa,” got excited. Hajime let out a deep sigh and said, “This fellow can’t be helped anymore,” as he gave up thinking about her condition.



Hajime and his party were flirting with such feelings, Will who was outside of this got on and sat inside the vehicle while looking at the far distance to sort out his feelings. The line from before became noisy again. Hajime turned his gaze and apparently there were guards coming running. They probably saw the quarrel from a while ago. Rather, they might be trying to confirm what had happened because the gaudy man who was planted on the ground was still unmoving.



The three men who rode on horses while wearing simple armor approached Hajime and his party after asking the situation from the nearby merchants. One of the merchant pointed at Hajime’s party, then he pointed at the gaudy man. One of the men ordered one of his companions to go towards the gaudy man. The remaining two men approached Hajime’s party who were relaxing (flirting) on the four-wheeler’s bonnet. The two men’s eyes somewhat sharpened. Not because of duty… but because they envied him.



“Oi, you! What’s with this commotion! Beside, what’s that black box? Explain yourself!”



Though the man spoke oppressively to Hajime, there’s no force at all because he kept sneaking a look towards Yue and the girls. Hajime already expected this development as he looked at the guard and briefly answered.



“This is my artifact. I threw that man away because he tried to put his hand on her. Can you believe it? How can he suddenly try to hug her? Look, she is frightened by that… Mister Guards, don’t tell me you’re going to ally with that sex offender? If so, we won’t go to Fhuren ever again… how can I be treated as a criminal while you defend the offender… right?”



Blah, blah, Hajime spoke in such manner about vague things as if they were the facts. Shia stuck to Hajime simply because she wanted to be spoiled, and she didn’t look frightened if one looked at her objectively. It was a tragedy!, Hajime warped his expression to sincerely appeal. Will on the vehicle said, “What a smooth talker,” as he stared at him but got ignored. The surrounding merchants who became the straight men said, “Rather than trying to embrace, he was thrown before he finished speaking,” or “Far from being frightened, it’s more like you’re flirting,” with small voices which were also ignored.



However, it was needless to say what their answer was, as it was obvious which one to believe between the words of a gaudy man and the side of beautiful girls and women. “That guy is the worst,” they easily believed him without examining it further.



Then at that time, one of the guards inclined his head when he saw Hajime’s party then he said, “Ah,” as if he recalled something then he whispered to the other guard to confirm it. Unknown to what was said, the other guard said in a similar manner, “Now that you mention it,” as he thoroughly examined at Hajime’s party.



“… You, are you Hajime, Yue, and Shia?”



“Nn? Ah, that’s certainly so…”



“I see. Then, are you returning from the guild’s branch head’s request?”



“Ah, though it is so… did a notification come from by the branch head?”



The guard nodded in consent towards Hajime’s expectations. The guard immediately told them to pass the gate without waiting for their turn. They moved using four-wheeler and followed by the guards. The people in the lines were curious about what happened as they narrowed their eyes to watch them move, and Hajime’s party once again set their feet in Fhuren.



* * *



Hajime’s party were currently inside the reception room of the adventurer guild.



They were served with high-grade teas along with the cakes, and they unreservedly drank it while they waited for five minutes. The one who kicked the door open and jumped inside was Ilwa Chang who requested Hajime’s party to rescue Will.



“Will! Are you safe!? Do you have any injury!?”



Casting aside his calm atmosphere from the past meeting, he didn’t even greet them as Ilwa was confirming Will’s safety when he saw him. It might be because he was very worried about him.



“Ilwa-san… I am sorry. It was because I said something unreasonable that you were troubled …”



“… What are you saying… It was me who introduced you to a dangerous commission… You really are safe… I can’t face Greille and Sarria if something happened to Will… They are also quite worried about you. It’ll be better if you quickly show your face to relieve them. I have reported to them about your safety. That information came to Fhuren several days ago…”



“Father and Mama are… I understand. I will immediately go to meet them.”



Ilwa told Will where his parent stayed and nodded, telling him to go. Will once again expressed his gratitude to Ilwa as he bowed, then he formally greeted Hajime’s party before he, as promised, went outside the room. For Hajime, he was glad it went well, but he seemed dissatisfied because he didn’t make proper thanks.



After Will went outside, Ilwa formally looked at Hajime. Ilwa was smiling with a calm expression, then he deeply bowed to Hajime.



“Hajime-kun, thank you very much for this. I never thought you’d really bring Will back alive. I can’t express my gratitude with words.”



“Well, Will survived because he has good luck.”



“Fufu, is that so? There is certainly that… but isn’t it the truth that you protected him from tens of thousands of demonic beasts? Goddess’s Sword-sama?”



While he smiled radiantly, Ilwa called Hajime with his nickname from the previous battle against the large crowd of demonic beasts. Hajime’s cheeks cramped. Apparently, the guild’s branch head owned the method to transmit the information faster than Hajime’s movement.



“… That information spread quite fast, huh.”



“It is because of the guild executives. There’s also the artifact for long-distance report. And I also have my subordinate to follow you. Though I said that, he seemed to have been always left behind to wander around because of those unexpected movement type artifacts… It was the first time I heard him complaining. After all, he held the greatest ability to gather information.”



Ilwa said as he smiled wryly. It seemed he hired an observer since the beginning. It was a natural measure as a guild’s branch head, so Hajime wasn’t angry. Rather, he quite sympathized with the branch head’s direct subordinate when he thought of him always rushing around because of him.



“Even so, the situation was truly a serious one. I never thought the accident in the Northern Mountain Ranges area to be a sign for such great disaster… It was truly a good thing I asked you for that request. I’m also interested in the power that could annihilate tens of thousands of demonic beasts… Can you let me hear it? Just what on earth had happened?”



“Ah, I don’t mind. But, before that I ask you for Yue and Shia’s status plates… and about Tio—”



“Hmm, if those two get one, then please this one too.”



“… Is what she said.”



“Hmm, certainly, and the credibility will increase if I can see what’s in the plate… okay.”



After saying so, Ilwa called the staff and three brand new status plates were brought in.



As the result, Yue and the girls’ statuses were as followed.



Name



Yue



Age



323 Years Old



Gender



Female



Level



75



Class



Sorceress (Miko)



Strength



120



Vitality



300



Resistance



60



Agility



120



Magic



6,908



Magic Resistance



7,120



Skills



Name



Shia Haulia



Age



16 Years Old



Gender



Female



Level



40



Class



Diviner



Strength



60 – Max: 6,100



Vitality



80 – Max: 6,120



Resistance



60 – Max: 6,120



Agility



85 – Max: 6,125



Magic



3,020



Magic Resistance



3,180



Skills



Name



Tio Clarce



Age



563 Years Old



Gender



Female



Level



89



Class



Guardian



Strength



770 – Dragon Form: 4,620



Vitality



1,100 – Dragon Form: 6,600



Resistance



1,100 – Dragon Form: 6,600



Agility



580 – Dragon Form: 3,480



Magic



4,590



Magic Resistance



4,220



Skills



Though their statuses didn’t reach Hajime, theirs were at the level where not even a few of the summoned cheat group could become. It was at the level that couldn’t even be reached by the Hero when he uses Limit Break.



As expected, Ilwa was speechless as he became slack-jawed. It couldn’t be helped. Yue and Tio owned the skills such as “Blood Conversion” and “Dragon Form” which were peculiar skill for the races assumed to have been perished, and their statuses were too abnormal. Shia also completely ignored her tribe’s common sense. It was strange to not be surprised by them.



“My, my… I had thought there must be something, but something like these are…”



Drenched in cold sweat, Ilwa’s usual smile cramped when he saw the statuses, and Hajime uncaringly said in agreement. He listened to it normally, even if the silly contents seemed to be fixed through their lives, he could not help believing it because the numerical values and skills he just seen were proven by the status plates. When Ilwa finished hearing all of his stories, he sat deeply on the sofa with a weary look that made him seemed like he suddenly aged for at least ten years.



“… Indeed, you were able to catch Catherine-sensei’s attention. Though I had expected Hajime-kun alone was someone from different world… the actual things are far more oblique, huh…”



“… Then, branch head-san. What will you do? Are you going to hand us over to the church as dangerous elements?”



Ilwa corrected his seating as he looked at Hajime as if criticizing his question.



“That joke is too cruel. You think I can do that? To become your enemy is an impossible choice as an executive of the guild… Also, I don’t want you to take lightly of me. You are my benefactors. It is not something I can forget for the rest of my life.”



“… I see. Then that’s good.” Hajime shrugged his shoulders and used his gaze to express his sorry and gratitude.



“I have even thought, at the very least, to become your support just as promised, as guild executive and as my own self. Well, at least I will show you that now. For now, I don’t think the people from above will do anything to you as their discussion became complicated. At least I will make all of you “Gold”-rank adventurers to make it easier to support you. Normally there would be various troublesome procedures to become “Gold”… I will somehow do it later. After all, there are Catherine-sensei and my recommendation along with your fame as “Goddess’s Sword”.”



Ilwa shown a lavish hospitality as he prepared a letter with his family crest, so they could use the VIP room of the inn directly operated by the guild while they were in Fhuren. If anything, though there was his gratitude for the recent event, he seemed to also want to create a friendly relationship with Hajime’s party. He spoke of everything in seriousness without having any reason to hide anything.



Afterwards, when they separated from Ilwa, Hajime’s party went to relax in the VIP room at the hotel directly managed by the guild in Fhuren’s Central Ward. On their way, they met Will’s parents, Count Greille Greta and Saria Greta, who came to greet them accompanied by Will. They were different from the nobles he had saw in the Royal Palace, since they seemed to be fairly logical people. He was convinced that Will’s goodness came from his parents.



Count Greille wanted to thank them by inviting them to his house by giving them money and goods, but he left with a message saying he’d help them if they were in trouble because Hajime firmly refused the rewards.



A wide living room: there were four other rooms beside the room, and all of them were equipped with canopied beds overseeing the Sightseeing Ward from the terrace. Hajime was lying down on the super big sofa in the living room as he sighed in relaxation.



Yue lifted Hajime’s head and rested it on her lap as usual. Shia was sitting at his feet, while Tio was looking around the room in curiosity.



“Let’s rest for today. We will do things such as shopping and buying the food tomorrow.”



Hajime narrowed his eyes as he felt pleasant from Yue’s hand that was brushing his hair, and he said the schedule for tomorrow. Shia was waiting for it. She timidly shook Hajime’s reclining body.



“That’s~, Hajime-san. The promise…”



“… I remember. Shall I take you to the Sightseeing Ward…”



As the reward for Shia’s hard work, Hajime promised to go on a date with her for a day. Shia was looking at Hajime with expectant eyes. Hajime was hesitating because it was necessary to procure the food, but Yue concluded his hesitation. Her soft hands were placed on Hajime’s cheeks and she narrowed her eyes gently.



“… Tio and I will be the one shopping. So go with Shia, okay?”



“… Is it okay?”



“Nn… in exchange…”



“In exchange?”



Yue looked at Hajime and her best friend Shia, who was truly expecting the promise, with a gentle gaze as she exuded a big-sister-like atmosphere, and she urged Hajime. Hajime tried to confirm the continuation of her words with a somewhat complex look, and Yue’s gentle expression changed into bewitching one as she licked her lip. She followed it by drawing her face closer to Hajime’s ear and…



“… I want you to love me a lot tonight.” She said.



Hajime covered his face with his hand and said, “… Nn,” a Yue-like answer. That’s all they needed. Though he was confident of being able to win against the guardian in the depth of the dungeon, perhaps for his whole life he wouldn’t be able to defeat Yue or so Hajime thought.



“… Before I notice, they naturally began to make the world of their own… not surprising from Yue-san.”



“Hmm, even so, this one feel the undiscouraged Shia is considerably strong. Well, this one has no problem because this one is satisfied as long as Master bullies this one… Shia has quite the obstacle~”



While Shia directed a, “As expected of Master,” gaze towards Yue with respectful eyes, and Tio sent an interested gaze towards Shia and Yue’s relationship where no envy could be felt. Afterwards, when Hajime managed to regain his senses that flew outside because of Yue’s surprise attack, the four of them chatted, and the day grew into the night.



* * *



Extra



Midnight that day.



As the moon approached the zenith… two shadows stealthily moved to the terrace in the top floor of the inn directly managed by adventurer guild. The two dressed in black just like assassins, slowly killed their presences as they approached a certain room’s window, and they silently look inside.



The things inside that room were…



“Fuwah! Please look at that, Tio-san! That intense… Yue-san will break you know.”



“WHOOAA! Master is so intense! H-However, Shia. Yue’s expression… is certainly bad! Even though this one is also a woman, this one can feel something strange…”



“Ack, it is definitely an enchanting expression that cannot be resisted! She looks so happy~, I’m so jealous~.”



“Mmm~, though this one is satisfied as long as Master bully this one… that kind of thing isn’t bad, too~.”



… After this, Hajime who noticed their presences, needless to say, gave the two peeping toms a harsh punishment.



* * *



Some information about the statuses: Blood Pact — Drastic increase in status of the person whom is chosen to suck blood from.



Composition by Imagination — Magic array can be completely made just by imagining it.



Rise in Conversion Efficiency 3 — 1 unit of magic will be converted into 3 unit of physical strength.



Dragon Scales Hardening — Dragon scales can be further hardened using magic. It is possible to further increase the basic status using Dragon Form.



Author’s Note: The statuses are still tentative. There’s possibility of adjustment depending on the future development.





Volume 7 Chapter 7




“Fufufufu~n, fufufu~n! What a fine weather~ It’s a splendid weather for a date~.”



In Fhuren’s main street, the rabbit eared girl, Shia, was cheerfully walking while skipping. Her clothing was different from her usual durable adventurer style clothes — it was a lovely milk-white one-piece dress. With narrowed collar, there was a big opening in the cleavage and Shia’s rich breasts were boing, boing!, swaying as she walked. A slender, black belt was attached on her waist. Her rich hip-line and the indescribably enchanting curve were clearly displayed. Slender, tight, and beautiful legs were extended from the skirt 15 cm above her knees, and the gazes of men were gathered on the pair of bouncing hills.



But the most attractive thing about her was her atmosphere and her smile. With blushing cheeks, I am happy, so it cannot be helped!, was overflowing from her without any effort to conceal it. About her being a demi-human or how she wore a slave’s collar-like thing, could be said as something trivial as the surrounding people fell for her. There were also elderlies who smiled as if they saw something pleasant.



Behind the ecstatic Shia, was Hajime who walked on with a wry smile. Maybe because she was so elated, Shia repeatedly walked a little ahead, and then turned around with a smile as she waited for Hajime to catch up. Just like the surrounding people, Hajime inadvertently smiled.



“Your spirit is too high, Shia. You will fall down if you don’t look in front, you know?”



“Fufufu, I won’t make such blunder~, after all I have been trained by Yue-sa—!?”



Because of Hajime’s warning, Shia turned around again as she replied to him, she almost fell down. Hajime promptly held her waist to support her. Though there wouldn’t be any problem considering Shia’s physical strength, she wore a short skirt today. He would not let the men who pant as they looked at Shia to become lucky perverts.



“I-I am sorry.”



“See, now that you understand, walk right beside me.”



As she shrunk her body because of the embarrassment from being held by the waist, Shia demurely tugged Hajime’s sleeve, and this time she began to walk in slower pace next to him. Because of how lovely she looked with blushing cheeks, most of the surrounding men seemed to have been knocked out. Some of them were because of the fists from the lovers by their side.



Hajime and Shia kept collecting the surrounding gazes, and they finally entered the Sightseeing Ward. There were various facilities inside the Sightseeing Ward. For example were theatres and street performers avenue, circus, music halls, aquarium, arena, game studio, observatory, colorful flower garden along with huge maze of flowers, and even beautiful buildings along with the plazas.



“Hajime-san, Hajime-san! Let’s go to Meerstat first! I have never seen a marine creature before!”



With a guide book in hand, Shia’s rabbit ears moved as though to express, “Let’s go! Let’s go!” She seemed to have never seen any marine creature because she lived in «Haltina Sea of Trees», so she wanted to go to Meerstat, a famous aquarium in Fhuren’s Sightseeing Ward.



Incidentally, she was used to seeing freshwater fishes because there were lakes and rivers in the Sea of Trees. However, she felt they weren’t the same even though the marine creatures were shaped similar to those fishes. Though Hajime thought them as only fish… he didn’t say anything since he read the mood. Hajime was going to be nice to Shia today.



“Hee~, for marine creatures to be inland… that’s the point. Though the management, maintenance, and transportation must be troublesome…”



Though Hajime wasn’t interested at all, he didn’t reject it since he didn’t have any reason to refuse her. Furthermore, Shia was happily smiling as she pulled Hajime’s hand.



On the way in street performers avenue, their eyes were caught by people who did acrobatic as they challenged the human’s limit, when they finally reached the big facility of Meerstat. Maybe as to represent the sea, the whole building was painted in blue and there were crowds of people in there.



The interior was extremely similar to the aquarium in the Earth. However, maybe because they didn’t have the technology to make transparent water tanks that could endure the water pressure like the ones on Earth, bulky glass tiles were buried in the fence made of crystal-like metal, and it only somewhat visible.



However, Shia didn’t mind it. Her eyes sparkled from seeing the marine creatures for the first time, and she spoke to Hajime while pointing her finger. Right next to them, was a little girl with her family who also pointing with sparkling eyes. Unexpectedly, his gaze met the father-like person’s gaze and because Hajime noticed he looked at him with warm gaze. Hajime, who felt awkward, took Shia’s hand and moved elsewhere. Shia was surprised by Hajime’s action but she was happy he took her hand, and needless to say she returned his grasp while blushing.



After this and that, they enjoyed the aquarium for one hour, when Shia suddenly became wide-eyed when she looked at a certain water tank again, and began to stare at it.



Inside was… a Seaman. It was human-faced fish very similar to the one from the game Hajime knew.



“… Wh-why is he here…”



Shia backed away and trembled. Maybe because the Seaman noticed Shia, it turned to watch her with the same lazy expression from inside the water tank. The tension raised for some unknown reason. Because of two people, Hajime looked at the explanation placed beside the water tank.



According to it, this Seaman was an aquatic demonic beast, and it capable of using peculiar magic called “Telepathy.” It seemed to be able to speak fluently though it rarely spoke, and he confirmed from the description that it was famous as a demonic beast one could converse with.



However, even if it was possible to talk to, it would only answer with an unmotivated voice as though the talk was very troublesome for it. Also, caution was necessary because the person it spoke to would become depressed as a side effect. It like alcohol and becomes talkative as it drinks. However, it wouldn’t be called a conversation as a person would one-sidedly continued to preach to the conversation partner… Incidentally, it was named Lehman.



Since Hajime didn’t know whether Shia was simply staring or if she was having at argument with it. However, when sweat lines started to appear on her face and she didn’t reply to him, or when he talked to it in the normal way, he used “Telepathy” instead.



“You, can you really use telepathy? Can you really converse? Can you understand my words?”



Because of the sudden telepathy, Lehman’s eyes twitched for a moment in response. It followed by shifting its gaze from Shia to slowly looking at Hajime. Shia whose expression expressed, Somehow I won!, was ignored.



“… Tch, this should be our first meeting. First, introduce yourself. That is how you show your manner. Good grief, this is why the young people these days…”



He was taught about manners by the fish with a face of an old man. He regretted his mistake. With cramped cheeks, Hajime tried to talk again.



“… My bad. I am Hajime. Looks like you really can converse. Just what is Lehman?”



“… You know. Just what is human? How can you answer that? That’s why, how would I know the answer. Well, I only can say I am me. No more no less. Also, call me by my name or whatever you like.”



Hajime had thought, “Just how does it think…” But somehow it spoke about common sense, moreover it was rather cool. That was completely unexpected. Wasn’t it written that it was unmotivated?, he wanted to complaint to the aquarium’s staff. Hajime was slightly looking at the distance in escapism, but this time a question came from the Lehman.



“I also want to ask one thing. You, why can you use telepathy? There’s no sign of the use of human’s magic… It was as if you are the same as me.”



It was nothing but a natural question. After all, a human was using the peculiar magic, “Telepathy.” It was curious as to why he was able to casually use just like it. It might be the cause of why the rarely talkative Lehman was responding to Hajime’s conversation. Hajime explained he was able to use it by eating the demonic beast that was capable of using telepathy.



“… That’s a lot of hardships for someone so young. Okay, ask me anything you want. This old man will answer anything in my knowledge.”



He was sympathized. Apparently, it thought he was so poor that there was no choice other than eating the demonic beast. When it saw his current appearance and he was wearing good clothing, it said as it sniffled, “Looks like you’ve worked so hard, good boy! It make me want to cry.”



Hajime didn’t correct it because it was the true he had some hard times. However, for him to be sympathized by a fish… it was somewhat depressing. He somehow managed to set it aside and asked Lehman various things. For examples, Does a demonic beast have a clear will?, How were the demonic beasts born?, Are there any other demonic beasts people can communicate with?, … Lehman answered that most demonic beasts didn’t have clear will. It didn’t know any other demonic beasts that could understand human language other than its species. Moreover, it didn’t know how the demonic beasts were born.



Moderate amount of time had passed as he asked a lot of things, and they began to gather attention because it was a surreal spectacle for the onlookers to see a young man and a fish with a face of an old man staring at each other. Shia, who began to feel restless, was tugging Hajime’s sleeve, so Hajime rounded up the conversation.



Even though his conversation with Lehman was somewhat interesting, today was decided for him to go out and spend it with Shia. He would not neglect his promise. Lehman also said, “Oops, looks like I have obstructed your date,” as it rounded up the conversation by reading the mood. By the way, they got along so well that they called each other with “Leh-san” and “Ha-boy.” Hajime could see the “nobleness” inside the Lehman.



In the end, Hajime asked why Lehman was in such a place. The answer was…



“Nn? Just as I said before, I was traveling freely… but the underground water which I was swimming through suddenly sprouted outside and I was thrown away… Before I knew, I was in a grassy place beside a spring. Though I won’t die even without water, I cannot move without it. When I tried to ask for help using telepathy… Well, I was brought here.”



Immediately, a line of sweat flowed from Hajime’s forehead. It was obviously the time when they got out from the Great Dungeon of Raisen. Apparently, Lehman was involved and was launched together with them at that spring. Though the real culprit was the idiot Miledi, there was no change that they got it involved.



Hajime, ahem, cleared his throat, then asked the Lehman.



“Ah~, Leh-san. That is, what can I say. Do you want to get out of here?”



“? That’s, of course. For I am more suited for traveling freely. It is the best for a living thing to live the natural way. Rather than inside such a cage, I prefer to die in the ocean.”



Lehman used lot of connotations in those words. Therefore, Hajime who liked the Lehman decided to help it because he was also at fault.



“Leh-san. If so, I will bring you to a nearby river. Apparently, your situation was caused by my party. Since I will bring you out in few minutes, please believe in me and I will quietly transport you.”



“Ha-boy… Heh, though you are young, to have such way of thinking… I don’t know what will you do, but no one should be able to match your power. I will believe in Ha-boy and wait.”



Hajime and Lehman exchanged manly smiles. As if understanding the their expressions, Shia’s cheeks cramped as she said, “Huh? Don’t tell me another rival?” Hajime pulled Shia’s hand as he turned on his heel from the place. Although the reason was unknown, the Lehman used “Telepathy” to Shia who followed Hajime.



“Little miss, I am sorry to surprise you back then. Don’t let go of the hand tied to Ha-boy’s.”



“Heh? Heh? Umm, well, there is no need to worry about that! I have my first kiss with Hajime-san thanks to that! Also, I definitely won’t let it go!”



Though she didn’t understand, Shia firmly answered. Lehman displayed a satisfied smile as it looked at Shia. “How meddlesome,” Hajime prayed for his new friend’s good luck from now on as he left the Meerstat aquarium with a wry smile.



After a few minutes, a claw crane broke through into the lower part of the aquarium. It crushed Lehman’s water tank, used the arm to catch the Lehman that came out along the water splendidly, defeated the staff members who were after them (there were no injury). Furthermore, it destroyed a wall to get out and disappeared far into the sky; these kinds of things happened. There were commotions about whether it was a new kind of demonic beast or the Lehman’s hidden ability… but that was something trivial.



* * *



At that time, on the other side…



Yue and Tio were shopping inside the Commercial Ward. Even so, because there were already a large amount of necessary thing inside Hajime’s “Treasure Box,” they could only replenish a small amount of the things they consume in their travel. Therefore, rather than shopping for food, the two were just indifferently wandering around the various shops in the Commercial Ward.



“Hmm. Even so, Yue. Art thou really okay about that?” ” ? … About Shia?”



“Mm-hmm. It is possible that various things had progressed right now, thou know? Have thou thought of that?”



Tio was questioning Yue, who was judging the things exhibited in the boutique. Her tone was filled with some curiosity. Is it okay to be this calm? Isn’t it possible she passed thou? Tio was interested in the mysterious relationship of the three. Because they would be traveling companions from now on, she wanted to converse without reserve for once.



On the other hand, Yue wasn’t was shaken. She simply shrugged her shoulders and looked at Tio. There was no sense of crisis at all.



“… I am happy if it happens.”



“Happy? Though the man thou love becomes intimate with another woman?”



“… It is not another woman. It’s Shia.”



When Tio inclined her head, Yue continued to talk as she walked around the shop.



“… In the beginning, when she tried to get close to Hajime… I was annoyed because she clearly had another intent… However, I understand now.”



“Understand?”



“… Nn, that girl always did her best. Always used her utmost effort. All for the sake of her important things and the things she loves. She is straightforward for the better or worse.”



“Hmm. This one understands just by seeing her… Is that why thou have such a bond?”



Tio smiled when Shia, someone she was associated with only for a short time, floated in her head. She naturally smile as she thought of the moodmaker girl, whose smile didn’t disappear even with the hardship she has experienced for being a demi-human. Moreover, although there were a lot of disappointing things about her because she was still young, Tio liked Shia. However, she thought it was a weak reason to allow her to go on a date with Yue’s lover. In the end, she wanted to confirm another reason than Yue just liking Shia.



“… The other is.”



“Other? What doest thou mean by other?”



Because of Tio’s questioning face, Yue began to smile as she answered.



“… Shia also likes me. At least as much as Hajime. They are the same even though they have different meaning… Isn’t that cute?”



“… Indeed… Master and Yue, ye both are necessary for that child… There are only few people who could be fond of the one who treated them unkindly. That might be her virtue. Hmm, this one thought this one understood what Yue thinks of Shia… But what about Master? Have thou thought Master might be captivated by her? Don’t thou understand that child’s charm?”



Yue shrugged her shoulders as if those things were ridiculous, and this time she displayed a bewitching smile. Eyes narrowed, cheeks blushed, she licked her lips. Her seductiveness overflowed from her body though she was small just like a little girl. Men and women who were walking around them stopped to look at her. In the following moments, accidents appeared here and there; pedestrians collided because they walked while their eyes were still nailed on Yue. Overflowing sensuality came from Tio’s voluptuous body, but beside her was blurred. Tio recalled the time when she peeped at Yue last night and she became charmed by her.



“… I want to increase Hajime’s “important ones.” However,… only I am “special”… if you think you can take him, then try it. No matter the time, the place, or who it is… I will be the winner.”



“Can you do it?”, Yue implied the declaration with a smile, and Tio backed away from the force she felt coming from the gap of Yue’s usual expressionlessness. Because she backed away unconsciously, Tio revealed a surprised expression and she raised both hands to show she gave up with a bitter smile.



“Well… this one never thinks of starting a fight. This one feel it is enough as long as Master abuse this one.”



“… A pervert.”



Yue looked at Tio with an amazed expression while the person in question only laughed cheerfully. Thus, Yue, who had guessed Tio was trying to find a way to relate with them when she purposely began such talk, could only sighed because the Ryuujin race she longed for turned out to be a pervert. However, she smiled wryly as they seemed to be able to get along.



As such, the distance between Yue and Tio slightly shortened as they went out of the boutique and,



BOOM!!



“Guwa!!” “Ahhh!!”



The wall of a nearby building was immediately destroyed, and the screams of two men could be heard from there as they appeared with their faces planted on the ground. In addition, several men were also blown away from the window of the same building just like pinballs as they screamed. Sounds of destruction resounded from inside the building, and with that, the wall cracked and collapsed as though the building received a severe earthquake.



With several tens of men convulsing with their limbs bent in strange directions as they lined up on the street. The building that could no longer endure the damage finally collapsed with a tremendous roar.



Among the onlooker who had scattered in a distance, Yue and Tio perceived familiar voices and presences. Thus, they stayed in their places and they looked inside the scattered dust with amazed expressions.



“Ah, ah, these are the two’s presences, as expected…”



“Huh? Aren’t those Yue-san and Tio-san? Why are you here?”



“… That’s our line… You are overdoing it for a date.”



“Seriously~, well? Oh Master, just what kind of trouble hath art thou gotten involved in this time?”



Just as Yue and Tio perceived, what appeared from the scattered dust were Hajime and Shia. The two should be on a date now, but they approached Yue and Tio with familiar weapons on their arms. She was wearing adorable clothing, so the appearance of Shia who shouldered a brutal weapon was truly a surreal one.



“Ahaha, even I never thought it will turn into such a date… It just that the development… we destroyed a facility related to an organization that trades people…”



“… What kind of development resulted in fighting an underground organization?”



Yue displayed an amazed expression as Shia let out dry laugh. Tio was looking at Hajime asking for an explanation.



“Well, we are rather short handed for now. So can you help me after I explain the situation?”



As he put Donner into the holster, Hajime threw away the men who tumbled on the ground like pebbles as they obstructed his way. While looking at the piled up men with a leer, Hajime began to explain the situation to Yue and Tio.





Volume 7 Chapter 8




After they left the Meerstat aquarium and ate their lunches, Hajime and Shia strolled around the maze of flower beds and street performers’ avenue. In Shia’s arm, there were many wrappers of food item bought from various stalls, and she was currently occupied with the vanilla-like ice cream.



“You ate a lot… Were they that good?”



“Nom… Yes! They are really delicious. As expected of Fhuren, even the level of their food stalls are high.”



“…You’ll grow fat if you eat too much.”



“…Hajime-san, those are words that shouldn’t be said to a woman.”



Because of Hajime’s words, the hand she was using to eat stopped for a moment as she made excuses under her breath, “I will exercise later… I will also eat less tomorrow…,” and Shia continued to enjoy the sweets from the stalls. While Hajime walked beside Shia with a wry smile, his expression changed suddenly to a dubious one. He turned around and looked down.



Shia noticed him and asked while inclining her head, “Nn? Is something wrong, Hajime-san?”



“Nn—? The sign perception perceived a worrying presence…”



“Did you use the sign perception?”



“I always activate it as precaution.”



“U~n? But, are you that worried? And even if you say a presence…”



Shia looked at the surrounding, she tilted her head and said, “There are a lot of people around, you know?”



“No, that’s not what I mean… What I perceived was from below?”



“Below?… you mean the drainage? Umm, wouldn’t it be the maintenance staff?”



“If so, then I wouldn’t be worried about it. It’s a small and weak presence… Maybe it’s a child? Moreover, a weakened one.”



“Eh!? Th-That’s bad! I-It is possible the child fell into a hole and drowned! Hajime-san! Let’s chase after it! Show me the way!”



The moment Shia heard Hajime’s explanation, she immediately ran. Although Aiko’s words about his “lonely way of life” had been etched in his heart, but the truth was that Shia moved faster than him, which made him smile wryly. Shia’s brightness and straightforwardness seems to have been a good influence on Hajime.



Shia and Hajime chased after the moving presence underground with a moderate speed. From the town’s structure, they expected the drainage to flow along the street. When they immediately passed by the presence, he pressed his hand on the ground to transmute it. Red sparks kindled, and a hole connected to the underground immediately opened.



Hajime and Shia unhesitatingly jumped into the hole. He then used “Aerodynamic,” held onto Shia right before they fell into the drainage that released the bad smell, and they landed on the passage on both side of the waterways.



“Hajime-san, I can also feel the presence. I will jump and pull it!”



“No, it is okay.”



Hajime stopped Shia, who tried to jump without minding that her clothing would be dirtied, by holding her neck root. He then once again pressed his hand on the ground and used transmutation. A lattice was created along with red sparks in the waterway. Because the lattice was set diagonally up, the child being swept away moved towards them and stopped when caught by the lattice. Hajime operated the gimmick in his left arm. His arm extended to catch the child, and he pulled it to the passage.



“This child…”



“Well, this child is still breathing… Let’s get out of here for now, the smell is very bad here.”



Seeing child they saved, Shia widened her eyes in surprise. Hajime also had knowledge of the child’s appearance, so he was surprised in his mind. However, their current location wasn’t good physically and mentally, so they moved to another location.



Somehow, since it didn’t seem to be an accident where a child fell into the waterways and drowned, Hajime who was hesitating to return to the street from the hole he created earlier, used transmutation close to the hole and opened another hole in the drainage passage after recalling the arrangement of the buildings on the surface. Thus, while holding the small child wrapped in a blanket he took out from the “Treasure Box,” they began to move.



Red sparks suddenly appeared in a certain back alley, and a hole opened on the ground. The ones who jumped out from there were Shia and Hajime carrying a small child with him. Hajime used transmutation to close the hole and he shifted his gaze back towards the child he was holding.



From the child’s stature, he or she should be around 3 or 4 years old. With long emerald green hair, and though the child was dirty, it didn’t change her lovely features. The child should be a girl. However, the most eye catching thing were her ears. Unlike humans, her ears were fan-like fins. In addition, what peeked out from inside the blanket were maple-like small hand, and a folded thin film attached in between her fingers.



“Looks like this child came from Sea-dweller tribe… Just why is she in such a place…”



“Well, I am certain it wasn’t for a good reason.”



The Sea-dweller tribe was a tribe with considerably special position even among the demi-human races. They lived in «Seaside Town of Elisen», located offshore of the sea right beside «Great Dessert Guryuu-en» in the west of the continent. Using their special characteristic, the tribe caught 80% of the marine products that appeared in the market in this continent. It was the reason why they were publicly protected by Herrlicht Kingdom even though they are demi-human race. In the end, it was all about the money, since they were protected because they could be used even while the discrimination continued.



That was why it was unbelievable for a person of the Sea-dweller’s tribe, who were being protected, to be washed away in the drainage of an inland’s big city, even more so when it was a child. The smell of crime was intense.



As they were thinking of the girl from the Sea-dweller’s tribe, her nose twitched, her eyes opened and blinked. Then, the big, circle pupils, began to stare at Hajime. Hajime, whose gaze somehow met hers, didn’t look away and stared back. With the unknown tension floating around, Shia, who seem to know something, approached her with an amazed expression. Suddenly, the stomach of the girl from the Sea-dweller’s tribe let out a cute growling sound. With her nose twitching again, she moved her gaze from Hajime and her eyes locked on the wrappers Shia bought from the stalls.



‘These?’ Shia thought as she tilted her head and moved the wrappings with skewered meats inside from right to left. Just like magnet, the girl’s gaze followed. Apparently, she was quite hungry. Shia tried to take out the skewered meats from the wrapping while Hajime began talking to the girl while transmuting.



“Okay, what’s your name?”



The girl whose eyes were captivated by the skewered meats Shia was holding was surprised and ducked her body when bright sparks suddenly appeared from the ground followed by a floating square box. Hajime asked her name once more, and after her gazed wandered around for a while, she said her name in small whisper.



“… Myuu.”



“I see. I am Hajime, and this is Shia. Then, Myuu, if you want to eat the skewered meat, first wash off the dirt from your body.”



Hajime took out clean water he saved inside the “Treasure Box,” and filled the bathtub he just transmuted. In addition, he adjusted the water temperature using a flame ore and the improvised bath was completed. It is very dangerous eat a meal with a body dirtied by drainage. Because she seemed to have drank the drainage water, it was necessary to take detoxifying and bactericidal medicines (marketed commodities).



Not long afterwards, Myuu responded by taking off the blanket along with her clothes dirtied by the drainage, and entered the bathtub. “Ekk!,” though her body was cringed as though she was frightened, she then narrowed her eyes when her body gradually got warmed up. Hajime handed the medicines and towel to Shia, passed the soap to Myuu, and he went out to the back alley to buy Myuu some clothing.



When Hajime returned from the back alley after purchasing Myuu’s clothing, Myuu had already gotten out of the bathtub and was currently being held by Shia, wrapped in a new blanket. While Shia was holding on to Myuu, she said “Ahh,” as she peeled off pieces of meat and fed it to Myuu’s small mouth — chewing to the utmost. Her dirtied hair regained its emerald green shine, and the reflected light created a halo around her head.



“Ah, Hajime-san. Welcome back. Although it’s amateur judgement, there’s no problem with Myuu-chan.”



When Shia noticed Hajime’s return, she reported while continuously stroking Myuu’s moist hair. Maybe because she also noticed Hajime’s presence, she began to stare at him again while still chewing. She might be judging whether he was a good or bad person.



Hajime responded to Shia’s words by nodding, and took out the clothes he bought. It was a milk-white, feminine one piece dress, one that looked similar to the one Shia was wearing. In addition, there was a gladiator sandal-like footwear, and underwear. Because the items were for children, he was worried about the shop clerk’s eyes when he bought them.



Hajime walked towards Myuu, took off the blanket, and put on the one piece dress over her head, quickly followed by the underwear. He knelt before Myuu and put the sandals on each foot. In addition, he took out an artifact that lets out warm air — in other words, a blow dryer — from the “Treasure Box,” and dried Myuu’s moist hair. Myuu stood completely still but although she continued to stare at Hajime, she gradually narrowed her eyes when pleasant warm air blew.



“… What can I say. Looks like Hajime-san is good at taking care of others.”



“What are you saying out of the blue…”



Although Hajime frowned at Shia’s words while he was still drying Myuu’s hair, his appearance was the evidence he was good at taking care of others, so Shia’s cheeks loosened with a smile. Hajime somehow felt embarrassed and averted the topic.



“Well, about what to do…”



“About what we should do with Myuu-chan, right…”



Because she understood the two were talking about her, Myuu alternately looked up between Shia and Hajime.



For now, Hajime and Shia decided to hear Myuu’s situation.



As a result, the content Myuu spoke of with her faltering voice was almost exactly what Hajime had expected. On a certain day, she got lost while she was swimming with her mother in a nearby coastline, and while she was wandering around, she was suddenly captured by a man from the human race.



After many harsh days had passed, she was transported quite a distance to Fhuren, and was then put in a dim, prison-like place. Inside the place, there were a lot of children of the human race. After she spent who knows how many days inside, several children who were with her were taken out on a daily basis but never returned. A slightly older boy said they were going to be displayed to guests and priced.



When it was finally Myuu’s turn, there was by chance a drainage maintenance that day, so the hole leading to the underground waterway was open. Myuu, who heard the nostalgic sound of the water, immediately jumped inside. Usually, there was nothing a 3 or 4 year old could do because the hurdle was too high, but fortunately, she wasn’t handcuffed. Myuu swam with all her might while enduring the unpleasantness of the filthy sewage. Though she was young, she was a child of the Sea-dweller’s tribe. The men could do nothing but run on the passageway to try and catch her, but failed to do so while she rode the current.



However, because she wasn’t accustomed to long travels, coupled by the stress of getting kidnapped, the unpalatable food, and the bad environment where she was soaked inside the drainage for a long time, Myuu finally lost her consciousness when she reached both her physical and mental limits. Her consciousness faintly returned thanks to being wrapped in a warm back, and she noticed she was being held by Hajime.



“The guests set the… price. An auction, huh. For children ranging from the human race and Sea-dweller’s tribe to be there, it should be an underground auction.”



“… Hajime-san, what should we do?”



Shia, who looked distressed, embraced Myuu closely. Her eyes were clearing expressing she wanted to do something about it. It was normal for the demi-human race to be captured and turned into slaves. Shia who was deprived of her family because of it, understood the fear and pain.



However, Hajime shook his head.



“It should be better to entrust her to the security office.”



“That’s… you’re going to abandon this child and the other children…”



When Shia heard Hajime’s words, she gritted her teeth. She closely embraced Myuu as she received the shock and looked at Hajime. What Hajime meant as security office was an organization similar to the police force on Earth. By entrusting her to the government-like facility, Myuu could be separated from them. Although it wasn’t an abandonment but a regular procedure of finding lost children, Shia didn’t think so.



Hajime tried to explain it to Shia in an easy-to-understand manner.



“You know, Shia. It is the natural thing to send the lost children you find to the security office. Even more so when Myuu is a child of the Sea-dweller tribe. She will surely be protected by them. In addition, to auction someone from Sea-dweller tribe is a great problem. They will investigate it and the other children will be saved. Isn’t that enough? Though I’m just guessing, this is probably the dark side of this big city. When Myuu was caught, she would surely placed in a location where the public officials couldn’t get their hands there. In other words, this is Fhuren’s problem. That’s why, isn’t it necessary to report it?… Considering your circumstance, I understand your feelings of wanting to do something, but…”



“Th-That… that is true… But, at the very least can we be the one who take this child? After all, we are going to the sea in the west…”



“Haa~, listen. We are going to the Great Volcano first. Don’t tell me, are you going to take her along to the dungeon? Or, are you going to tell her to wait in the desert alone? In the first place, we will be considered as the kidnapper’s comrade if we take the kidnapped child of Sea-dweller tribe without permission. So, don’t say anything unreasonable like this.”



“… Uuh, I understand…”



Apparently, in just a short time, Shia had come to adore Myuu. Maybe because she read the mood regarding her situation, Myuu clung onto Shia tightly. Myuu seemed to like Shia as well, and felt the need to resist parting from her.



However, what Hajime had suggested was the right thing, so Shia could only nod and droop her shoulders. Hajime bowed to match Myuu’s gaze, and began to explain in a way Myuu could understand him.



“Listen, Myuu, we are going to bring you to people who will protect you. Though it might take time, you will surely be returned to the sea in the west.”



“…What about Onii-chan and Onee-chan?” Myuu asked what the two were going to do with an uneasy tone.



“I am sorry but, it will be a goodbye.”



“No!”



“Wait, it shouldn’t be—”



“No!”



“…”



“Myuu is okay with Onii-chan and Onee-chan! Myuu want to be together!”



Hajime flinched because of the strong rejection. Myuu began to flail around on Shia’s lap, just like a spoiled child. Until now, they thought of her as a quiet child, but that apparently was because she was still trying to ascertain Hajime’s and Shia’s character. Maybe because she judged them to be people she could trust, she acted spoiled. However, she might still be an originally quiet and a bright child.



Hajime didn’t feel bad to be trusted by her, but it was necessary to report the situation to the official, and they could not take Myuu along as they were going to conquer one of the Great Dungeons, «Great Volcano» on their way. Even so, “No— —!!,” Myuu rejected with all her might, so he gave up on persuading her, and just took her in his arms to bring her to the security office.



Because Myuu didn’t want to separate from the people she met miraculously and could actually trust, she strongly pulled Hajime’s hair, eye-patch, and scratched his cheeks on the way to the security office as a form of resistance. If not for Shia smiling courtesy beside him, Hajime would have likely been reported as a kidnapper. With his hair in a mess, one eye shut because his eye-patch was removed, and the scratches on his cheeks, Hajime arrived at the security office and explained the circumstances to the pop-eyed security personnel.



The expression of the security member who heard the circumstances steepened, and promised to protect Myuu inside the security office, together with the investigation and procedure to bring Myuu back to her home. Just as Hajime had expected, it was a big problem, and he wanted to excuse himself since the reinforcement should arrive immediately from their headquarters. However…



“Does Onii-chan hate Myuu?” Said by the little girl with moistened eyes together with an upward gaze, no sane person would be able to endure it, including Hajime. “Uh.” He groaned. Although he perseveringly explained she would be able to return home if she was with the security uncle, Myuu’s sorrowful expression didn’t let up in the slightest.



The security member couldn’t endure it any longer, somewhat forcefully separated Myuu from Hajime’s party while he was trying to calm her, and Myuu pulled the man’s hair while letting out a sad voice. Hajime and Shia had finally left the security office, but naturally, they didn’t feel like continuing their date. Shia’s eyebrows were wrinkling in worry while she kept looking back at the security office.



Before long, the security office was no longer in sight, and Hajime wanted to say something to make the depress Shia feel better in a place considerably far away from the office. But at that time…



BooOOooMm!!!!!



An explosion occurred behind them, and black smoke could be seen. The location was,



“Ha-Hajime-san. Over there is…”



“Tch, the security office!”



That’s right. The place the black smoke was coming from was the security office where they were before. The two nodded at each other, and ran back towards the security office. The worse thing that could happen with such timing entered their minds. The organization which kidnapped Myuu blasted the security office along with Myuu to prevent information leakage.



Suppressing their impatience, they reached the security office. What entered their view were the spectacle of windows’ glasses along with the door of the office blown and scattered into the street. However, the building itself didn’t that damaged, so there’s no worry of it collapsing. Hajime and Shia entered the building and they discovered the uncle from security collapsed under a cover.



The security officer had both his arms broken, and was unconscious. Similar thing happened to the other security members. Fortunately, there was no life-threatening injury. While Hajime was looking at the security members, Shia went to investigate other places, and returned with a hurried look.



“Hajime-san! I can’t find Myuu-chan! Beside th-this!” What Shia handed over was a sheet of paper with something written on it.



“If you don’t want the child of Sea-dweller tribe to die, come to ___ ___ with the white-haired girl from Rabbit-man tribe.”



“Hajime-san, this is…”



“Looks like these guys are greedy ones…”



Hajime crumpled the paper in his hand and revealed a savage smile. Those guys probably heard the conversation between Myuu and Hajime’s party’s in the security office by some means. Afterwards, they judged Myuu was useful as a hostage, and they didn’t kill her to silence her because of the thought of obtaining a rare Rabbit-man.



Beside Hajime, was Shia who wore a resolute expression.



“Hajime-san! I-!”



“Say no more. I know it now. These guys are my enemies… No more tedious talk, we will crush them all and take Myuu back.”



“Yes!”



Truthfully, Hajime thought it would be better to quickly separate from Myuu because he didn’t want her to have to accompany them to such a dangerous journey. After all, Myuu would only have painful times if they unskillfully gave affection to a mentally cornered child. However, he could not leave her when she has been kidnapped for the second time. There was time, and there was something he could do. So to leave such a small child while she’s in a predicament would surely be “a lonely way of life.” In addition, if he decided to abandon her with the reason of her being unrelated to them, Shia would surely grieved about it.



Furthermore, the other party was also trying to get their hands on Shia. To want to covet Hajime’s “important” person, they are considered as “enemies.” There was no need to pardon them or hold back. These guys had crossed the line not meant to be crossed.



Hajime and Shia readied their arms, and the monsters quickly ran towards the location of the fools who had woken them up.



* * *



“And that’s happened. When we arrived at the specified location, there were a crowd of armed thugs, but Myuu herself wasn’t there. From the very beginning, they probably thought of killing me and take Shia. For the time being, we massacred everyone except several of them since we wanted to ask Myuu’s whereabouts… but they didn’t know anything. I tortured the others to find where their hideout is… and the same thing happened.”



“Not only me, they were also planning to kidnap Yue-san and Tio-san. That’s why this time, we decided to give them a warning by crushing all of the things related to their organization…”



Yue and Tio, who heard Hajime and Shia’s explanation as they moved. With an amazed expressions towards their constitution towards trouble, wondered how the normal date could have turned into something involving the underground organization of this big city.



“… So, we just need to look for a child called Myuu?”



“Yep. What I found from the questioning, was they are a considerably large organization… so there are a lot of facilities related to them. Will you help us?”



“Nn… leave it to me.”



“Hmm. This one will certainly do it if it’s something asked by Master.”



Yue and Tio unhesitatingly answered. Hajime told them what he found out in regards to the whereabouts of the underground organization’s hideouts. They then proceeded to search for Myuu and crush the organization in groups of two consisting Hajime-Yue and Shia-Tio. Hajime and Shia went separate ways because they thought it would be better to have someone acquainted to Myuu when they find her.



* * *



Nearby the outer wall of Commercial Ward, there was a place separated from Sightseeing and Craftsman Wards. It was a place where the government’s eyes couldn’t reach; a complete underworld, the dark side of this big city. It was dim despite it being daytime, and the people walked with gloomy atmosphere.



In the corner of the place, there was a seven story building. Although it was an employment agency on the surface, it was actually the headquarters of the biggest underground organization specializing in “people” trafficking, “Flithof.” Normally, the headquarters has an eerily and quiet atmosphere, but now, it was noisy with people wandering around. The expressions of the thug-like subordinates who served as messengers were perplexed and irritated, which then warped into fear.



Among tens of people that were always going in and out, two people clad in robes from head to toe slipped in during the confusion, and infiltrated Flithof’s headquarters without much difficulty. They advanced while avoiding people who were running around, and finally arriving before a conspicuous room at the highest floor. A man’s hoarse yell reverberated into the corridor through the door. Hearing him, the robed people quietly removed their hoods and moved stealthily.



“Stop fucking around around! Ah!? Say it again, you bastard!”



“Hii! L-like I reported before, the number of destroyed hideouts has exceeded 50. The attackers were two groups of a pair.”



“Then, what’s wrong with that? Are you saying Flithof will be destroyed by four shitty bastards? Aa?”



“Th-that’s not i— hmph!?”



Inside the room, when they thinking the yell had stopped, something let out thud! sound and silence ruled for a moment. Apparently, the man who was reporting was knocked down by the yelling man.



“You guys, no matter how you do it, bring back those shitty bastards before me, alive. I don’t care what state they are in as long as they are alive. If this keeps up, Flithof’s reputation will be ruined. That’s why I am going to let those bastards see hell while they are alive. It is necessary to show a warning to the others. I will reward the guy who can bring them here with five million Ruta! Five millions each! Tell this to all of the members of the organization!”



Because of the instructions of the man, the room became hectic. Just like what the man had instructed, all the members inside the room left to deliver the message to all of the members in the organization. The two eavesdroppers put their hoods on, looked at each other, nodded once. One of them took out a war-hammer on her back and took a pose.



The moment the person inside placed his hand on the door knob, the super-heavy war-hammer was swung with considerably centrifugal and gravitational force.



BaaaANNgG!!!



With a thunderous sound, the door was crushed into pieces. The man who was holding onto the doorknob had his right half crushed. In addition, the people behind him had their whole bodies pierced by the splinters, and were instantly had wounds them they were blown to the other side of the wall.



“There’s no need to inform your employees. The people in question have come.”



“Hmmm, this one will be responsible for people on the outside. Shia, finish this quickly, okay?”



“Thank you very much, Tio-san.”



The people who cultivated the tragedy and casually entered the room were Shia and Tio. Realizing the door had suddenly burst into pieces, and how his subordinates were blown away to the wall across the room; both done so effortlessly, the head of Flithof, Hansen, stiffened and stared wide-eyed. He regained his senses when he heard Shia’s and Tio’s voices. He then quickly took out his weapon and spoke like a Yakuza.



“…Ya bastards are the assailants, huh… That figures… Tch, ain’t ya da ones from da list. Shia and Tio was it? Da other one is the lil’ one, Yue… Indeed y’all’s appearances are first rate. Oi, y’all’s lives will be saved if ya surrender now, y’know? Don’t tell me, ya think ya can return alive after putting ur hands on Flithof’s headquart—!?” Swiiiish “UGYAAAA!!!”



Hansen, who began to speak while looking at Shia and Tio with lust, was coldly cut off by Shia, who fired the shotgun, since there was no need for discussion. The numerous iron balls blew off Hansen’s right arm, which spun and crashed into the wall behind, while guy himself screamed and crouched.



Though the organization members who heard the commotion came running, Tio used fire magic to burn the stairs and they could only stand still because they lost the only way up. Furthermore, she used the scaled-down version of “Breath,” casually mowing them down, and everything on seventh floor turned completely charred except Hansen’s room. With that, there was an unobstructed view of the Flithof’s headquarters. Tio fired Wind Blades and Fire Bullets, just like a machine gun, towards the organization members who could do nothing but vacantly look up at the upper floor. Because of the merciless attacks, the organization members tried to disperse and scattered about in escape… but only few survived.



While Tio handled the people outside, Shia shouldered Doryukken, approached the screaming and writhing Hansen, and pushed Doryukken to his abdomen. “Guwaa,” he let out sounds of agony as he tried to move the sledgehammer away, but his right hand was useless against the super heavy Doryukken. The only thing Hansen could do was ungracefully pleaded for his life.



“P-Please. Spare me! You can take as much money as you like! I don’t want to be involved with you anymore! That is wh— Gekk!?”



“Please don’t speak without permission. You only have to answer my question, understand? If you don’t, the weight will increase every second… so I recommend you answer everything before your organs burst.”



“… Shia. Thou art Master’s companion after all… Thy speech and behavior are the same.”



Tio, who retorted from behind, was ignored, and Shia asked Hansen about Myuu. When she mentioned Myuu, Hansen showed a dumbfounded expression for a moment. But when she asked about a child from the Sea-dweller tribe, he frantically answered with an anguished expression because Doryukken getting heavier by the second. Apparently, she had been transported to the basement of a hall where the underground auction would occur this evening.



Hansen’s subordinates, who probably heard the conversation between Shia’s party and Myuu, were the ones who planned on kidnapping Shia. They probably thought that by kidnapping her, they could raise their position inside the organization since she was already in the organization’s list to be kidnapped.



Shia touched the telepathy stone on her choker, activated it, and contacted Hajime.



“Hajime-san, Hajime-san. Can you hear me? It’s me, Shia.”



“…Shia. Yes, I can hear you. What’s wrong?”



“I just got the information on Myuu-chan’s whereabouts. Hajime-san is currently in Sightseeing Ward, right? Please go ahead because it’s around there.”



“Roger.”



Shia told Hajime the exact location using telepathy. Because of Doryukken’s weight, Hansen’s complexion had turned blue due to being unable to breathe. Shia deactivated the gravity magic in Doryukken, pulled the normal weighted Doryukken from Hansen and shouldered it. Though he was released from Doryukken’s weight, Hansen’s consciousness began to faint because of hemorrhage, and desperately asked for Shia’s help.



“H-Help me… Take me to the doctor…”



“It’s too convenient for you to use children’s lives as food source… In addition, Hajime-san and Yue-san will be angry at me if I let a human like you escape. That’s why, goodbye.”



“S-Stop!”



Splatter!



Shia shook Doryukken that was swung mightily, to brush off the blood stuck on it, put it on her back, and faced Tio.



“Tio-san. Let’s quickly crush this place and meet with Hajime-san and Yue-san!”



“Whoa… Shia is also merciless, huh… It made this one throbbed slightly…”



“?… Did you just say something?”



“N-Nothing at all.”



The words Tio said in a whisper somehow made Shia feel a chill. Although when she asked Tio, there was nothing but her strange feverish expression, so Shia tilted her head as they continued to diligently destroy the Flithof’s headquarters.



When Shia and Tio left, what remained was numerous corpses and a mountain of rubble. “Flithof” in Fhuren was one of the three biggest underground organizations, and today, it was easily a annihilated.





Volume 7 Chapter 9




After receiving the telepathy from Shia, Hajime and Yue rushed towards the informed location. Being sent to the auction, there was no need to worry about Myuu’s life, but she must have quite the mental burden. Either way, they must rescue her quickly.



When they arrived at their destination, two huge men dressed in black was standing at the entrance. Thinking Myuu would be transported somewhere else if he made a commotion, Hajime moved to a back alley and used transmutation to infiltrate from the basement.



Accompanied by Yue, they moved quickly while using sign interception. It was truly a shame that there was no cardboard. As long as they have it, there would be no need to use sign interception skill…



Before long, numerous cages could be seen deep inside the basement. The only person who guarded the entrance was sleeping. They passed by the guard, and found around ten of human children inside who were cowering from the cold stone floor. Nine out of ten of these children were to be auctioned today.



In truth, because most humans were believer of Church of the Saints, it was forbidden to sell or turn humans into slaves. Even so, criminals among human race could become trade goods. It was okay to sell or enslave those who betrayed God. However, the trembling children before their eyes couldn’t have possibly fall into such circumstances where they turned into criminals. To begin with, human who turned into slaves with regular procedures would not be sent to an auction. As such, they have been captured and to be sold illegally.



Hajime went over to the cage and met the gazes of the the children who were frightened by the silhouette that appeared all of a sudden. He then asked them in a calm voice.



“Was there a child from Sea-dweller tribe here?”



The frightened children must have thought it was their turn to be sold, so they looked at each other, puzzled by the unexpected question. Myuu’s figure was not inside the cage, that’s why Hajime he asked the children. He wondered whether there was another jail or she had already been taken out.



The children stayed silent for a while, but when Yue squatted down beside Hajime, looked at them with gentle eyes, and muttered, “… It’s okay.”



They looked slightly at ease, and one of boy with age of around seven to eight years old timidly answered Hajime’s question.



“That’s, the child from Sea-dweller tribe was taken a while ago… Onii-san, Onee-san, who are you?”



It was as he expected, she had already been taken out. Hajime inwardly clicked his tongue and answered the uneasy boy simply.



“We’ve come to rescue you.”



“Eh!? You are going to rescue us!?”



Hajime’s words made the boy inadvertently shout, and raised an astonished and joyed look. His voice resounded well inside the dim basement jail. Although the boy panickedly covered his mouth, the guard heard him, shouted, “What’s with the commotion!?” as he woke up and trotted into the basement jail.



Thus, he found Hajime’s party and stiffened for a moment before shouting, “Who are you bastards!?,” pulled a dagger and attacked them. The children screamed as they imagine visions of Hajime and Yue collapsing after being stabbed.



However, it was something impossible for it to happen. Hajime casually gripped the thrusted dagger with his left hand, put his strength into it, and crushed the blade. Hajime opened his palm and dropped the blade’s fragments. The guard could not register what happened, he was dumbfounded for a moment, and cast his gaze down to the dagger on his hand, but he could only see the handle. Finally understanding what happened, the man turned pale and backed away while uttering, “Wh-Wh-.”



Hajime immediately grabbed the man’s head and threw him into the ground.



SQUIIIISH!



The man immediately died, accompanied with a raw sound.



“A guard should first ring the alarm.”



Saying such a thing with an amazed expression, Hajime who instantly killed the guard made the children pop-eyed in surprise. Without minding their gazes, Hajime used transmutation to disassemble the iron bars. In the children’s eyes, they saw the iron bars disappeared in an instant which made them stiffened, and their mouths were wide open with surprise.



“Sorry, Yue, but can I entrust them to you? Looks like I can’t do anything but rampage now.”



“Nn… leave them to me.”



“The security officers should arrives soon, too, so it’s okay to leave the children to them. The branch head, Ilwa will help us, too… Let’s leave the details to him.”



Yue was watching from a distance with a somewhat sympathized look. It was directed to the Guild Branch’s Head. Actually, before they came here, they had caught a suitable Adventurer to deliver the telepathy stone to Ilwa, since they thought to explain the situation to him. Status plate with “Gold”-rank was useful in such a time. Because after seeing Hajime’s color, the Adventurer stiffened for a moment and his attitude turned into a formal one… It was similar to how the Japanese greeted a Hollywood Star who came to the town. He even saluted as he agreed to listen to his request.



Incidentally, because telepathy stone could not be activated from Ilwa’s side, he was made to hear the report one-sidedly; about how they got in a fight against a huge underground organization, and that Hajime left the post-treatment to him which made his face turned white in his office.



Hajime once again transmuted a passage from the oubliette to the surface, entrusted the children to Yue, and quickly went towards the auction hall. At the same time, the boy from before called Hajime to a stop.



“Nii-chan! Thank you for helping us! You can definitely save that girl too! She was truly frightened. Even I couldn’t do anything…”



Apparently, this boy didn’t care Myuu was a demi-human, and seemed to have tried to encourage her. He was quite the spirited boy, though he himself was caught. Hajime patted the head of the boy who felt bitter from his powerlessness.



“Wah, wh-what is it?”



“Well, if you feel it was mortifying, then you only have to become stronger. Rather, there’s nothing but to do that. This time is my turn, but next time it’s your turn if something comes up.”



After saying so, Hajime quickly turned his heels and went out of the oubliette. The boy held his patted head in blank surprise, had sparkling eyes in next moment, and clenched his fists with a slightly manly face. Yue gazed at the boy with pleased gaze and took the children to the surface.



* * *



The auction hall was wrapped in its own bizarre atmosphere.



The guests in the hall were around 100 people. All of them were wearing queer masks, and no one was making any noise. They only quietly raised placards with numbers when the merchandise they want was up for auction. They hesitated to speak because they didn’t want to be identified.



Even those guest who were carefully trying not to let any sound out, involuntarily raised their voices when “that” merchandise came out.



What appeared was a little girl from Sea-dweller tribe inside a square water tank with a distance of two meters in all directions. She was stripped off her clothes, naked, and she shrunk her body as she held onto her knees in the corner of the water tank. Sea-dweller tribe could breathe inside water. It was the reason why she was put inside the water tank, to prove she was a genuine Sea-dweller. And maybe because she had escaped once, metallic shackles were put on her limbs. It was such a cruel sight for such small limbs.



The numerous gazes that frightened Myuu narrowed and began to compete. Her price went up at a ferocious pace. It was a one time thing, so they probably thought they would be able to buy and hid the Sea-dweller. It was possibly because they had yet to know the commotions that occurred in the daytime.



The noisy hall made Myuu shrink more and more, while clenching her hand that held a black cloth. It was Hajime’s eyepatch. When they tried to separate from Myuu, they were too busy trying to calm Myuu down and it was forgotten. Hajime remembered it later, and he wore a spare eyepatch.



Hajime’s eyepatch had became Myuu’s small support. Being separated from her mother, forced to go through harsh travel, being put inside dark cage, soaked in the sewage, and she desperately ran away. When she thought it was the end, she was wrapped by something warm. She woke up due to a nice smell, and before her was a white-haired boy that wore the black cloth in one of his eyes. She quietly watched him in surprise, and when she tried to look away, he somehow turned to watch her. Myuu also became somewhat obstinate and returned his gaze, when a delicious smell she missed tickled her nose.



Afterwards, she answered when he asked her for her name, and when she saw beautiful red lights being emitted, she was put inside a warm bath. Then, a rabbit eared big sister with similar hair color as the boy — though there were some blue hues — washed her body. Unbeknownst to her, she called the big sister who introduced herself as Shia with “Onee-chan,” due to the pleasant feeling from the warm bath and gentle washing.



Being held, sitting on her lap, while being able to eat the delicious meats, Myuu would surely not forget this throughout her life. She was absorbed in being fed, and unbeknownst to her, the boy called Hajime had returned. Although she became slightly cautious, her cautiousness completely dissipated when he took out a lovely clothing, politely dressed her, and blowed her hair dry with warm and comfortable wind.



That’s why she was very sad when she heard they would be separated because it was necessary to entrust her to the security office. After being separated from her mother while enduring the solitude and fear for a long time, Myuu didn’t want to be separated from the gentle Onii-chan and Onee-chan she met in this faraway place. She wouldn’t be able to endure being alone again.



Therefore, Myuu protested with all of her might. She pulled Hajime’s hair, scratched his cheeks for so many times, and took the black cloth attached to his eye. She repeatedly said, Myuu wants to stay together! However, the Onii-chan and Onee-chan could not stay with Myuu and as the result, Myuu was left behind.



Myuu thought as her body shrunk more while thinking. As expected, am I left behind because I will be a pain? Are they mad because I took off this black cloth? Am I hated by Onii-chan and Onee-chan? She was very sad, and tears fell from her eyes. If I can meet them once again, I want to apologize for being a pain. I will return this black cloth, and this time… I want us to somehow stay together.



“Onii-chan… Onee-chan…” Myuu muttered when suddenly, the water tank let out a loud sound because of an impact.



“Eeek!,” Myuu became frightened, looked at the surrounding, and she frowned. There was a masked-man in tuxedo nearby, and she noticed him shouting something as he repeatedly kicked the water tank. Apparently, he wanted to let the guests see her swim to further increase her price, and he kicked the water tank because he thought the unmoving Myuu was sleeping.



However, Myuu became even more frightened, further shrunk her body and didn’t move at all. Shrinking her body while strongly clenching onto Hajime’s eyepatch as she endured the impact sound and the shaking water tank.



The man who was the host of the underground auction and member of Flithof feared the unmoving Myuu was sick, which would drop her price, so he told a man to bring a rod. It was to be directly thrusted at her to forced her to move. He unintentionally cursed, and became impatient due to the noises made by the guests.



“Good grief, what an irritating brat. Don’t you trouble a human like me. You dimwitted blockhead!” The host climbed the stepladder, and tried to thrust the rod at Myuu. Myuu shut her eyes tightly and prepared for the impact.



However, instead of the impact… what reached her was the voice of a person she wanted to hear the most.



“I will return those words back at you, okay? You shitty bastard.”



In the next moment, a shadow fell, fluttered from the ceiling, and trampled the host’s head who was crushed along with the stepladder when it fell because of the momentum. Splash! Blood splattered from the host as though he had exploded. He was literally crushed to death.



The shadow, Hajime, who appeared with such an impact, didn’t even glance at the collapsed man, and hit the water tank with his artificial arm. Smash! The water tank was destroyed, accompanied with sound of something being crushed.



“Eeep!” Myuu was thrown outside along with the flowing water, and she screamed unintentionally.



Myuu was immediately caught by something warm, and she timidly opened her eyes. There was the person she wanted to meet, the one she helplessly expected to come when she heard his voice… He was certainly here. She was held by him. Myuu blinked and quietly watched Hajime just like the first time they met.



“Hey, Myuu. You, why are you always sopping wet when we meet?”



Hajime said jokingly, and quietly watched Myuu. She then asked him in a whisper.



“… Onii-chan?”



“I don’t know who is this Onii-chan is, but Hajime-san whose hair you pulled, cheeks you scratched, and eyepatch you took is certainly me.”



Hajime answered with a wry smile, and Myuu’s round pupil moistened. Following that…



“Onii-chan!!!”



She clung onto Hajime’s neck tightly and began to sob. Hajime had a troubled expression, and patted Myuu’s back. Afterwards, he agilely wrapped her in blanket.



And the two, Hajime and Myuu, who reunited once again near the water, were surrounded by men in black clothing who hurriedly rushed in. On the guests’ seats, there was a commotion and they wondered why Hajime didn’t immediately run away. However, even now, he didn’t look like he want to run away.



“Brat, looks like you aren’t that bright to lay your hands against Flithof. Leave that merchandise and I will give you a nice death, kay?”



Being surrounded by 20 strong looking men, Myuu raised her face from Hajime’s neck and looked up at him with uneasiness. Hajime draw his face closer to Myuu’s ear and whispered, It’ll be troublesome so close your ears and shut your eyes, and he placed Myuu’s small hand to close her ear. Even though Myuu wondered why, she nodded, and she felt at ease because Hajime had a calm attitude without any impatience or anxiety. She obediently used her hands to cover her ears, closed her eyes, and she buried her face in Hajime’s chest.



Veins popped on the forehead of the men in black when they were completely ignored, and shouted loudly, Don’t hurt the merchandise! And kill the brat! At the same time,



BOooOOoM!!!



With a dry explosive sound, the head of the leader of the men in black burst. Everyone let out an “Eh?,” and became pop-eyed without being able to understand anything. They could only watch the man in black collapse with his brain matter scattered from the back of his head. Using that chance, Hajime further fired in succession. While everyone was stiffened due to not knowing what had happened, the sound of rapid-fire rang out, and when they regained their senses, the number of the corpse who had their head burst totaled to 12.



At that time, they finally noticed the boy before them was nothing ordinary, and the black-clothed men backed away while the guests began to flood the exits, screaming.



“Y-You, what are you! What, how… this—!”



Confused and trying to fight his fear, one of the men in black frantically acted brave by raising his voice. Ten more people came from the interior and flinched when they saw the disastrous scene in the hall.



Seeing them, Hajime snorted.



“Why you ask? Don’t you understand just by seeing me? I come here to take back the thing you took from me. Next… is only a warning from me. This will happen to those who takes something from me. That’s why, shall I make the ending a flashy one?”



Hajime said so and used “Aerodynamic” to go up to the ceiling of the hall and unbeknownst to others, he jumped outside from the hole and reached the roof.



“Yue. Myuu was safely secured. How’s the thing on your end?”



“… Nn, they have reached the shelter. The final will be after all the guests came out.”



“I see, then let’s make the Finale a flashy one.”



“Nn!”



Hajime used “Aerodynamic,” jumping further into the sky. Then, he spoke to Myuu who faithfully closed her ears and buried her face into Hajime’s chest. She blinked and looked at the surrounding when Hajime said, “It is okay now, Myuu,” and… “Fuwah!?,” she said with a surprised voice.



It couldn’t be helped because when she opened her eyes, she was in the sky where she could see every part of the town. On the other side, the setting sun that seemed to be blazing, dying the evening sky in red. Above the ground were the man-made lights glittering, creating a beautiful illumination. Myuu’s eyes sparkled seeing the magnificent spectacle for the first time and she held Hajime’s chest while saying, Kyaa.



“Onii-chan is amazing! Onii-chan can fly in the sky!”



“Not fly, I just jump—… well whatever. More importantly, I will let Myuu watch some flashy fireworks now, okay?”



“Fireworks?”



“Fireworks is… something like explosion.”



“Explosion?”



Though he could not give a good explanation, Hajime didn’t mind it since the thing he need to do was still the same. While he holding Myuu with his right arm, he used “Aerodynamic” to stay in the sky, and took out a ring from “Treasure Box.” It was a remote detonator of the bomb made with “Induction Stone.” In fact, he had scattered the bombs into suitable locations while looking for Myuu.



“Well then, time to start. Ta~ma~ya~.”



“Ta~ma~ya~?”



The moment Hajime and Myuu’s voice resounded in the evening sky, tremendous roars rang the entirety of Fhuren and horrendous impact ran through buildings related to Flithof. Even the museum used as the underground auction hall where, Historical building? Work of arts? Are those delicious?, was said to be crushed to bits. Flames burst out into the sky along with the tremendous explosions. The surrounding buildings and the sky were dyed in red by something other than the evening sun.



“Eeeeh!?”



“What do you think, Myuu? Were you surprised?”



“Fireworks, scary.”



Myuu trembled because of the grand explosions, and frantically clung to Hajime.When it came down to the final blow, dark clouds suddenly began to shroud the sky slightly away from them. Following that, four “Thunder Dragons” appeared accompanied with thundering howls. The number had increased though their sizes were half from when there was only one.



The four “Thunder Dragons” Yue created scattered into different directions of the blazing red evening sky. Almost all of the people in Fhuren witnessed their majestic forms. The four Thunder Dragons let our thundering roars and “fell” at the same time onto four of Flithof’s important bases that were left behind. Their lightnings dyed the surrounding sky, and the roaring sound of collapsing building resounded within Fhuren. With bursting flames and the scattered dust, the sunset in Fhuren in addition to being dyed in red by flames was just like a town in a war-time after an air raid.



Incidentally, the common people unrelated to this event were unharmed. He had confirmed there was no one around unrelated to Flithof by using Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes into the related facilities and the buildings’ circumferences. The people who were blown off and turned to cinders were only those related to Flithof. Their identities, however, were unidentifiable.



“Hajime-san! Is Myuu-chan okay!?”



“Wa-wait Shia. Eh, that’s too fast!”



While he and Myuu was looking at the raising flames and smokes, a telepathy came from Shia. Since Hajime didn’t let Shia in on the details of what he was going to do, she was surprised by the explosions and the “Thunder Dragon”s, so she asked while panicking.



“It’s okay. She is safe. Looks like… those bastards’ bases are all destroyed. Perhaps we should meet at the branch head, Ilwa’s place though he might be screaming right now.”



“Ha~, thank god~. Branch head’s place, is it? Roger. I will immediately go there so please come quickly with Myuu-chan, okay?”



“Ah, okay. Then, see you there.”



“Yes.”



Because Hajime was suddenly looking at the distance in silent, Myuu looked at him in wonder. When Hajime said, “We will meet with Onee-chan soon, okay?,” Myuu smiled happily while saying, “Onee-chan!”.



Hajime, who descended to the surface, met up with Yue who had entrusted the children to the securities. She quietly watched Myuu who was held by Hajime. Myuu restlessly looking around, and then looked up at Hajime. Her eyes were saying, “Who is this person?”



“Myuu, she is Yue. My lover?”



“Eh? Lover? … Then, Shia-oneechan?”



“My companion.”



“Not a lover?”



“Of course not.”



“… No matter what?”



“I will say it again and again… my lover is Yue.”



“Hmm~”



After being introduced to Yue, Myuu looking at Yue with a somewhat dissatisfied expression. Yue was still watching Myuu quietly. As if to ascertain something, Myuu returned Yue’s gaze. The two were staring at each other for a while, but the balance unexpectedly broken. Yue was trotting closer to them.



“Uhh,” Myuu was cautious. However, Yue didn’t mind Myuu’s cautiousness and took her away from Hajime. Yue made a Kyaa~ sound as she tightly embraced Myuu. “Ugh~” Although Myuu groaned and tried to resist, Yue didn’t let her go. After that, she said,



“… So cute.”



Apparently, she had come to like Myuu very much. Hah Myuu, who finally caught her breath, raised her face, and she and Yue were looking at each other in a close range.



“… Myuu. I am Yue. You’ve tried your best alone. Truly admirable.”



Yue’s eyes gently soften, and patted Myuu’s head while still embracing her saying, “Good girl, good girl.” With her gentle hand and warm atmosphere, Myuu relaxed and tears began to flow. Then, she began to cry loudly, Waa— When she met Hajime again, she still felt the tension that’s why she could not cry. However, at this moment, she relaxed and could let out all of her feelings completely.



With a wry smile, Hajime said, “As expected of Yue,” and they waited until Myuu finished crying before heading towards Adventurer Guild’s Branch Headquarters.



* * *



“Collapsed buildings, numbered twenty-two. Partially destroyed ones, numbered forty-four. Completely annihilated buildings, numbered five. Death of 95 members of Flithof confirmed. Disabled, numbered forty-four. Serious injuries, numbered twenty-eight, and 119 people are missing… Well? Do you have anything to say?”



“It went according to the plan. There’s neither regret nor a thing to reflect on.”



“Haa~~~”



Inside the Adventurer Guild’s reception room, Ilwa was glaring at Hajime with a written report in hand. However, from hearing words without any hint of remorse to the figure of a little girl from the Sea-dweller tribe who was eating the tea cake while hitting on his laps made Ilwa felt completely exhausted.



“Although I thought it couldn’t be… I heard Lehman escaped from Meerstat by destroying the water tank and walls, then flew to the sky… It wasn’t not your doing, right?”



“… Myuu, this is delicious, too, you know? Try eating it.”



“Ah~n.”



Although Hajime calmly fed Myuu the cake, Ilwa didn’t missed Shia, who was sitting beside him, wavering for a moment. Thus, he once again let out a very , very deep sigh. He rubbed his stomach with a hand, and the head secretary, Datt, casually handed him some stomach medication.



“Well, I won’t deny that I felt you overdid it, however, we are also troubled by the underground organization… So I can honestly say you helped us in this matter. They always cleared any evidence, with their outward appearance being a legitimate company, and they could just cut off arrested the ones like a lizard’s tail… Frankly, their extermination was a dream for us… But with the balance of the underground world collapsing… Haa, it will need serious cooperation between the Security Bureau and the Adventurers.”



“Well, that originally should’ve been managed by Fhuren’s Administrators. This matter only involved us because by some chance, someone wanted to put their hands on us so we counterattacked…”



“For a counterattack, how did it became annihilating one of three biggest underground organizations based in Fhuren in just half a day? Seriously, I can’t even joke about it.”



Ilwa smiled bitterly and somehow looked like he aged for at least ten more years. Because Hajime felt he was pitiful, he make a proposal to Ilwa.



“We gave those criminal groups such a grand warning, making them think twice of ever trying to meddle with us again. Also, it’s okay for Branch Head to use our names, you know? After all, if it’s known that the Branch Head was the one who hired “Gold” ranks… It’ll be a good deterrent, right?”



“Oya, is it really okay? It will surely become a big help… but aren’t you the type who dislikes being used?



Ilwa’s expression says he wasn’t expecting Hajime’s words. However, his eyes clearly said, “Eh? Seriously? Of course I will!” Hajime shrugged his shoulders and smiled wryly.



“Well, it is a give-and-take. We have troubled you, that’s why I don’t mind it if it’s just that much. I also know you, the Branch Head, will use it with caution. Besides, Fhuren will be involved in a war between underground organizations because of us, and I feel bad to involve the ordinary people.”



“… Hmm. Hajime-kun, aren’t you changing slightly? When I first met you, I had a feeling you had no consideration for anyone beside your companions… Did something good happened in Ul?”



“… Well, at least it was not only bad things that happened there.”



As expected of this big city’s Guild Branch Head, he could clearly judged people. He was able to notice the slight change in Hajime. Since this change was also desirable for Ilwa, he gratefully accepted Hajime’s proposal



Later on, although the two organizations planned on raising their influences by taking advantage of Flithof’s annihilation, it didn’t become just a big when thanks you Ilwa’s effective use of the names of Hajime’s party similar to how adults would scare children by saying “Namahage will come~” But because of this, Hajime gained various nicknames such as “Right-hand man of Fhuren’s Branch Head,” “White-haired, eye-patch, blazing flame-user,” and “Little girl-killer”… However, Hajime didn’t know of it, and it’s no big deal if he had no knowledge of it.



[T/N: Namahage is a demon-like being, portrayed by men wearing hefty orge masks and traditional straw capes during a New Year’s ritual.]



In regards to dealing with Hajime’s party who caused such a grand rampage, thanks to Ilwa’s effort, connections, and the unexpected help from the Security Bureau who defends the public peace, it became a legitimate case of self-defence. Thus, there was no problem at all. Apparently, even for the Security Bureau, the case where a child they were entrusted with was kidnapped, along with the bombing of one of their office, had become quite a hit on the head.



In addition, they could not tolerate the underground organization which kept doing illegal acts while making a mockery of them. The bureau director came to greet Hajime’s party with truly manly smile to conclude all things, and when he left, somehow his steps were light as though it was humming, “La dida dida.”



“Next, about Myuu-kun…”



Ilwa turned his gaze towards Myuu who was munching a cookie she held with both hands like a squirrel. Myuu twitched because of his gaze, uneasily looking up at Hajime, Yue, and Shia due to not wanting to be separated again. The reason she didn’t look at Tio was… it was the elders’ role to prevent a child from seeing something harmful.



“She could be entrusted to us and be sent to Elisen according to the legal procedures, or she could be entrusted you to be returned in a form of a commission… Those two are the only ways. What will you choose?”



Hajime inclined his head and wondered if it was okay not to entrust the kidnapped child of Sea-dweller tribe to the officials. According to Ilwa’s explanation, it would be okay to leave her to them because from the beginning, the “Gold”s’ rampage was to protect her, Myuu.



“Hajime-san… I, will, absolutely protect this child. That’s why, let her come with us… please.”



Shia bowed her head to Hajime. By all means she wanted to be together with Myuu until she was safely returned. Yue and Tio was watching Hajime in silence, leaving the decision up to Hajime.



“Onii-chan… stay together… please?”



It was foul play to say, “Please?,” while sending an upward gaze from his own lap. More importantly, when he got Myuu back, he had already considered to take her along if she wished for it, so his decision had been made.



“Well, it would have been be a big help in beginning… But now, I hold her dear so I can’t just say something like goodbye.”



“Hajime-san!”



“Onii-chan!”



Shia and Myuu were elated and smiled widely. Although it was necessary to conquer the Great Dungeon in «Great Volcano» before they travel to «Seaside town, Elisen», Hajime decided to allow Myuu to accompany and determined in his mind, “Well, we’ll manage somehow.”



“However, Myuu. Can you stop calling me Onii-chan? It’s okay to just call me Hajime. What can I say, the way you call me make me itch.”



Because Myuu was hugging him in joy, Hajime said his demand while feeling half embarrassed. For an otaku to be called “Onii-chan”… various things might happen.



Hajime’s demand made Myuu puzzled for a moment, but before long she nodded as though she understood it… and she answered with something completely different from what everyone had expected.



“… Papa.”



“… Wh-What? Sorry, Myuu. I seems I didn’t hear it correctly. Please say it again.”



“Papa.”



“… I-it must be that, right? A word that means “Onii-chan” or “Hajime” in Sea-dweller tribe’s language, right?”



“Ah-uh. Papa is papa.”



“Um, wait a sec.”



Hajime used his hand to massage his forehead and Shia timidly asked Myuu why she used the word “Papa” to call Hajime. Then…



“You know, Myuu doesn’t have a Papa… He had gone to where the God is before Myuu was born… Ki-chan, Lu-chan, and Mi-chan have theirs but only Myuu doesn’t… That’s why Onii-chan is Papa.”



“I somehow understand, but I want to tsukkomi your “that’s why,” Myuu. Please anything but Papa. I’m still only 17 years old, you know.”



“No, it’s Papa!”



“Okay. Then Onii-chan is okay! I don’t want such an extravagance title, so stop with Papa!”



“Nooo!! Papa is Myuu’s Papa—!”



Afterwards, he tried various things to get Myuu to stop calling him “Papa,” but Myuu displayed unexpected stubbornness, even more than the time she called him Onii-chan, and as the result, it was not revoked. As such, he could do nothing but made her mother persuade her when they arrived in Elisen. Hajime’s expression looked like he was suffering his greatest damage since the time he came out of the Abyss.



The the discussion with Ilwa was over, they returned to the inn, and a dispute broke out in regards to whom would be called “Mama” by Myuu, and for the time being, Tio who would become a bad influence to Myuum was rolling on the floor because Hajime had tied her. Naturally, she was excited by it…



In the end, she didn’t want to call anyone “Mama” except her real Mama, so Yue, Shia, and even Tio settled with “Onee-chan.”



Then at the night, everyone slept together in a kawa-no-ji style because Myuu wished for it. Once again problem occurred on who would sleep beside Myuu and across Hajime. However, the exhausted Hajime made Myuu sleep in between him and Yue. Shia was dissatisfied by this and threw a tantrum, but somehow she was able to sleep after she finished saying all of her complaints.



That day, the 17 years old Hajime became a Papa… and now the journey together with a child began!



* * *



Extra



Yue : “… Hajime.”



Hajime : “Nn? What is it, Yue?”



Yue : “… I want a child.”



Hajime : “… (Sweat drips).”



Yue : “… Jiii— (Silently appealing with her eyes).”



Hajime : “… Someday.”



Yue : “Nn!”



Shia : “That’s~, Hajime san… me, too (Fidget, fidget).”



Hajime : “… I won’t.”



Tio : “Master, this o— ”



Hajime: “Only those existing can joke around”



Tio : “… Haa, haa. Only this one got an immediate reply… Moreover, a merciless one… Haa, haa… I can’t hold it anymore!”





Volume 7 Chapter 10




Intense weapons clashing, and explosion sounds rang out inside the dim underground dungeon, with only a faint green light to rely upon.



It was so intense that it could be described as severe, and even the far distant wall shook from time to time. Numerous silver-colored sword trails were beautifully drawn in the empty space. Flame bullets, flame spears, wind blades, and water lasers flew about like a barrage. Sound of something hitting tough flesh, angry roars for their companions, and war cries filled the should be silent space suddenly turning into a battlefield.



“O light cutting through all creation, wind bring forth destruction, scatters and dances around like a whirlpool, and become the storm of light that cut my enemies! Soaring Severation!”



The Holy Sword he had in his hand, along with his wrist blurring as they accelerated, and numerous swords of light released with him, Kouki, as the core. The attacking bat-like demonic beast with the length of about 50 centimeters was instantly cut into ten pieces, and fell into the ground without being able to successfully attack as its blood splattered.



“Vanguard! Counting, ten—!” “””Roger!”””



Ant-like demonic beasts that moved their jaws, bat-like flying demonic beasts, and sea anemone-like demonic beasts with numerous wriggling tentacles; hey wriggled and moved around inside the 30 meters in diameter round shaped room. The demonic beasts were coming from the eight tunnels all around the room.



This place was «Orcus Great Dungeon» 89th floor. The vanguards, Kouki, Ryuutarou, Shizuku, Nagayama, Hiyama, and Kondou, were matching the countdown timing of the rear guard’s all out magic attack. The demonic beasts, which managed to attack the rear guards, were repelled and defeated by Kouki and the vanguards as they wait for the countdown.



The troublesome bat-like flying demonic beasts rushed to attack the rear guards using the space between the vanguards’ defense, but were stopped thanks to rampart made by the reliable “Barrier-user.”



“O’ ephemeral storm, O’ invisible shield; rage, blow, swirl, and stop everything, “Wall of Furious Tempest”!”



Taniguchi Suzu activated the offensive defense magic. The chanted spell went right before the rearguards, and breeze could be felt by their outstretched hands. No change could be seen with naked eyes. Even the bat-like demonic beasts didn’t notice its presence, and were not alarmed by their instinct. They kept trying to attack the rear-guards who were about to activate large-scale attack magic spells.



However, before they reached, what met the charging demonic beasts was a wall of air that looked like a huge distortion of space appearing all of a sudden. Tens of those bat-like demonic beasts collided against the wall one after another, but the wall of air only bent without letting even one through.



When all of the charging bat-like demonic beasts had collided, the distorted space exploded, causing great impact as if it had reached its limit. The generated impact was tremendous, and the fleshes crushed by it immediately splattered on the dungeon’s walls with sound of raw and death. Splatter!



“Hmph! I won’t let you pass that easily!”



The voice of the class’s mood-maker, Suzu, rang in the middle of the intense sound of battle. At the same time, the rear guards simultaneously fired their best attacks. It was an attack where it was necessary for them to be at a distance, since it would defeat the enemies, and struck all those who are close to it.



“Retreat!” With Kouki’s order, the vanguards immediately backed away from the demonic beasts.



In the next moment, the magic attacks of six people arrived with such perfect timing.



A huge fireball crashed and simultaneously caused a huge explosion. Meanwhile, a tornado trampled the battlefield, bringing forth vacuum blades which sucked the demonic beasts and cut them up. On the ground, stone spears shot off with tremendous speed and pierced the demonic beasts’ lower parts. At the same time, the icicles falling from above created holes in the demonic beasts’ upper bodies.



There was no way a living thing would be able to survive inside the sublime space that looked like it was receiving the wrath of nature. The attacks only last for tens of seconds. However, more than 90% of the demonic beasts were dead while the rest were on verge of dying due to grave injuries.



“Alright! This is good! Let’s finish the leftover ones quickly!”



With Kouki’s shout, the vanguards once again went forwards, and the demonic beasts on the brink of death, couldn’t even fight back thanks to the all-out magic attacks, were finished one by one. Not even five minutes had passed when all of the demonic beasts were annihilated.



The battle ended, but Kouki’s party didn’t relax their guards and searched their surroundings to see if there were more enemies.



“Phew, next is the 90th floor, huh… We were able to defeat the demonic beasts in this floor without much difficulty… and it looks like the end of the combat training inside this dungeon is near.”



“That’s why; don’t let your guard down. After all, we don’t know what kind of demonic beasts and traps are ahead.”



“Aren’t you worrying too much about it, Shizuku? Didn’t we just an easy battle in a floor no one ever reached? No matter what may come, I will defeat them! Even if it’s the Demon race!”



Shizuku cautioned Kouki, who muttered so in deep thought, and the muscle headed Ryuutarou replied with a hearty laugh. Nevertheless, Kouki made fist-to-fist greeting with Ryuutarou, and revealed a fearless smile. Seeing them, Shizuku sighed while rubbing her creased forehead. She came and had followed the extremeness of the two, which ascended her to a stage of a wordly-wise man. My wrinkle hasn’t increased again, right?, was her worry as the number of times Shizuku looked in a mirror had sublimely increased. Even so, she didn’t restrict the two as she followed them; truly a good natured person.



* * *



“Hiyama-kun, Kondou-kun, I think you must have recovered by now. But… how are you?”



While the others were discussing the earlier battle, Kaori was doing her duty; to heal the injured people from previous battle, since she was a “Healer.” It should be noted that there was another girl with “Healer” class within the 15 people who had undergone combat training by conquering the dungeon, and the duty to heal was divided between the two.



“… Aah, there’s no problem now. Thank you, Shirasaki.”



“O-Oh, it’s okay now. Thanks.”



Himaya, who was healed by Kaori, was daydreaming due to the close proximity of Kaori’s face, and answered absentmindedly. It was obvious he was charmed by her. Even Kondou was saying his gratitude with his reddened ears. Because they were the vanguards, Hiyama and Kondou were frequently in care of Kaori’s healing, and yet they still could not get used to coming in contact with Kaori. Although Kondou’s attitude was just like a child in puberty… there was darkness inside Hiyama’s eyes when he looked at Kaori. The darkness became thicker as days go by… but almost no one noticed it.



Hearing their gratitude, Kaori said, “You’re welcome,” with a smile. Then, she stood and turned around. When she confirmed no one else was in need of healing, she secretly sighed, and she began to look at the dim passage ahead with eyes filled with anxiety.



“…”



Noticing Kaori’s state, Shizuku understood what her best friend felt. Kaori’s mind was filled with worries. There were ten more floors until the lowest floor (the general opinion), yet they didn’t find any sign of Hajime at all.



Although it meant there was hope, the despair was far stronger. Even if she decided to not believe Hajime was dead until she saw it herself, another floor was conquered, and the negative thoughts that surged when nothing was found, could not be easily put aside. Furthermore, four months had passed since the day Hajime fell into the abyss. Even if her determination was strong, it was enough time for negative thoughts to begin invading her mind.



Seeing Kaori’s appearance while she embraced her artifact, a white staff, tightly, Shizuku called out to her since she could no longer endure it. And, before Shizuku moved, the small mood-maker said,As if I will let Kaori keep worrying like that!, and ran towards her. Bounce, she jumped and embraced Kaori from behind.



“KA-O-RI~N!! There’s no need to heal those guys, just heal Suzu a, lot~! Heal me with this and that~”



“Hya! Suzu-chan! Where are you touching! Rather, Suzu-chan should not have any injury!”



“There is! Suzu’s glass-like heart is injured! That’s why, spoil me! To put it concretely, use Kaorin’s big breasts!”



“B-Brea—… I said stop! Ah, hey! Yanh! Shizuku-chan, help!”



“Haa, Haa, is this good? How about over here? Young lady, you are quite th-puuutt!?”



“… Haa, stop it already, Suzu. I know you don’t mind the boys’ gaze… But, you should…”



Suzu had transformed into a perverted old man and was groping Kaori’s breasts with an expression so sloppy that it couldn’t be shown to other human. It was the reason why she received a head chop from Shizuku, and collapsed. Incidentally, some of the guys who watched Suzu and Kaori’s yuri scene had also collapsed. Suzu was convulsing with lump on her head, and was looked after by Nakamura Eri with a wry smile.



“Uu~, thank you, Shizuku-chan. That was embarrassing…”



“Alright, alright. It is okay now. I have exterminated the pervert, okay?”



Kaori, who clung to her with teary eyes, was gently patted by Shizuku. It was scene that could often be seen recently. Shizuku took a look at Kaori’s complexion while she gently stroked Kaori’s silky hair. Kaori was looking at Eri who was looking after Suzu with troubled but somewhat happy expression, and her anxiety from before was no longer there. Apparently, her feeling had changed even if it was a temporary thing. One way or another, Shizuku felt admiration in her mind as she thought, As expected of the class’s moodmaker, Suzu (Oldman version).



“There are only ten floors left… Let’s do our best, Kaori.”



Shizuku put her hands on Kaori’s shoulders, and then put some strength into them as she looked straight at Kaori. It was her way to encourage her best friend, so she would not break. Seeing Shizuku, Kaori noticed she had become slightly more timid, so she slapped both of her cheeks and returned Shizuku’s gaze with a powerful gaze.



“Un. Thank you, Shizuku-chan.”



Shizuku’s worry made Kaori realized again how much Shizuku would support her, and Kaori conveyed her gratitude as her gaze softened as she smiled. Shizuku quietly nodded, and her gaze also softened… Lily flowers were blooming on their sides, but they didn’t notice it. Kouki and others who were looking around awkwardly were also unnoticed by Shizuku and Kaori. They were already in their own world after all.



“If it is now… can I protect him?”



“I see… I am sure you can. We are different from that time… Even our levels have surpassed Meld-san and the other Knights… However, hehe, isn’t it possible that he has also became stronger? Even that time, he was the one who helped us in the end.”



“Haha, jeez… Shizuku-chan…”



Kaori believed in Hajime’s survival, but she was looking down on her current self, wondering if she could protect him this time, and that’s why Shizuku was poking fun at her as a joke. Actually, they would be dumbfounded for various reasons when they found their target… But that is something for the near future.



Incidentally, the ones here were Kouki, Ryuutarou, Shizuku, Kaori, Suzu, Eri, five people including Nagayama Juugo, and Hiyama’s gang of four; a total of 15 people, while Meld and the Knights were standing by at 70th floor. Actually, they were able to start from the 70th floor, since a teleport magic circle that connected 30th and 70th floor was discovered. Though it became easier to move to the lower floor, 70th floor was the limit for Meld and the Knights. To begin with, there were only Meld and few others who could keep up while accompanied by Kouki’s party when they were around the 60th floor. Thus, they had only become a hindrance to Kouki’s party when they reached 70th floor.



Even Meld was conscious of that. He taught Kouki’s party of all the know-how about the dungeon. That’s why, he and the Knights decided to try their best to secure a safety zone around the teleportation circle, and only Kouki’s party were to move on.



Meld wanted to show a bitter smile due to being exceeded in only four months. But even so, after associating with Kouki’s party, he and the Knights were satisfied if their abilities could safely secure a safety zone in 70th floor.



Kouki’s party current statuses were something like the following:



Name



Amanogawa Kouki



Age



17 Years Old



Gender



Male



Level



72



Class



Hero



Strength



880



Vitality



880



Resistance



880



Agility



880



Magic



880



Magic Resistance



880



Skills



Name



Sakagami Ryuutarou



Age



17 Years Old



Gender



Male



Level



72



Class



Fist Fighter



Strength



820



Vitality



820



Resistance



680



Agility



550



Magic



280



Magic Resistance



280



Skills



Name



Yaegashi Shizuku



Age



17 Years Old



Gender



Female



Level



72



Class



Swordswoman



Strength



450



Vitality



560



Resistance



320



Agility



1,110



Magic



380



Magic Resistance



380



Skills



Name



Shirasaki Kaori



Age



17 Years Old



Gender



Female



Level



72



Class



Healer



Strength



280



Vitality



460



Resistance



360



Agility



380



Magic



1,380



Magic Resistance



1,380



Skills



Kaori’s Healing Magic and Light Element Aptitude skills were at the extreme. Her healing magic in particular was in the highest rank possible. Just judging by the amount of skills, Kaori’s was at least amounted to four people. Furthermore, her current number of skills even exceeded the Hero, Kouki. With tit for tat, everything was definitely for her promise. Believing in his survival, this time, she would be the one to protect him. It was the result of her single-mindedly repeated the things she could do while spared little time for sleep.



“I think it’s about the time to leave… Is it okay now?”



Kouki timidly called out to Kaori and Shizuku, who were still looking at each other. Before, he had witnessed Kaori and Shizuku embracing each other in Kaori’s room, so sometimes Kouki’s attitude became suspicious, which had taken Kaori aback, but Shizuku knew what was in his mind and only quietly watched him. Her eyes were truly expressing, “Until when are you going to keep this strange misunderstanding, you fool.”



Pretending he didn’t notice Shizuku’s gaze, Kouki ordered the other members. They had explored 90% of the 89th floor, and the route they were to go now was the last place to explore. Thinking about the structure of the floors up until now, it was about time for them to see the stairs.



The prediction turned out right, and the party discovered the stairs 10 minutes after they moved out. They descended the dim, spiral staircase while confirming the existence of trap. After they descended for around 10 meters, Kouki’s party arrived at the 90th floor.



For now, Kouki’s party were looking in vigilance for anything that might happen since it was the starting point. However, just by its external appearance, nothing had changed from 80th-ish floors they had just finished exploring. They immediately began their exploration while mapping. Even if the structure was the same, but they could not let their guard down because the demonic beasts that would appear might be strong ones.



In vigilance, Kouki’s party explored the passages and rooms with the same structure as before. The exploration progressed easily. Or so it should be, because before long, one by one they made doubtful expressions.



“…What’s with this?”



By the time the party reached a deep inside broad space, the incomprehensible feeling reached its peak, and Kouki leaked a questioning voice with a perplexed expression. The other members were also perplexed just like him, so they halted when Kouki asked the question.



“… Even though we have explored it so much, why we didn’t encounter even one demonic beast?”



Their exploration had reached the latter half part, excluding the unneeded passages. Up until now, they would not have been able to advance this easily since they were furiously attacked by strong demonic beasts. Normally, they needed two days to reach the latter half of a floor. However, not even three hours had passed since Kouki’s party started exploring the 90th floor. The reason for this progress was simple. They didn’t encounter even one demonic beast in this floor.



In the beginning, they thought the demonic beasts were observing Kouki’s party from the shadows, but nothing popped up even when they used their perception skills and magic spells. It was strange for them not even feel the presence of a single demonic beast. It was obviously an abnormal situation.



“…How to say it, it feels eerie. Was nothing here since the beginning?”



Similar to Ryuutarou, the other members also talked about the other possibilities which remain unsolved. Their confusion only deepened.



“… Kouki, shouldn’t we return for now? Somehow I feel an ominous premonition. Meld and Knights might know something about this situation.”



Shizuku suggested to Kouki while she strengthened her vigilance. Kouki considered Shizuku’s suggestion because he also had a bad feeling about it, but they must keep advancing no matter what happens, and he thought they would be fine because they could take it easy in the 89th floor, so he hesitated on answering.



While Kouki was hesitating, the party members who explored the nearby surroundings unexpectedly raised their voice when they found something.



“This is… blood…, right?”



“It is hard to discern since the blood assimilate with the color of dim wall… They are all over the wall.”



“Oi, oi… this… this is quite the amount.”



Nagayama advanced from within the paled party members, and he touched the liquid they thought as blood with his finger. Afterwards, he confirmed the details by looking and smelling the blood stuck on his finger.



“Amanogawa… we should follow Yaegashi’s suggestion… This is demonic beast’s blood. Furthermore, it still fresh.”



“Well, if that is demonic beast’s blood, it means the demonic beasts around her have all been killed. Not only that, it also means there’s strong one who did it… But, won’t we be unable to advance unless we defeat it?”



Nagayama shook his head towards Kouki’s rebuttal. Even though Nagayama was the second biggest after Ryuutarou, he had a very prudent character unlike the other one. Nagayama watched the surrounding carefully while being prepared for battle, and told Kouki what he thought about the situation.



“Amanogawa… the demonic beast is likely not to go out of this room alone. We also haven’t even encountered one in the passages and rooms up until now. In addition, it is the first time we discovered traces. In other words…”



“… Something must have hidden the traces of the attacked demonic beasts, right?”



Nagayama nodded at Shizuku’s words. Even Kouki’s expression showed he realized something because of those words. Then, just like Nagayama, he raised his vigilance to the maximum with a stern expression.



“There’s also the possibility of demonic beasts becoming more intelligent… But, it was natural to think someone was here… In addition, for only traces in this room not to be hidden, either it means it didn’t have the time to do it, or…”



“Here is the last stop.”



What succeeded Kouki’s words was a never heard before voice of a woman suddenly ringing out. It was a man-like husky voice. Kouki’s party became pop-eyed, and they immediately entered battle state. They turned their gazes towards the source of the voice.



Sound of footsteps resounded, but what appeared from deep within the darkness of the spacious hall was a young woman with blazing red hair. The woman’s ears were slightly pointed, and her skin was darkish.



Kouki’s party opened their eyes wide in astonishment. The woman’s features were something they know very well. Though they have never seen it before, it was a race’s characteristics that always appeared inside the lecture from Ishtal and the others — the enemy of the Church of Saints’ God, and also the arch-enemy of human race. It was…



“…Demon race.”



Someone muttered, and the woman from Demon race revealed a faint, cold smile.





Volume 8 Chapter 1




The red-haired woman of the Demon race who appeared before Kouki’s party revealed a cold smile as she looked at Kouki’s party who had widened eyes with surprise.



Similar to her hair, the color of her eyes were also red, and she wore a dull-black rider suit-like clothing. Its design was fitting to her body, so her splendid curves could be seen well even in the dim dungeon. Moreover, there was the opening on the chest area, where the splendid twin hills seemed like it was going to spill out at any time. Furthermore, her flowing hair behind her, and her characteristically slightly pointed ears was truly captivating. Most of the male students were blushing even though they know it wasn’t the right time.



“You are the hero, right? Yes, you, the one wearing a stupidly sparkling armor.”



“St-Stupid… sh-shut up! I won’t accept being called stupid by someone from Demon race! Besides, why would a person from the Demon race be in a place like this!?”



Kouki spoke without thinking, and used his slight anger to recover from his surprise, questioning the purpose of the woman of the Demon race.



However, the Demon race woman thought of Kouki’s question as annoying and ignored it. Then, she very reluctantly continued saying.



“Haa~ Even though this is absolutely unneeded… Well, this is an order after all… You, I mean the overly sparkling one. Won’t you come to our side?”



“Wh-What did you say? Come to your… what do you mean!?”



“Looks like your comprehensive ability is rather low. The meaning is exactly as I said. An invitation for Mr. Hero. I want you to come to our side. There are various preferential treatments, too, you know?”



Time was needed for Kouki’s party to completely understand the unexpected words. Then, the classmates looked at Kouki, who glared at the woman from Demon race with strained and disgusted expression. It was then when they understood what she meant.



“I refuse! How dare you… asking me to betray… Human race… my comrades and the people of this Kingdom! It’s exactly as I heard; the Demon race is an evil existence! You purposely came her to invite me, but for you to come alone is too foolish! We have the numbers. So, surrender now!”



Kouki’s words made the other classmates felt at ease. They thought Kouki would definitely refuse it, but they could not deny that they were slightly worried about it. However, his childhood friends, Ryuutarou and Shizuku, didn’t even worry about it.



On the other side, the woman of the Demon race didn’t even pay any attention to the immediate refusal, and she muttered, “I see.” In fact, when Kouki’s shouted his reply, it annoyed her.



“Well, my superior also said it was okay for your comrades to come with you, you know? So how about it?”



“My answer is still the same! No matter what you say, I absolutely won’t betray Human race!”



Without discussing with his comrades, the representative, Kouki, immediately answered as such. And as though implying the invitation was something unpleasant, Kouki activated the Holy Sword, which then became cladded in light. There’s no more need for discussion, and I will use force if you don’t surrender!



Behind him, Nagayama and Shizuku clicked their tongues in secret as they took maximum precaution to their surroundings over the Demon race woman. Considering their situation, the two contemplated to change the location even if they must lie to the Demon race woman. However, Kouki had already answered in anger before they could bring up their idea. Since it could not be helped now, they prepared for anything unexpected to happen.



But if they thought about it, normally, no matter how adept the Demon race were in using magic, they would not come to such a place alone. It was even more unbelievable that she flawlessly manage to annihilate the demonic beasts in the current floor, in addition to not leaving a single trace. If the Demon race was so strong, and she was able to achieve all that, then they would have already trampled the Human race by now.



Besides, the Demon race woman didn’t even break a sweat when she reached this floor ahead of the 15 humans. Thinking of how she concealed the signs of combat, it made one fear thinking something laid in wait since they step into the floor, and one would think she had the geographical advantage. It would not be strange if something happen.



The crisis the two had sensed was immediately proven to be correct.



“I see. Then, I won’t ask any more. Also let me say this… to invite you is not my main priority, so don’t even think of something naive like I won’t kill you. Lutos, Havell, Enki. It’s time to eat!”



The Demon race woman called out three names and, CRAAASH! Sound of something crushed echoed along with Shizuku and Nagayama’s anguished voices when they were blown away at the same time.



“Guh!?” “Gah!?”



It was not known what blew the two away. With the order of the woman of the Demon race, they sensed the left and right spaces of Kouki’s party suddenly blurred. There were “existences” approaching them with speed comparable to “Ground Shrinker,” and attacked the unprepared classmates who were watching the conversation between Kouki and the woman of the Demon race.



Even with Shizuku and Nagayama’s maximum precaution from the very beginning, they were barely able to notice the surprise attack, and they stood to protect the students who were suddenly the aim of their invisible enemy.



Shizuku was a speedfighter, so her defense is low. Therefore, she drew her swords into a cross towards the blurring space, and tried to jump back to dull the force when she received the impact. However, the enemy’s attack power was far greater than she had imagined, so her defense was broken, and she was thrown to the ground, sucking all the air in her lungs. There was even shallow cut on her abdomen.



Nagayama was a “Great Martial Artist,” which owned special aptitude towards defense even among hand-to-hand fighter class. He had acquired the skill derived from “Body Strengthening” called “Body Hardening,” which was similar to “Vajra,” and both skills had great credibility as they were far stronger than a steel shield. Coupled by his huge figure, his hard to break through defend made him suitable to be called a human fortress.



However, even Nagayama had his defense broken through by that “existence,” and was blown away while splattering blood from his deeply wounded arms. He barely escaped the additional damage of crashing into the ground by chance, and landed on Hiyama’s gang who was in the rear.



The glass cracking-like crushed sounds came from the barrier magic Suzu had chanted beforehand; similar to how Shizuku took maximum caution. It was something she did immediately when she instinctively sensed the crisis. The location was at the rear side of the party. She didn’t feel the “existences” there, but she somehow used the barrier to not only envelop Shizuku and Nagayama, but also everyone on the rear. It was something she did instinctively which could also be said that it was due to her experience. Her action was extremely correct. Without Suzu’s barrier, the third blurred space would mercilessly cut up Nagayama and other party members.



However, Suzu was immediately blown backward as compensation of splendidly protecting her allies because she directly received the impact from the crushed barrier. Fortunately, Eri was right behind her and she successfully caught Suzu, but the crisis had not ended yet, when the third blurring space immediately began to move in pursuit just like the other two blurring spaces, wounding Shizuku and Nagayama.



Because of the suddenness, those classmates who could not react towards the three approaching blurred spaces… at that moment,



“Give the grace and divine protection of light to us! “Heavenly Time,” “Heavenly Perimeter,” “Heaven Interruption!”.”



Kaori activated three light magic at the same time with almost no chanting; she was able to omit some of her chants.



The first magic spell was a mid-rank recovery magic, which immediately healed Shizuku and Nagayama, who were wounded, blown away, and landed on the ground. It was a magic spell capable of healing more than two people remotely away from her. Faint white lights poured on the two people who somehow managed to stand up while groaning because of the pain; their wound recovery rate was abnormal.



The second spell was used to allow Suzu and the others to be unnoticable by the three blurred spaces. Similar faint white light poured into them. The light buoyantly expanded, and an area of light appeared at where they were at.



“Heavenly Perimeter” was a mid-ranked recovery magic, and it was the so called auto-regen. Although the duration was long, the amount recovered was little at a time. It had the feature of wrapping the surrounding with light made of magic power while the magic was activated. Kaori was using that feature, and the recovered amount was set to the lowest to indirectly reveal the appearances of the unknown enemies.



What appeared inside the white light were strange demonic beasts with lion head, dragon-like limbs, sharp claws, snake as the tails, and eagle-like wings on their backs — the so called Chimera. They must have peculiar magic for camouflaging. It was a quite troublesome ability, since not only were their appearances camouflaged, their presences as well. However, the fact that they could not exhibit their full power in that state, and thus the blurred spaces, was a blessing in the midst of misfortunes.



After all, even Shizuku and Nagayama who held the best combat prowess among the classmates were incapacitated with only a blow. They were enemies to be feared. Their powers were completely far above the demonic beasts the students had met on the previous floors, and obviously even stronger than the demonic beasts in this floor.



The three Chimeras readied their claws and fangs in pursuit as though they knew the location even inside the light. Their targets were Shizuku, Nagayama, and Suzu, these three. However, their fangs and claws could not reach the three, since three shields of light appeared before each of them and the attacks were averted in a hair’s breadth, and the angle slightly moved while the shields were crushed by the Chimeras’ attacks.



They were the mid-ranked defense spell, “Heaven’s Interruption.” It was the higher ranking version of the beginner-ranked light defensive magic, “Light’s Interruption,” where more than two shields produced at the same time. Even the “Barrier-user,” Suzu was using this magic, and by replenishing the destroyed edges of the shield in high-speed, it was possible to stall time though it’d soon to be destroyed when weakened. In this respect, Kaori could not reached Suzu whose specialty was barrier, since she could not use it like such as even when her aptitude towards light element is high. At best, she could only do minute adjustments to the shield.



However, the shields were helpful. At the moment Suzu’s strong barrier was destroyed in a blow, Kaori realized her barrier would be useless, so she chose a method to avert the attack. To begin with, she didn’t expect the incoming attacks would be the same as before, so it was more like a sink or swim situation. She was lucky it went well.



The three Chimeras whose attacks were averted, became irritated and moved to attack again. The time she gained was only a moment. It was as though the Chimeras didn’t find it troublesome. However, there was no change that the most expensive thing to buy was time, even if it was just a moment. Kouki and the others didn’t miss that moment.



“Get away from Shizukuuuu!!”



So, is it okay to attack Nagayama?, No one said just a sentence. Perhaps because of anger, Kouki roared and used “Ground Shrinker” to immediately reached the Chimera near Shizuku. Kouki’s movement speed was so fast that he left after images. He swung his Holy Sword towards the Chimera’s neck, and the sword became shinier.



At the same time, Ryuutarou took on the Chimera that went to attack Nagayama with his thrusted fist in a karate stance. Rather than a direct attack, he thought it’d be faster to attack using the gauntlet-type artifact’s ability, shock wave. A war cry came from Ryuutarou and magic power was supplied to the gauntlet.



Furthermore, Eri, who caught the blown away Suzu, thrusted her hand out, began to chant when she felt the same crisis as Suzu, and powerful fire magic was activated. It was a mid-ranked magic called “Sea of Flame,” and just like the name, it was a ranged magic that manipulated tidal waves of flame. Even agile enemy would not be able to easily avoid it.



With sublime power and speed, Kouki swung the Holy Sword down from an upper stance. While Ryuutarou’s thrusted fist drew out a form that couldn’t even be more splendid and resulted in a violent shock wave that went forward just like a cannonball. Eri’s deathbringer, crimson tidal wave surged to swallow its target, turning it into ashes and dusts.



However…



“”ROOOAAAR!!”” “GuUURawwwr!!”



Unbeknownst to them, some things had hidden themselves. Three shadows roared and attacked Kouki’s party right before their attacks would directly hit their targets.



“”Hmmmph!?””



The suddenness of this situation made Kouki and Ryuutarou felt chills running down their spines. Two of the shadow rushed towards Kouki and Ryuutarou with tremendous power, and the metal maces in their hands were swung with great speed.



Kouki immediately used the sword’s centrifugal force to twist his body while Ryuutarou raised his left hand towards the incoming mace instead of his thrusted out right hand. With his balance broken, Kouki rolled on the ground, and Ryuutarou was blown away by the enemy’s second attack, a punch, after he defended against the mace.



What attacked Kouki and Ryuutarou were demonic beasts with appearances similar to Brutal, with a height of 2.5 meters. However, even though they were similar to monsters in RPGs such as Orc and Ogre, the Brutals were like pigs while these demonic beasts were considerably smart. Furthermore, their Brutal-like bodies were strengthened to their limits. In fact, the strength and speed from the previous surprise attack could not be compared to Brutals.



On the other side, even though Eri didn’t receive any direct attack, the psychological impact she received was greater than Kouki and Ryuutarou’s. Reason being, the shadow that suddenly appeared opened its mouth and begun to inhale the surging tidal waves at once. WoOOOoosh! The expansive flame gathered at a single point and disappeared. The shadow inhaled all of the flame in only tens of seconds.



What appeared in the space where the flame and heat disappeared was turtle-like demonic beast with six feet. The shell on its back was dyed in crimson, just like the rampaging flame that earlier changed its target to ashes.



In the next moment, the turtle with six feet finished absorbing the flame and once again opened its mouth wide. At the same time, the shell on its back shined intensely and red light appeared inside its opened mouth. It was just like how energy was collected before a laser beam was fired.



Seeing that, an impatient expression appeared on Eri’s face; she had no room to spare since she had just fired her magic. However, her impatient was blown off by the usual cheerful voice of her best friend in her arms.



“Don’t underestimate me! Come in succession o’ light of protection and be revived as long as I have the will, “Heaven’s Interruption”!”



In a moment, ten light shields appeared in succession before Suzu and Eri. All of the shields were set up diagonally at 45 degree angle. The super-high temperature beam was fired by the six-legged turtle at the same time the shields appeared, and parried upward through where the shields were crushed.



Even so, the power of the beam was greatly above the attack from the previous demonic beasts, since it only needed a moment to pulverize a shield. Suzu was gritting her teeth and chanted in succession to construct new shields one after another. It could be said it was as expected of a “Barrier-user,” the shield’s construction speed rivaled the speed of the shield’s destruction and succeeded in parrying the six-legged turtle’s beam, barely.



The parried beam hit the dungeon’s ceiling accompanied with great tremor, pulverizing its surroundings, and the scattered scorching minerals fell down like a rain.



“Damn it! What’s just happened!?”



“Just what are those demonic beasts!?”



“Shit, let’s defeat them now!”



Only until the situation progressed this much did Hiyama’s gang and Nagayama’s party slipped out of their confusion and prepared to fight. The wounded Shizuku and Nagayama were also healed completely, and they began to respectively attack the Chimeras.



Shizuku entered the super-high-speed world, and not even her after image could be seen. Voom! Her figure disappeared with a sound of exploded air, appearing right behind the Chimera in the next moment, and she used the sword drawing technique to unsheathe her swords that had returned to their sheaths before anyone noticed.



“No Beat,” it was a skill that enable movement without preliminary action. Rather than simply moving with speed without leaving any after images, one just could not catch up with her movement, which rapidly quicken and slowed. In addition, her sword drawing and slashing speed were further increased by the skills derived from Swordsmanship. The speed of the naked blades was even faster than what an ordinary living being would recognize as a swift flash.



To return the blow she received a while ago, she used one of the Yaegashi-style secret techniques, “Void Severing.” It cut even the space just like its name; at one moment one could see the silver-colored trajectory of the sword, and the Chimera’s snake tail was severed into two in the next moment.



“GURAaaaaWR!!”



Raising roar of anger, the Chimera turned around and swung its sharp claws. However, its attack only cut through the air; Shizuku had already moved to the other side. She swung her two swords, and cut the Chimera’s flank.



“Kuh!”



Shizuku used her speed to steadily damage the Chimera. However, Shizuku’s expression didn’t clear up, inadvertently leaking a sound as though she had been bitten a bitter bug. It was because her calculation had been wrong. In reality, Shizuku had wanted to cut the Chimera’s body apart with the first strike, but she could not do that, and the snake tail entered her slashing range instead. Even the second slash that supposed to cut the Chimera’s body in even halves were stopped when it quickly bent its body right before the slashes reached it.



The Chimera could not keep up with Shizuku’s speed. However, it was not like it could not respond to her. It could not see her figure, so it was barely able to respond to Shizuku’s extreme speed using its reflex speed; a truly troublesome opponent. It was something more than troublesome for Shizuku who wanted to finish the fight quickly and rescue the others.



Afterwards, she swung her swords for the third and fourth times, and though there were numerous wounds on the Chimera’s body, they were too shallow to become a mortal wound. In addition, the Chimera began to become accustomed to Shizuku’s speed. An impatient expression appeared on Shizuku’s face.



The bad things continued for Shizuku, no for all of them.



“CAAAWWWW!!”



When she heard a shriek suddenly resounding around the room, dark red light wrapped the severed tail and wings before her, and the Chimera’s wounds immediately healed. Kaori’s “Heavenly Perimeter”‘s effect had been significantly lowered, and thus, wounds were not supposed to be healed easily no matter how shallow they were. Shizuku opened her eyes wide and looked at the source of the shriek, while she kept caution towards the healed Chimera.



Thus, unbeknownst to her, the Demon race woman who was standing idly like an unconcerned spectator had a double-headed white crow riding on her shoulder, with one head turned towards Shizuku. More accurately, it was facing the Chimera before Shizuku.



“There’s even a healer!?”



She thought she finally wounded the difficult enemy, but it was immediately healed. Even at the best of times, lots of time would have passed before she could attain the victory. However, now, there was an excellent healer in stand by for the Chimera. Such a situation made Shizuku screamed instinctively.



Not only Shizuku, her comrades at the other places similarly raised bitter screams.



Kouki, who fought the Brutal-look-alike while receiving support, had almost finished after he deeply cut the Brutal-like body from shoulder to the waist, but the crow’s other head was looking at the wound, and when it shrieked, it was healed as though time had rewinded.



The same thing happened to Ryuutarou and Nagayama. The second Brutal-look-alike Ryuutarou was fighting had its abdomen hollowed out as though it had exploded, and one of its arm was broken. However, it was immediately healed when the head that was looking at the Chimera Shizuku was fighting against, turned towards it and shrieked. Even the Chimera Nagayama had battled against that had parts of its body caved in was immediately healed.



“Looks like you have quite the hard time. What will you do? Will you come to our side now? If it is now, I will let you think for a while, you know?”



Seeing Kouki’s party having a hard fight, the woman of the Demon race clapped her hands with composed attitude and once again spoke to invite them. To begin with, she asked the question knowing what the answer will be, and her expression remained cold. Her expectation turned to be right.



“Don’t joke around! We won’t yield to your threat! We won’t be defeated! And I will give you the proof! Here I go, “Limit Break”!”



The words of the woman of the Demon race made Kouki raised an expression of indignation. He used the Holy Sword to counter the Brutal-look-alike’s swung down mace, and used the chance to activate “Limit Break”.



Cladded in divine light, Kouki shouted this would be the end, and charged towards the woman of the Demon race.





Volume 8 Chapter 2




“Limit Break,” a skill that temporarily triples ones basic stats using magic power, however, it is literally breaking one’s limit; so, it cannot be used for a long period and the user will be weakened proportionally to the time it was use afterwards. That is because of the severe fatigue and results in the inability to use even half of one’s original power. Therefore, the time and place to use this last-resort skill should be thought out carefully.



Because of the demonic beast’s strength and recovery, Kouki judged that the morale of his companions would plummet if this kept up, so he used “Limit Break” to immediately defeat the White Crow and the Demon race woman.



With Kouki’s declaration of “Limit Break,” pure white light wrapped around his body. At the same time, the Brutal-look-alike, whose mace attack was counter attacked again, didn’t notice the change in Kouki.



“O’ blade-like will, bear the light and tear my enemy, “Light Sword”!”



Kouki bent his body forward to dodge the Brutal-look-alike’s mace. He then immediately slashed from below using the Holy Sword which was extended by the blade of light.



He had slashed the enemy before by using “Light Sword,” and although it received a severe wound, it wasn’t life-threatening. However, this time he was using “Limit Break,” which tripled his stats, and with the effect of “Light Sword,” the Brutal-look-alike was diagonally cut in two, as though it was made of butter.



One beat later, the Brutal-look-alike’s body shifted diagonally and boom!, it crumbled with a raw sound. Kouki put strength into his legs and immediately accelerated fiercely towards the Demon race woman.



Nothing obstructed the space between Kouki and the Demon race woman. Although it was said that the Demon race was a superior race in terms of magic, but it was too late for her to do anything. With this, she would be slashed along with the white crow, the end. Everyone thought so.



At that moment,



“””””GUUURAAAAAARRRRRWW!!!”””””



“Wha—!?”



There were six blurred spaces, and they attacked Kouki while roaring loudly. Because the Chimeras were attacking simultaneously from all sides, Kouki instinctively raised an astonished voice and his eyes opened wide.



He immediately slammed the brake, dodging the attack from the front, and used Holy Sword to slash the Chimera attacking from his right. Next, he believed in the performance of the Holy Armor and endured the deadly attack he received on his back.



However, those were the only things he could do. The claws of the Chimera on his left hit his shoulder. He flew outside of the encirclement when the last Chimera suddenly jumped, dug its foreleg claws on Kouki’s shoulders, and pinned him.



“Ack!!” A cry slipped through his grit his teeth.



He was barely able to stop the Chimera that was about to pierce its fangs in the scruff of his neck with Holy Sword. With claws digging into his shoulders, the power to block the jaws was reduced. Kouki who had already broken his limit was gradually cornered, and he could not bring forth enough power.



“O’ light of grace, bring your healing and warning to this place, “Heavenly Burn”! “Binding Seal”!”



Seeing Kouki in such a pinch, Kaori promptly activated recovery magic spells. “Heavenly Burn” was a mid-ranked healing magic with a single target. Its effect was higher than the recovery magic, “Heavenly Time,” she used earlier to heal several people. However, the Chimera’s claws were digging in Kouki’s shoulders, so it wouldn’t be healed the way things were going.



Therefore, she activated mid-ranked restraining magic of the light element, “Binding Seal,” at the same time she activated the healing magic. “Binding Seal” was a magic that produced a cage of light centering on the confined object — Kaori used that magic on Kouki. The cage of light instantaneously expanded around Kouki and pushed the Chimera away.



With the claws coming out of his shoulders, “Heavenly Burn” demonstrated its effect and Kouki’s wounds were instantly healed.



At the same time, some people from the rear, such as Suzu and the rear guard group who were fighting against the Chimera and the six-legged turtle, released attack magics towards the Chimeras attacking Kouki. However the distance was too far and they could not get a good aim, even when they had had the effects of Kaori’s “Heavenly Perimeter,” they were still unable to deal great damages to the Chimeras.



Even so, they were able to buy time for Kouki to regain his balance. Next, he readied his Holy Sword, chanted, and charged to counter attack when he was fully healed.



“”Soaring Four Wing Blades””



He swung the Holy Sword which drew a curve in the air, and four slashes of light appeared from the space where he swung at. The targeted Chimeras sensed the crisis beheld by Kouki’s action strengthened by “Limit Break,” and immediately jumped away to evade.



However,



“Capture them, “Restrain”!”



With a chantless-like short chant, Kaori activated mid-ranked restraining magic of the light element, “Restrain.” Numerous chains of light jumped out from the evading Chimeras’ feet and twined around their neck and feet. Though it was not difficult to get out of it with the strength the Chimeras possessed, they were stopped for a moment and could not evade.



As a result, the four Chimeras were directly hit by Kouki’s “Soaring Blade”s and died as their blood splattered around.



Kouki glared and pointed his Holy Sword towards the Demon race woman.



“How regrettable; your last resort was ineffective against us. Now there’s nothing else to protect you!”



Upon hearing Kouki’s words, the Demon race woman looked dubiously, no, looked at Kouki with amazement. In her mind, she thought, “Why was it necessary for him to declare that now? Wouldn’t it be better for him to immediately slash me?”



Even though the Demon race woman should have been cornered, her composed attitude irritated Kouki. First she let out Chimeras, next Brutal-look-alikes, and now Chimeras again. Those surprise attacks were also the source of his irritation. “You only used surprise attacks and didn’t fight fairly. Moreover, you’re just spectating. What a coward!” Kouki shouted.



“… Well, that’s not my last resort.”



“What a bluff!”



“Anyway, forget about whether or not it’s a bluff, but what will you do after you repel those? I have confirmed your power as the “Heretic Apostles,” so I have no more business with you.”



“What ar—” “KYAAA!”



“— Kh!?”



The Demon race woman said while going through the trouble of flipping her hair, when a scream rang out from behind him the same time Kouki was questioning her.



Kouki reflexively looked back, and what greeted his eyes were five Brutal-look-alikes and Chimeras. Furthermore, there was a black, four-eyed wolf he had never seen before who was ridden by a 60 centimeter black cat with four tentacles. They simultaneously attacked his comrades and Kouki could see the spectacle where the black cat’s tentacle pierced through the flank of one of his best friends in Nagayama’s party, Nomura Kentarou. The one who screamed was Yoshino Mao, also from Nagayama’s party.



“Kentarou! Damn you, don’t you get carried away!”



“Mao, calm down! I will heal him!”



A member from their party, Endou Kousuke, slashed the tentacle that pierced Nomura and he glared at the black cat with eyes blazing in anger.



Nomura fell and raised an anguished voice, which made Yoshino dumbfounded, but only to be scolded by Tsuji Ayako who immediately activated healing magic. It was a blessing that she completed her chant completed before the tentacle cut by Endou healed up.



“Wh—, there are still more—!”



As he looked back, Kouki made a surprised sound because there were new reinforcements that appeared unbeknownst to him.



“The effect of Chimera’s peculiar magic, “Camouflage,” activates on whoever it touched. Or have you not thought of such a thing? Looks, there’s more of them.”



“Kh!?”



The large amount of demonic beasts that suddenly appeared had reversed the situation, and Kouki and his comrades were now the ones who were inferior in terms of numbers. Seeing that, Kouki hurriedly turned back. To Kouki, the Demon race woman gave away the secret of the Chimera’s “Camouflage” effect and further revealed more demonic beasts. Ten four-eyed wolves and black cats appeared from behind her and rushed towards Kouki.



“Kuh— oOO!”



The black cats’ tentacles extended at extraordinary speed and attacked Kouki from all directions. Kouki made a pinwheel rotation to cut the incoming tentacles using the Holy Sword, but one of the black cats had gotten close to his side and tried to hit him. It was aiming at Kouki’s face, so the jumping black cat shouldn’t have been able avoid his attack mid-air. Kouki said, “One down!,” when he was convinced of the demonic beast’s death.



However, his conviction was easily overturned in the next moment. Somehow, the black cat did a somersault in mid-air and avoided Kouki’s attack. Next, sharp claws that didn’t suit the cat’s physique targeted Kouki’s neck.



Kouki was barely able to move his head and avoided the attack, but he was unable to respond to a four-eyed wolf’s attack that came from behind him, due to the collapse of his balance. It didn’t result in a serious injury thanks to his defense of his armor and the strength from exceeding his limit. He then mightily jumped away and returned to his comrades.



With that, the obviously abnormally strong demonic beasts surrounded Kouki’s party. Everyone tried to fight back desperately, but what was even more troublesome was that the enemies had suddenly increased in numbers and were cooperating. In addition, the white crow would immediately heal the demonic beasts if they didn’t die in one hit.



Although the frontline somehow managed to avoid collapsing, thanks to the continuous healing of Kaori and the other “Healer,” Tsuji Ayako, they still could not do anything to break the situation.



Kouki dealt damage to the enemies using the power he gained from “Limit Break,” but it had become impossible for him to attack the demonic beasts with “hit and run” tactic while cooperating with the others.



With high-speed movement comparable to Shizuku’s “No Beat,” the black cat and the four-eyed wolf that possessed a skill called “Prediction,” had excellent teamwork which resulted in the evasion of what should have been a mortal wound.



They desperately fought back, but shadows of despair gradually began to loom over the expression of the classmates. That feeling grew larger thanks to the participation of the Demon race woman in the battle.



“The golden eyed lizard sleeping in the depth of the ground, the magic-eyed king born in this world, the one who brought the curse of darkness within his view. What I seek is the eternal and everlasting prison of darkness. Neither terror, nor despair, nor sorrow, to lock out my enemies with those eyes, and what remains would be demise, only cold sanction sculptures. Crush everything and return them to the ground! “Final Prison”!”



Immediately after the chant was finished, a gray orb appeared from the woman of the Demon race’s outstretched hand and flew towards Kouki’s party drawing a parabola. Although it could not be called fast, there’s no one currently in Kouki’s party who could not evade it. At a glance, it was truly not a marvelous magic, but the one whose abdomen pierced by the tentacle, Nomura Kentarou, was already pale faced because of the blood loss, and became paler. He shouted,



“Kh!? Fuck! Taniguchi—!! Stop that thing! Use your barrier!”



“Eh!? R-Roger! Bring a sanctuary that won’t let the God’s enemy pass here! “Holy Interruption”!”



Nomura, who was at his wit’s end ordered, and Suzu used shortened chants to invoke high-ranked defense magic of the light element. The shining barrier created a dome-like state and surrounded Kouki’s party. Because “Holy Interruption” didn’t have a function to detect friend or foe, there were lots of demonic beasts wrapped inside the dome-like barrier. Not only was it a strong magic, it also had high magic power consumption rate. It was the reason why it was often not used in meaningless fights. However, Nomura’s shout told her the danger of the magic activated by the Demon race woman, so at the very least, she wanted to use a strong barrier magic and immediately chose “Holy Interruption.”



The gray-colored swirling orb immediately collided with the barrier right after Suzu expanded the “Holy Interruption.” The gray orb had tremendous pressure and strength belied by its appearance to break through the barrier. To not let it break through, Suzu gritted her teeth and desperately endured the feeling of her magic power being consumed.



Then, as if they received an order from the Demon race woman, the demonic beasts’ movements changed. Several all of them began to aim at Suzu simultaneously.



“Suzu!”



“Protect Taniguchi!”



Eri fired her magic to obstruct the approaching Brutal-look-alike as she called Suzu’s name. With Suzu in the center, there was Eri with Saitou Yoshiki and Kondou Reiichi fighting against a Chimera, and a four-eyed wolf in opposite of her. Nomura came to Suzu’s side.



However, a black cat suddenly appeared from the crack of their defense towards the unmoving Suzu who could not move while maintaining “Holy Interruption.” Nomura immediately activated “Stone Spear” and skew it to the ground. However, the black cat was zigzagging mid-air, bent its body to avoid the stone spear, and thrust out all of its tentacles.



“Taniguchii!”



“Agh!?”



Nomura called Suzu’s name to warn her, but it was too late. The tentacles had instantly pierced the Suzu’s stomach, thigh, and right arm while she tried to dodge. Her small body was caught and was thrown to the side with a strong force.



With splattered blood, Suzu’s back struck the ground and her breath hung. Then, she screamed due to the incapability to endure the severe pain the same time she regained her breath.



“AaAaAUGH!!”



“Suzu-chan!”



“Suzu!”



Hearing her agonized voice, Kaori and Eri instantly screamed Suzu’s name. Although Kaori tried to focus her mind to activate healing magic, but the shining barrier Suzu made had disappeared first.



“Everyone, get away from that orb!”



Nomura warned the others with a voice filled with frustration. However, up till now, no magic could rival Suzu’s impregnable defense, “Holy Interruption.” That was why his warning came too slow.



With the disappearance of the barrier, the swirling grey orb flew mightily, crashed into the ground and exploded soundlessly, and scattered grey smoke to the surroundings tremendously.



Saitou, Kondou, and Nomura, ran towards Suzu who had collapsed in agony nearby. The grey smoke immediately wrapped around them. There were no shadows of demonic beasts. All of them had simultaneously distanced themselves at once.



The grey smoke continued to extend and tried to engulfed Kouki and the others.



“Come, O’ wind! “Wind Bomb”!”



Kouki immediately used wind magic to create a squall, which pushed the grey smoke outside the room.



Maybe because it was created with magic, the smoke didn’t easily get blown out of the room unlike ordinary smoke, but because Kouki’s magic was strengthened thanks to the “Limit Break,” he successfully blew the smoke away after some struggle, into the dungeon passageway.



However, what was left by the smoke was…



“That can’t be, Suzu!”



“Nomura-kun”



“Saitou! Kondou!”



Saitou and Kondou had completely petrified and became unable to speak, while Suzu had her lower half of her body petrified, and Nomura who covered Suzu had the left side of his body petrified.



Saitou and Kondou were petrified with dumbfounded expressions because they didn’t understand what had happened. Suzu whose lower half petrified, coupled with severe pain, had lost her consciousness with a truly pained expression.



On the other hand, the one who protected Suzu, Nomura, had the most negligible damage, but he still let out a pained groan while gritting his teeth looking like he seemed to be enduring an acute pain. Nomura’s damage was slight because he was an “Earth Magic-user.” Carrying the highest aptitude to earth attribute, it was natural he had high resistance against magic from Earth element.



In addition, Nomura instantaneously saw through the Demon race woman’s magic because it was of the Earth element, which he had studied — high-ranked offensive magic, “Final Prison.” It was a troublesome magic scattering petrifying grey smoke. Even if it was only a slight touch, the magic would gradually invade the body until one was completely petrified, and the only action to prevent it was to create barrier that’d hold up until the effect has worn off, or use strong magic to blow the smoke away. Moreover, the barrier would also be petrified unless it was a high-ranked one, and the smoke could also only be blown away using a high-ranked magic.



“Bastard! How dare you!”



Kouki raised an enraged expression because of the disaster that fell upon his comrades. Kouki, who was wrapped in a shining light due to the effect of “Limit Break,” began to shine in a brighter dazzling light. He looked like he would charge towards the Demon race woman at any moment.



However, Shizuku acted as a stopper to Kouki when she yelled with an admonishing voice, followed by telling him to withdraw with all of their might.



“Stop! Kouki! Let’s withdraw! The path of retreat is clear now!”



“Wh—!? After what had happened, how can I run away?!”



However, with his fury from seeing his comrades getting hurt, Kouki glared and objected to Shizuku’s plan of retreating. The pressure Kouki released rushed towards Shizuku, but she received it as though it was nothing, and pressured him instead with a stern expression.



“Listen! Kaori will surely cure them. However, it’ll take time. There’s also the possibility of it being too late if we are too slow to treat them. So it is necessary to withdraw now and recover! Besides, we lack three people now, so if you rush out, everyone won’t be able to endure the next attack! We’ll truly be annihilated!”



“Ugh, but…”



“In addition, isn’t it about time your “Limit Break” reached dangerous time? In this situation, it’ll be truly the end if Kouki is weakened! Please calm down! Everyone also feels the same as you!”



Hearing the logical words of his childhood friend, Kouki hesitated as he bit his lip when he noticed the bleeding at the edge of Shizuku’s lips, and he felt his boiling head go cold. Shizuku was also mortified. Before she knew it, she had cut her lip. Her important comrades had been done in, and if possible she wanted to immediately beat up her enemy.



“Okay! Everyone, time to retreat! Shizuku, Ryuutarou! Please endure it for a little longer!”



“Leave it to me!”



“Right on!”



Kouki thrusted up the Holy Sword and began a long chant. Until now, he didn’t use any long chant because it would not have defused their earlier situation. However, it was now the perfect magic to clear a path for their retreat. But, it became necessary for him to entrust his defense to Shizuku and Ryuutarou because he was completely defenseless when he’s chanting. In other words, they must face the demonic beasts aiming for Kouki. Naturally, even if Shizuku and Ryuutarou could not cope with it, they would still desperately fight back with considerable vigor even with injuries.



“Do you think I’ll let you escape?” When she said this, the Demon race woman ordered the demonic beasts to block the passage behind Kouki’s party. Then, she began to chant magic, with the chanting Kouki as her target.



However, that’s when something abnormal began to happen to the Demon race woman.



“””””ROOOOAR!!”””””



“Kh!? Why!”



Somehow, five of the Chimeras that should be her allies were attacking the woman. While being surprised with widely opened eyes, she immediately resumed and used a shortened chant to activate her magic. High density of dust clouds became swirling blades with the woman in the center, cutting two of the attacking Chimeras. The attacks from the remaining Chimeras were somehow avoided by blowing herself away using the dust clouds.



The Demon race woman yelled, “Why am I being attacked!?” She was agitated while staring at the Chimeras that attacked her. Then, she noticed something — all of the Chimeras had parts of their bodies destroyed. There’s one that was headless, and one with a deep scar in its body which still had blood dripping from it even now.



“These…”



Just as the Demon race woman noticed, the five Chimeras that attacked her were the ones defeated by Kouki. The should-be-dead Chimeras stood up and attacked her. The situation was unreal until the Demon race woman recalled a certain magic and muttered, “Don’t tell me…”



“I won’t let you disturb Kouki-kun!”



As she shouted so, Eri swung her hand like a baton and made the corpses of the Chimeras surround the Demon race woman.



“Tch! Necromancer, huh! I didn’t get such information!”



The Demon race woman had prior investigations before she waited in ambush for Kouki’s party. From the information, there’s no mention of someone capable using super difficult magic such as Necromancy, so this situation was completely unexpected. That was because, even though Eri had “Necromancer” as her class, she was bad at it and never use Necromancy in actual combat, but now this fact worked in their favor.



Even if I am bad at it, I’ll just overcome it! Eri thought while she glared at the Demon race woman with a powerful gaze, and skillfully manipulated the Chimeras as though it wasn’t her first time doing it in actual combat. However, she was just going to buy time rather than defeating the Demon race woman.



In the meantime, Kaori used “Focus” and “Ten Thousand Heavens” on Suzu. Among the party members, Suzu was the one in the direst situation, which was why she decided on focusing healing Suzu first. “Ten Thousand Heavens” was a mid-ranked healing magic of the light element capable of curing abnormal statuses. However, the petrification magic was a considerably strong magic, and she couldn’t cured it all. Though the holes in her abdomen and arm were immediately recovered, she had lost a considerable amount of blood. She was in such a critical situation where needed immediate rest. It was also necessary to heal the hole in her leg the moment her petrification is undone.



Nomura, with a petrified left side of his body, had been diligently worked on to be released from his abnormal state by Tsuji Ayako. Tsuji Ayako had a high aptitude for healing magic, but the fact that Nomura had high resistance against earth magic, made his recovery rate considerably faster. His petrified leg had already been cured.



However, even with that, Tsuji Ayako could only grit her teeth when she sneaked a peek at Kaori swinging her white wand. Although their class was the same, “Healer,” Kaori was obviously above her in terms of capability. Kaori was using magic to simultaneously heal Suzu who had far more serious injuries than Nomura. In addition, she sometimes used healing magic on Shizuku and Ryuutarou who were in battle to defend Kouki. It was a feat impossible to be mimicked by Ayako. She was mortified and felt miserable because she couldn’t heal all of her allies while being in a dire situation.



Although Nomura seemed to want to say something to Ayako in regards to what she was feeling, he thought it was not the right time, so he bore the pain and muttered an incantation.



With their fighting force deceased and Kouki out of the fight, Hiyama and Nakano were covered in wounds as they confronted many demonic beasts. On the other side, Nagayama’s party and Eri, who were protecting the two healers, noticed they had almost reached their limits. With the current flow, it would only be several minutes before they completely exhaust themselves.



Light gathered in Kouki’s Holy Sword, but Nakano, who was about to cry at any moment, panicked when she thought of this as a suicidal action. The party members anxiously waited for the time… which finally came.



“Here I go! “Heavenly Downpour”!”



One flashing line fired from the thrusted up Holy Sword. The light exploded and scattered before the ceiling, pouring down towards the surrounding demonic beasts like meteors.



This “Heavenly Downpour” was an attack magic from light element where it flew above enemies, could pinpoint several enemies, and attacked them simultaneously. Its power wasn’t that high since its power was distributed among the scattered lights, and was originally used to clean up a lot of small fries. But in “Limit Break” state, this bombing-like magic was enough to clean up demonic beasts in 50th floor.



However, the abnormally strong demonic beasts brought by the demon race woman didn’t receive that much damage as expected, and at most, it only blew them away from his comrades as far as possible. But it was enough for Kouki. By creating a gap, his comrades would be able to retreat while the demon race woman was still occupied by the Chimera controlled by Eri.



Having confirmed so, Kouki demonstrated the characteristic of the magic which had a stupidly long chanting.



“”Converge”!”



As it pour down from the heaven, the rain of light that made the demonic beasts retreat temporarily, once again converged into the Holy Sword. The spectacle where the meteors converged as they left trails was quite a fantastic scene. Kouki thrusted the Holy Sword straight, and it shone as it cladded in light towards the demonic beasts that positioned themselves before the passage the retreat path of him and his comrades. With a war cry, he pulled the last trigger from the a series of magic.



“”Heavenly Claws Downpour”!”



Immediately, numerous meteors shot like a bombardment when his thrusted the Holy Sword forward. Even though it looked the same as previous attack, it had far stronger power since Kouki used his trump card, “Heaven Might,” and naturally it swept away the demonic beasts that closed their retreat path.



Normally, even if he wanted to use “Heaven Might,” the chant was long and he didn’t want Shizuku and Ryuutarou to protect him any longer than needed.



Even so, “Heavenly Claws Downpour” was the best technique he had in the current situation. The meteor-like torrent of lights went straight towards the demonic beasts blocking their retreat path, and caused numerous explosions simultaneously at the moment of impact. The bombardment that consisted of numerous light bullets exploded like the cluster bomb. The consecutive impacts resulted in the broken balance of the demonic beasts as they were being blown away.



“””ROOOOAR!!”””



The demonic beasts screamed as they closed their eyes. “Heavenly Claws Downpour” had an additional effect, blindness, caused by looking at the flash. The strong light generated in close proximity burnt their sights. Rubbing their eyes with their backhands, the demonic beasts blindly rampaged.



These demonic beasts were already out of Kouki’s party’s path of retreat. A way had opened straight to the passage.



“Now! Let’s retreat!”



With Kouki’s order, everyone simultaneously moved. Nagayama had carried the petrified Kondou and Saitou on his shoulders while Endou shouldered the fainted Suzu. Even though his left arm was still petrified, Nomura stood up by himself, endured the acute pain, and began to run towards the passage.



“Tch! Don’t let them escape! Capture them!”



While fighting the last two Chimeras, the demon race woman ordered the unharmed demonic beasts. The demonic beasts moved as instructed and began their pursuit at once. Chimeras, four-eyed wolves, and black cats, they were all swift-footed demonic beasts, and the distance between them and Kouki’s party was shortened in less than no time.



It was at that time Nomura turned around. With pained face, he thrusted out his right hand and revealed a fearless smile.



“Don’t ever think I’ll be defeated in earth magic! It’s my payback! “Final Prison”!”



The same swirling grey orb just like the demon race woman’s magic shot out from Nomura’s hand. The magic orb transmitting petrification smoke collided with the incoming demonic beasts. When the demon race woman activated “Final Prison” a while ago, even without her saying anything, the demonic beasts immediately distanced themselves. That’s why Nomura the demonic beasts could sense the danger that lies within the spell, and chanted it in preparation to use on the pursuer as he was retreating.



What Nomura concluded turned out to be true. The moment the grey orb shot out, the charging demonic beasts immediately slammed on their brakes and began to jumped back to distance themselves and return to their previous location. At the same time, the smoke became a smokescreen concealing the appearances of Kouki and his comrade as they were retreating.



In addition, Endou used magic to erase the remains of magic power and traces of their smells. Endou’s class was an “Assassin,” so he had natural talent in covert magic, and the demonic beasts were likely unable to pursue them.



The entrance of the previous room already looked smaller behind them, and maybe it was just their imagination, but mortified howls of demonic beasts seemed like it was resounding.



Kouki’s party felt mortified because of their ragged bodies and their comrades who could not open their eyes. However, they also feel glad they survived, and continued to run away without saying anything.





Volume 8 Chapter 3




Their current location was the deepest room in the 89th floor.



Currently, there were four entrances within the huge octagonal room, but there was actually one more passage that leads to a hidden room between two entrances. The size of the entrance to this closed room was about 10 tatami, and its entrance was splendidly camouflaged.



Inside the room was Kouki’s party, who were resting in complete relief. However, their expressions were uniformly gloomy. There were only those who cast their gaze down in deep frustration. Everyone was covered in wounds, so a lot of them had expressions distorted by pain.



Normally, Kouki would use his charisma to encourage everyone, but now, his whole body was attacked by severe exhaustion due to the recoil from “Limit Break,” and he leaned his body in towards the wall, shutting his mouth in silent.



In addition, at such a time, the class moodmaker who could not read the mood in a good way had a pale face due to the loss blood, and was sleeping with rough breathing as she frowned in pain. This fact was also one of the reasons which made everyone depressed.



Suzu’s lower half was still petrified from the knees down, and so Kaori was still continuing the treatment. Her pierced thigh had already been healed. What was left was to undo her petrification. However, Suzu had lost a large amount of blood from the attacks of the tentacles. There was the possibility that her vital blood vessels were damaged. But it could also be said that Kaori made it in time for the healing because she was Kaori.



To begin with, even Kaori was incapable of replenishing Suzu’s lost blood. Thus, she was limited to making Suzu drink the blood-increasing medicine from this world. It was the reason why Suzu’s physical condition would not return to normal immediately. It was necessary for her to rest.



Kaori had spent all of her time on Suzu, so the others didn’t receive her healing. Naturally, Saitou and Kondou who were petrified into object-like things were kept as they were. After Suzu’s treatment ended, next were the petrified two, and the other party members who understood there were still a long wait before it was their turn, didn’t complain, except for a small portion of them. It was simply because they did not have energy to do it.



Inside the dim room where the gloomy atmosphere drifted about, Shizuku wrinkled her forehead and was puzzled on how to encourage the others. Naturally, the taciturn Shizuku could not skillfully change the atmosphere, unlike Suzu. However, there was no one else to do so since Kouki was also weakened due to the effect of “Limit Break” and his defeat, so she thought she must somehow do something. She was thinking in such manner because she naturally cared about others. A true worldly-wise person.



Shizuku herself was nearing her limit both physically and mentally, and she was gradually troubled by thinking of what to do. Thus, she decided to make an unable-to-read-the-mood-style gag with the resolution of dying a honorable death. However, when she considered again, she felt as though she felt herself breaking. Then, Nomura and Tsuji Ayako appeared from the improvised passage and they conversed.



“Fuu, I think it somehow turned into a good camouflation. But as expected, I am exhausted after using such a delicate magic… I’m already at my limit.”



“It’s not in your field of expertise to be able to transform it into wall without any sense of incompatibility… But you even used only one magic array to do that, so it can’t be helped. Cheers for your hard work.”



“You also worked hard to completely undo my petrification, right? Thanks.”



From the conversation of these two people, the one who made this room and camouflaged the entrance into the surrounding wall was the “Earth Magic-user,” Nomura Kentarou.



“Earth Magic-user” held high aptitude towards Earth-Element magic which directly manipulates the ground, but it could not do delicate work such as manufacturing and forming such as “Transmutation.” For example, it could create a bulge in the ground, make rocks fly up from the ground, harden the ground to create a stone spear, or controlling clouds of sand. In addition, for someone high-ranked, they could use petrification spells and create Golems (completely non-independent doll). However, an Earth Magic user could not produce things by separating or mixing various minerals.



That’s why, though it was possible to roughly create a hole on the wall using magic array at hand, to be able to “form” a wall similar to the surrounding walls, Nomura could do nothing but constructed it using only one magic array.



It should be noted that Tsuji Ayako had treated Nomura after he had undid his petrification.



“Thanks for your hard work, Nomura-kun. We should be able to gain some time with this.”



“… I hope so. Well, with this I can do nothing but pray we won’t be found until everyone has recovered. About Kousuke… we can only pray, too, huh.”



“… Kousuke should be okay. He won’t lose to anyone in term of the thinness of his shadow.”



“No, Juugo. Don’t say that, I feel bad just by hearing it…”



The talk about the increasing safety of their hiding place made the depressed atmosphere slightly relaxed, and Shizuku smiled as she treated Nomura kindly due to the cancellation of creating a black history of her.



On the other hand, Nomura had a bitter smile as he prayed and looked into the distance towards one of his bestfriends who was not here now.



That’s right, currently one of their companions was not here. He was Endou Kousuke. With “Assassin” as his class, he was Nagayama Juugo and Nomura Kentarou’s best friend. He was neither gloomy nor a poor talker, but his existence was a forgettable one. He was a normal high school boy who could speak casually with anyone, but somehow “his shadow is thin.” His figure would be gone before anyone noticed it while saying, “Huh? Where is he?,” as they looked at the surrounding only to be surprised that he was right beside them. He demonstrated elusiveness without any intention of doing it at all. And, of course, it was also the same story when they were still in Japan.



Though the person himself was extremely unwilling, his ability was currently the most useful. Endou alone separated from the party and went to explain the situation to Meld and the Knights. Normally, no matter how much of a cheat the summoned person was, it was suicidal to run through the level 80ish floors alone. Even Kouki’s party had little room to spare in conquering the floors, only because there were 15 people cooperating.



But, if it was Endou, a man who could puff up his chest while saying, “The world’s thinnest shadow!,” he could take full advantages of his stealth skills and possibly be capable of reaching the 70th floor where Meld and the Knights were without being found by any demonic beast. Thinking so, Kouki’s party sent Endou off.



When he left, Endou was slightly teary eyed… surely, he felt something by leaving alone to retreat from his companions. It could not be from his companions’ persuasion words, such as: “If it’s you with your thin shadow, even keen demonic beasts won’t notice you! Only you have a thin shadow that won’t lose to anyone, so you must be able to break through the demonic beasts without being noticed.”



Truthfully, Kouki’s party wanted to immediately withdraw from the upper floors. However, to their regrets, they didn’t have any reserve strength left to do so. Within the party members who were covered in wounds, three of them were in no condition for battle while Kouki was in a weakened state, so they didn’t think they would be able to break through the 80’s floors.



Of course, they also didn’t think Meld and the Knights would come to rescue them. Including Meld, only six people were capable of building their base on the 70th floor. In the party’s minds, even by gaining help from other Knight members and the guild’s high-ranked adventurers, whose strength came close to Meld, it should be within the safety margin for Meld and the others to reached the latter half of 70’s floors, more than that was asking for the impossible.



Even with that, it would not have any meaning if Kouki’s party didn’t break through the 80ish floors by themselves. In other words, rather than to call for rescue, the purpose for Endo to go alone was to inform them about their situation and the Demon Race woman who lead the demonic beasts.



Kouki’s party had certainly heard from Ishtal and the others from the Church of the Saints that the Demon Race was amassing demonic beasts, not by brainwashing, but enslavement, since the beasts still carried their own wills. But, they never heard of such strong demonic beasts. And the astounding thing about the demonic beasts should be the “number” not their individual strength.



In fact, the demonic beasts the Demon Race woman lead had easily cleared the human untrodden 90th floor of «Orcus Great Dungeon» and overwhelmed Kouki’s party even with the cheats they carried. Such things made it strange if the human race was not destroyed sooner.



In other words, Ishtal’s information was not mistaken and the conclusion was still that the demonic beasts the Demon Race controlled “had became stronger.” Not only their “number” but also their individual strength was astounding. Kouki’s party judged this information should be conveyed by all means.



“Shirasaki-san. Please take care of Kondou-kun and Saito-kun’s de-petrification. It’ll take too much time if it is me. But, leave the healing of the others to me.”



“Un, okay. Don’t push yourself too hard, Tsuji-san.”



“I will be okay. Rather, that’s my line… sorry. If only I was stronger, Shirasaki-san’s responsibility would be decreased…”



On the side of the conversing with Nomura and the others, Ayako was drinking the potion for recovering magic power and she said to Kaori who was still continuing Suzu’s treatment. Though both were “healers,” Ayako’s abilities was far inferior compared to Kaori’s, and even though she didn’t show it, Ayako felt herself pathetic and full of apologies, since she could only add more responsibility to Kaori.



“There is no such thing,” Kaori replied so with a wry smile, then Ayako turned to heal their companions. Even if it’s slight, darkness disappeared from their companions’ faces when they recovered by Ayako’s healing. Nomura was watching Ayako with a face as though he wanted to say something, but he could not raise a voice since he felt he’d only disturbing her work.



“… In such a situation. Just speak if there’s something you want to say.”



“… Shut up.”



Nagayama said to Nomura with an expression as if he finds something amusing, but Nomura turned his face away as if sulking.



After that, several tens of hours passed. Kouki’s party’s bodies and minds were gradually recovered and they took turns to sleep.



* * *



On the other side, one person, Endou Kousuke was retreating with the entrusted information about the Demon Race. He walked steadily aiming for 70th floor, where Meld and the Knights were, without entering even one battle.



In the 80th floors, if he was noticed by the demonic beasts, one on one would work out somehow but multiple on one was an out for him. That’s why, while hurrying up as much as possible, he advanced with prudent thoughts. Thanks to that, he was able to pass right before demonic beasts unnoticed, even now.



After the demonic beasts were out his sight, Endou got off of the ceiling where he stuck himself. The figure which was completely clad in black to make the best use of “Invisibility,” made him look just like an “Assassin.” Surely, even the demonic beasts he had just passed by earlier would receive huge damage if they were to receive a surprise attack from the ceiling. In his mind, he didn’t think, “… At least feel a little of my presence…” There was no glittering at the edge of his eyes when he saw the demonic beasts pass through without noticing him at all. Absolutely not.



“I must hurry…”



Endo understood the mission imposed on him. He had guessed Kouki and the others had sent him off to transmit the information which also meant he must survive. Nagayama and Nomura said, “Do not return here,” but their wish was transmitted without the need for words.



However, after he fulfilled his duty, Endou was going to return to where Kouki and the others were. No matter what was said, he would not feel good if he was the only one who retreated to safety.



He felt somewhat empty because the demonic beasts didn’t notice him, but it was the best weapon for the current Endou as he traced the returning route memorized in his head, and finally he reached 70th floor.



While suppressing his impatience, he went towards the room with the teleport circle where Meld and the others set their base. After a while, Endo’s Sign Perception perceived the presence of six people. There’s no mistake they were Meld and the Knights. With this distance, the others should’ve noticed him since he had deactivated “Invisibility.”



Endo turned at the last corner and arrived at teleportation room where Meld and the Knights were. However, even though his figure could completely be seen, Meld and the Knights didn’t notice him at all. Endo then approached Meld with eyes of a dead fish, and called him.



“Commander! It’s me! Please notice me! It’s an emergency!”



“Uoh!? What!? Is it enemy’s attack!?”



At the moment Endou raised his voice, Meld yelled, drew his sword, jumped back, and looked at the surrounding with vigilance. Even the other Knights were surprised and shaken for a moment, then they entered battle stance.



“Like I said, it’s ME! Seriously, please don’t give such reactions!”



“Eh? Wait, it’s Kousuke, huh. Don’t surprise me like that. Rather, what happened to the others? Besides, aren’t you somewhat ragged?”



“I said it before, there’s an emergency!”



When Meld and the Knights understood it was Endou, they relaxed their shoulders because they knew how thin Endou’s shadow was. However, Endou returned earlier than scheduled, and it was only him. Furthermore, Endou was ragged and covered in wounds, that’s why their expressions became stern and guessed something must’ve happened.



As he was hurting because of the fact even the Kingdom’s elite Knights were incapable of noticing him unless he called out to them. However, Endou thought it was not the time for that and he began to talk about the situation rapidly.



At first, Meld and the Knights put on dubious expressions, but their expression tightened as Endo advanced in his story. Then, maybe because his heart was shaken when his story reached to where he retreated alone, Endou was drown in tears and his head was patted.



“Don’t cry, Kousuke. You are doing something only you can do. Do you think any of them can run through 20 floors in such a short time without even a fight? You’ve done well. I’ve certainly received your words.”



“Commander… I, I’ll return to them now. Even though they’d be able to return here by themselves… even if this time they said they won’t lose… Amanogawa was unable to defeat the enemies even with “Limit Break.” All we could do was to run away. Everyone is considerably exhausted, so even if their injuries heal… if they are attacked… we still don’t understand everything about those bastard demonic beasts… that’s why, please return to the surface and convey this information.”



So ashamed that he was crying, Endou rubbed his eyes with his sleeve, and said with a resolute expression.



Meld bit his lip in regret, and handed over the tool bag filled with all of the highest grade healing potions and everything else inside. The other Knights copied Meld’s actions, and entrusted their tool bags to Endo, feeling mortified.



“I can only apologize, Kousuke. Although we want to rescue them together… we will just be a hindrance to you…”



“Ah, no, please don’t worry about that. There’s a considerable decrease in the number of our potions, so it will surely help us.”



Saying that, Endou shook the tool bags where various potions were kept with a wry smile, but Meld’s frown only deepened. It was not only because he was mortified with his incapability of helping them, but also due to the bitterness.



“… Kousuke. Now, I will say the worst thing I can say. I don’t care if you scorn me because it’s natural. However, I want you to hear it.”



“Eh? What’s with this all of a sudden…”



“… No matter what happens, please take only “Kouki” back.”



“Eh?”



Meld’s words made Endou dumbfounded.



“Kousuke. If the demonic beasts are so strong and capable of putting the current you into such a predicament… the Human Race won’t have any future if we lose Kouki. Of course, I believe all of you can go through this and meet again with us, and I wish for that… However, I must say this as the Commander of Herrlicht Kingdom’s Knights. If by some chance it comes to that, please let “Kouki” live.”



“…”



Endou finally guessed what Meld meant and was dumbfounded. It was to sacrifice anyone to keep the more important one alive, a “choice” that must be done for someone with duty. It was something Endou never thought of. Therefore, Endou’s expression had become awfully bitter.



“… We, are we just extras added to Amanogawa?”



“Of course not. For it is true I wish and desire for everyone’s survival. No, such words don’t have any persuasiveness after I said that… Kousuke, at the very least I want you to convey those words to Shizuku and Ryuutarou.”



“…”



Meld’s words made Endou’s feelings darken. Meld, Endou, and the others had spent much time together. He was always by their sides ever since their beginner days in this world, and they had fought together for a long time. Meld was a big brother-like existence for the students who went to the front lines, and someone they trusted more than anyone in this world. That’s why, Endou felt betrayed by Meld who said to cast them away.



Still, he understood the necessity of what Meld said in the corner of his mind, so he could not curse him. With a dark expression, Endo only nodded and turned on his heels.



However, at that moment…



“Kousuke!?” “Eh!?”



Meld suddenly pushed Kousuke aside and cliiiiing!!, the sound of metal grinding against metal rang out, it came from the drawn sword swung in an arc. Following that, he rotated once and sent a splendid kick towards the blurred space.



BooOOOm!



With such a sound, the blurred space was blown backward. Next, numerous claw marks appeared on the ground five meter from where they were. The claws were probably used to deaccelerate.



Seeing that, Endou, who fell on his butt, turned pale and muttered.



“I-Impossible. For them to catch up now…”



As though using those words as a signal, demonic beasts that had tracked Endo and the Knights, appeared one by one. Endou remained sitting on the ground, shaken to be caught this fast. Until he arrived here, he had used “Assassin” skills to erase his presence, smell, and magic trace while moving. The Demon Race woman was moving while searching for Kouki and the others, so it shouldn’t be possible to catch up with Endou who ran straight to the 70th floor.



Endou’s doubt was erased by the nightmare-like woman who appeared next.



“Tch. Only one, huh… I thought they had escape here where the teleport circle was… Looking at this, looks like they are hiding somewhere.”



Twirling her hair in irritation, the Demon Race woman who appeared riding on a four-eyed wolf’s back, made Meld and the Knights enter battle mode. From her words, the woman thought Kouki’s party would run towards the teleportation circle, and that’s why she came straight to this floor. With her guess off, she seemed to be irritated because she now needed to search around to look for Kouki and the others.



At the same time, it could be said Kouki and the others were still safe. Endou, Meld, and the Knights looked relieved, and smiled faintly. The demon race woman noticed them and snorted towards Endou and the Knights.



“Whatever, I also have a duty here… Let’s quickly kill them and begin our search.”



Immediately, all of the demonic beasts came attacking. The Chimeras charged and made the space blur, while the black cats covered the distance like a gale. The Brutal-look-alikes were approaching with maces in their hands, and the four-eyed wolves were looking for a chance from behind.



“Make a circle! Defend the teleport circle to the end! Kousuke! How long are you going to show that disgraceful attitude! Stand up and… run away! To the surface!”



“Eh!?”



As expected of the Kingdom’s elites of the elites. Meld and the Knights promptly made such a formation and cooperated against the incoming demonic beasts. From hearing Endou’s story about the demonic beasts a little while ago, they clearly knew they were obviously inferior in terms of offense, that’s why they chose to only defend and parry.



Endou slipped a surprised voice when Meld said, “Escape to the surface.” If it’s escaping, it would be better if all of us go together. When Meld said for him to get away from this place, Endou felt that rather than going to the surface, he had a responsibility to return to where Kouki and the others were.



“Stop daydreaming! Tell the surface about the Demon Race!



“B-But, Commander Meld and the Knights…”



“We are… going to made this place our graves! Kousuke! Destroy the teleport circle once you get to the other side! It’ll at least buy you some time!”



“Th-That’s…”



Meld’s intention was clear. Even if they went to the surface, the demonic beasts would immediately teleport, too, if no one bought them even a little bit of time. If that happened, they’d lose the method to lose the pursuers, and they were likely to be killed when the pursuers catches up. Therefore, the best choice was for only one to escape while the rest buys him some time. If the time could be bought, the other teleportation circle on 30th floor could be destroyed, and he’d lose the pursuers. The teleportation circle was the type carved on the ground, so it could be restored using “transmutation.” After one had escaped and told the stationed force on the surface about this, they only have to restore the circle, and it could be used again by Kouki and the others.



The one chosen to escape was Endou, but because Meld previously said to cast away anyone other than Kouki, Endou was puzzled because this time he was told to escape at the expense of the Knights. It was the reason why he could not move immediately.



Toward such an Endou, Meld roared his deepest wish as the intense battle unfolded.



“I am sorry for being powerless! I am sorry I could not help you! I am sorry you weren’t the chosen one! Kousuke! This is the last wish of the worthless me! So please hear it!”



Toward the puzzled Endou, the big bro-like man’s last wish was conveyed.



“Don’t die!”



Those words made Endou understand everything. Meld, in reality, never wanted to let anyone die. If someone must be sacrificed to let the others survive, it would rather be the Knights. Meld and the Knights wished for not only Kouki, but all of the students to survive. For him to be “chosen” made Endou full of bitterness.



Endou bit his lip and used all of his might to turn on his heel towards the teleport circle. It was because he felt he would not be a man if he didn’t answer the wish and resolution of Meld here.



“Don’t think you can!”



The Demon Race woman raised her hand towards a black cat while activating her own magic. The black cat shot out the tentacles on its back with a great velocity. In addition, stone spears also flew in the air riding on her killing intent.



Endou somehow managed to cut the tentacles with his shortsword, and bent his body to the side. It looked like he wouldn’t be able to evade the following stone spears. The reason for the his incapability of evading was because of the positioning of the tentacles, and the wonderful timing of the spears that came in succession. Endou gritted his teeth and prepared to receive the impact. Even if he was to receive the attack, he was determined to keep running and jump into the teleport circle.



However, the expected impact didn’t come. One of the Knight had jumped out of the formation and used his body to shield Endou.



“A-Alan-san!”



“Guh… don’t worry, and go!”



With the stone spear piercing his abdomen, the Knight named Alan swung his sword to parry the attack of the incoming demonic beasts, and said to Endou with a truly manly smile. Endou strongly bit his lip as though he was biting it off, and ran towards the teleport circle.



“Tch! What persistent small fries! Aim for that boy!” The Demon Race woman sent out new order in a little haste… but it was too late.



“Hah, this is our victory! Don’t you look down on Herrlicht Kingdom’s Knights!”



Meld revealed a fearless smile as he shouted. At the same time, Endou activated the teleportation circle and disappeared. The Demon Race woman ignored Meld’s words and thrust her hand towards the demonic beast. The demonic beast could directly manipulate magic power, so the teleportation circle could be activated without the need for troublesome chanting. Thus, she thought she could still make it in time, if she was quick enough.



However,



“I told you not to look down on us!”



Meld and the Knights had skillful techniques and teamwork Kouki’s party didn’t have. Using their experiences, they obstructed the incoming demonic beasts’ movements. They were outnumbered, but their defense skill and ability were praiseworthy.



To begin with, it was abnormal for Meld and the Knights to confront these many powerful demonic beasts, no matter how much of a desperate effort they put forth. Alan, whose abdomen pierced by stone spear, was finally exhausted and the balance was destroyed when he fell on his knees, and could not persist against the demonic beasts anymore. With that opening, one of the Chimeras breached their defense line and reached the teleport circle.



The Chimera disappeared the same time the glow of the magic circle was lost.



“Kuh, one, passed, huh… Kousuke… don’t die.”



Meld’s mutters was erased by the demonic beasts’ roars. Unable to stomach that she let Endou escape, the Demon Race woman sent the demonic beasts simultaneously towards Meld and the Knights.



“Fuh, we have decided our grave would be here, so let’s rampage to the end. Guys, show them the spirit of Herrlicht Kingdom’s Knights.”



“””””Ou!”””””



With Meld’s instruction, his subordinate Knights answered with a high-spirited shout. The spirit put into their shouts, even though it was just for a moment, made the surrounding demonic beasts flinch.



… Ten minutes passed



Silence once again returned to the room with teleportation circle on the 70th floor.



* * *



“Uwaaaaa—!!”



With a shout mixed in between scream and war cry, Endou jumped out from the teleportation circle in «Orcus Great Dungeon»’s 30th floor, immediately wielded his shortsword, and tried to destroy the magic circle before him.



“Wh-What!? Eh, you! What are you doing!?”



“Stop him.”



“Catch him.”



A black-clothed boy appeared from the teleportation circle, suddenly raised a shout and began to destroy the magic circle with the sword in his hand. This made the surrounding people, dressed as Knights, stand in blank surprise for a moment then they raised angry roars and jumped at Endou to obstruct his destructive action.



These guys were Meld’s subordinates who was responsible of protecting the teleportation circle on the 30th floor. Because of the force deficiency, there were people who were at their limit just by guarding the 30th floor. Unable to destroy the magic circle with a blow, Endou struck for the second time, for the third time, and when he only need one more swing to destroy the circle, he was barely stopped from destroying the magic circle.



“L-Let go! If it’s not destroyed, quickly! Those bastards will-! Let go!”



“Wh-, aren’t you from the Hero’s party!? Why are you…”



After seeing him closely, the Knights knew the person acting like a madman was one of the hero’s companions, and the Knights spontaneously loosened their holds as they whispered voices of surprise. With that chance, Endou once again swung his shortsword and destroyed a part of the magic circle, but he was one step too slow.



The magic circle once again glowed and activated. Thus, in the next moment, a blurred space attacked Endou and the Knights.



“Damn it!”



“What’s—! Guuaaa!!”



Endou immediately jumped back and was barely able to evade the Chimera’s attack. However, the Knights who didn’t know the situation and should have been able to evade, defenselessly received the Chimera’s claw attack, and died with deeply torn armor.



One of their comrades who suddenly sprayed blood, made the other Knights panic. Endou frantically shouted towards the Knights with a voice filled with impatience.



“It’s an enemy! Be careful of the blurring space! More will come if we don’t destroy the magic circle!”



Endou’s scream-like voice made the Knights regain their senses. However, at the same time, one more person was slashed and blown away. There were seven people guarding the teleportation circle on the 30th floor. And now two had been killed.



Endou grit his teeth towards the fact and used an “Assassin” skill called “Wallrun,” to run on the ceiling and aimed to destroy the magic circle from above. However, the Chimera noticed him and tried to intercept him by jumping.



Although they still didn’t understand what had happened, the Knights guessed it was necessary and jumped towards the Chimera that was trying to attack Endou. However, the Knights could only see the Chimera as a blurred space, so naturally they didn’t understand what kind of attack it had; they understood nothing about it. That’s why, the Knight who jumped behind the Chimera had his neck bitten by the tail-snake, while the Knights right beside its flank was beaten by its wings and thrown to the ground.



Nevertheless, it was not meaningless. The Chimera somewhat lost its balance and Endou was able to evade its dangerous claws and fangs. It was not a complete evasion since his shoulder and flank were gouged, but the snake tail was slashed, and the Chimera fell into the ground when they passed each other.



The Chimera flapped its wings to regain its balance to land on the ground slightly away from them, while Endou immediately stood up after he fell on his shoulder and simultaneously swung his short sword in his hand towards the previously damaged teleportation circle.



At the same time it landed, the Chimera turned around and once again rushed to kill Endou. However, at that time, Endou’s shortsword was already pierced the magic circle with all of his might.BAM!, a clear sound effect rang out. It was the evidence the magic circle had been destroyed. The trace of magic when the teleportation magic circle was used had disappeared.



“With this—… kh… gaa, AaAAAAAH!!!”



Succeeded in destroying the teleportation circle, Endou inadvertently leaked a relieved sigh because no more pursuers would come. However, the Chimera’s fangs bored into his right arm in the next moment, and he screamed due to the sharp pain. The strong jaws tried to bite off Endou’s right arm.



The Knights charged towards it and used all of their might to attack the Chimera in order to disturb it. The Chimera whose side were pierced by strengthened short spears, inadvertently loosened the force on its jaws. Endou pulled out his right arm, slipped out the concealed knife from his left sleeve, and slashed the Chimera’s eye.



The rampaging Chimera slashed two more Knights to death when they approached it to give it the finishing blows. Endou threw the knife in his hand, but the Chimera, with a slashed eye, evaded by instinct.



Immediately, one of the Knights suddenly raised a scream. He inadvertently looked towards the source and saw the Knight who previously had his neck bitten by the snake, was beaten to the ground. The Knight’s lips turned purple, writhed in pain, and died in no time.



“Damn it!”



Seeing that, the last Knight ran out to kill the snake, but it was a fatal mistake. The Chimera whose back was turned to the Knight noticed the incoming enemy and immediately attacked. Covered in wounds, Endou squeezed out all of his remaining strength, and activated his certain kill attack towards the neck of Chimera that attacked the Knight.



“DieeEEEEE!!”



Being separated from his companions, forced to desert Meld and the Knights, for the Knights he knew to be killed, and various grudges mixed into his shout, he struck a fatal blow demonstrating all of his power. He tore the Chimera’s neck from the nape, and it died in a moment.



Due to the inertia, Endou who sprang from the Chimera’s flank, crossed it, and rolled tremendously once he reached the ground. Enduring the pain in his shoulder, right arm, and flank, Endou lifted his upper body with his left arm to confirm, and burn the Chimera’s death into his eyes.



The Chimera laid quietly looking to be completely dead due to the partly torn up neck. However, Endou’s expression was weak as though he was going to cry rather than feeling joy, and he couldn’t help but whisper, “Damn it!”



Before his gaze was the figure of the last Knight who rushed out. He was falling prone. With sword gripped in his right hand, his face had turned purple. Beside him, was the torn up snake. Perhaps, right before the Chimera attacked, he slashed the snake that sprung to him and his face might be bathed by the toxin inside its body. Resultantly, all of the Knights who were guarding 30th floor had been annihilated.



Because he could not save even one person, Endou cried as he shouted, “Damn it!,” many times. He shouted the same words for a while, and Endou, who thought he had died due to blood loss, took out the highest grade ointments and recovery potions from the tool bags he got from Meld and the Knights. After his wounds were treated by the emergency set, he silently lined the Knights’ corpses in a corner of the room where the teleportation circle was.



For a little while, Endou watched the Knights’ figures, and slowly turned around to advanced a step toward the surface. His face was as pale as a ghost, and his eyes were hollow without any ambition. Thinking “Once again only I survived,” Endou’s heart was tightened by a heavy, cold chain. The current him moved his body just like a machine that only had to fulfill the role he was entrusted with, and he single-mindedly aimed towards the surface.





Volume 8 Chapter 4




“Hyahha—! Yeah!” As if such a sound could be heard, a dense, enormous, and fierce pressure mercilessly attacked the Adventurers aiming at Hajime’s party. The bloodlust that was previously coming from the Adventurers seemed nothing but a childish tantrum compared to this. As if also carrying physical force, the immature Adventurers immediately lost their consciousness while all of the standing Adventurers were re-seated without even having the time to tremble.



With Raisen Grand Canyon to their left, and a magnificent meadow to their right, the magic driven two and four-wheelers advanced towards the west with the sun at their backs. Raising a cloud of dust on the highway as it advanced by the four-wheeler’s side, the two-wheeler went back and forth between the barren ground and the meadow by the canyon side as it roared noisily, merrily even.



“… Seems like Shia is in a good mood. She even shouted just like those guys from the end of the century.”



“… Hmm. I also want to try it.”



In the four-wheeler’s driver seat, Hajime muttered with an amazed expression with one hand steering the vehicle, while the elbow of his other hand was on the window frame. Just as Hajime said, Shia was not riding on the four-wheeler. She was driving the two-wheeler alone.



To begin with, Shia truly liked the feeling of cutting through the wind as the two-wheeler advanced, but the number of people had increased recently and their main transportation method changed to that of the four-wheeler, which made her dissatisfied. Though she could feel the wind if she put her head out the window, she could not be satisfied with that and she could not stick to Hajime like when they used the two-wheeler because the seat next to him was reserved for Yue. Thus, she asked Hajime to teach her how to drive the two-wheeler.



The magic-driven two-wheeler could be operated easily as long as one could use direct magic power manipulation. Depending on the circumstances, direct magic power manipulation could also be used to control the steering without the need to grip it. Thus, this was not that difficult for Shia, and she quickly learned how to drive it. Following that, she became enamoured with the two-wheeler.



Even now, she moved left and right while squeaking, she even drifted and popped a wheelie. Furthermore, she also did jackknife and backride techniques which would not lose to a professional extreme motorcycle stunt artist. The acceleration and braking could be done by manipulating her magic power, so it was far easier to operate than the one on Earth… Still, she kept up with Hajime’s pace. Shia’s rabbit ears even said, “Hey, hey, what do you think about my technique?” as they sometimes turned towards Hajime with a somewhat cheeky expression, which was simply irritating.



Occasionally, there were those whose character would change when they drive, and Shia might be one of them. Seeing Shia, Yue by Hajime’s side also wanted to try driving it herself. Yue even said, “Hyahha—!” but Hajime decided to absolutely stop her as he felt the mood would become awful. Also, beside Hajime was the three or four year-old Myuu putting her head out of the window at Yue’s side, as she steadily climbed from Yue’s lap with sparkling eyes. Pointing her hand towards Shia, who began to stand while steering with one hand, Myuu began pleading to Hajime.



“Papa! Papa! Myuu also wants to do that!”



“I already said you can’t.”



Sitting on Yue’s lap, Myuu, whose wish was denied began to whine and said, “No! Myuu wants to!” to Hajime. So as to not let the whining Myuu fall from the seat, Yue hugged her from behind and scolded her with, “…don’t whine!” “Uu~” Myuu raised a cute groan and Hajime showed a face as though to say it couldn’t be helped towards the depressed Myuu.



“Myuu. I’ll drive it with you later, so be patient.”



“Ehh~? Really?”



“Mhm. I won’t permit you to board it with Shia… but it’s okay if it is with me.”



“So, Myuu can’t drive it with Shia-oneechan?”



“Mhm, absolutely. Just look at her. This time she’s making a strange pose while steering. Though something come to my mind… I absolutely won’t let you get on the vehicle with someone who drives dangerously.”



Standing above the steer, Shia raised an American-like laughter while making a strange pose where her right hand’s fingers spreaded and hid her face while her left arm hung down with the shoulder slightly raised. As he stared at Shia who made Joke-like pose, Hajime pointed at Myuu. ‘Don’t copy Shia, okay?’, he said.



“To begin with, I don’t want you to get on the two-wheeler because it’ll be dangerous… should I make a child seat? The materials will be… mumble, mumble.”



“Yue-oneechan. Papa is mumbling. How strange.”



“… Hajime papa is just worried about Myuu… unexpectedly overprotective.”



“Fufu, does it mean Master is an unexpectedly indulgent person? Hmm, this gap somehow… haa, haa.”



“Yue-oneechan. Tio-oneechan is panting.”



“… It is an incurable disease so just ignore her.”



Serving as Myuu’s conversation partner, Yue patted Myuu’s head, who was gazing up at her.



Only a little time had passed since they started traveling with Myuu, but Hajime had already given up about Myuu calling him, “Papa.” At first, he used every possible means to change the way she called him, but Myuu began to tear up every time, and her trembling eyes silently appealed, “Is it bad? Does Papa hate Myuu?” Even Hajime, who was capable of beating the demonic beasts in the abyss to a pulp could not win against Myuu, just like how he could not go against Yue. Resultantly, he could not change it and it was established that he would be called “Papa.”



As he allowed (he gave up) her to call him “Papa,” Hajime began to worry about Myuu. Even now, it could be said he was being overprotective. Shia is a shameless rabbit while Tio is a pervert, so I must protect Myuu until she returns to her mother! or so he thought. During the time when he begins to be too meddlesome, Yue was the one who became the stopper, as well as the one in charge of teaching Myuu about common sense, and that’s the current composition of Hajime’s party.



Because Myuu was glued to Hajime, Yue couldn’t flirt with him, and she became somewhat dissatisfied, but she felt it could not be helped since she had also come to adore the cute Myuu.



While silently firing her magic towards Tio, who was panting and concentrating on her delusion in the back seat to silence her, Yue was covering Myuu’s ears since it would be bad for her education. Thus, with Hajime who was still mumbling about making the seat for Myuu, and Shia on the two-wheeler with only the rear wheel touching the ground, I must keep calm! Yue made an empty resolve.



* * *



Hajime’s party were currently at the Post Town, Holad.



Normally they would just pass through here, but because of a request from the head of Fhuren branch Adventurer Guild, Ilwa, they must stop on their way here. Even so, it didn’t take too much time as they passed here along their way to «Guryuu-en Great Desert».



Hajime walked towards Holad branch guild along the main street with nostalgic gaze. Riding on Hajime’s shoulders, Myuu noticed his state and used her small hand to tap on Hajime in curiosity.



“Papa? Did something happened?”



“Nn? Ah~, well, I’ve come here before… though it’s only been four months, it feels like years to me…”



“… Hajime, are you okay?”



Yue, whose hands were affixed on Hajime’s arm, had a complex expression while looking at him anxiously. Hajime shrugged and his atmosphere returned to the usual in the next moment.



“Ah, there’s no problem. It’s just that, I was absorbed in my emotions because it’s been such a long time. I remember that everything started here… After a night spent in tension, fear, and even desperation, I went to the dungeon on the next day… and then I fell.”



“…”



Hajime felt that in a way, that day could be called a fateful day. His monologue made Yue and the girls listen to him in a serious mood. Yue was silently looking at Hajime. And Tio asked Hajime questions out of curiosity.



“Hmm. Dost Master want to return to that day? After all, there’s the case of Master’s companions, too, right? Though Master hast his own circumstances… After all, thither’s not only those whom hast hurteth master, right? Was thither not someone master got along with?”



Because Tio’s relationship with Hajime’s party was still shallow, she would sometimes frankly ask about things she should be careful about even though she knew what was going through Hajime’s mind. It was because she didn’t want to only become a travel companion, so Tio put forth great effort to truly become a comrade in Hajime’s party. Although she was a pervert, in a way she favored Hajime.



That’s why Hajime listened to Tio’s question without being bothered by it. Thus, he exhaled and recalled the midnight tea party under the moonlight. With the unpalatable tea, there was the white negligee and black hair which reflected the moonlight, whose owner swore to protect him, and at the last moment, she stretched her hand out towards him with a bitter expression as her companions pinioned her…



Unexpectedly, he felt a trembling hand on his arm which made him regain his senses. When he looked at the source, Yue was looking straight at him with strong, resolute gaze, and her trembling hand tightly grasped Hajime’s sleeve.



Hajime matched Yue’s gaze and returned to silently gazing at her with a soft and gentle gaze.



“Certainly, there was someone… However, even if I could return to those days, I will still tread on this path of mine.”



“Heh~, why?”



Although she knew the answer from Hajime’s expression, Tio still asked with a slightly amused expression. Without averting his gaze from Yue, Hajime used his other hand to gently grasp Yue’s hand which was grasping his sleeve. Yue had a faintly smiling expression, and her cheeks were slightly dyed in red.



“Of course… it’s because I want to meet Yue.”



“… Hajime.”



In the town of Holad, «Orcus Great Dungeon» made it possible to raise level quickly while selling the magic stones within the safety margin. Thus, Adventurers, Mercenaries, and Kingdom Soldiers gathered, together with a lot of merchants as their partner in business. The town displayed serious hustle and bustle. Naturally, the main street of such a town would have increased bustle.



Within the main street where a lot of people were doing their activities, Hajime and Yue suddenly halted and were looking at each other. They created their own world without minding their surroundings. They reached out to each other’s cheeks, and their atmosphere looked like they were about to kiss at any moment. Though they had somewhat gathered a crowd around them, and they were showered by gazes filled with curiosity and jealousy, Hajime and Yue didn’t notice them at all. They could only see each other.



“Tio-san, did you hear that? It isn’t “you” that Hajime-san wants to meet, is it? It’s only Yue-san. Once again, they created their own world. They don’t even care about their location and situation. And we can only watch them from the side, can’t we?



I feel it is about the time that such an atmosphere should be created between me and Hajime-san. Even though I’m always prepared to receive such treatment, it always passed me by, and to be treated as a regrettable character… No, I understand, you know? I know Yue-san is special. I yearn for a relationship just like those two, that’s why I want to stay together with them.



What I mean is, it’s natural Yue-san is special and I feel it’s a good thing. Rather, Hajime-san who neglects Yue-san is not Hajime-san. If that happens and Yue-san becomes sad because of it, I’ll be the one who beat Hajime-san to a pulp.



However, it is a however, kay? Recently, Hajime-san has become slightly dere~ I wonder if it’s about time I climb the stairs to adulthood~ I expected that, but it didn’t come true. No matter how special Yue-san is, wouldn’t it okay for Hajime-san to look at me a little more? It is shameful for a man to refuse a woman’s offer.



Even though it was easily understood that I welcomed him, he sloppily answered with a composed face to ignore it, this dimwit!, I thought so, but I never thought of complaining. I just want to flirt! Then, doing this and that on the bed! Even the hardcore play he did with Yue-san! I thought of those! So, what does Tio-san, the representative of all perverts, think!?”



“Sh-Shia. This one knows thou hast saved up thy resentment, but calm down. Rather, the one who shouted while not paying attention to the location is art thou. Also, to casually speak ill of this one in the end… To be treated as a pervert in such a public place, haa, haa, made everyone look at this one with cold gazes… Haa, haa, ngh, ngh.”



In the middle of the main street, the rabbit-eared girl shouted she wanted to do erotic things while speaking ill of the perverted beautiful woman whom began panting due to the atmosphere. The people who had gathered due to their curiosity were taken aback and they backed away.



“Papa~, Shia-oneechan and Tio-oneechan are…”



“Myuu. Don’t look at them. Just act as if we don’t know them.”



“…Shia… next time, I will tie Hajime and together with Shia…”



Shia’s shout was noticed by Hajime and Yue, and they returned to their senses. However, for now, they acted as though they didn’t know either Shia or Tio, and not looked at them because Myuu had become dumbfounded.



Although Yue whispered something frightening, Hajime decided he didn’t hear anything. But if he was worried about it, he would think of the possibility of the trap the next time he is with Yue. But he wanted to be pardoned from doing that. If it is Yue, such a thing… would not… happen, right? Surely, probably… it’ll be safe even though there’s a previous offense! Hajime tried to persuade himself.



Because from the distance, What’s with this commotion!, the town guards could be seen everywhere, Hajime reluctantly dragged Shia and Tio by the scruff of their necks to get out of this place. Every time they went to the town, gazes filled with envy and jealousy pierced Hajime who was surrounded by beautiful girls and beautiful woman… However, he didn’t know why only this time he felt there were a lot of sympathetic gazes. Surely it’s only his imagination.



* * *



Ignoring the gazes of the people, Hajime’s party finally arrived at Holad branch Adventurer Guild. With Myuu on his shoulders just like before, Hajime opened the guild’s door. Unlike the one in the other towns, the Holad branch’s door was made of metal. The heavy sound became a signal that someone was entering the building.



It was the first time he came here, since the last time he was in town, he neither had business here nor did he had the time to go to the adventurer guild. The atmosphere inside Holad branch was just like an adventurer guild Hajime had expected from the beginning.



There were broken parts of the walls and floor which were roughly patched up. Mud and stains from something were here and there, giving an insanitary impression. The interior was just like the other branches where the counter was near the entrance with a restaurant on the left. However, unlike the other branches, alcohol was served here, and there were old men hanging around to drink during the daytime. There was also the second floor where Adventurer-like people were looking down by the handrails. The people in the second floor gave off the atmosphere of a strong group. He didn’t know if it was an unspoken rule, but high-ranked Adventurers seemed to be on the second floor.



The atmosphere around the Adventurers was also different from the other towns. Everyone was glaring at them, and there was none of the heartwarming atmosphere compared to the one in Brook town. It could be said to be natural, because the Adventurers and Mercenaries were filled with spirit since these experts in battle and fighting demonic beasts would voluntarily enter the dungeon.



However, there was a tense atmosphere inside the guild and something seemed unusual. Something had obviously occurred since the Adventurers had serious expressions.



At the moment Hajime’s party entered the guild, the Adventurers turned their gazes towards them simultaneously. Their gazes were so sharp, that it felt like it would be able to penetrate through them which made Myuu, who was still riding on Hajime’s shoulders, to shout, “Eeek!,” and she quickly clung to Hajime’s head. Because Hajime appeared with a little girl on his shoulders while being surrounded by pretty girls and a beautiful woman, the Adventurers began to let out their bloodlust which contained various meaning. Myuu trembled even more. She was put down from Hajime’s shoulders, and was now held with his right hand. Myuu buried her head on Hajime’s chest to completely shut herself out of the surroundings.



With a youthful vigor, rather the Adventurers were just intoxicated by their own vigor, some of them began to stand from their seats. “Let’s beat up this brat,” was what their gazes implied, with an outburst of anger to release their resentment came from guild wrapped in bizarre atmosphere, and it was obvious they disliked Hajime’s party.



There was a possibility Hajime’s party were clients… but these Adventurers seemed to have never thought of that. The talk would be after they beat him up or something like that, and those who thought so, stepped forward towards Hajime.



However, Hajime, who recently became Papa, was an overprotective one. Even though it was temporary, he could not remain silent if someone frightened his daughter. Veins had already popped up on Hajime’s forehead and, contrary to his hand which was gently calming Myuu, his gaze was fierce.



Thus…



BaaaANG!!



As if that sound could be heard, a dense, enormous, and fierce pressure mercilessly attacked the Adventurers aiming at Hajime’s party. The bloodlust that previously came from the Adventurers was a childish tantrum compared to this. As if carrying physical force, too, the immature Adventurers immediately lost their consciousness while all of the standing Adventurers were re-seated without being given the time to tremble.



Even those who didn’t lose their consciousness from Hajime’s pressure, “Pressure” and “Magic Power Emission,” were desperately supporting their body and consciousness while most were trembling with pale faces, and with cold sweat.



After a moment that felt like an eternity, the pressure weakened. The Adventurers used that chance to frantically take a breath. Though there were those who accidentally pissed and vomited on themselves… Hajime was smirking to them while he spoke.



“Oi, to those aiming at us.”



“”””””” !”””””””



The Adventurers were surprised and shaken by Hajime’s voice. The gazes that timidly looked at Hajime had fear stuck in them as if they were looking at a monster. However, without caring about such a thing, Hajime demanded… ordered them.



“Laugh.”



“””””””Eh?”””””””



The Adventurers were puzzled due to the situation, ignoring order. So, Hajime continued his words.



“Did you not hear me? I said, laugh. Smile. Appeal to her that there’s nothing to be afraid of. Waves your hands, too. This child is frightened because of you. What will you do if she gets traumatized by it? Ah? Ah? So, amend for it.”



Then, don’t bring such a young child here!, was what the Adventurers wanted to retort, but they could not since the other party was a monster. Because Hajime’s sharp gaze pierced the puzzled them, they frantically tried to force a smile even though their cheeks were extremely stiff. Along with that, they began to wave their hands, too.



The appearance of the the fierce looking men with good body builds floating smile with cramped cheeks while lightly waving their hands, was truly surreal. However, without worrying about such things, Hajime nodded and whispered to Myuu whose face was buried in Hajime’s chest.



Because of what he said, Myuu timidly raised her face, and her moistened eyes looked up to Hajime. Next, she slowly turned around while being urged by Hajime’s gaze. Naturally, there were the fierce and trained people desperately trying to look friendly.



“Eeek!”



As expected, Myuu was still frightened and returned to Hajime’s chest. Hajime frowned. With more piercing glare at the Adventurers that said, “Bastard, what’s with this!” “Don’t be unreasonable!,” was what the Adventurers rebutted in their minds, and they finally turned their gazes towards Yue and the others by Hajime’s side to plead for help.



Receiving their gazes, “Haa~,” Yue sighed deeply, approached Myuu, and whispered something to her ear similar to what Hajime had done earlier. Thus, Myuu once again timidly raised her face and looked at the Adventurers. The Adventurers panickedly tried to look friendly.



For a while, Myuu silently watched the Adventurers and, as if she understood something, she smiled and waved her small hand back. Because her smile and gesture were so lovely, the trained men inadvertently calmed down while forgetting the situation. Hajime was also satisfied, and once again carried Myuu on his shoulders. Then, he walked towards the counter as though he didn’t have any more interest in the Adventurers.



The moment Hajime’s party arrived before the counter, ignoring the crumbling sounds that rang out here and there, they told their purpose to the receptionist.



By the way, the receptionist, a girl, was a lovely one. A cheerful girl who was at least as old as Hajime. It seemed the usual template was here. But most noticeable was the tension and big confusion that appeared on the attractive receptionist’s expression.



“Is the branch head here? I have a letter from Fhuren branch head… but he said to personally hand it over.”



As he said so, Hajime presented his status plate to the receptionist. Although she seemed to be filled with tension, the receptionist sat up and received the status plate just like a pro.



“Th-Thank you. You can entrust it to me. E-excuse me, just what kind of request did the Fhuren’s… branch head had?”



Normally, no mere adventurer would receive any request from a branch head, so the receptionist displayed a slightly dubious expression. However, her eyes opened wide when she saw the information displayed by Hajime’s status plate.



“G-“Gold” rank!?”



Among Adventurers, not even 10% of them were “Gold” ranked. Thus, all of the guild personnel were told about the “Gold” rank ones so they would be able to recognize them. Naturally, this receptionist also knew of all the “Gold” ranked Adventurers. However, she unintentionally leaked a surprised voice because she didn’t know about Hajime.



Her voice made the Adventurers, guild staff members, and everyone inside the guild building opened their eyes wide in surprise. And just like the receptionist, they stared at Hajime. The building interior became noisy.



The receptionist turned pale as she realized she just exposed an individual’s information loudly. Thus, she began to bow at tremendous pace.



“I-I am sorry! I truly am sorry about it!”



“Ah~, no need for that. It’s not like I mind it. So, can you convey this to the branch head now?”



“Y-Yes! Please wait for a moment!”



The receptionist who seemed as though she would continue to apologize if he didn’t say anything made Hajime smile wryly. After the small battle in UI and the great rampage that annihilated an underground organization in Fhuren, he thought it’d already be too late to try to hide his identity.



The “Gold” ranked adventurer boy who brought along a child and a harem of pretty girls as well as a beautiful woman made him gather attention inside the guild building. Nevertheless, Hajime’s party gave off a clear attitude that it was the usual as they waited for the receptionist. Unaccustomed to being in the center of attention, Myuu felt uncomfortable, only to be comforted by everyone in Hajime’s party. Because the way Tio comforted her was bad for Myuu’s education, a slap visited her cheek. Thus, it raised further commotion, but was ignored as expected.



Before long, rather not even five minutes had passed, someone ran from inside the interior with loud footsteps. Hajime’s party paid attention to the sound and wondered what happened. A boy clad in black jumped out from the passage behind the counter and skidded on the floor due to the momentum. As though he was looking for someone, the boy began to look around.



Hajime remembered the person. He was dumbfounded since he never thought he would meet him again in such a place, and thus he muttered inadvertently.



“… Endou?”





Volume 8 Chapter 5




“… Endou?”



Hajime’s mutter made the black-clothed boy, Endou Kousuke, respond with “!,” a response similar to a certain cardboard-loving mercenary when an enemy appeared in a game. He kept looking around and began to shout as if he was irritated, because he could not find the one he was looking for.



“Nagumoo! Are you here!? Is it really you!? Where are you!? Nagumoo! Come out if you’re alive! Nagumo Hajimee—!”



Because his shout was too loud, one by one people began to shut their ears with their fingers. His voice was filled with desperation since he wanted to ascertain whether the should be dead classmate of his had survived.



Yue and the girls turned their gazes towards Hajime. With an expression as if he didn’t want to be involved in this, Hajime scratched his cheek and spoke towards Endou who repeatedly shouted his name out loud.



“Ah~, Endou? I can hear you just fine so stop repeatedly shouting my name.”



“!? Nagumo! Where are you!?”



Endou turned his face towards Hajime, reacting to Hajime’s voice. Hajime was inadvertently taken aback because Endou looked so desperate.



For a moment, Endou’s gaze met Hajime’s, but he immediately averted his gaze and began to look around again.



“Damn it! I can’t see him even though I can hear his voice! Is he a ghost now? As expected, he returned as a ghost!? So that’s why I cannot see him!?”



“No, I am right in front of you, you big idiot. Rather, calm down already. You whose thinness shadow ranked the best in the whole world.”



“!? Again, his voice!? Wait, whose shadow did you say was so thin that even the convenience store’s automatic door didn’t react to it and disappears from time to time! The automatic door opened at least one of three tries!”



“So, it didn’t open two times in three tries… as expected of you.”



After conversing that much, Endou finally noticed the source was the white-haired, eye-patched boy before him and he began to carefully observe Hajime’s face. Towards Hajime, who averted his face since he felt unpleasant due to not having a hobby where he’d be pleased from being watched by a man, Endou spoke as if he could not believe what he perceived.



“Y-You… are you… Nagumo?”



“Haa… yeah, that’s right. Though I look like this now, I am Nagumo Hajime.”



As he carefully observed Hajime from head to toe, Endou became dubious because Hajime was quite different from the one in his memory, but he finally believed Hajime after looking at his features and how he knew about the thinness of his shadow.



“So… you are alive.”



“Of course, after all I am right before you now.”



“Somehow, no you have completely changed… Your looks, atmosphere, and tone…”



“I crawled up from that abyss with my own power, you know? So, of course, I’ve changed.”



“I-Is that so? No, but, I see… You really are alive…”



Although Endou was perplexed by Hajime’s blunt attitude, his gaze softened as he was relieved that the classmate he thought to be dead was alive. No matter how he envied him like the other boys because Kaori paid attention to Hajime, and how he pretended to not see Hiyama’s gang bullying Hajime, nothing was more frightening than thinking Hajime had died. Hajime’s death had such a great impact. That’s why Endou was purely glad his classmate was alive.



“Rather… when did you become an Adventurer? Moreover, a “Gold”…”



“Nn~, well it just happened.”



After Hajime replied, Endou’s expression completely changed. The relieved expression he had because his classmate was alive, had changed into an expression as if he was in a pinch. Hajime looked at Endou again and he noticed Endou was in ragtag state. He tilted his head, wondering what had happened.



“… In other words, you came back alive from the depths of the dungeon by yourself, and became strong enough to gain the Adventurers’ highest rank? That’s rather unbelievable…”



“Well, that’s true though.”



After Hajime confirmed what Endou said with a serious expression as the truth, Endou sprang up towards Hajime and gripped his shoulders, and in a voice filled with more desperation than before, he began to speak in sorrow.



“Then, please! Please enter the dungeon with me! We must hurry or else everyone will be dead! We need someone with battle potential even if it is just one person! There’s also the possibility that Kentarou and Kondou have died! That’s why please help us, Nagumo!”



“W-Wait a sec. What’s with you all of a sudden!? I don’t know the situation, you know? So what’s with the dead thing? And can’t Amanogawa somehow do something about it? There’s also Commander Meld, so there’s no need to worry about another failure like when we faced the Behemoth…”



Hajime perplexedly asked back because even though he usually didn’t stand, out Endou wore an expression as if he was truly at his wits’ end. And at the moment Endou heard Commander Meld name, he fell to his knees with a truly dark expression. Next, he muttered with a low, subdued voice.



“… –ad.”



“Hah? I can’t hear you. So, what did you say?”



“… I said they are dead! Commander Meld, Alan-san, and the other Knights are dead! All of the Knights who entered the dungeon are dead! They died to let me escape! Because of me! They are dead! They died!”



“… I see.”



“They died,” Endou said repeatedly like a child throwing a tantrum, and Hajime only replied with two words.



Hajime’s class was not a fighting one, so he didn’t have much encounter with Commander Meld. However, he remembered that Commander Meld was a good person, and he recalled that Commander Meld believed the “incompetent” him before Hajime fell into the abyss. If it was Hajime who just got out of the abyss and heard of Meld’s death, he would have probably just said, “So what?” However, the current him thought it was little regrettable. At the very least, he prayed for their happiness in the next world in his mind.



“So, what happened?”



“That’s…”



Still on his knees, Endou tried to explain the situation to answer Hajime’s question, while he hung his head. However, a hoarse voice interrupted him.



“Please continue your conversation inside. After all, you are my guests.”



The owner of the voice was a powerful man with a good body build, and had a large scar on his left eye who was around 60 years of age. It was obvious his eye had the ability to perceive the situation, polished for years, and ambition was overflowing from his body.



With the previous receptionist by the man’s side, Hajime guessed the man must be the head of this guild branch. And because Endou’s wails and shouts made the guild atmosphere returned to one of high tension similar to the time Hajime’s party entered the hall, he thought this was not an appropriate place to have such a talk, and obediently followed the man.



Endou had probably already made such a commotion earlier, and exposed that something had happened to the Hero’s group and the Knights. And that was the cause of the strange atmosphere when Hajime’s party entered the guild.



The man Hajime thought of as the branch head grab Endou’s arm to force him to stand up and lead them to the guild interior without saying anything. Endou was considerably emotionally unstable, and currently had lost all of his strength.



Because the content would not be something pleasant, Hajime’s party moved after the man while expecting the unpleasant.



* * *



“… Demon… race, huh.”



Hajime’s mutter rang out inside the reception room of Holad branch Adventurer guild. Seated on the sofa before him were the Holad branch’s head, Lorr Vauabith, and Endou Kousuke, and seated beside Hajime were Yue, Shia with Tio at Shia’s side. Myuu was sitting on Hajime’s lap.



Hajime’s first response after hearing the situation from Endou was something Endou had said during his explanation. The talk of how the Hero’s party was attacked by the demon race and was in pinch, made Endou and Lorr’s put on serious expressions, and the room was filled with an oppressive atmosphere.



…Or so it should be, but the little girl sitting on Hajime’s lap was munching on the snacks, and it made her cheeks swell up like a squirrel, so she didn’t even notice the serious atmosphere. The conversation between Hajime and the others was slightly difficult for Myuu, and she could feel the uneasy atmosphere. However, Hajime gave her a snack so to divert her attention from being uneasy.



“More importantly! What’s with that!? Who’s that child!? Why is she eating the cake!? Doesn’t she understand the situation!? Everyone might have be dead, you know!”



“Eeek!? Papa!”



Unable to endure Myuu’s existence, who destroyed the mood in the room, Endou stood up and said with an angry voice while pointing at her. Surprised, Myuu raised a small scream and clung to Hajime.



Naturally, bloodlust far above an ordinary person could emit, overflowed from Hajime. Papa would not forgive his daughter’s enemy.



“Bastard… Who are you to snarl at Myuu, ah? AH? Should I kill you?”



“Eeek!?”



Screaming just like Myuu, Endou dropped into the sofa. Because of what Hajime said, “…Really, Hajime is completely a Papa now,” or “Before, Hajime-san casually said “our child”, right~,” or “In the end, this one wonders whether Master will be able to separate from this child once we arrive at Elizen~,” could be heard only to be ignored by him. It was more important for him to calm the frightened Myuu.



While Hajime calming Myuu down, he leered at trembling Endou trembling after he had collapsed into the sofa. Lorr entered the conversation with an amazed expression.



“How then, Hajime. I have roughly understood your situation from Ilwa’s letter. You’ve quite the rampage, haven’t you?”



“Well, all of them were just the course of events.”



Although they were not situations that normally appeared as the course of events, Hajime who shrugged his shoulders as though nothing big had happened, made Lorr curve the edge of his lips, finding it amusing.



“From the letter, with the acceptance of you as “Gold” rank, it was written that you want to be accommodated in the best possible way. I’ve roughly understood the situation… but to annihilate around 60,000 demonic beasts with just a handful of people, and decimate the underground organization based in Fhuren in just half a day… that is something unbelievable. But for Ilwa to purposely tell me this through a letter… I won’t think it is strange if someone said you are actually one of the Demon Lords now.”



Lorr’s words made Endou opened his eyes wide to show how surprised he was. Even though he thought Hajime must’ve gotten stronger since he had escaped from the depths of «Orcus Great Dungeon», he thought Hajime was still weaker than himself.



After all, Hajime’s class was “Transmutation Master,” which was a non-fighting class, and he was also called as “incompetent.” Even if someone said he was “Gold” rank, it was just the standard of being an Adventurer in this different world, and couldn’t be compared to those summoned here. That’s why he thought, at the very least, Hajime should be able to repair the destroyed teleportation circle and become his support in battle.



To begin with, Endou came to the Adventurers’ guild to ask high ranked Adventurers to help him in rescuing Kouki’s party. Surely even if he could not take them to the dungeon depth, they would at least be able to protect the area around the teleportation circle. And though there were also stationed knights, they would not do anything before they reported this to the Kingdom, and their level was so low that at most they could do was protect the teleportation circle on 30th floor. He needed Adventurers with at least “Silver” rank to protect the 70th floor’s teleportation circle.



He entered the Adventurer guild with such thoughts and grandly exposed the current situation to those in second floor. He thought he could ask for the Adventurers’ cooperation, for heroes, who were the humanity’s hope, fell into such a predicament along with the annihilation of the Elite Knights. However, in addition to the unexpected request to protect 70th floor’s teleportation circle, made everyone avert their gazes and at the same time, uneasiness about what would happen to the humanity spreaded.



Noticing the commotion, Loor grabbed Endou by the scruff of his neck and dragged him inside to question him, when the receptionist ran inside with Hajime’s status plate.



As such, Endou noticed he had underestimated Hajime’s ability and the possibility that Hajime was even more powerful than him made, Endou astonished when he compared the current and past Hajime.



Even though Endou was stiffened due to the shock, Lorr and Hajime’s talk kept advancing.



“Please don’t say such a stupid thing… How could you think we are as weak as the Demon Lords?”



“Hmm, so even Demon Lords are small fries, huh? What confidence… But, if that’s the truth, I want you to receive a commission with Holad branch Adventurer guild’s head as the referral.”



“… Rescuing the heroes, right?”



Endou returned to his senses when he heard the word rescue. Next, he leaned forward and spoke to Hajime.



“Th-That’s it! Nagumo! Come with me and help them! If you are that strong, we can surely save everyone!”



“…”



Although Endou’s eyes shined because he could see the hope, but Hajime’s reaction was an unfavorable one. He was looking at the distance as though he was thinking of something. Endou naturally had thought Hajime would surely help him to rescue the others, so he was perplexed because there was no prompt answer.



“What’s with you!? Even now, they might be dying, you know! Don’t hesitate! Aren’t we comrades!?”



“… Comrades?”



Hajime, who averted his gaze earlier while thinking of something, was once again looking back at the heated up Endou with a cold expression. Endou instinctively backed away due to the coldness in Hajime’s eyes. He hesitated after recalling Hajime’s earlier bloodlust, but he obstinately answered because Hajime was a valuable force that could not be missed.



“Y-Yeah. We are comrades! So it’s natural to he—…”



“Don’t selfishly make me your comrade. Frankly, I only recognize you as nothing but a human ‘from the same world,’ no more, no less. You are no different than the others.”



“Wh—!? Why… why did you say that…”



Hajime’s unexpectedly cold words and leer made Endou confused. Hajime resumed thinking, in other words, he thought of the demerits from rescuing Kouki’s party.



Just as Hajime said, he recognized the classmates as nothing more than acquaintances. Until now, he neither thought of using his power to return to the way he was in the past, nor revenge. He was truly disinterested and thought them as trivial things.



However, he could not just bluntly answer with a “NO.” As for the reason, he connected that answer to the words Aiko said, “lonely way of life.”



Furthermore, Hajime recalled the conversation under the moonlight. Having been called “incompetent” and “weakest” in this different world, there was the girl who said to Hajime, “I will protect Nagumo-kun.” In the end, Hajime was reckless and disappeared as he fell into the abyss, just like what the girl was uneasy about. She had promised “to protect him” to remove her uneasiness, but that promise could not be accomplished. And somehow, Hajime had frequently recalled the time he was about to fall into the abyss and the girl who outstretched her hand with bitter expression after returning to this town.



“Shirasaki… is she safe?”



Hajime muttered and asked the confused Endou. Letting out, “Eh?,” a dubious voice because of the sudden question, Endou panickedly began to speak about Kaori since he thought Hajime would not cooperate if he didn’t say anything.



“Y-Yeah. Shirasaki-san is safe. Rather, we would not have survived if not for her. Jyuugo and Yaegashi-san were dying from the first attack… but Shirasaki-san was truly amazing. Her healing magic was unbelievable, rather… she turned ghastly since the day you fell, you know? She trained so hard, so much that we wanted to stop her… and her aura also changed? She somehow looked mature as though she was always thinking of something, and the fluffy atmosphere around her had disappeared…”



“… I see.”



Hajime only replied as such to the Endou who frantically talked even about the unnecessary things. Thus, Hajime looked at his precious partner who watched him as he scratched his head.



“… If it’s something Hajime wants to do, I’ll follow you to wherever it is.”



“… Yue.”



With affectionate gaze, Yue said so and quietly grasped Hajime’s hand. Hajime returned her grasp, watched her gently, and thanked her.



“M-Me too! I’ll follow Hajime-san to wherever it is! Hajime-san!”



“Hmph, of course this one will, too. Master.” “Umm, umm, that’s, Myuu, too!”



Because Hajime and Yue began to create their own world, Shia and Tio panicky asserted. Although she didn’t understand it well, Myuu clung and insisted so because she didn’t want to be left behind.



Before them, Endou said, “Eh? What’s with this harem…,” with an amazed expression to which Hajime responded with a leer, while telling his comrades what he wanted to do.



“Everyone, thank you. Although I don’t want to purposely make connection between us and the God chosen Heroes… I have someone I’m indebted to. That’s why, I thought to at least help. Well, if it’s them then they might be able to do something themselves.”



Hajime’s real intention was not to help Kouki’s party. He didn’t want to purposely approach either the Heroes or the Mad God who chose them.



However, he thought to at least show his face to Kaori who pushed herself to find him. In addition, he’d help her if she was truly in a pinch. In other words, he had an obligation to Kaori who wanted to protect him and still believed his survival even now.



He didn’t even worry about the risk involved. He had fought the four-eyed wolf in Endou’s story, and the Chimeras’ strength should be below tenth floor of Abyss dungeon, so there was no problem at all.



“E-Excuse me, so, will you go with him?”



“Ah, branch head Lorr. For now, I also want to request something from you…”



“You don’t want to be seen unconditionally helping them by the ones above, right?”



“Yes. There’s one more thing. I want you lend me a room for Myuu until we return.”



“Ah, I don’t mind.”



Resultantly, Endou who breathed a sigh of relief because Hajime would come with him, was ignored while Hajime continued his conversation with Lorr.



As expected, he could not just take a child into the depth of the dungeon, so he entrusted Myuu to the guild. Although Myuu fiercely resisted, somehow everyone was able to calm her down, and Tio was entrusted with baby-sitting and guarding her. Finally, Hajime’s party were able to depart with Endou as their guide.



“Oi, guide us quickly, Endou.”



“Uwah, don’t kick my butt! Rather, you are changing too much!”



“How noisy. As for the time, a day… No, let’s end this in half a day. Though reluctant, we left Myuu behind, so we need to return quickly. I’m also worried because she’s with that pervert.”



“…You, so you really are her father… To create a harem of beautiful girls… just what has happened to turn that Nagumo into this…”



While dashing towards the depth of the dungeon, Endou muttered, trying to comprehend something from Hajime’s attitude and the surroundings. With such powerful help, Endou’s mind regained some composure. If he had the time to talk, he wanted to use it to run faster since he had confidence in his high agility, but it had been smashed to pieces. In addition, Endou was praying for his best friends’ safety.





Volume 8 Chapter 6




“Uh…”



“Suzu-chan!”



“Suzu!”



With Suzu raising a groan and slowly opening her eyes, Kaori and Eri who were always beside her, called Suzu’s name with anxious voices mixed with relief. Suzu spaced out for a while with only her gaze moving around, and finally opened her mouth.



“I-I don’t know this ceiling~.”



“Suzu, I know you like acting, but wouldn’t it be better if you didn’t say something like that at time like this?”



She should be thirsty. However, Suzu desperately said so with hoarse voice, which made Shizuku retorted in a half-amazed, half-praising tone when she heard her. Afterwards, Suzu moistened her throat using the water from the leather flask by her side.



With lovely sound of gulping, Suzu, who sated her thirst, said, “I’m revived! Literally!,” words that couldn’t be taken as a joke, and she tried her best to stand up with Kaori and Eri supporting her. The class’s moodmaker who regained her consciousness from a critical condition, radiated a cheerful atmosphere which made the classmates who had been depressed until now show smiles.



However, the bright atmosphere was very contrary to Suzu’s complexion. She was exhausted and suffered blood loss. With a pale face and thin lines below her eyes just like a bear’s, her smile looked miserable. Some parts of her body were pierced, but it was unmistakably her “strength” to be able to smile as soon as she got up. Shizuku and Kaori watched her with respect.



“Suzu-chan. It’s okay for you to rest some more. After all, your blood shouldn’t have been replenished yet, even if your wounds have recovered…”



“U~n, so that’s why I feel dizzy~. That bastard~, to pierce the beautiful Suzu… even though, “Can I penetrate you now?,” is better to be said in bed!”



“Suzu! That’s vulgar! Be more prudent!”



Suzu said while hatefully gazing at empty space, and Eri scolded Suzu with flushed cheeks. Some of the male students inadvertently, “Bff!?,” but averted their gazes due to Shizuku’s glare.



“Suzu, thank God you woke up. We were worried, you know?”



“Yo, are you really okay? Isn’t your face completely pale?”



Because Suzu suddenly caused a commotion after she woke up, Kouki and Ryuutarou approached her. While being weakened for a period of time as an effect from using “Limit Break,” Kouki became depressed because they were severely beaten. However, he seemed to have recovered somehow since a moderate amount of time had passed after they had retreated and hid where they currently were.



“Morning~, Kouki-kun, Ryuutarou-kun! Looks like we somehow got away, huh? Umm, is everyone saf—… Wait, one is missing…”



“Yeah, it’s Endou. He retreated ahead alone. We think he should be able to break through the floors alone by hiding himself…”



After greeting Kouki and Ryuutarou with a smile, Suzu noticed one person was missing from the surrounding classmates. Suzu had lost her consciousness in the midst of battle, so Kouki and the others answered her doubt while they explained the current situation.



Incidentally, Kondou and Saitou had been de-petrified, woke up earlier than Suzu, and had already been debriefed of the situation.



“I see, looks like a lot of time had passed since Suzu fainted… Ah, that’s right. Kaorin, thanks! Kaorin has become Suzu’s life benefactor!”



“Suzu-chan, it’s my duty to heal everyone. So don’t exaggerate it by calling me your life benefactor because it was a natural thing for me to do.”



“Heh~, even stoic Kaorin is wonderful! Shall we get married?”



“Suzu… it’s eerie if you say that with pale face. For now, shouldn’t you rest some more?”



Suzu was scolded by Eri while she was clinging to Kaori. If she over did it, Shizuku would physically stop her. It was the usual way of things. Even the classmates who wondered whether they’d be able to survive and return to surface again, gradually regained their composure thanks to Suzu and the girls’ conversation that didn’t mind their defeat.



However, the atmosphere which was starting to turn bright was douse with water by a person who always ruin the ambience.



“…What are you grinning about? We almost died, you know? Moreover, our situation hasn’t changed even now! Think of how we can get out of here if you have time to joke around!”



The one who shouted while glaring at Suzu was Kondou Reiichi. And though he didn’t express it, Saitou Yoshiki by his side also watched her with criticizing gaze.



“Oi, Kondou. Can you not say such a thing? Suzu only did this to change the moo—…”



“Shut up! It’s not like you can say anything to me! After all, you lost! I almost died! Shit! What a Hero you are!”



Although Kouki tried to admonish Kondou due to his remark, Kondou suddenly burst like fire that got poured with oil and began to criticize Kouki.



“Bastard… Thanks to whom do you think we could retreat, huh? We could do that because Kouki opened a path for us!”



“To begin with, there’s no need for us to retreat if he wins! More importantly, we obviously had our chance. It would have been all right for us to receive the invitation from Demon Race and defeat them later! But, you selfishly started the fight! Everything is your fault! This is your responsibility!”



This time, Ryuutarou began to admonish such a Kondou. Kondou stood up and confronted Ryuurarou. Sympathizing with Kondou, Saitou and Nakano also stood up and faced Ryuutarou.



“Ryuutarou, I am okay… I’ll accept my responsibility, Kondou. We won’t lose this time! We already understood the characteristics of the demonic beasts, and we won’t get attacked by surprise again. So, we will absolutely win this time!”



Although Kouki made a gesture where he clasped his clenched fist, Saitou muttered with darkened eyes.



“… But, you could not win even with “Limit Break.”



“Th-That’s… i-it’ll be okay now!”



“Why?”



“I’ll use “Divine Might” and attack the Demon Race woman from the beginning. That’s why, if everyone could cover me…”



“But, won’t she know a troublesome attack is coming with such a long chant? Even our enemies will have their own plans, right? Besides, we don’t know if those were all of the demonic beasts she has.”



Even if Kouki said it’d be okay, Kondou and gang complained while beginning to doubt Kouki’s ability, and were looking at him with doubtful eyes. With this, even though Kouki could not help but take responsibility to make sure they win. They would not calm down because of the fact that they had almost died as a result of the enemies’ unbelievable strength and number.



The main cause for them to heat up were because Ryuutarou had a low angry point while Kondou and gang were being belligerent by objecting constantly. Gradually, Ayako, Yoshino, and Nomura tried to stop their quarrel, but a dangerous mood began to drift around.



As such, Ryuutarou began to ready his fists while Kondou readied his spear. Tension immediately filled their location. Kouki shouted, Ryuutarou!, and grip his shoulder to stop him. However, Ryuutarou could not be stopped and veins popped on his head while glaring at Kondou. Even Kondou and gang were partly obstinate about it.



“Everyone, please calm down! No matter what you say, we can only bet on Kouki to survive! We must defeat the Demon Race woman even if Kouki was at the time limit of his “Limit Break.” We can only do that since she won’t let us escape. You understand that, right?”



Shizuku entered between them and frantically tried to persuade them to calm down, but it didn’t work either. Swaying while standing, Suzu seemed to not want to hear what Kondou said even if he apologized. Finally, Kaori thought she needed to restrain everyone and began to prepare her restraining magic… when they heard something.



“Grrrrr…”



“””” !?””””



A growl. A growl so familiar, so low that came from the bottom of abdomen. The appearances of Chimeras and the four-red-eyed wolves crossed their minds. The dangerous mood immediately dissipated and everyone stiffened. Even the smallest breathing seemed to resound, and their breathing became smaller. Their gazes turned towards the passage camouflaged as a wall before them.



Whoosh! Fwiiish, Whooosh! Fwuuush!



Sounds of scratching and rough nasal breathing could be heard from the wall. Someone was gulping. Even trace of their smells should’ve been erased by Endou, so the demonic beasts shouldn’t be able to perceive that Kouki’s party were inside no matter how strong they were. Even though they thought so, they were tensed and unpleasant sweats flowed.



Some time was still needed before they completely recovered. Suzu was not in condition to fight, Kaori and Ayako had used too much magic to heal the others and had hardly recovered. The vanguard group were almost fully recovered, but the magic users in the rear group only had recovered half of their magic power. The healing potions they had also been exhausted, so they still need to wait for sometimes to recover at the earliest.



They could not overlook the holes in terms of roles created by Kaori and Ayako as the healers and the barrier user, Suzu. That’s why Kouki’s party were hoping they would not be found out now as they watched the wall separating the outside and the hidden room.



The demonic beasts wandered outside for a while, but their presences gradually began to fade before long. Thus, silence returned once again. Even so, everyone was standing still for a while, and breathed great sighs of relief when they knew the demonic beasts had completely disappeared; some of them crumpled on the spot. The extreme tension made their sweats overflow like a flood.



“…We’ll be found out if we keep making a commotion. That’s why, please just calm down and recover for now.”



“Y-Yeah…”



“Y-You are right…”



Shizuku wiped the sweat off her cheek which fell and created weird dripping sound. Kondou and the others replied while stammering and withdrew their arms. It was as though they got doused by cold water.



Having thought the crisis was through, everyone relaxed… and at that moment,



“ROOOOOOARRRRR!!!”



BOOOM!!!



The wall separating the hidden room and the outside was crushed to pieces along with a tremendous roar.



“Uwah!?”



“Kyaaaa!!”



The wall’s fragments were blown like bullets due to the impact into the hidden room, and hit Kondou and Yoshino who were in its trajectory. The two spontaneously fell flat on their butts as they raised screams.



In the next moment, before the dumbfounded Kouki’s party were the incoming blurred spaces whom they still didn’t want to meet.



“Prepare to fight!”



“Damn it! How did they find us!”



While ordering so, Kouki immediately drew and slashed the Chimeras with the Holy Sword. They didn’t move because they would lose sight of the enemies if they distanced themselves from them. As he cursed, Ryuutarou positioned himself before the passage connected to the outside, and tried to prevent the demonic beasts from invading any more than this.



However,



“RooOOoAR!!” “GROoowwwWL!!”



A Brutal-look-alike immediately hurled its steel-like body like a cannonball into the room. Thus, it grappled into Ryuutarou with tremendous momentum and pushed him down.



Using that chance, tens of black cats dashed into the room and immediately fired tens of tentacles. Fired like a barrage, they mercilessly attacked Kondou and the others who remained on their spots. And though Kondou and the others immediately readied their weapons, the tentacles were too much in number and would skewer them as-is. ?????????? ??



“——”Heaven Interruption”!” “——”Heaven Interruption”!”



15 shields of light slantly appeared in the space before Kondou and the others and managed to deviate the trajectories of the attacks. To be capable of activating the shields even with such short chants would make anyone marveled. Ten of the shields were Suzu’s, while the other five were Kaori’s.



However, even though they immediately cast them, Suzu’s physical condition was still in a bad shape while Kaori’s magic power was still exhausted. Those facts affected the strenght of the shields.



Whiiiish! Fwooosh! Whiiiish! Fwooosh! Whiiiish! Fwooosh!



They should’ve been able to change the trajectories and endure the impact, but vigorous attacks from the tentacles broke the shields one after another. Thus, several of the tentacles’ trajectories could not be changed by the crushed shields and attacked Nakano and Saitou. The two immediately bend their bodies. Since both were in the rear group, their physical strength weren’t that high. Because of that, even though they avoided mortal wound, Nakano shoulder and Saitou’s thigh were gouged, and they raised screams as they were thrown to the ground.



“Shinji! Yoshiki! Shit! Daisuke, help them!”



“… Ah, of course.”



Always brooding over something since they escaped into the hidden room, Hiyama did not pay much attention to what Kondou said. However, the situation didn’t let him say anything otherwise, so he dragged the wounded Nakano and Saitou towards Suzu’s side. Even though her physical condition was not good, the area around Suzu, whose magic power still had a lot remaining, was the safest. Besides, they would be easily healed by Kaori at Suzu’s side.



“Kuh, Kouki! Use “Limit Break” and get outside! We will do something about these guys inside this room!”



“But, Suzu and the others cannot move…”



“We will face them as-is! Please! Break through them and kill the Demon Race woman!”



“Kouki! Leave this place to us! I absolutely won’t let them die!”



“…Okay! I will leave this place to you! “Limit Break”!”



After thinking about Shizuku and Ryuutarou’s words for a moment, he thought it was certainly the only way to break through this situation. With a resolute expression, Kouki activated “Limit Break” for the second time today. The reason “Limit Break” must not be used for more than once a day was because it put considerable burden into the body. That’s why, “Limit Break” which usually had an eight minute limit, but it might be shorter now. Expecting that, Kouki would ignore the others and only concentrate on defeating the Demon Race woman, he went out of the hidden room.



Going out of the room into the huge octagonal room, before Kouki’s eyes were a large amount of demonic beasts. And within the stationary demonic beasts stood the Demon Race woman looking at him with cold eyes, and a white crow on her shoulder. The inside of Kouki’s mind was boiling with a sense of mission to save his comrades and anger that they were put into such a predicament. Thus, he glared straight at the Demon Race woman.



“Hmph, you made me waste too much time. I also have other missions too…”



“Shut up! I will surely defeat you! Prepare yourself!”



Declaring so, Kouki used short chant, and magic power was immediately sent into the Holy Sword. “Divine Might” would normally reach the Demon Race woman, but even so, he used the chant omission version of “Divine Might” since he believed it would be able to open a path for him.



However, the Demon Race woman showed a smile before the Holy Sword, whose radiance increased, and she ordered the Brutal-look-alike standing by near her to drag something from the back.



Kouki put a dubious expression at first which then turned into an aghast expression when he saw that “something.” He instinctively lowered the Holy Sword with eyes wide opened and called his name with a trembling voice.



“… M-Meld-san?”



That’s right, there was the dying Meld whose limbs were crushed and whole body drenched in blood being dragged by the Brutal-look-alike by the scruff of his neck. With a glance, his whole body was limp and seemed to have died, but sometimes small groans arose and demonstrated that he was alive.



“Y-You! Let go of Meld-san—!?”



Kouki was enraged because of Meld’s state, and in a split moment, he tried to rush towards the Demon Race woman, losing himself. Suddenly, a huge shadow shrouded over Kouki as though it had been waiting for such exquisite timing. Hah, before Kouki noticed it and turned his gaze, there was the spectacle’s wall-like fist approaching him with tremendous momentum that made even the air exploded.



BaAAaaM!!!



Although Kouki spontaneously used his left arm to guard, the fist swung with tremendous force easily crushed his guard, and Kouki’s left arm and body received a powerful impact. Kouki flew towards a wall and crashed into it with tremendous speed incomparable to being run over by a dump truck. The wall behind him was crushed radically by the impact.



“GaaAH!”



Because of the impact he had taken, Kouki air was released from his lungs, and he slipped down from the wall, in all fours. Kouki desperately tried to support his body using his healthy right arm, but a lot of blood flowed from his mouth. The earlier attack had most likely damaged his organs. He might have died instantly if it wasn’t for the skill derived from “Physical Resistance,” “Mitigation of Impact.”



In addition, because of a concussion to his head, he desperately tried to understand the situation even with an unfocused gaze. Then, he saw it. A three meter, huge demonic beast was in the location where Kouki was before, with its fist thrusted.



It had a horse-like head where fangs grew, four thick heavy arms growing from its muscular body, and its lower half was that of a monstrous gorilla. Glaring at Kouki with bloodshot eyes, steam gushed out from the long horse-like mouth every time it breathed. Its atmosphere was obviously different from the demonic beasts he had faced until now.



The horsehead withdrew its fist and immediately rushed out while firing a dense bloodlust to the still unable-to-stand Kouki mercilessly. Jumping only a little away from the place where Kouki was crouching, it swung its fist down with tremendous momentum towards Kouki. Because of the warning from his instincts, Kouki laid on the ground and rolled over, desperately getting out of his location.



KABOOOM!!!



Immediately, the horsehead’s fist pierced the ground and at the same time, a reddish black ripple extended on the ground along with a roar. The destruction was just like an explosion. This was the horsehead’s peculiar magic, “Magic Shock Wave.” It was an ability to convert magic power into a shockwave. However, as simple as it might be, it was an immensely powerful peculiar magic.



Due to the skill derived from “Physical Resistance,” “Recovery Rate Increased,” Kouki somehow recovered from his head concussion. He desperately stood up and readied the Holy Sword. At that time, the horsehead had already approached before him and swung its fist once again.



With a crushed left arm, Kouki used Holy Sword as a shield and the impact received by his right arm blew him away again. Afterwards, even though Kouki managed to avoid a mortal wound, the four arms sent out “Magic Shock Wave” with all of their might, and he, whose movement had slowed down due to the damage from the first impact, couldn’t counter attack at all.



“Kuuu! What’s with this thing’s strength! Even though I should be strengthened by “Limit Break”!”



“RUUUUAAAA!!”



With pained expression, Kouki was frustrated because the horsehead demonic beast could overpower him who was under “Limit Break,” and he went for a counterattack, prepared for damages while thinking he couldn’t let it continue.



However…



THUD!



“Kh!?”



Right before he began, the limit of Kouki’s “Limit Break” had arrived, and power suddenly left him. Because he used it twice in such a short time, he was attacked by powerlessness incomparable to what he felt earlier, and he fell on his knee with no power entering his legs.



The horsehead didn’t miss that chance. With him suddenly losing his power and balance, Kouki was in a hopeless situation as the horsehead’s fist, bam!, hit his abdomen with a sound of impact.



“GAaAH!”



Splurting blood, Kouki’s body was made into ‹ shape, blown away, and crashed into the wall once again. Being weakened thanks to the side effect of “Limit Break,” Kouki’s consciousness was drifting away. Being mortally injured, he fell down without even twitching. Rather, it was strange for him not to die instantly in his current state. Perhaps the horsehead was taking it easy so he wouldn’t.



The horsehead approached Kouki and lifted him by grabbing the back of his neck. The unconscious and completely powerless Kouki was hung by the horsehead to show his state to the Demon Race woman. The Demon Race woman nodded in satisfaction and ordered the demonic beasts that rushed into the hidden room to withdraw.



After a while, Shizuku and the others went out with full caution.Their expressions were dyed in despair when they saw the powerless Kouki being lifted by the huge horse-headed demonic beast they had never seen before.





Volume 8 Chapter 7




“It’s a lie… right? How can Kouki… lose?”



“N-No way…”



“N-No… w-why…”



Coming out from the hidden room, Kouki’s comrades were bewildered in seeing him being hung, and they uttered incoherent words. Even Shizuku, Kaori, and Suzu were speechless. Towards the classmates who had lost their fighting spirit, the Demon Race woman spoke with a cold attitude.



“Hmm, it looks like I’ll be able to catch you guys easily. I… have underestimated you brats, but it looks like it’ll work out just fine.”



With a pale expression, Shizuku asked the Demon Race woman with courageous tone.



“… What did you do?”



“Nn? It’s this, you know this.”



After replying to the question, the Demon Race woman turned her gaze towards Commander Meld who was gripped by a Brutal-look-alike even now. Following her gaze, Shizuku came to understand the moment she saw the dying Commander Meld. Commander Meld was used to divert Kouki’s attention. If his acquaintance was caught and was dying, Kouki would surely react to it. Furthermore, he would’ve considerably lost his composure.



The Demon Race woman had most likely to understood Kouki’s straight forward character from their previous fight. Thus, using Chimera’s peculiar ability, she hid a strong demonic beast who aimed at the moment Kouki jumped in anger.



“… So? What do you want from us? You must want something since you’re purposely letting us live and started to converse with us, right?”



“Ah, as expected, you’re the one who can understand situation the best. What, it’s not such a special conversation. When I saw you guys earlier, I thought to once again invite you guys. Look, before, it was this Hero-kun who selfishly decided everything, right? And, there are also excellent people among you, so I want ask you again. So? What do you think?”



Some people reacted to the Demon Race woman’s words. Because of that, Shizuku narrowed her eyes and questioned the woman again.



“… What about Kouki?”



“Fufu, what a fast learner… Sorry, but I can’t let Hero-kun alive. He didn’t want to come to our side, so it’s impossible to persuade him, right? After all, he is the self-contained type. That’s why I don’t have any reason to keep such a dangerous creature alive.”



“… Isn’t that the same with us?”



“Of course; why did you think I let you live even though I know it’ll only make me anxious of my back?”



“Haven’t you thought that we might joined now and betray you later?”



“Naturally, I have thought that. That’s why I’ll make you wear collars. Ah, there’s no need to worry, it’s only make you unable to rebel against us. No one will be deprived of their freedoms.”



“That’s just like slaves with high degree of freedom. What you mean is we will keep our free will, but we won’t be able to harm you.”



“That’s right. It helps me that you’re quick to understand. Also, it’s good that this conversation is going somewhere until the one with Hero-kun.”



Although the classmates were silently listening to the conversation between Shizuku and the Demon Race, they were also looking at each other with fear-stricken eyes and full of worries. If they did not accept the invitation from Demon Race, then nine out of ten they would be killed by the demonic beasts that were even difficult for Kouki to defeat, but they would not be able to fight against Demon Race again if they sided with Demon Race and wore the collar.



In other words, they would no longer be “God’s Apostles.” If it turned to that, would Church of the Saints whom they had been summoned to protect became useless… and, would it be possible for them to return to their original world…



No matter what option they chose, they could not see a bright future. However…



“I-I think we should accept that person’s invitation!”



Among the silent crowd, Eri unexpectedly desperately spoke while trembling. Thus, the classmates opened their eyes wide in surprise, and carefully paid attention to her. To such an Eri, Ryuutarou shouted back with face red in anger.



“Eri, you! So, you are going to abandon Kouki!”



“Hih!?”



“Ryuutarou, please calm down! Eri, why do you think so?”



Ryuutarou’s attitude made Eri frightened, and she stepped back as a result. However, Shizuku admonished Ryuutarou and was somehow able to stop him. Thus, Eri took a deep breath and spoke her mind with tightly clenched fists.



“I-I just… don’t want everyone to die… Even I don’t know… what to do with Kouki-kun… ugh, gulp…”



Eri spun her words with all of her might with tearing streaming down her eyes. Seeing her, the other party members’ hearts were shaken. Thus, one person who agreed with Eri appeared.



“I also agree with Nakamura. Our lost has already been decided; between annihilation and survival, there’s no need to hesitate, right?”



“Hiyama… you mean, you don’t care what happen to Kouki, huh? Huh?”



“Then, Sakagami, are you trying to do double suicide with Kouki who could not fight anymore? And with all of us involved?”



“That’s not it! As if I’d do that!”



“Then please shut your mouth if you don’t have any alternative. Right now, it should take precedence on how to survive by ourselves.”



With Hiyama’s remark, the atmosphere turned into one where it looked like it was necessary for them to accept the invitation. And just like what Hiyama said, they only had one choice if they wanted to survive.



However, they could not just choose that since they felt guilty, thinking, ‘Is it really okay for us to survive while Kouki gets killed? It was as though they were boldly sacrificing Kouki for their survival.



To their dilemma, the Demon Race woman made another proposal with such perfect timing.



“Hmmm, if you guys are that worried about Hero-kun… shall I keep him alive? Naturally, a collar with stronger effect than yours will be put on him. But, I want all of you to side with Demon Race first.”



Shizuku secretly clicked her tongue when she heard the proposal. It was because she had guessed since the beginning that the Demon Race woman would propose it. It was strange for Kouki to be kept alive if she had already decided to kill him. The woman only had to kill him if there was no need for discussion after all.



That’s why by not killing him and keeping him alive were all for this moment. The Demon Race woman had likely acknowledged that Kouki and the others were useful after the last fight. However, she was convinced she could not make Kouki waver even through talking. But the others didn’t know of that. So, she planned to draw in the others aside from Kouki.



First, she did not kill Kouki to not raise the animosity of the others. Second, she told them to make a choice while she cornered them between choice of death or survival. Third, she guided them to think “if we do that,” and she chose that time to erase the problem from their thought.



Actually, by making the best use of Kouki, the atmosphere changed to one where they thought it’d be okay to side with Demon Race if they survive. Though in reality, they didn’t have any guarantee Kouki would be kept alive. Even if they regretted if he was killed after this, they could no longer act against the Demon Race.



Shizuku noticed that, but she kept silent as she told herself they currently could do nothing but to side with Demon Race if they want to survive. There should be a way to save Kouki as long as they were alive.



There were huge merits for the Demon Race woman if she got her hand on Shizuku and the others. First, needless to say, it’ll give an impact to the human’s side. After all, the “God’s Apostles” who were humanity’s hope are siding with Demon Race. That impact… no, it was much more like despair will be a huge advantage to the Demon Race.



Second, she would get new battle force. Having come to «Orcus Great Dungeon», the Demon Race woman’s real purpose was to conquer the dungeon and bring back the power inside. Though up until now, it was at the level where she could easily sweep the floor with the demonic beasts she had on hand, but it couldn’t be said that she’d be able to keep it up. It would be a good thing to obtain Shizuku and the others as fighting force to replenish the demonic beasts killed by Kouki’s party.



If this keeps up, she would obtain Shizuku and the others. The Demon Race woman floated a faint smile as she realized the mood.



However, her smile was immediately erased by the pained voice that suddenly rang out.



“E-Everyone… this is bad… please run away…”



“Kouki!”



“Kouki-kun!”



“Amanogawa!”



The voice’s source was the hanged Kouki. All of his comrades’ gazes turned to him.



“… Don’t believe her… she killed… Alan-san and the other knights… don’t… be fooled… you’ll be used as slaves… to fight humans… so run away… I am… okay… just… escape by yourself…”



With feeble breathing, Kouki told the danger of the deal and insisted for them to leave him and bet on running away, which once again shook the hearts of the classmates.



“…In this situation, just how many do you think will survive? Just look at the reality already! We already lost! Even the knights… were killed! So there’s no other choice! We can do nothing but accepting the invitation if we want to survive!”



Hiyama’s angry voice rang out. He angrily looked at Kouki who still didn’t come to terms with the situation. Hiyama certainly wanted to survive. At worst, he would make sure Kaori and himself survive even if the others didn’t. However, the possibility of doing that if he bet on escaping would be too low.



If he went to the Demon Race side, there’s enough possibility of being promoted o an important position if he displayed his usefulness, and he’d be able to obtain Kaori. Naturally, he’d limit her freedom using the collar. Hiyama did not care whether she had free will or not. He’d be satisfied as long as he made Kaori his.



Because of Hiyama’s angry voice, the others were charmed by the more certain and nearer future.



At that moment, a pained but powerful voice rang inside the room. Even though it was a small voice, it resounded well to others. It was a voice that had encouraged them many times in the battlefields. The person calmly judged any kind of situations, said words without any hesitation, and a model for them who also had a reliable back. For everyone, he was like a big brother and even a father they were fond of. Meld’s voice rang out.



“Guh… you guys… you only need to think on how to survive! … Advance on the path you believed in! … I am sorry involving you… to our war… Even though the time I spent with you isn’t that long… I’ve regretted involving you… That’s why, live and return to your world… no need to worry about human race… In the first place… this war should be fought by the human in this world!”



Meld’s words weren’t words of a Herrlicht Kingdom’s Commanding Knight. They were words of a man, Meld Loginz, his true feelings as he cast aside his position. He exposed his feelings because he realized here would be the end for him.



Kouki and the others had their eyes wide opened while muttering Meld’s name and Meld shook off the Brutal-look-alike while a light shone from his whole body. Then, he immediately grappled the Demon Race woman.



“You demon… let’s die together!”



“… That is… hee~, self-destruction? How brave. I can say I don’t hate it.”



“Shut it!”



The light wrapping Meld was similar to Kouki’s “Limit Break” in a glance while magic power gushed out of his body. However, it was actually not from his body but the crystal hanging on his neck.



Seeing that, the Demon Race woman instantly saw through his personality and satisfyingly praised him.



The crystal’s name was “Last Loyalty,” an evil tool to self-destruct just like the Demon Race woman said. Someone with high position in the Kingdom and Church of the Saints naturally carried important information with him. And because there’s magic capable of reading one’s memory in dark attributed magic, that person would be forced to carry the crystal when he went to the frontline. It would be used in time of emergence so the memory could not be read, along with the intention of involving the enemy with the self-destruction.



Meld’s last attack that risked his life made Kouki’s party screamed out his name. However, unlike them, the Demon Race woman was still calm even though she’d be swallowed by the explosion and die.



Thus the “Last Loyalty” Meld carried increased its shine further, and one sentence was muttered right before it activated.



“Devour it, Absod.”



Immediately, after the Demon Race woman’s voice rang out, the “Last Loyalty” on its limit let out tremendous lights, and lost its shine.



“Wh-!? What’s happen!”



If one looked carefully, the overflowing lights were flowing into a certain direction. Meld frantically moved only his gaze towards that direction while still pinning the Demon Race woman, and there was the six-legged turtle shaped demonic beast whose opened mouth was inhaling the lights wrapping Meld.



The six-legged turtle demonic beast was called Absod. Its peculiar magic was “Magic Storage.” It was a skill to freely take and stock magic inside its body. On the other hand, it could not use the stored magic if more than one magic if it took different elements. It only had the ability of letting out the magic again by compressing it from its mouth. However, the storage could even store high-ranked magic. It was a natural enemy for people who fight using magic.



The light wrapping Meld from “Last Loyalty” rapidly lost, and it exhausted all its powers and became a normal crystal. Suddenly, an impact from an attack hit Meld who was flabbergasted because his last struggle had been obstructed in an unexpected way, but the impact wasn’t that strong. What is it?, Meld looked down towards his abdomen where the impact came from.



A reddish brown blade could be seen. Accurately, a blade of sand had pierced through Meld’s abdomen from his back. The blade piercing him from behind had blood dripping at the tip.



“… Meld-san!”



Kouki shouted Meld’s name without minding his vomited blood. Meld reacted to his call and the gaze on his abdomen shifted to Kouki. He then frowned he moved his mouth to say, “Sorry,” while revealing a mortified smile.



Immediately, the sand blade swung horizontally and Meld was blown away. Just like a powerless doll,thud!, he was thrown to the ground. The pool of blood spread little by little. Anyone see it would think of it as a mortal wound. It was already a miracle he was capable of moving while covered in wounds, but everyone knew that this time it was the true end.



Even though she understood she would not make it in time, Kaori immediately used ranged recovery magic on Meld. Although the amount of bleeding had slightly decreased, Kaori could not block Meld’s wound since she herself hardly have any magic power.



“Uu, please! Be healed!”



Even as she fell to her knee due to the severe exhaustion from magic power depletion, Kaori desperately continued using healing magic.



“I never thought he’d be able to stand up and pinned me with such wounds. As expected of the Kingdom’s Knight Leader. He’s worthy of praise. However, this is the end… this’ll be your last. So, what do you think?”



The Demon Race woman glared at Kouki and the others as she swung the sand blade dyed in red. Seeing someone close to them dying once again, everyone, except some, were trembling. Even if they didn’t want to admit it, they’d be the next to die if they did not accept the Demon Race woman’s proposal.



Representing the others, Hiyama was about to say they accept the proposal. However, at that time,



“… –me.”



Kouki, who powerlessly tried to escape from being hung by the horsehead, muttered something with a small voice. Even though he shouldn’t be able to create any miracle since he covered in wounds, Hiyama swallowed his words. He somehow could not ignore the pressure coming from Kouki.



“Ha? What did you say? So, you want to die.”



The Demon Race woman heard Kouki’s mutter, she snorted, and asked him thinking it was just another rave. Kouki raised his cast down gaze, and his straight glare pierced the Demon Race woman.



The Demon Race woman instinctively held her breath when she saw Kouki’s glare. After all, the color of his irises had changed to silvery white as it shone. Instinctively backing away due to an unknown pressure, she ordered the horsehead according to the warning her instinct was telling her. She instinctively realized it was not the time to think about the advantage and disadvantage of gaining Shizuku and the others.



“Ahatd! Kill him!”



“RoOoOoAaR!!”



The horsehead nameded Ahatd faithfully executed the Demon Race woman’s order. It tried to crush the suspended Kouki’s sides using two fists equipped with “Magic Shock Wave.”



However, at that moment,



CLiiIIInnNG!!



Tremendous light overflowed from Kouki. It became a torrent and rose into the ceiling just like a tornado. Next, Kouki swung his right fist towards Ahatd’s arm that was grabbing onto him,SNaaaAAAAP!, and the arm was easily crushed.



“ROooOOAR!!”



With a roar different from a while ago, Ahatd inadvertently dropped Kouki, and Kouki moved to make a roundhouse kick as though he could not feel his injury.



ThUuUumpP!!



Cannon-like impact sound rang when the kick hit, Ahatd’s huge body was bent into < and was blown towards the wall behind with an extraordinary momentum. Ahatd, who was crushed into the wall accompanied with a thunderous roar, could not move well its body thanks to the impact, desperately trying to slip out of the wall but resulted in nothing.



With a swaying body, Kouki picked up the dropped Holy Sword and glared at the Demon Race woman with a piercing gaze that could almost kill. At the same time, similar torrent that of a tonado rose and began to envelope Kouki’s body.



A skill derived from “Limit Break,” “Supreme Break.” If the normal “Limit Break” increased the basic states by three times within the time limit, “Supreme Break” was higher skill, and basic stats were multiplied by five. However, he had to use limit break to now forcibly dragged out his power. That’s why the current Kouki only had 30 seconds until the limit. The effective time had been cut greatly because of the side effect.



However, without minding that, Kouki rushed towards the Demon Race woman in anger. The only thing in his mind was to beat Meld’s enemy. Only revenge.



The Demon Race woman raised a panicked expression and ordered the surrounding demonic beasts to attack Kouki. Chimeras were sneaked attacking, the black cats were firing their tentacles, and the Brutal-look-alike swung their maces. However, Kouki ignored those demonic beasts. Without swinging Holy Sword, he kept advancing, and raised angry cry towards where the Demon Race woman was.



“Bitch-! How dare you do that to Meld-san-!!”



“Tch!”



Kouki unhesitatingly swung down the Holy Sword that was held in upper stance. The Demon Race woman clicked her tongue and she immediately densified the sand into a shield… but cladded in torrent of light, the Holy Sword easily cut through the shield and slashed the Demon Race woman behind it.



Although she was not cut in two; she backed away and created the sand shield, the Demon Race woman had a deeply cut diagonally on her body, and blown backward, spraying blood.



Her back crashed into the wall behind, the Demon Race woman skidded down from the crushed wall, and Kouki approached her as he shook of the blood off the Holy Sword.



“What luck… to have the situation reversed just like this… It’s as if I am looking at a cheap drama.”



Having the table reversed thanks to him awakening his hidden power due to him being in a pinch, made the Demon Race woman say sarcastic words while her wandering gaze was looking at the approaching Kouki in resignation.



Even though the white crow on her side activated its peculiar magic, her wound was too deep that it could not be healed immediately, and Kouki won’t give her such a time either. It was a true checkmate, and the Demon Race woman endured the severe pain, moved her right hand, and took out a locket pendant from her breast pocket.



Seeing that, Kouki sharpened his expression, thinking it was the same self-destruction tool similar to the one Meld used, and he suddenly dashed out. Regardless of the Demon Race woman’s death, he could not let the explosion swallow his comrades. That’s why, I will defeat her before it activates! He attacked to stop her.



However…



“I am sorry… I am going to die before you… I love you, Mikhail…”



Looking at the locket pendant in her hand dearly, the Demon Race woman muttered, which made Kouki inadvertently stopped the Holy Sword. Due to the attack not being delivered, the Demon Race woman dubiously raised her face and she noticed the Holy Sword had stopped just a few millimeters overhead.



Kouki expression was aghast as he looked down at the Demon Race woman with wide-open eyes. His eyes expressed, but when he noticed something, it generated fear and hesitation. Seeing his eyes, the Demon Race woman realized the thing that made him stopped his sword and watched him with a condemning gaze. Her gaze made Kouki shaken further.



“… I am amazed… Did you notice it only now? That you are going to kill a ‘person.’?”



“Kh!?”



That’s right, for Kouki, the Demon Race was a cruel and cowardly higher ranked demonic beasts. It also meant they were recognized as existences evolved from demonic beasts, that was what the Ishtar had taught him about the Demon Race. Actually, they were recognized as such because they were accompanied by the demonic beasts, their slaves. However, just like a normal human, they love and loved, desperately tried to survive for the sake of something. But Kouki never thought he was going to fight “people.” In a way, it could be said he unconsciously did not want to think so…



The recognition was overturned when the Demon Race woman dearly called the name of her loved person. Whether he liked it or not, the one he was fighting was not a demonic beast. He noticed she was in truth a “person” just like him. He recognized what he was trying to do was “murder.”



“Surely, you did not admit us as “people”… What arrogance.”



“N-No… I, I didn’t know…”



“Hah, isn’t it you “did not try to know”?”



“I, I…”



“See? So, what’s wrong? After all, what you’re doing is not fighting but “hunting,” right? There’s one animal before you here, you know? Even though you have thought like that until now…”



“… L-let’s just talk… surely if we talk…”



Kouki said as he lowered Holy Sword. Demon Race woman looked at him with pure scorn, and she shouted an order instead of answering him.



“Ahatd! Aim at the swordswoman! The others, attack!”



Having recovered from the impact, Ahatd approached Shizuku with tremendous momentum, exactly what the Demon Race woman had ordered. Within Kouki’s party, although her charisma to lead people could not be compared to him, to excel in making calm judgement of the situation made her the most troublesome enemy, so Shizuku was the first to be targeted.



The others demonic beasts also began attacking the other party members. Rather than the merits gained by making them betray their allies with attached collars, she judged, because of his last attack, it was necessary to kill Kouki. The Demon Race woman felt Kouki’s latest attack was a threat.



“Wh-, why!”



“You’re a boy without any self-awareness… we are at “war!” You who possessed huge power with immature mind is too dangerous! You are going to die here no matter what! Look, your comrades will be annihilated if you don’t help them!”



Kouki shouted at the Demon Race woman who ignored his suggestion, but the woman didn’t care at all.



Next, Kouki turned around because of the woman’s words, and at the same time, Shizuku was blown away and she crashed into the ground. Ahatd was already a monster that had already far surpassed the strong demonic beasts. It overpowered Kouki who was using “Limit Break” even if it was just a surprise attack. So, Shizuku should not be able to fight it by herself.



Kouki turned pale and used the power from “Supreme Break” to instantly move between Ahatd and Shizuku, and caught the “Magic Shock Wave” attack. Next, he counter-attacked by swinging Holy Sword which cut off its arms.



However, by the time he was before its bosom to finish it off with a stab, just like before, he fell to his knees, lost his strength, and fell forward.



“Supreme Limit” had reached its time limit. It was the worst case scenario. Not only was weakened because of the after effect he had accumulated one impossible plight after another, he also could not move his body as though he was paralyzed.



“A-At Such a time!”



“Kouki!”



Covering Kouki, Shizuku slashed towards the wound Ahatd had on its arm that was cut off. Unable to calm down after its wound was slashed, Ahatd screamed and retreated. At that moment, Shizuku grabbed and threw Kouki to where their comrades were.



With Kouki incapable of moving, his comrades could only defend against the encircling demonic beasts. Then… I must do something! Shizuku aimed at the Demon Race woman. Her gaze unmistakably carried killing intent.



“…Heh~. You seem be conscious about the murder. Rather, aren’t you the one most suitable to be called as Hero?”



“… I don’t care. It is our fault Kouki did not realize it. That’s why I will pay for that debt!”



Completely healed by the white crow’s peculiar magic, the Demon Race woman stood up steadily and commented on Shizuku actions.



Shizuku should have known Kouki’s straightforward character, and how deeply he sets his heart on something. She gritted her teeth because she felt responsible that it was only until now that Kouki realized they were killing people, and how he didn’t realize their true enemies during this war.



Shizuku had no experience of murder, and she felt she did not want to experience it either. However, she was prepared such a day would come if she was going into a war. By learning swordsmanship, the “heaviness” of hurting people was driven into her.



However, now that the time has come, her resolution was easily shaken because of fear neither from the shame nor honour, but because she wanted to cry due to the thing she was going to do. Even so, she bit her lip and gritted her teeth to desperately suppress her fear.



Thus, she took a stance as she activated “No Beat” to kill the Demon Race woman using the Godspeed from the sword drawing technique. However in that moment, a chill ran along her spine because her instinct warned her to imminent danger. Immediately, from the side of the location where she jumped back from, a black cat’s tentacles was fired.



“I never told the other demonic beasts to not aim at you. Do you think you can kill me with Ahatd and other demonic beasts as your enemies.”



“Kuh.”



Saying, “Of course I am also going to kill you,” the Demon Race woman began to chant. Shizuku somehow managed to break through the waves of attacks from the demonic beasts using acceleration and deceleration without preliminary action of “No Beat,” but her expression was gradually dyed in despair when she tried to move before the Demon Race woman through an opening.



The most difficult was that Ahatd had speed similar to Shizuku. The sturdy and gigantic figure was certainly seen by Shizuku, so even if she used the chance to jump towards the Demon Race woman, its swung fist give an explosion-like impact that would immediately reach Shizuku.



Shizuku was a swordsman who specialized in speed, so her defense was extremely brittle. Evasion and parry were the basic of her defense. Besides, damages would accumulated little by little from “Magic Shock Wave”‘s after effect. Also, she could neither completely evade nor parry.



Following that, Shizuku’s movement had slightly become duller because of the accumulated damages. And that was fatal in a fight to death such as this.



WHHAAAAAM!!



“Aghh!!”



Although she immediately used the sword and sheath as shields, Ahatd’s fist crushed Shizuku’s partner and hit her shoulder. Having blown parallel to the ground, forcefully crashing, and continued skidding on the ground, Shizuku laid down helplessly. The arm on her right shoulder was bent into an impossible angle. It was completely crushed. And because the impact was passed into her body, she sometimes coughed up blood.



“Shizuku-chan!”



Kaori called Shizuku with tone overflowed with uneasiness, but Shizuku could not move at all even as she gripped the handle of her broken sword while crouching.



At that time, the things about her comrades, formation, and her exhausted magic power, there was be no meaning for her to come to Shizuku’s side, but other logical reasons had completely disappeared from her mind. Kaori’s only thought was she “must go to her important best friend’s side.”



Kaori dashed out due to impulse. Her body was swaying and her feet weren’t steady because she hardly had any magic power. Although there were voices behind that tried to stop her, they did not reach Kaori’s ears. She was only trying her best to recklessly rush towards Shizuku. Naturally, the demonic beasts did not overlook the defenseless Kaori, and merciless attacks poured towards her.



However, all of those attacks were received by shining shields. Moreover, the numerous shields were standing just like a passage between Kaori and Shizuku.



“Ehehe. As expected, being alone is unpleasant.”



Suzu said with a pale expression. She held out her right hand straight towards Shizuku, and used all of her shields to make a beeline between Kaori and Shizuku. A faint smile floated on her face.



Suzu had realized it herself. Realized they could not survive at all. That’s why, she thought of using her magic to allow her to be together with the best friends she loved even in the last moment. Naturally, the defense on the other comrades had become thinner as the effect… so Suzu, “I am sorry,” apologized in her mind, and continued to put up her shields for Kaori and Shizuku.



With Suzu’s shields, Kaori reached Shizuku with only few wounds. Then, she embraced Shizuku’s body tightly.



“K-Kaori… what are you doing… Get back, hurry. It’s dangerous here.”



“Uun. It is the same anywhere. That’s why, it’s okay for me to be by Shizuku-chan’s side.”



“… I am sorry. I can’t win.”



“Me, too, I am sorry I can’t really do anything. I have hardly any magic power.”



Supporting Shizuku, Kaori was frowning while smiling while using her magic to lessen Shizuku’s pain. Shizuku on the other hand, used her solid right arm to grasp the hand Kaori was using to support her, and sported a troubled smile.



A shadow appeared before the two. It was Ahatd. With bloodshot eyes, it approached and looked down at Kaori and Shizuku. “RoOoOaR!!,” it raised its characteristic roar and swung its thick arm.



Unbeknownst to them, Suzu’s shields had been put between Ahatd, and Kaori and Shizuku to interrupt it from coming any closer. However, it just ignore such barriers. It was probably because it was convinced that its swung fist would easily destroy the shields just like papers and use the shockwave to crush Kaori and Shizuku.



Currently, with the iron hammer of death swinging before them, various scenes passed through Kaori’s mind. “Ah, I wonder is this the revolving lantern?,” and she strangely calmed down, but Kaori who was flooded with memories had her heart shaken by the latest scene that appeared.



It was the tea party under the moonlight. The memories of the two conversing. The night when she said a vow. The disappeared him who made a troubled smile. How she began to realize her “love” once he disappeared. How she chased after him, believing in his survival.



However, those would also end here. “In the end, I was once again unable to hold up my promise,” thinking so, tears flowed on Kaori’s cheeks before she was aware of it.



First, I want to call out to him if we ever meet again, Kaori thought so. With such a wish, at the very least, I will call his name at the end… and she naturally said.



“… Hajime-kun.”



At that moment.



KABOoOoOM!!



The ceiling above Ahatd fell with a roaring sound, and at the same time, a huge, jet-black stake flew out with an extreme power cladded in red thunder.



Raising sparks, the jet-black stake pierced through Ahatd as though it was a tofu, and it then pierced and was stuck on the ground.



With length around 120 centimeters, the huge stake buried itself into the ground while releasing red sparks. Flesh and blood scattered from the center where Ahatd’s remains were with its original form nowhere to be seen. The spectacle made Kaori, Shizuku, and of course Kouki’s party, the demonic beasts attacking them, and the Demon Race woman stiffened.



A silent unbecoming of a battlefield ruled the room. No one, not even a thing understood what had happened as they stood in bewilderment. Suddenly, a shadow jumped down from the opened ceiling. The person landed and lightly trampled down on the Ahatd’s remains with his back before Kaori and Shizuku, and when he got off it, the person glared at the surroundings.



When he looked over his shoulder, he saw Kaori and Shizuku who were embracing each other.



The moment the person turned around, their eyes met, and a lightning ran through Kaori’s body. Her heart had been cold accompanied by sorrow, no, probably it was freezing since the day her important person disappeared, but a sudden fire lighted it and heated it up Thu-thump, thu-thump.Her heart began to throb intensely.



“…Your relationship is good as usual, you two.”



The person said with a wry smile, and Kaori’s mind was filled with delight even before she could think about it.



The hair color was different, the aura was different, the tone was different, and the appearance was different. However, she knew. It is him. It is he whose survival she believed in while she looked for him.



That’s right,



“Hajime-kun!”





Volume 8 Chapter 8




“Eh? Hajime-kun? Wait, Nagumo-kun? Eh? What? What do you mean?”



Kaori’s ecstatic shout made Shizuku, who was by her side, confused and looked alternately between Kaori and Hajime. Apparently, Kaori was able to see through the white haired, eye-patched, black-coated person before her as Hajime with just a single glance, but Shizuku was still unable to recognize him.



However, when she saw the boy’s face who was looking back over his shoulder with a wry smile, it immediately overlapped with Nagumo Hajime in her memory, and Shizuku, with widened eyes, raised a surprised voice.



“Eh? Eh? Really? Is he really Nagumo-kun? Eh? What? What’s really happening here?”



“Well, just calm down, Yaegashi. Aren’t calm, cool, and collected your main selling point?”



The chain of events happened after she, Shizuku, just like Kaori, was prepared to die which made her perplexed and she forgot her pain. Admonishing her as he said Shizuku’s name, Hajime suddenly looked overhead, feeling their presences. Thus, the falling blond-haired girl, Yue, was caught by him in princess carry style and he carefully let her down, next he received the rabbit-eared girl, Shia, who jumped down the same way.



The last to jump down was a boy dressed in black, Endou Kousuke.



“Na-Nagumoo! You-! I was blown away by that! Wait, what was that just now!? It suddenly pierced the dungeon’s floors…”



Endou looked at the surrounding, started complaining. Then, he saw his best friends and the others together with a group of demonic beasts. After noticing that he was being watched by his stiffened classmates, “Nuoh!,” and released a strange shout. To Endou, they voices were half-filled with joy because of their reunion, and anger because he came back.



“”Kousuke!””



“Jyuugo! Kentarou! I’ve come with help!”



Reacting to “I’ve come with help,” Kouki’s party and the demon race woman finally returned to their sense. Then, they once again stared at Hajime and the two girls. However, not minding the gazes of those in his surroundings, Hajime quickly ordered Yue and Shia with a slightly irritated expression.



“Yue, sorry but please protect those people gathered there. Shia, please look at the condition of the fallen man in Knight’s armor there.”



“Nn… leave it to me.”



“Roger~!”



Yue calmly walked without caring about the surrounding demonic beasts, while Shia used her marvelous jumping power to jump overhead the group of demonic beasts and landed beside the collapsed Meld.



“Ha-Hajime-kun…”



Kaori once again called Hajime’s name with a shaking voice. Her tone was probably filled with joy due to the reunion, yet there was also sorrow. It was because she thought Hajime had came here to die. Although Kaori didn’t know the details, her expression was telling him to immediately get away from the place.



Shrugging his shoulders, he returned Kaori’s gaze. Hajime briefly said, “It’s okay now, so just wait there.” After saying that, he activated “Light Speed” which greatly improved his perception. Then, he took out three Cross Bits from “Treasure Box” which surrounded Kaori and Shizuku like shields.



The floating cross-like objects that suddenly appeared from empty space surprised Kaori and Shizuku. With his back before the two, Hajime made a proposal towards the demon race woman whose appearance could be seen as nothing but arrogance. It was his mercy since the demon race woman was still not his enemy.



“The red-haired woman over there. I won’t do anything if you leave immediately. Just disappeared quickly from here if you don’t want to die.”



“…What did you say?”



It was not a remark that could be said by an ordinary human while being surrounded by demonic beasts. It was the reason why the demon race woman inadvertently asked back. As a response, Hajime repeated himself with an amazed expression.



“Prompt decisions are needed in battlefields. That’s why I said, just disappear from here quickly if you don’t want to die. Understand now?”



Knowing she did not hear it wrong, the demon race woman erased her expression and ordered the demonic beasts while pointing at Hajime, “Kill him.”



This time, the too abrupt situation—— especially the dead of her treasured Ahatd due to an unknown attack made the demon race woman lose her calm and make a fatal mistake.



Even if Hajime had his own objection, the woman was too enraged by Hajime who by the course of events treaded on Ahatd, a demonic beast she didn’t want to lose since it was given to her by her revered superior. In addition, there was the confusion due to the unbelievable situation where the dungeon’s ceiling had been destroyed just because he wanted to go downstairs. In any case, she would have been able to make a more careful judgement if it was the usual her. However, the glove had been thrown out.



“I see… So, I take it that you’re an “enemy”, right?”



Hajime muttered at the same time the Chimera attacked him. Behind Hajime, “Hajime-kun!” and “Nagumo-kun!” warning voices filled with urgency could be heard. However, Hajime casually clawed the Chimera attacking from his left with his artificial arm and lifted it without any difficulty.



The Chimera was surprised and struggled to escape which made the space blurred intensely. Looking at it, Hajime looked at it with scorn.



“Oi, oi, what is this? This half-assed peculiar magic. Are you a street performer?”



Because there’s no meaning if one’s presence and figure disappears when spaces blurs when it moves. Hajime inadvertently retorted. Even in the abyss, there were demonic beasts that could conceal their presences and figuring out what each of them has was extremely troublesome. Comparing it to them, Hajime thought it was too childish that the concealment exposed when it moved.



Standing still while he raised a Chimera with huge body weighing several hundreds kilograms as it struggling mid air, Hajime made the demon race woman, Kaori, and the others dumbfounded.



Hajime leered at them and used “Great Arm” to throw the Chimera on the ground as though he had lost his interest in it.



BoOoOoOmM!!



BaAaAaANNNG



With a raw sound ringing out, the Chimera had its head crushed and made a crater on the ground. Next, having drawn out Donner, Hajime turned the railgun towards the space that seemed to be empty at a glance and fired it in succession.



BAAANG BAAAAANNNG!!



Dry, explosive sounds rang out and two flashes cut through the air, mercilessly piercing respective targets. The space blurred for a moment, then a Chimera with a blasted head and a Brutal-look-alike whose heart had been shot through appeared. They stood still for a second, swayed, and crumbled to ground.



Not moving but could not conceal the wind flow, the shaking of the air and ground, their gazes, killing intent, flow of magic, and temperature made them nothing but unmoving targets for Hajime.



Without even looking at the demonic beasts he instantly killed, Hajime took a step forward into the battlefield, no, the execution ground. What started could not even be called deathmatch. It was a one-sided execution by the monster who shouldn’t be made into an enemy.



The demon race woman was shocked seeing the demonic beasts were killed casually and easily while the classmates stood still feeling the chill from the weapon that shouldn’t exist in this world. Leaving aside those stiffened people, the demonic beasts were attacking Hajime one after another, faithfully executing the demon race woman’s order.



A black cat creeped behind him and fired its tentacles, but Hajime didn’t turn around and only turned the wrist of his lowered arm where Donner was and fired behind. The bullet exceeding the speed of sound easily gouged through the black cat’s forehead.



Without stopping to look at their companion, four-eyed wolves rushed towards him from left and right at the same time. However, Schlag, unknown as to when it was drawn, blew the enemy on his left while Donner blown off the one on the right.



At that moment, the black cats hidden behind the annihilated four-eyed wolves shot their tentacles in cooperation with the Chimeras that were approaching Hajime’s back. However, Hajime had jumped several meters above, flipped mid-air, and while hanging upside down, the floating black cats and the two Chimera, who lost sight of their target, became preys for the railgun.



Within the scattered flesh and blood that looked like flower storm, two Brutal-look-alikes came and swung their maces, aiming for the moment Hajime landed. However, such an easily predicted future wouldn’t work on a monster such as Hajime, and he jumped further using “Aerodynamic” mid-air. He then fired Donner-Schlag to his left and right in succession while spinning like a top.



The released wind of killing intent not only moved towards the two Brutal-look-alikes that were waiting for him, but it also pierced and burst to pieces the heads of the Chimeras and four-eyed wolves that were approaching from behind. While each of the demonic beasts sprayed and scattered blood, Hajime descend as though to follow the law of inertia and dulled the momentum right before he landed.



Landing soundlessly in the center of the corpses and a ground dyed with blood, Hajime took out ammo from an empty space and use gunspin to reload them.



And at that time, “KuWAaAA!,” a strange sound rang out all of a sudden. Hajime turned toward the source and there was the six-legged turtle-like demonic beasts, Absod, whose wide opened mouth was turned towards Hajime. Inside its mouth was a compression of tremendous power shining a pure white light.



It was the previously stored huge magic power from Commander Meld’s “Last Loyalty.” The “Last Loyalty”‘s range was only few meters but its power was more than enough to decimate a person.



The magic power was compressed to the limit and in the next moment it was launched like a laser towards its target, Hajime. The death light approached as it gouged out the ground on its track. However, Hajime calmly took out a large, coffin-like shield from an empty space, equipped it on his left arm, and activated “Vajra” the same time he held up the shield. Just like a huge tree whose roots were firmly rooted on the ground, there was no impatience in Hajime’s eyes which showed his firm will.



A tremendous roar resounded the moment the laser-like magic power hit, and the trembling air expressed how strong it was. However, Hajime, who received the direct hit, didn’t even move a step away, but rather, he sported a mischievous smile, and began to slant the shield to parry the attack. The destination of where the attack was averted to was…



“Kh!? Damn it!”



It was the demon race woman. Since the time Hajime began to easily kill the demonic beasts, she sensed the crisis and began to chant powerful magic with an exaggerated chant, but Hajime noticed it and redirect Absod’s attack towards the demon race woman to obstruct her.



The unexpected situation made the demon race woman take an evasive action in a panic, but Hajime only adjusted the angle of his shield for the attack to reach her. The torrent of light approached her and destroyed the wall, made the demon race woman frantically ran on the side of the wall. Her expression was one where there was not the slightest hint of composure remained.



However, the attack gradually drew near her back, and when she thought she would be mowed down by the attack she had ordered to be released, the magic power stored by Absod had reached the bottom and the attack ended.



“Tch…”



Without any room to react to Hajime who clicked his tongue, the demon race woman breathed a sigh of relief only to be frozen in the next moment.



BaAaAaANNNG!!



An explosive sound roared along with the feeling of heat passing right beside her right cheek, and something white splattered.



That something was the remains of the white crow which was previously stood on the demon race woman’s shoulder. Although things had not been going the way he expected, Hajime countered by firing Donner aiming at Absod while Schlag was aimed at the white crow.



Even if Absod tried to evade only to endure the bullet so even with its tremendous velocity, it would only leave a small sound, but it could not even sense the bullet which ended up piercing through its opened mouth and its consciousness fell into darkness for eternity.



Even the white crow had its body burst open and had died in an instant, scattering white feathers along with its flesh and blood. Receiving the after effect of the railgun, the demon race woman lost her balance, fell on her butt, and absentmindedly patted her own cheek. What stuck there were the white crow’s flesh and blood, and at the same time she felt the heat from the severe burn.



If it shifted just by a few centimeters… The demon race woman was trembling when she thought of what might have happened. In other words, Hajime whose matchless strength allowed him to playfully kill the army of demonic beasts as though he was killing bugs before her eyes, and could have also killed her at any time. Even now, her life was in the palm of his hands.



The demon race woman had a strong pride as a warrior, but she could not stop her trembling body before the monster-like existence. What was that? Why did such a thing exist? How can I survive from that monster!? Such thoughts filled the demon race woman’s mind, and it continued to circle round and round inside her.



Kouki and the others felt the same as her. They could not immediately see through the white haired, eyepatched boy as Hajime. They could not understand who was the unknown person who easily annihilated the demonic beasts that had put them into such predicament.



“What was that…? Just who in this world is he!?”



Kouki muttered while his unmoving body was laid on the ground. Everyone around him also had the same questions forming in their minds. The one who answered was the person they asked to retreat only to return here by his own will, Endou.



“Haha, I know it is unbelievable… but he is Nagumo.”



“”””””Hah?””””””



Endou’s words made Kouki and the others leaked those words at the same time. Seeing Endou, they though, “Is this guy’s head okay?,” and made some gesture with their hands. Thinking, it can’t be helped, huh~, Endou could only shrugged his shoulders because he was only stating the truth.



“Like I said, he is Nagumo, Nagumo Hajime. The Nagumo who fell from the bridge at that day. He survived in the depth of the dungeon and climbed up with his own power. When coming here, he treated the demonic beasts as if they are just small fries. It’s seriously unbelievable!, I thought so, too… but it is the truth.”



“Nagumo, eh? You mean Nagumo is alive!?”



Kouki said with a surprised voice. Thus, the others also simultaneously tried to look at the boy with monstrous strength who was advancing the annihilation progress… but as expected they tried to deny it while thinking, “Just how is he Nagumo?” Endou understood their feelings and with a gesture he said, “Well, it’s true. Although he has completely changed, I’ve seen his status plate,” Endou told them again that the boy was Nagumo Hajime while sporting a dry smile.



Everyone felt it was unbelievable as they vacantly looked at Hajime’s peerlessness, and a person who was awfully flustered said,



“L-Lies. Nagumo is dead. Wasn’t that the case? Everyone also saw it. There’s no way he is alive! We have already agreed on that!”



“Uwah, what’s with you! I have seen his status plate so there’s no mistake it is him.”



“Lies! There’s must be some trick! He must be in disguise and trying to trick us!”



“No, just what are you saying? There’s no reason for him to do that.”



The one who was saying unreasonable things and grabbed Endou’s collar was Hiyama. He was denying Hajime’s survival with an abnormally paled complexion. Kondou and the others around him were somewhat taken aback by Hiyama’s appearance.



The agitated Hiyama was doused by cold water, literally. A large amount of water suddenly appeared above Hiyama and poured down on him like a small waterfall. Hiyama somewhat drowned because it matched the timing when he inhaled. After being doused with water, he had a coughing fit. What on earth!? Hiyama was confused only to be told by a cold voice far colder than the cold water.



“… Be quiet. It’s irritating.”



Although Hiyama seemed to getting more agitated and tried to object, he instinctively swallowed his words when he turned his gaze towards the source of the voice. After all, the source of the voice, Yue, was looking at Hiyama with a very cold gaze as though she was looking at an insect. At the same time, not only a few would forget their situation after they were captivated by the ideal girl whose beauty was just like the highest grade bisque doll.



Same could be said for Kouki’s party. Their gazes were naturally attracted to the beautiful looking girl whether they were female or male. Even Suzu was obviously captivated and said, “Whooaa~,” with a strange voice. It wasn’t simply because of her beauty, she was also cladded in a bewitching atmosphere contrary to her young appearance which made Kouki’s party captivated.



And at that time, maybe because of the demon race woman’s instruction, several demonic beasts came to attack Kouki’s party. She probably thought of turning them into hostages just like how she had used Meld. It was a normal measure since she couldn’t even imagine of capturing Hajime with a fair challenge.



Suzu immediately thought of creating shields. Having activated magic one after another, her exhausted body was screaming. She bit her lips to prevent herself from blacking out… but Yue gently stopped Suzu with her hand. Having Yue quietly patting her head, “Ehh?,” Suzu inadvertently said with a relaxed voice and stopped her chant.



“… Don’t worry.”



Yue muttered, and Suzu said, “Ah, it’s already safe now,” without any basis for it nor any power left her body. Even she herself didn’t know why she could simply accepted Yue’s words, but she felt she was being defended by a reliable big sister.



Yue looked away from Suzu and glared at the demonic beasts that readied their fangs, claws, tentacles, and maces. Then, with one sentence she pulled her magic’s trigger.



“”Blue Dragon.””



In the next moment, a bluish-white sphere with one meter in diameter appeared above Yue and the others. Those who used flame attribute magic knew it was one of the highest level magic, a blue flame magic capable of decimating anything it approached, “Blue Imperial.” It was abnormal to be able to activate it without any chant and in no time. Especially the rear group; they knew what happened and could only looked up at the blue blaze in blank surprise.



However, this was just the start of what would make them truly surprised. The blue flame burning radiantly suddenly changed its shape to one of a snake, attacked the incoming maces swinging Brutal-look-alikes and the others by swallowing them. They were instantly killed, and not even an ash remained.



Before long, the shape of the blue flame changed and swam in the air. It was a blazing blue dragon, with length of around 30 meters. With Yue in the center, the blue dragon protected Kouki and the others by coiling around them. Then, it raised its head, and opened its jaws towards the demonic beasts which were standing still because they could not approach the the blue hellfire that would perish everything.



RoOoOAAAAR!!!



It roared. And immediately, the bodies of the demonic beasts flew. As though they were attracted by gravity, they jumped into the blue dragon’s mouth one after another. Although the others understood it was not suicide since the demonic beasts desperately tried to escape in mid-air in panic due to the abrupt situation. Seeing the demonic beast throwing their bodies in queue towards the annihilation that didn’t even leave an ash, made them think it as nothing but a bad joke.



“What is this magic…”



Someone muttered. The unknown magic had one-sidedly burnt the demonic beasts to annihilation by pulling them, which made Kouki’s party unable to close their wide opened mouths. But it couldn’t be helped. After all, this magic was the same as “Thunder Dragon,” an original magic of Yue’s, formed by combining the highest fire magic element, “Blue Imperial,” and one of the Age of Gods’ magic, gravity magic.



Incidentally, the reason she used “Blue Dragon” and not “Thunder Dragon” was simply because Yue was training herself. Thunder Dragon was a combination between gravity magic and high-ranked wind attribute, thunder, so “Blue Dragon” had higher difficulty and power. Because she was just recently capable of combining highest level magic, she wanted to make its debut.



Naturally, Kouki’s party who didn’t know of the circumstances shifted their gazes from the “Blue Dragon” to Yue, about to ask for an explanation. However, calmly straightening its back, the Blue Dragon stopped and its flame shone brighter. Together with Yue’s sublime figure, it made Kouki’s party hold their breath, and they were unable to say the words to ask for an explanation. Several people quickly had their hearts stolen by Yue… especially Suzu; she was letting out an exclamation of joy like a small old man.



On the other side, when the demon race woman saw the bizarre “Blue Dragon” from the distance, she cursed in her mind, “There’s only monsters here, huh!” Frustrated due to the demonic beasts being exterminated one after another, she changed her aim to the RabbitMan girl beside the mortally wounded Meld, and the two girls close to each other who were separated from the others.



However, the demon race woman was further exposed to the arbitrary.



The Brutal-look-alike which came to attack Shia had its head blown away like a pinball with a swing from Doryukken. She then rotated her body using the momentum from her first attack towards the four-eyed wolf coming advancing from behind her and it died easily with its head crushed by an attack carrying enough centrifugal force.



Once again, Chimeras and black cats were about to attack Kaori and Shizuku. Shizuku gritted her teeth, and readied her broken sword towards the incoming; the scattered demonic beasts filled with killing intent. However, as if to stop them, the cross bits floating in her surrounding came in between Shizuku and the Chimeras.



Shizuku was somewhat shaken by the mysterious crosses were moving as though to protect her. Suddenly, the longer point of the crosses turned towards the Chimera and a roaring sounds rang out. “Seriously, what are those!?” Shizuku was shouting inside her mind, when something spinningly flew almost grazing her cheek and fell to the ground with a metallic sound. The same roaring sound rang out beside Kaori, and the same sound of metal resounded, too, as expected.



Although confused, Kaori and Shizuku returned their attentions towards the incoming demonic beasts, and there were only the figures of demonic beasts with heads blown to pieces… They were speechless and turned their gazes towards the source of the metallic sounds and confirmed its identity.



“Isn’t that… cartridge?”



“Cartridge… a gun’s?”



Kaori and Shizuku faced each other as they said the unfamiliar term out loud. They were convinced once they saw Hajime’s figure rampaging with guns in both hand. The crosses floating to defend them were similar to an all-range weapon from somewhere.



“A-Amazing… Hajime-kun can use Funnel.”



“Just, since when did he become a NewType…”



Kaori and Shizuku regained a lot of their composure after the surrounding demonic beasts were instantly exterminated. They let out unbecoming retorts which were actually transmitted to Hajime through the Cross Bits. And on the contrary, Hajime wanted to retort back in regards to how the two knew such references. However, Hajime did not worry about it thanks to the skill he honed by being in the company of Yue and the girls, “Let it be”.



“Seriously… what’s with this.”



The demon race woman muttered powerlessly. No matter what she tried, everything was held down and crushed by sheer power. Such irrational things allowed her mind to be invaded by feeling of throwing in the towel. There were hardly any demonic beasts remaining, and it was obvious to anyone who was the victor and loser.



My last hope! The demon race woman fired magic towards Hajime for the sake of escaping and ran towards one of the four exits with all of her might. The magic fired towards Hajime was “Final Prison.” It exploded right beside Hajime, and the petrifying smoke wrapped around him. Kouki’s party held their breaths while Kaori and Shizuku screamed Hajime’s name.



Leering at the shaken Kouki’s party, the demon race woman finally reached one of the exits.



However…



“Haha… I’ve been checkmated, huh.”



“It is certainly as you say.”



Before the demon race woman was the floating cross with its dark muzzle pointed at her from inside the passage. With a dry laughter, only now did she realize she had been checkmated long since before she attacked Hajime, and the demon race woman inadvertently leaked a dry laughter. The hateful calm voice came from behind.



This time, the demon race woman looked back in resignation and she saw Hajime walking closer from inside the petrifying smoke as if nothing happened. Next, he scattered the petrifying smoke to the other passage by sweeping it away using the red wave of “Magic Emission.”



“… You monster. To take a high-ranked magic as something insignificant… You, are you really human?”



“Actually, even I’ve doubting that. But, it isn’t so bad to become a monster, you know?”



Hajime and the demon race woman said in a joking manner with only a slight distance between them. When the demon race woman took a look at the room, the demonic beasts had truly been annihilated before she was aware of it. Once again she cursed in a small voice, “You monster.”



Ignoring her, Hajime aimed Donner’s muzzle towards the woman. The weapon of death pointed right before her eyes made the demon race woman realize it was time for her to die, and she looked back.



“Well then, “Do you have anything left to say?” Is what is usually said in these kinds of situation… Unfortunately, I don’t have any interest in hearing your last will. More importantly, about why a person of the demon race had come here… and where you obtained those demonic beasts… Shall I have you spit it out?”



“Do you think I will speak? It might become an advantage for human race, right? As if I am that stupid.”



The demon race woman snorted scornfully, which made Hajime look at her with cold gaze. Thus, without hesitation, he fired Donner to both of the demon race woman’s legs.



“AgaaAH!!”



The demon race woman screamed and collapsed. The scream resounded inside the silent room where the demonic beasts had ceased to breathe. Hajime knew the classmates behind him were gulping because of his merciless action. However, not worrying about such things, Hajime asked again with Donner aimed at the woman.



“Whether it’s human race or demon race, I don’t care about your world’s circumstance. I am asking you not as someone from human race. I am only asking because I want to know it. So, answer it now.”



“…”



The demon race woman was glaring at Hajime while gritting her teeth from the pain. Seeing her eyes, Hajime realized she was not likely to speak, so he began to speak instead.



“Well, I have roughly guessed it. You came here to conquer the “True Great Dungeon,” right?”



The demon race woman’s brows twitched from Hajime’s words. Hajime continued speaking while carefully observing the woman’s reaction.



“Those demonic beasts were the product of an Age of Gods magic… looks like I hit the bull’s eye. I see, so the change in demon race side was because they conquered a Great Dungeon and obtained the Age of Gods magic which could enslave demonic beasts, huh… Resultantly, the human race side moved to conquer the Great Dungeon by investigating and then inviting the heroes…”



“How… it can’t be…”



Hajime had stated his theories which was right on the mark, and it rattled the demon race woman. With the mortified expression, she questioned how he knew when a possibility came to mind. Seeing her expression, Hajime noticed the demon race woman had guessed Hajime was also another dungeon conqueror. With his glance, he responded, “Correct.”



“I see, if you are the same as that person… then I can understand your monster-like power… Ah, isn’t that enough? Just kill me. After all, I have no intention of being a captive…”



“As that person… right. You must be referring to the conqueror whom you received the demonic beasts from, huh…”



The expression of the demon race woman’s face told him she would rather commit suicide rather than to be taken as a captive. Thus, she wanted to at least die in battle. The information about another dungeon conqueror was enough for Hajime, so with thoughts of ending it, killing intent appeared in his eyes.



As revenge for dying in the middle of her path, and unwillingness to admit defeat, the demon race woman muttered towards Hajime.



“Someday, my lover will kill you.”



Her words made Hajime’s lips curved and floated a fearless smile.



“I will kill my enemy, even if it is God. And if that person is someone who dances inside the palm of God’s, then he wouldn’t be able to reach me.”



There’s nothing left to talk about, so the two closed their mouths. Hajime turned Donner’s muzzle towards the demon race woman’s head.



However, the moment he was about to pull the trigger, a loud voice stopped him.



“Wait! Just wait, Nagumo! She can no longer fight! So, it’s not necessary to kill her!”



“…”



With his finger still on Donner’s trigger, “What is this guy saying?,” Hajime looked over his shoulder with a dubious expression. Kouki managed to unsteadily stand up after he had slightly recovered and further raised his voice.



“Capture, right, just make her a captive. It’s absolutely unforgivable to kill someone who cannot resist. I am the hero. And Nagumo is my comrade, so please back away in consideration of me.”



Excuses that rendered too much retort was something Hajime thought there was no value in hearing it and swiftly discarded them. Silently,… he pulled the trigger.



BaAaAaANNNG!



The dry explosive sound echoed inside the room. Killing intent was aimed and a shot was fired through the demon race woman’s forehead where she instantly died.



Silence engulfed their surrounding. The classmates finally understood and could only hold their bated breaths, puzzled to the spectacle where one of their classmate killed a person without hesitation. Amongst all of them, Kaori was most shocked by it.



It was not about him killing a person. After all, Kaori herself had been prepared for it. It was a natural thing since they had entered the fight in this world. After all, fighting the demonic beast inside the dungeon was only combat exercise.



That’s why, a day where killing one another would surely come, for she must kill hostile people, and she was prepared to do it. She was a healer who stand by the rear, but thinking of Shizuku, Kouki, and the others who were in the front lines — the time when her the hands of her friends will be dirtied by blood, even if it was just a little, made her heart resolved to not averting from such situations even just for a moment.



What shocked Kaori was because she could not sense any aversion, disgust, and hesitation towards murder from Hajime. He killed a person as though it was natural as breathing. The Hajime Kaori knew was someone who even though he couldn’t go against the others, he was a gentle and strong person capable of being able to jump into a whirlpool for the sake of others.



That form of being “strong” was not a power that came from violence. It was a strength due to “thinking about others” no matter what time or situation he was in. That’s why, Hajime who could kill an enemy who had lost her spirit and would not resist with neither hesitation nor had any deep emotion, had become someone completely different from Hajime she knew, and it shocked her.



Shizuku was her best friend, so she understood Kaori had received a powerful shock. However, she was able to guess what shocked Kaori from the scattered talk they usually had about Hajime when they were in Japan.



Shizuku looked at Hajime with a cool expression and she thought he had certainly changed, but she knew it was wrong for her, who knew nothing, to complain about it. That’s why, as the result, she could do nothing but to stop being nestled close to Kaori.



However, naturally, the lump of justice called hero wouldn’t be able to stay silent about it. Kouki’s voice rang out as if to subdue the space filled with silence.



“Why, why did you kill her. Was there any necessary to kill her…”



Hajime was walking towards Shia’s side and caught Kouki staring at him with a penetrating glare at the edge of his view. He hesitated for a moment thinking how he should answer, but in the next moment, to begin with, there’s no need to answer!, he thought and decided to ignore Kouki.



However, whether the other party would allow Hajime’s attitude was another problem…





Volume 8 Chapter 9




While the sound of Kouki’s desperate voice subduing the silence, the person whom the words were directed to pretended as though he didn’t hear anything and walked towards Shia’s side, beside the collapsed Meld.



Thinking there was no longer a need to protect Kouki’s party, Yue also walked towards Hajime and Shia. “Ahh, One-sama!,” Suzu’s shout, whose heart was just like a small old man, came from behind her.



“Shia, how’s Meld’s condition?”



“It was almost too late. He would not survive if we were even a little slower… I used “Holy Water” as instructed, but… was it really okay to do that?”



“Ah, I was indebted to this person. Besides, the hole Meld left would be too big in a lot of ways. It’ll be especially problematic if someone weird took over the training of the Hero’s party. Well, seeing their current state, it looks like Meld was unable to finish their training properly… but it isn’t a mistake that he is a man of character. He is a person who will cause regret in various meanings if he died.”



Kouki was currently glaring at Hajime. Supported by Ryuutarou, he walked towards Hajime accompanied by the other classmates. Shia was asking him for the reason of using Holy Water on Meld. Incidentally, what he meant by “someone weird” was the person from Church of the Saints such as Ishtal.



“… Hajime.”



“Yue. Thank you for listening to my request.”



“Nh.”



Yue had arrived at the time he was still speaking to Shia. While gently patting Yue’s cheek who was looking up at him as she called his name, Hajime conveyed his gratitude. Yue’s gaze expressed, “Don’t mind,” while delightedly narrowing her eyes. Naturally, Hajime’s gaze softened and the two were watching each other.



“… You two, please read the mood… Come on, return to your senses! Everyone are almost gathered here!”



Hajime and Yue began to create their own world which could already be called a disease for them. Thus, Shia clapped her hands and retorted to make them return to their senses.



Apparently, the glares coming from Kouki with different meaning had increased and Hajime noticed it. Especially a glare coming from different direction than Kouki and the others. It made him feel a chill running down on his spine.



“Oi, Nagumo. Why did you kill—…”



“Hajime-kun… even though there’s much I want to ask, how’s Meld-san’s condition? From what I see, the injuries had been closed and his breathing is also steady. But, he should’ve been mortally wounded…”



Kouki’s words to press a question onto Hajime was interrupted by Kaori, who came and knelt by Meld’s side with a serious expression and asked Hajime the details of Meld’s condition.



For a moment, Hajime felt the chill in his guts from Kaori’s gaze, but thinking it was just his imagination, he decided to answer Kaori’s question.



“Yeah, that’s because… I used a rather special medicine. The liquid type that will instantly heal a person completely even if the person was dying.”



“S-Such a medicine, how come I’ve never heard of it?”



“That is because it was once only a legend… and no one would be able to obtain it, normally. That’s why, Yaegashi, you need to be healed by magic. And here is the potion to recover magic power.”



“Eh, yes… Thank you.”



Being called by Hajime, Shizuku received the potion and slightly stammered while she said her gratitude due to the gap between the current Hajime and the Hajime in her memory. Hajime didn’t especially mind Shizuku’s reaction and he gave another magic power recovery potion to Kaori. Kaori caught the potion bottle and drunk the content after she said her gratitude to Hajime. With the Lipovitan-like taste spreading inside her mouth, her energy gradually recovered. The classmates should be immediately healed as long as Kaori recovers.



For now, Kaori and the others breathed sighs of relief because they understood there was nothing to worry about in regards to Meld. Then, Kouki once again opened his mouth.



“Oi, Nagumo, I am grateful about Meld-san’s matter, but why did y—…”



“Hajime-kun. Thank you for saving Meld-san. Also, thank you… for saving us.”



Thus, he was once again interrupted by Kaori. Kouki now wore a truly subtle expression. However, Kaori completely not noticing Kouki’s expression since she was looking straight at Hajime. Even though she received a severe shock from Hajime’s changes, there were things she wanted to say. She walked up until she was right before Hajime to say her gratitude about Meld’s matter and how he saved them.



Afterwards, while grasping her skirt with both hands, guh, the things she wanted to say were on the tip of her tongue, but she couldn’t say anything and her tears began to fall. Although she was sobbing, she didn’t look away from Hajime as though to confirm the him before her was not an illusion. Hajime silently returned Kaori’s gaze.



“Hajime-gun… dank God, gusuh, dat you’r alive. Dat time, I am sorry… hic… dat I couldn’t protect you… waaa.”



Amongst the classmates, the girls held warm gazes because they could guess Kaori’s feelings. Some of the boys also had warm gazes, but Kondou and some others had bitter expressions, while Kouki and Ryuutarou were dumbfounded since they could not understand Kaori. The most dense protagonist on earth, Kouki, and the muscle for a brain, Ryuutarou, made it hard for Shizuku and it could be seen in her eyes.



With troubled expression, Shia said, “Uh, by any chance, is she a new rival?,” while Yue was looking at Kaori with the usual silent and expressionlessness.



The Kaori before him was crying which messed her face, and Hajime wore an indescribable expression when he realized Kaori had been worrying about him since the day he fell just as Endou had said.



The truth was, he had told Yue once about his circumstance along with the story about Kaori, but that was when they were still in the abyss, and he had completely forgotten about Kaori until he met Aiko and the others in Ul. That’s why, he was gradually feeling guilty because she thought of him this strongly.



After sporting a troubled and at lost expression, Hajime answered Kaori’s words with a bitter smile.



“…What to say, looks like I’ve made you worried. I am sorry for not immediately telling you about it. Well, just as you see, I am alive… so there’s no need to apologize… Also, umm, please don’t cry.”



Hajime said while looking at Kaori with the same gentle gaze when he was worrying about Kaori and said, “Please protect me.” Upon seeing his gaze, Kaori felt her chest being filled with the memory of the night when they exchanged the promise. Inadvertently, Waahh, she cried and jumped into Hajime’s chest.



At a loss of what to do about Kaori who was crying while clinging on his chest, Hajime held up both of his hands. If it was another classmate, he would have mercilessly threw the person away since he would feel irritated and use yakuza kick to make the person unconscious. However, the pure and never changing goodwill which was the same even before he fell into the abyss made him incapable of treating her coldly.



But with Yue by his side, he couldn’t embrace another woman and could only hold up his hands as though someone had pointed gun’s muzzle at him, becoming a half assed respond since he just let Kaori cry. It was truly not Hajime-like.



“My best friend is crying! So, hug her!,” was what Shizuku’s gaze who was beside him was saying, but it was hard to move because Yue was also watching him in silence. Being helpless, he lightly pat Kaori’s head to stop her after a while. Really, Hajime had became a good for nothing.



“…Fuu, Kaori is really gentle. She even cry in joy from her classmate’s survival… However, Nagumo killed a non-resisting person. We need to talk. That’s why, that’s enough and you should get away from Nagumo.”



“You, read the mood!,” was what some of the classmates criticized Kouki with their gazes. Even in such time, this boy was still unable to be considerate to Kaori’s feeling. While glaring at Hajime mixed with condemn, he tried to pull Kaori away from Hajime. Maybe it was simply because he didn’t want others to touch Kaori or because the caution he held from being beside a murderer… or maybe both.



“Wait, Kouki! Isn’t Nagumo-kun the one who saved us? How can you said such things?”



“But, Shizuku. That woman already lost her spirit to fight. There’s no need to kill her. So what Nagumo did is something I can’t allow.”



“See here, Kouki, can you cut it out already? To begin with…”



Kouki’s objection was rebutted by Shizuku. The other classmates were flustered since they didn’t know what to do, but Hiyama’s gang who never liked Hajime began to support Kouki.



Gradually, it became a discussion about Hajime’s action. Kaori had already separated from Hajime’s chest and wiped her tears, but there was still the shock she received from a while ago, so she fell silent with a difficult expression while she was thinking of something.



Suddenly, a voice came to douse them with cold water.



“…What foolish people. Hajime, can we leave now?”



“Ah~, yup, let’s go.”



The one calling Kouki and the others “foolish” with tone so cold as if it was in absolute zero was Yue. Although the voice was spoken in small mutter, it clearly resounded even inside the commotion of Kouki and the others. For a moment, silence wrapped their location, then Kouki and the others moved their gazes towards Yue.



To begin with, the reason Hajime came here after hearing Endou’s story was his obligation to Kaori, and it had been accomplished. Thus, he went out of the room following Yue who pulled his hand. Shia followed after them without minding the others.



As such, the action of Hajime’s party made Kouki and the others stop.



“Please stop. Our talk here isn’t over yet. I won’t take Nagumo as my comrade if he doesn’t tell me his real intention. Besides, just who do you think you are? Although I am grateful for your help, to call us foolish at our first meeting… isn’t that rude? Just what is foolish about us?”



“…”



Kouki once again talk about something out of topic. Although what he said was correct in such situations, comparing their circumstances made Yue wanted to say, “Try to think while putting your hand on your chest.” To even go this far, it wouldn’t be strange to say Kouki was cursed by something.



Maybe because Yue had forsaken Kouki already; she didn’t look at him, expressing there’s no value in looking at him. Kouki was slightly irritated and frowned being of Yue’s attitude, but he immediately floated a gentle smile again, thinking she was just an ordinary girl, and he tried to talk to Yue.



Because this wouldn’t end with the way it was going and he felt Yue’s discomfort, Hajime decided to answer a little and sighed with an expression as though saying it was a hassle.



“Amanogawa. I have neither care nor obligation to answer everything to you whose existence is a joke in more ways than one. But, I’ll point it out to you a little because you are being persistent about it.”



“Point it out, you say? Are you saying I am wrong? I, I only say something obvious as a person.”



Because, It’s troublesome, truly!, was what Hajime expression turned to. Kouki irritatedly objected Hajime’s words which was then ignored, and Hajime continued his words.



“You can’t fool me.”



“What’s with that…”



“You, you are not angry because I killed that woman. You are only feeling unpleasant to see a person’s death. However, you knew you are mistaken to blame me to kill the woman who murdered the Knights and tried to kill you. That’s why you’re using “killing a non-resisting person” as your main point, right? Being made to see something you didn’t want to see and for someone to easily do things you couldn’t… those are the cause of your anger. However, you tried to cover it under the name of justice. What worse is you yourself aren’t conscious of it. You never change, huh. You interpret things at your own convenience as natural as breathing.”



“Y-You are wrong! Don’t say something for your own convenience! It is the true you killed a non-resisting person!”



“I killed my enemy, what’s wrong with that?”



“Wh-!? What are you saying? It’s murder! Of course it is wrong!”



“Haa, I don’t want to discuss with you, so can we end it now? ———— I, I won’t give any mercy to my enemy. If someone opposed me, as long as I don’t have any other need for it, I will absolutely kill that person. I don’t care whether they are good or evil, resisting or not. Hatefully, I knew I’d be dead if I show even a moment of weakness. This is my sense of value cultivated inside the abyss, and I won’t force it to other. But, if someone doesn’t like it and tried to block me…”



Hajime instantly closed the distance and pressed the muzzle against Kouki’s forehead. At the same time, Hajime’s “Pressure” activated and the dense killing intent fell into the surrounding like a large, powerful waterfall. Kouki’s party held their breaths. Even Kouki, who was able to chase after Shizuku whose movement was the fastest among his comrades, could not even perceive Hajime’s earlier movement and he trembled in fear.



“I will kill them, even if that person is a former classmate of mine.”



“Y-You…”



“Don’t misunderstand, okay? I never thought of returning to you. Also, I am not your comrade. I only came here to pay my obligation to Shirasaki. It’s a goodbye after we get out of here. I have my own path to take.”



After saying so, he glared at Kouki who couldn’t say anything and was holding his breath. Hajime returned Donner to its holster, and with “Pressure” deactivation, the classmates exhaled greatly while looking at Hajime with complexed gazes. However, Kouki still could not accept it and tried to argue some more. But it was prevented by Yue’s harsh words while she wore a disgusted expression.



“…The one who fought was Hajime. The loser who ran away after being defeated in fear has no qualification to criticize him.”



“Wh—, you say I ran away…”



Actually it was not a coincidence Hajime’s party could pinpointed their location. The truth was, Hajime guessed the explosive torrent of magic power he felt to be coming from Kouki’s party when he was still in upper floor. Then, he used full advantage of his perception type skills to search for people presences downstairs and used transmutation along with pile bunker to pierce through the floors.



The torrent of magic power he felt at that time was Kouki’s “Supreme Break.” Feeling the huge power, Hajime’s party understood that Kouki would be able to defeat the demon race woman in that condition. That’s why they could see through that Kouki hesitated to kill and invited their predicament after coming to their location. It was why Yue said, “he ran away after being defeated in fear.”



Kouki tried to refute Yue, but a deep voice interrupted him.



“Stop it, Kouki.”



“Meld-san!”



Meld’s consciousness had returned a while ago and he heard the conversation between Kouki and the others. Still somewhat in a daze, he stood up and shook his head to clear his mind. Next, he saw his abdomen which surely had been injured, and so he tilt his head in confusion.



Kaori explained to Meld in details about what had happened. Knowing he was miraculously helped with a valuable medicine and hearing the owner was Hajime, Meld was happy from the depth of his heart that Hajime was alive. Moreover, he thanked Hajime for saving him. He grandly prostrated for being unable to save him at that time which made Hajime felt uncomfortable to receive his apology.



Rather than not minding it, Hajime had completely forgotten when Meld said, “I will absolutely save you,” … but he read the mood when Meld was before him, apologizing while bowing deeply.



When his conversation with Hajime ended, Meld turned towards Kouki and apologized just like what he did to Hajime.



“M-Meld-san? Why, why are you apologizing?”



“Of course. I am your trainer… but, I forgot to teach you an important thing during a fight. It’s the resolution to kill a person. When the time comes, I’ve thought of making you experience killing people by setting them up as thieves while making it look like a coincidence… After all, that experience is something necessary if you participate in war against the demon race… However, I’ve spent a lot of time conversing with you which made me think if it was really okay to let you experience that… Thus, I’ve hesitated. If I am thinking of my position as the commander of the Knights, I would have taught you even earlier, but… a little longer, just a little longer, until we cleared this. Things dragged on in this manner and reached this situation… I am just being half-assed. It’s my mistake as your trainer. That’s why, to make you face death… I apologize.”



Saying so, Meld once again bowed which made the classmates try and comfort him in hurry. Apparently, Meld had been considerably worried about Kouki’s party. He was likely being pulled apart by his mission as the commander and him as a person.



Meld is a citizen of the Kingdom and a believer of Church of the Saints. Therefore, it wasn’t weird that he felt it was natural and an honor for Kouki and the others, the “God’s Apostles,” to fight the demon race. However, he doubted as he fought along with Kouki’s party which meant he was a good or maybe a gentle person, and at the level of a man of character just as Hajime said.



Hearing what was in Meld’s mind, Kouki fell silent. After knowing that he must kill people in due time, he recalled his fear when he was about to kill the demon race woman. At the same time, he received shock from Meld’s words saying they would kill people masked as thieves for the sake of training. If it’s thieves, then we have power to overwhelm them. But to purposely killed them… he thought.



On the other side, Kaori was also silent. But it was not because she heard Meld’s words. For a long time, she had been thinking about Hajime’s words.



The sense of value cultivated inside the abyss where enemy would be killed without hesitation even if it was his classmate… were impossible words coming from Hajime of the past. However, he proved he was serious with the previous killing intent. The Hajime who was gentle and acted by putting the sake of others before him had unhesitatingly turned his killing intent towards them. Kaori was perplexed and shaken by the differences between Hajime she knew and Hajime before her. Thinking of the Hajime who was worried about her from a little ago was an illusion, Kaori was uneasy.



While she was thinking, Kaori suddenly felt someone’s gaze. Before Kaori was the blond-haired, red-eyed beautiful girl. A beautiful girl that made even Kaori instinctively charmed. She was quietly observing Kaori with eyes where no feeling could be felt.



Kaori recalled the girl had been fairly intimate with Hajime which made Kaori interested and turned to look at Yue. For a while, the two watched each other.



“…Fu.”



“Kh…”



However, Yue was the first to avert her gaze while sneering.



Kaori inadvertently held her breath. It was because she noticed the meaning behind her sneer. It was, “If you are shaken by this, just forget about Hajime,” something like that.



Yue had of course guessed how Kaori feels about Hajime from her attitude. Thus, hearing she believed of Hajime’s survival even though he fell into the abyss, a strong rival in love might show up, I must stand tall!, was what she thought.



However, when she saw Kaori comparing the past and current Hajime, and it resulted in her being shaken and perplexed while being taken aback by the differences. Although that reaction was as natural as possible for a person… it made Yue see her as insignificant.



You can’t even become an enemy. From now on, Hajime is only mine. Hajime’s “special” person is me! The implied declaration made Kaori’s face red; red from shame and anger. However, Kaori could not refute since she had lost sight of the human called Hajime. The first encounter between Yue and Kaori resulted in Yue as the victor.



Leering at Kouki and the others whose mood became subtle, Hajime took Yue and Shia along, collected the pile bunker’s stake, and tried to go through the opened hole. Noticing what he was doing, Kouki and the others began to follow Hajime’s party. Endou had proposed for everyone to take advantage of Hajime’s party until they reached the surface, and Meld was being carried by Hajime after they pleaded him.



On the way to the surface, the demonic beasts that tried to obstruct them were instantly killed by Hajime which made them once again amazed by his strength. The classmates wore various expressions thinking whether he was the same person who was once called “incompetent.”



Hiyama was glaring at Hajime with paled complexion, Kondou’s gang were sending him begrudging gazes, and Nagayama’s party were looking at him admiringly as they wore complex expressions due to Hajime clearly saying he was not their comrade.



Even though Kondou’s gang had closely seen Hajime’s prowess and shrunk before it, they still thought Hajime was the same as the previous him. On the other side, Nagayama’s party knew what kind of treatment Hajime received from Hiyama and his gang and pretend to not see it, so now they felt guilty about it. They thought it could not be helped that Hajime didn’t think of them as his comrades…



Receiving various gazes from Kouki and the others behind him, Hajime just ignored them and advanced on his own road.



On the way, Suzu’s inner oldman caused commotion as she tried to talk to Yue about various things. She also barraged Hajime with questions about what happened, then she turned her aim towards Shia’s huge breasts and rabbit-ears. When she realized the two just ignored her, she was then physically stopped by Shizuku. Kondou’s gang tried to talk to Yue and Shia fully loaded with desire, but were completely ignored, even so they kept being persistent. They tried to touch Shia’s rabbit-ears without permission which awarded them with Hajime’s rubber bullets. They vomited after receiving yakuza kicks, and fear was driven into them when they received a slight killing intent leaking from Hajime ———— various things happened, and finally the group reached the surface.



Kaori was still looking down, worrying. Shizuku was also worriedly watching Kaori and drew closer to her. However, a situation where an impact blew away all of Kaori’s worries had happened. It was a situation she couldn’t overlook as a woman whose heart was set on Hajime.



It happened when they arrived at the entrance of «Orcus Great Dungeon».



“Ah! Papaa~!”



“Uh! Myuu, huh.”



It was the appearance of a little girl calling Hajime papa.





Volume 8 Chapter 10




“Papaa~!! Welcome back~!!”



A cheerful little girl’s voice rang out inside the plaza of «Orcus Great Dungeon»’s entrance gate.



Adventurers and mercenaries, who were going to dive into the dungeon, were noisily negotiating with the merchants who were also advertising themselves in various crowded stalls. However, Myuu’s raised voice, which rivaled their own, made the experts of battle look at her and smile as their gazes softened.



Tap, tap, tap, tap, tap—! Myuu ran straight towards Hajime while making such lovely footsteps, and then jumped into Hajime. Hajime failed to receive her since he hadn’t even dreamed she would do that.



In a normal situation, the little girl’s head would have thrust into his stomach like a rocket and made him writhe in pain. But fortunately, Hajime’s body was not that weak. Moreover, he completely warded off the impact so he would not injure Myuu, and firmly caught her.



“Myuu, you came to welcome us? Where’s Tio?”



“Un. Tio-oneechan thought it was about time for Papa to come back. That’s why we came here. Tio-oneechan is…”



“This one is here.”



Separating the crowd, a beautiful, black-haired, golden-eyed, young woman appeared. Needless to say, it was Tio. Since she was within the crowd where it wasn’t odd for one to get lost made, Hajime began to complain about her being separated from Myuu.



“Oi oi, Tio. Don’t separate from Myuu in such a place.”



“This one kept her along her sight. It just that there were some rude fellows. And this one doth not want to let Myuu see a ghastly spectacle.”



“I see. Then it couldn’t be helped… So, where are the suicide candidates?”



“Well, Master. This one has completely settled it down.”



“… Tch, well whatever.”



“… Doth Master truly believe thee will return her again?”



Apparently, there were some idiots who tried to kidnap Myuu. Because Myuu was a child from the Sea-dweller tribe, she put on a hood so she wouldn’t stand out in such a public location. As such, not knowing she was a child from Sea-dweller tribe protected by the Kingdom, there were people thinking of insolence. One of the reasons might be because under the hood, she had the face of a young child with lovely features. It was unknown whether their objective was ransom or not though.



Hajime asked for the criminals’ whereabout with a dark smile and the obviousness that he’d kill them, made Tio admonish him in half-amazement. In the beginning, Hajime disliked being called Papa from the bottom of his heart, but now he had become her Papa. When we arrive at Elisen, can Master separate from her… Hajime was more worrisome than Myuu.



Hearing the conversation between Hajime and Tio, Kouki’s party stood in blank surprise. Though they understood Hajime had become strong in the past four months because he experienced various things they couldn’t even imagine, “How can he be a father!” Everyone was dumbfounded by this thought. The male students thought, “Just what kind of experiences has he piled up!?” and they moved their gazes to Yue and Shia, and next they looked at the black-haired, big-breasted, beautiful woman who suddenly appeared, and they clearly thought of something rude. This surprise might even be greater than the time Hajime displayed his peerlessness inside the dungeon.



If they calmly thought about it, it’s unbelievable for him to make a child after being missing for just four months, but the various impacts in succession, along with them just returning from life and death battle made them lost their composure and splendidly make such a misunderstanding.



Following that, one person unsteadily moved within Kouki’s party. With a smile plastered on her face which didn’t reach the eyes… it was Kaori. Kaori unsteadily approached him and suddenly, glare, her eyes opened wide then she caught Hajime.



“Hajime-kun! What does this mean!? Is she really Hajime-kun’s daughter!? Who’s the mother!? Yue-san!? Shia-san!? Or, is it that black-haired person!? Don’t tell me, there are others!? Just how many did you make pregnant!? Answer me! Hajime-kun!”



Gripping Hajime’s collar, Kaori shook Hajime in confusion. Although Hajime tried to say it was a misunderstanding and get away from her, he couldn’t get away because Kaori gripped him with such ridiculous strength he had no idea she had. From behind Kaori, “Kaori, please calm down! There’s no way she is his daughter, you know!” Shizuku admonished and pinioned her, but it seemed like Kaori did not hear her.



On the other hand, they could hear whispers and rumours coming from the surroundings.



“What’s this? A scene of carnage?”



“It looks like, he got another woman pregnant while he has another woman?”



“And not only one or two.”



“Doesn’t it seem like he got five pregnant at the same time?”



“Well, I heard he created a harem and made tens of women pregnant, I think?”



“But, he seemed to have hidden it from the wife.”



“I see… so today he got found out huh.”



“To create a harem… how enviable.”



“What an honorable man… he is better off dead though.”



Apparently, it turned out that Hajime was a married brute who hid the fact that he was the master of a harem and made tens of women pregnant while keeping it a secret from his wife. Hajime, who was currently being shaken by Kaori, was looking at the ceiling with half-closed eyes, and then he leaked a deep sigh while patting Myuu, who wondered what happened and tilted her head.



* * *



The appearance of Kaori, whose head was buried in Shizuku’s chest with a crimson face, looked as though she wanted to bury herself in a hole. Regaining her composure, she noticed she had shouted something unbelievable, and her embarrassment came in at mach-speed. “It’s okay~, it’s okay,” the appearance of Shizuku comforting her was just like a mother… no, let’s stop here.



Hajime and the others had moved away from the entrance gate and arrived at the plaza in the town’s entrance. After his honor, which had gone up made a sharp fall in the public eyes, he reported to the branch head, Lorr, about the accomplishment of the request. And after two or three conversations, he decided to leave the town quickly to escape the various commotions. To begin with, he had only come here to deliver the letter from Ilwa to Lorr, so there was neither a need to resupply nor problem if they left immediately.



Kouki’s party came back one by one after the leaving Hajime’s party due to following Kaori. Kaori, still writhing in embarrassment, was desperately thinking about what she should do. She had to decide whether she would separate from Hajime as she was or follow him. Her feelings were more inclined to follow him. She didn’t want to separate after they were finally reunited.



However, she could not make a clear decision because of her her guilt from leaving Kouki’s party and how she was shaken by Hajime’s changes. Moreover, there was the effect from her shaking being seen through and sneered at.



Kaori, just like what Yue did to her, had guessed how strong Yue’s feelings were towards Hajime. Following that, more than anything, how Hajime thought of Yue as someone important to him became a thorn that pierced and stuck onto her heart. The two thought of each other. Then, the one-sidedly ridicule, “So that’s the extent of your feelings” doubted the strength of Kaori’s shaken feelings.



She was wondering whether her feelings would lose to Yue’s, and now, whether her feelings should be set aside so it would not become a nuisance. But more importantly, was she really looking at the current Hajime beside her? Or was she only thinking of the past Hajime? That, coupled with Yue’s extraordinarily high abilities as his partner and how dignified she was made Kaori… overwhelmed. In short, she had lost her confidence in herself as a woman, as a magic-user, and even her feelings towards Hajime.



Finally, it was the time for Hajime’s party to leave, and for some reason the atmosphere was full of unrest. Noticing that and raising her face, Kaori saw around ten of men blocking their way.



“Oi oi, just where do you think you are going? You made our comrades into such rag-tags, do you think you can go without an apology? Ah? Ah!?”



The dirty looking armed man smiled inappropriately as he looked at Tio and said. Apparently, they were the comrades of the fellows who previously tried to kidnap Myuu. They came to take revenge on Tio. But, those vulgar gazes were obviously not looking for retribution but something else.



In this town, adventurers should know of the commotion inside the guild and would not go looking for a fight against Hajime. That’s why, these men were probably stray mercenaries.



Hajime and some others were gritting their teeth while being amazed at the template-like situation coming from these scum. However, mistaking that as shaking in fear, the failed excuses for mercenaries began to get carried away.



Their gazes moved towards Yue and Shia, too. The gazes that seemed to licking them made Yue and Shia feel disturbed from the bottom of their hearts and hid behind Hajime. Misunderstanding their actions as being frightened, they began to threaten Hajime who was surrounded by Yue and the girls.



“BRAT! You understand right? Leave the women and quickly disappear if you don’t want to die! Whaa~t, I’ll return them if you properly apologize!”



“Well, they’ll already be broken by that time though.”



Thinking it was amusing, GYAHAHA—, the men laughed. One of them was even lusting after the frightened Myuu, while another was lusting after the Rabbitman, a race usually used as an outlet for human sexual desire. And their fate had been decided now.



Just like the usual, the pressure came attacked the mercenary-like men like a giant waterfall that even made creaks in the air. However, being enraged and could not endure the men’s speeches, Kouki moved out only to get wrapped inside the pressure and trembled. Then, he saw Hajime, not caring about him, walked towards the men from the corner of his view.



Though it was too late, the men tried to apologize because they noticed they had picked a fight against someone they must not. But, on all-fours due from the pressure, they could not even open their mouths, so they could not apologize.



Hajime also didn’t want to hear their words anymore. There was already enough reason for Hajime to become mad because they were thinking of making Shia an outlet for their lust, but their malice also had frightened Myuu, so that led to a decision of making them live a life more painful than death.



Hajime loosened the pressure a little and lined up the men who were on their knees, then he unhesitatingly and devilishly shot the symbol of a man starting from the one at the edge. Furthermore, one by one the screaming, groin-holding men were kicked away and piled up in the corner of the plaza with their smashed pelvises. With this, they wouldn’t be able to make child or even walk. It was up to each person whether they’d work hard in the future to stay alive or not.



The overly excessive and merciless counterattack made Kouki’s party back away. The male students were especially affected and turned pale as they covered their nether regions.



Leering at Kouki’s party, Hajime returned to where Yue and the girls were.



“Once again, a merciless one, huh~. As expected of Master. Even though those art women’s enemy, doesth not a little sympathy spring up?”



“Usually Hajime-san would not be angry right~. As expected, is it because of Myuu-chan? Looks like the overprotectiveness keeps rising.”



“… Nh, though there’s that… Hajime was also angry for Shia.”



“Eh!? Angry for my sake? Ehehe, Hajime-san… thank you very much~.”



“… Yue can immediately seen through me.”



“Nh… of course. It is because I am always looking at Hajime.”



“Yue…”



“Hajime…”



In the end, Hajime and Yue began to create their own world, which Shia retorted, then Myuu jumped to Hajime to be spoiled, and lastly Tio let out perverted remarks that ended in her panting from Hajime’s coldness. These spectacles were connected with Hajime as the core.



Kaori was silently watching Hajime who carried Myuu while being surrounded by Yue and the girls. With the previous spectacle, she understood that Hajime would not hesitate to use violence. It was something vastly different compared to the previous Hajime, and just by seeing it, it became a denial of Hajime’s kindness.



However, she wondered about the reason for Hajime’s anger, which made him resort to violence. It was for the sake of the girls that were close to him, so they could enjoy themselves and laugh happily. Really, just how can a person who lost his kindness be surrounded by such smiles. Just how can such a young child yearn for him as a father.



Following that, the disturbance in her mind due to Hajime’s changes had dissipated. To begin with, Hajime had returned to the dungeon for the sake of relieving Kaori by informing her his survival. And just like his words, he had returned to the dungeon only for Kaori, but he didn’t cast the others away. He saved Meld who received mortal wounds and told his companion to protect Kouki’s party.



Kaori noticed it. The reason Hajime unhesitatingly displayed such violence and mercilessness towards his enemy was for the sake of protecting his important people. Of course Kaori herself might also be included inside, but it was a fact that Hajime was thinking for the others’ sake. The proof was the smiles from the girls surrounding Hajime.



Kaori guessed it. Hajime had lost his hair color, right eye and left arm, surely because of the severe environment he had lived through. He certainly almost broken down mentally and physically many times. No, it was possible… it was possible that he had already broken which resulted in his changes. Even so, Hajime walked on his path surrounded by those smiles.



That fact made the fog inside Kaori’s mind disperse. She could hear the sound of puzzle pieces being rightfully placed. Just what I was hesitating about. There’s “Hajime” before her. There’s the boy that her heart always thought of. The one who was called “incompetent,” but crawled from the abyss, gained enormous power, and came to save her.



There were parts that had changed, but there was also unchanged parts. However, that’s something natural. After all, people would always change with time, experiences, and meetings. That’s why, there was no need for her to feel fear. There’s no need for her to lose her confidence. There’s no need for her to back away from him.



If there’s something I don’t know, then it’ll okay if I come to know it while being by his side. Up until now, just like the time we were inside the class. There’s no way the strength of my feelings will lose! There’s nothing wrong with me joining the circle that surrounds Hajime! I won’t let anyone laugh at my feelings anymore!



Resolution and determination were born inside Kaori’s eyes. Shizuku, by her side, was smiling at her best friend’s change. Following that, she silently pushed Kaori’s back. Kaori , with eyes radiating more “strength” than before, nodded to thank Shizuku and moved towards her next battlefield. That’s right, toward her fight as a woman!



Hajime’s party noticed that Kaori was walking towards them. Hajime thought she came to see them off, while Yue by his side, “Muh?,” became wary as she frowned. “Arara?,” Shia was looking at Kaori as her interest deepened, and Tio murmured, “Looks like it’ll be a bloodbath huh~.” Because she was apparently not coming to see them off, Hajime was looking at Kaori, frowning due at the ominous feeling.



“Hajime-kun, can I come with you, too? … No, that’s not it, I will absolutely come with you, so please take care of me, okay?”



“… Hah?”



From the first words spoken, with neither preface nor wish-washing, it became a development where everything was decided and made Hajime’s eyes turn into dots. Inadvertently, he leaked such a stupefied voice. In place of Hajime, who could not immediately regain his composure due to being dumbfounded, Yue moved out.



“… You are not qualified for that.”



“What qualification? Is it to always think of Hajime? Then, I won’t lose to anyone, you know?”



Kaori calmly replied Yue’s words. Yue, “Mmhmp,” made her mouth into ^.



Kaori matched her gaze to Yue’s, then she abruptly moved her unshakable gaze towards Hajime. Following that, she united her hand before her chest with blushing cheeks, took a deep breath, then with desperate and trembling voice, she spoke to him… thus she conveyed it.



“I love you.”



“… Shirasaki.”



Kaori’s expression was mix of embarrassment, worrying while she was expecting Hajime’s answer, and happiness coming from being able to convey her feelings to him. Thus, with those mixed feeling, she didn’t back away, displaying her determination.



That gaze, filled with determination and sincerity made Hajime answered her with serious eyes.



“I have a woman I am in love with. So I can’t answer Shirasaki’s feelings. Therefore, I can’t take you with me.”



Hajime’s clear answer made Kaori immediately bite her lip as if she wanted to cry, but in the next moment, power was born inside the eyes that were about to spill tears and she raised her face. Thus she nodded to tell him she understood. Behind Kaori, Kouki and the others were in blank surprise, agape, and in a pandemonium-like situation, but not minding them, Kaori spun her desired words.



“… Un, I know. It’s Yue-san, right?”



“Yeah, that’s why…”



“But, I don’t think that can be a reason for me not to be at Hajime-kun’s side.”



“What?”



“Because, Shia-san and the slightly strange Tio-san are also in love with Hajime-kun, right? Especially Shia-san, I feel she is pretty serious about it.”



“… That’s…”



“Even though Hajime-kun, with you already having your own special person, she still doesn’t give up and wants to be at Hajime-kun’s side, and also, Hajime-kun lets her be so. That’s why, it wouldn’t be a problem if I am there too, right? After all, my feelings for Hajime-kun… won’t lose to anyone.”



Saying so, Kaori turned her blazing, strong gaze towards Yue. What was expressed was, My feelings won’t lose to you! I won’t let you laugh at them!, and Yue could see Kaori’s strong will. That was definitely a declaration of war. It was a declaration that she’d steal the one and only “special seat” from Yue.



Receiving Kaori’s piercing gaze from the front, Yue, unusually, turned her lips in a smile that could be understood by anyone as fearless.



“… I see, then come with us. And there I will teach you. Our differences, that is.”



“Not you, it’s Kaori.”



“… Then, just call me Yue. I accept Kaori’s challange.”



“Fufu, Yue. Don’t cry if you lose, kay?”



“… Fu, fufufufufu.”



“Aha, ahahahahaha.”



Yue and Kaori created a world of their own with a different meaning than the time Yue did it with Hajime. Even though Hajime was the one confessed to, he was being put aside before he was aware of it, and, in such a manner, in the end it was decided Kaori would enter his party making Hajime look into the far distance. Seeing Yue and Kaori who were laughing together, Shia and Myuu by his side were hugging him, trembling.



“Ha-Hajime-san! Is something wrong with my eyes? I can see dark clouds and draconic lightning behind Yue-san!”



“… Isn’t that normal? Even I can see a katana holding Hanya behind Shirasaki.”



“Papaa~! Those Onee-chan are scaryy.”



“Haa haa, thee are somehow… if you turn your gazes to this one… ngh, can’t hold it.”



With Satan? appearing behind each of them, Yue and Kaori laughed with daunting pose. Were you those kinds of characters?, Hajime wanted to retort with that, but he decided to wait for them to stop while soothing Myuu, who was clinging to him, because those words would become a boomerang back at him. He is now the so called good-for-nothing.



But, there was someone who objected towards Kaori’s will… and of course it was the “Hero”, Amanokawa Kouki.



“Wa-Wait! Please wait a sec! I don’t understand this. Kaori likes Nagumo? She wants to follow him? Eh? What does this mean? How, how did it suddenly come to this? Nagumo! You, just what have you done to Kaori.”



“… the heck is with this one.”



Apparently, Kouki could not admit the reality of Kaori falling for Hajime. It was not something that came out of the blue as Kouki was the only one who didn’t notice it, but in Kouki’s eyes, he only saw it as Kaori suddenly doing something strange and the cause being Hajime. Really, Kouki’s mind that only saw things in the way that would be convenient for him made Hajime retort instinctively.



Being completely convinced that Hajime did something to Kaori, Kouki indignantly moved with partly drawn Holy Sword in hand which made Shizuku admonish him, with a gesture was as though she was enduring a headache.



“Kouki. Can’t you see Nagumo-kun didn’t do anything? Please think about it calmly. Though it looks like you didn’t notice it, Kaori has thought of him in that way since long ago. I mean, since the time we were still in Japan. Just try to think about what Kaori always talked about.”



“Shizuku… what are you saying… that’s, that’s because Kaori is kind, so she feels sorry for Hajime who was always alone, right? There’s neither connection nor motive, so there’s no way Kaori would like an otaku like Hajime.”



Hearing Kouki and Shizuku’s conversation, Hajime unexpectedly became agitated as that was said straight to his face, his cheek twitching.



Noticing the commotion from Kouki and the others, Kaori spoke towards Kouki and the classmates behind him to make herself clear.



“Kouki-kun, everyone, I am sorry. I know it is selfish of me… but I, I want to go with Hajime-kun by any means. That’s why, I will leave your party. Truly, I am sorry.”



Kaori said so as she bowed deeply, making Suzu, Eri, Ayako, and Mao, the female circle, yell Kyaa— Kyaa—. Nagayama, Endou, and Nomura, the three who had guessed Kaori’s feelings were waving their hands to tell her not to worry about it with wry smiles.



However, Kouki, of course, could not accept Kaori’s words.



“It’s a lie, right? After all, that’s weird. Kaori has always been by my side… so shouldn’t it be the same from now on too? Kaori is my childhood friend… that’s why… it’s natural for her to be by my side. Isn’t that so, Kaori?”



“Umm… Kouki-kun. It is true that we are childhood friends… but, it doesn’t mean we will be always together, you know? I think this is the natural way…”



“That’s right, Kouki. It’s not like Kaori is yours, and it’s Kaori herself that will choose what she does. So, drop it already.”



Being told so by his two childhood friends, Kouki was dumbfounded. His gaze immediately moved towards Hajime. Hajime was looking in the distance, expressing that this had nothing to do with him. Beside Hajime were a beautiful woman and beautiful girls in attendance. Seeing that spectacle, Kouki’s eyes began to gradually looking up. Inside him, he was thinking about his Kaori, and dark feeling he never felt before sprang up. Thus following his impulse, he fully interpreted things at his own convenience.



“Kaori. You must not go with him. I am saying this for your sake. Just look at that Nagumo. He is attended by several girls, even a small child like that… moreover, he even made a girl from the Rabbitman tribe wear a slave collar. Even that black-haired woman called Hajime “Master” before. Surely, she was compelled to call him that. I am sure Nagumo is collecting women or something along those lines. He is the worst. He easily killed a person and he didn’t want to cooperate with us, his comrades, even though he has those powerful weapons. Kaori, you’ll only be unhappy if you go along with him. That’s why, it is better if you stay here. No, just stay here. Even if you are going to hate me, I am going to stop you for your sake. I will absolutely not let you go with him!”



Kouki’s overly erratic objection made Kaori and the others dumbfounded. However, the heated up Kouki couldn’t be stopped. His gaze which was looking at Kaori to persuade her turned towards Yue and the girls by Hajime’s side as if he thought of something.



“You girls, too. There’s no more need for you to be by that man’s side. Come with me! I welcome people with abilities like you. Let’s save people together. Shia, was it? There’s no need to worry, I will immediately release you from slavery if you come with me. Tio too, it’s okay for you to not call him Master.”



Saying so with a refreshing smile, Kouki outstretched his hand towards Yue and the girls. Shizuku was facepalming and looking at the sky while Kaori was covering her opened mouth.



Yue and the girls who received the invitation along with Kouki’s smile were…



“”” …”””



They were speechless. They averted their gazes from Kouki and rubbed both of their own arms. If one looked carefully, Yue and the girls were having goosebumps. In a way, they received considerable damage. Even Tio said, “Somehow, this feels wrong…,” as she frowned at the cold feeling she felt.



Seeing their appearances, Kouki who outstretched his hand had his smile cramped. Far from looking at him, the girls were hurriedly hiding behind Hajime while looking disgustedly at him which shocked Kouki.



Then, that shock changed into anger which displayed in his action. He rashly drew the Holy Sword, aiming at Hajime. Kouki could no longer be stopped by words, he thrust the Holy Sword into the ground and pointed his finger at Hajime as he declared,



“Nagumo Hajime! Duel me! Throw away your weapon and fight me barehanded! If I win, don’t ever come close to Kaori again! Also, you must release those girls!”



“… Ouch, ouch, ouch. This is bad. It’s a more painful hero than I expected. It looks like he couldn’t see that he is being a pain though.”



“What are you mumbling about! Are you scared?!”



Stabbing the Holy Sword into the ground and declaring a bare-handed duel after drawing the sword was surely because he felt that he’d lose to Hajime if they used weapons. Though it was actually unknown whether he did it intentionally or not… Yue, Shia, Myuu, Tio, Kaori and the others were indeed taken aback by Kouki’s speech and behavior.



However, Kouki firmly believed that he was in the right and got worked up on saving his childhood friend and the unhappy girls from Hajime which made him unable to notice the surrounding atmosphere. To begin with, the strong conviction that made him doing such a reckless thing was the “envy” he that he felt for the first time, and he was completely out of control.



Without hearing Hajime’s approval, Kouki dashed out. Sighing, Hajime took two, three steps back. Seeing that, Kouki thought Hajime was frightened from fighting without a weapon and put more power into his dash. Just several steps before his fist reached Hajime, Hajime lowered his hands, not reacting to anything in particular. Kouki thought Hajime couldn’t react to him and was convinced of his victory.



At that moment,



THUUUMP!



“Kh!?”



Kouki disappeared.



More accurately, at the moment he put maximum power to his last step to put more power into his fist, he fell. He fell into a pitfall. At the beginning, the reason Hajime moved back two, three steps was to create transmutation magic array using his shoes to create a hole with a four meter depth under the surface.



The pitfall was immediately returned into stone pavement after it swallowed Kouki. Next, explosions could be heard from under the surface. At the moment Hajime transmuted the pitfall, he used that opportunity to transfer flash grenade, shock grenade, paralyze grenade, and tear grenade from “Treasure Box” into the hole.



While he was underground, the impact from explosions attacked Kouki who tried to escape, then his vision went dark with the flash, his eyes and nose flooded from the tear grenade, and lastly his body was in agony and stiffening because of the paralysis.



Hajime silently used transmutation again and hardened the ground around Kouki as hard as the two-tailed wolf. And now, because he’d likely to die due to being deprived of fresh air, he created a small hole for ventilation.



During that time, to the onlookers, it looked like Hajime didn’t do anything but stood only to take Kouki’s resentment, and then Kouki rushed forward, alone which ended with him disappearing down the hole alone; it made him looked terribly… silly.



“Ah~, Yaegashi. He is still alive, so dig him out later.”



“… I have a lot of things I want to ask… but, roger that.”



Leave the troublesome Kouki to Yaegashi Shizuku!, it was a tacit understanding since the time they were in Japan. Hajime pushing the troublesome thing onto her made Shizuku leak a sigh while covering one of her eyes. Finally, the nuisance was gone.



… Was what he thought, but this time Hiyama’s gang made a commotion. As for the reason, the hole left by Kaori was just too great. There was also the previous incident with the demon race woman, and they’d likely to die in the future if Kaori left them. That’s why they repeatedly tried to persuade Kaori to remain with them. Especially Hiyama, he intensely objected. His appearance… was in a panic, as though the thing he desired for so long which was about to come into his possession was disappearing.



Hiyama’s gang of four realized it was difficult to persuade or change Kaori’s decision, and this time they began to persuade Hajime to remain with them. We apologize about the past, so let’s get along from now on, such and so forth was said unabashedly.



They didn’t actually mean what they said, but they made friendly smiles as they snuck peeks at Hajime’s mood, but not only Hajime, but Shizuku and the others were also disgusted by them. Within that situation, Hajime, for the first time looked at Hiyama’s eyes from a close distance since their reunion. Inside those eyes, maybe due to the effect of Kaori leaving, Hajime could see madness.



Shizuku and the others admonished Hiyama’s gang and once again it turned into a commotion, but because there was such an opportunity, Hajime decided to talk to Hiyama to confirm the truth about that day and to resolve the current situation.



“Naa, Hiyama. Has your fire magic skill increased?”



“…Eh?”



The sudden question made Hiyama dumbfounded. However, his complexion gradually turned pale as he noticed the meaning behind it.



“Wh-What are you saying. I am the vanguard… and my element with the highest aptitude is Wind.”



“Hee, I thought you were surely had a fire element.”



“A-Aren’t you mistaken? Just what are you trying to say all of a sudden…”



“Then, you must have liked fire element magic. Especially something like fireball. I wonder if you would unintentionally use it?”



“…”



Now, the color of Hiyama’s face had changed from blue to white. Seeing that reaction, Hajime was convinced. Next, Hajime guessed his motive from his panicked attitude from Kaori separating from them. Well,as for why Hajime hadn’t attacked Hiyama up till now was because he was sneaking looks at Kaori.



Hajime himself, currently, had not even a shred of feeling burning with revenge. Though he’d be merciless if one was hostile to him, he planned to leave Hiyama as he was. If he retaliated here, it would be troublesome as there was no value in being burdened by a dispute against Kouki’s party just because of Hiyama. For Hajime, the existences of Hiyama and his gang were truly worthless just like the pebbles by the roadside.



Hajime moved away from the silent Hiyama and mercilessly informed Hiyama’s gang, with Kondou and the others included.



“There’s no need for you to apologize as I don’t mind the past. For me, you guys are worthless. Thus I don’t want to know what you are going to say. If you understand, scram now! You’re so irritating!”



Although Kondou and the others were angered by Hajime’s words, “Hiyamaaa. You should understand, right?,” Hajime said so with full smile, and then Hiyama’s body shook and he silently nodded, followed by him telling Kondou and the others to stop. Hiyama once again came to know that Hajime had noticed something about him, including what Hajime didn’t express, and he matched him.



Kondou and the others were dubious due at the sudden change in Hiyama’s attitude, but Hiyama’s abnormal attitude, as if he was killing his emotions, made them reluctantly give up on persuading Hajime.



Finally, truly finally, the nuisances who disturbed the departure of Hajime’s party had gone. Kaori went back to the inn to get her luggage (Hajime used his “Pressure” to stop Hiyama’s gang from following her). Leering at Ryuutarou and the others trying to dig Kouki up, Hajime now was talking with Shizuku.



“What can I say… I am sorry for everything. Also, let me thank you again. Thank you, for saving us, for surviving, and for coming here to meet with Kaori…”



Shizuku, who apologized about the trouble and thanked him for rescuing them and returning to Kaori, made Hajime laugh, inadvertently. Shizuku showed a dubious expression due to Hajime sudden burst of laughter. Her gaze was asking, “What is it?”



“No, sorry. What can I say, I thought you are worldly-wise as usual, so I inadvertently laughed. Even while we were in Japan, you were the one who quietly did the apologizing and thanking. It’s still the same, even in this different world… but keep it in moderation or your wrinkle will increase, you know?”



“… You’ve been a big help. Also, you have considerably changed. To have that many girls to wait upon you, along with a daughter… I couldn’t imagine this from you while we were still in Japan…”



“I only love one person though…”



“… I don’t have the obligation to say anything and I also understand that it is not my place to say it… but at least I want you to take care of Kaori. I implore you.”



“…”



Hajime didn’t answer. More than that he didn’t want to answer Kaori’s feelings, honestly, he never thought of letting her come along. But in the end, he let Yue have her way… but he wondered why the woman he fell for permitted one woman after another… Why did it come to this?, Hajime was looking into the far distance as he thought that he was spoiling Yue too much.



Towards Hajime, whose attitude said he didn’t hear anything, Shizuku’s spirit as a best friend raised a growl.



“… If you don’t take care of her… it’ll become serious matter.”



” ? Serious matter? What do you…”



“Have you heard “White-haired, eye-patched Punisher”?”



“…What?”



“Or maybe, written as “Round of Destruction” and read as “Outbreak,” how about it?”



“Wait a sec, you, just what are you…”



“There are also others such as “Jet-black Tyrant” or “Transmutation Master of Red Thunder,” you know?”



“Y-Yo-You, don’t tell me…”



Shizuku suddenly began to enumerate unknown names, which made Hajime look dubious at the beginning. But, noticing Shizuku joyfully looking at Hajime from head to toe, he turned pale as he understood what she meant.



“Fufufu, right now I am a “God’s Apostle” and a member of the Hero’s party. What I said will surely spread. It is equal to the network of neighboring housewives. Well then, Nagumo-kun, what kind of nickname do you want… I will make one that fairly describes your appearance and grandly make it known, okay?”



“Wait, just, wait! Why, how did you know such a damaging thing!?”



“It is because I studied about it with Kaori. That girl wanted to talk with Nagumo-kun, so she studied otaku culture like manga and anime so they could become a topic of conversation. I went along with her every time… that’s why I’ve gathered quite the knowledge about it. Certainly, people like the current Nagumo-kun are called “chuuni…””



“Stoop-! Please stop that”



“O-Oh my, it is more effective than what I imagined… looks like you are aware of it yourself.”



“Th-This devil…”



Hajime had already fallen to his knees. The black history that truly happened in his middle school years was revived. The memory that had been sealed deep inside him, “You rang?” said thus as it peeked out its face.



“Fufu, so, take care of Kaori, okay?”



“…”



“Fuu, Requiem of Ruin (Shotgun of Chaos), Revived Disaster (Reverse Calamity)…”



“Okay! I will do it, so please don’t make such painful nicknames.”



“Take care of Kaori, okay?”



“… At the very least, I promise that I won’t treat her unkindly.”



“Eeh, that’s enough for me. After all, it seems you’ll be mad at me if I go any further than this… if you break the promise, be prepared for a novel with you as the main character published in this world and Japan too, okay?”



“You, aren’t you actually the last boss here? You are, right?”



Hajime held his head as he was on the verge of going mad from embarrassment. Yue, the girls, and the other classmates that were looking at Hajime from a slight distance were shuddering at how Shizuku used only words to make the overwhelmingly powerful Hajime fall to his knees.



While Hajime was fighting against his dark history due to this and that from his appearance, Kaori came back, running. Next, she became pop-eyed when she saw Hajime hanging his head before Shizuku.



Worried about Shizuku, Kaori asked the details from Yue and they exchanged information. Finishing their conversation, Yue, “Muu~,” groaned at Shizuku who defeated Hajime with only words. Kaori had also remembered that the two often talked with each other quietly… and she looked alternately between Hajime and Shizuku. Following that, the two reached a conclusion. Don’t tell me, is she the last boss of this fight as a woman?, something like that.



Yue wore an indescribable expression and Kaori was worrying. Then, it was finally time for Hajime’s party to leave. Shizuku, Suzu, the other female students, and Nagayama’s party, along with Meld who finished reporting, were gathered at Hol-ad’s entrance to see them off. Following that, when Hajime took out the magic-driven four-wheeler, all of them were once again surprised.



While Shizuku and Kaori mutually struggling to separate their hands in regret, Hajime took out a sword with a black sheath from “Treasure Box” and handed it to Shizuku.



“This is?”



“Yaegashi, you are losing the one who can spoil you, right? Then, just take it. Even if you are worldly-wise, you can’t be “healed (mentally)” from being separated from Shirasaki. Maa, there’s also the various things I am indebted to you for from Japan.”



Shizuku accepted the sword from Hajime and slowly drew it from its sheath, and a jet-black sword that seemed to absorb even light appeared. There was no blade crest, it had a slight curve and became double edged around the tip. It resembled the sword called Shoukarasuma. Though Hajime only knew a little about Japanese swords, it was created similarly using transmutation just like the short swords he handed over to the Haulia.



“I can guarantee its strength because it was made from the compressed, hardest ore in this world, and its sharpness is at the level where even an amateur can cut steel by swinging it. About the maintenance… there’s no need to say it to Yaegashi, but please take care of it.”



“… Such an amazing thing… as expected of a Transmutation Master. Thank you. I won’t hold back and will accept it.”



After one swing, two swings, the balance as it cut through the wind made Shizuku respond with admiration, and she honestly thanked him as she smiled. Truthfully, because Shizuku’s swordsmanship was Yaegashi-styled, naturally it required a Japanese sword, and she felt disoriented every time she used her techniques using her previous sword. That’s why she was truly happy to obtain a Katana which made her float a natural, lovely smile.



“… Last Boss?”



“… Shizuku-chan.”



“Eh? What? You two, why are you looking at me with such eyes?”



Yue’s gaze, full of caution, and Kaori’s gaze, full of worry, made Shizuku flustered as she didn’t know the meaning behind them. Leaving behind that indescribable atmosphere, Shizuku and the others saw Hajime’s party out of Hol-ad.



The weather was good. Their destination was one of the Seven Great Dungeons «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» in «Guryuu-en Great Desert». With increasing liveliness from acquiring a new companion, Hajime continued his journey.





Volume 9 Chapter 1




“Shit! Shit! What’s with this! What kind of joke is this!”



It was midnight. Inside a park located on the outskirts of the post town, Hol-ad, one boy was cursing in a hushed voice, punching one of the trees repeatedly. It was Hiyama Daisuke. Hiyama’s eyes were shaking intensely in hatred, agitation, and impatience. Those were truly ugly and impure eyes, from which it was not an exaggeration to they were full of madness.



“As I thought, you really did lose your temper… well, I know it can’t be helped though. After all, your precious, precious princess Kaori was snatched by another man before your eyes, right?”



A voice filled with scorn and slight sympathy rang out from behind such a Hiyama. Fwip, Hiyama immediately turned around. Next, he momentarily raised an expression of relief when he recognized the other person was the one he meeting in secret, and, following that, with his fists clenched, he replied with a voice that was just like a beast’s howl.



“Shut up! Shit! This… this shouldn’t have happened! Why, why is that bastard alive!? Just why did he did that…”



“Don’t be distracted by yourself, I want to have a talk, you know? Also, it will become a serious matter if someone sees us meeting in secret.”



“… I, I don’t have anymore reasons to go along with you… my Kaori is already…”



In between the trees’ shadows created by the moonlight was a person’s silhouette, to whom Hiyama bitterly spoke as he pummeled his fists on the tree.



Hiyama cooperating with this person was only because he heard that he would be able to make Kaori his own. That’s why, with Kaori leaving, he had lost his reason to cooperate, and it was too late to threaten him with exposing his attempt to kill Hajime as the victim could have said it himself.



However, the person in the darkness smiled as its mouth turned curved into a crescent at such a Hiyama, and it once again tempted him just like the devil.



“If she is snatched then just snatch her back. Is it wrong? Fortunately, we have good bait here.”



“…Bait?”



Not knowing what it meant, Hiyama dubiously tilted his head which made that person grinned and nodded.



“That’s right, bait. Even if she puts priority on her feelings and parts from those comrades of hers… her best friends that were always by her side, her childhood friends… do you think she can just leave them be? Especially if she knows they are in a predicament.”



“You…”



“It is easy to call her back. So, there’s no need to be pessimistic about it. Especially in this case, even I got a chill… but I am glad that it resulted in something convenient for me. Yup, it could be said as a godsend. Shall we finish everything once we return to the Imperial Capital? Then… you will surely obtain what you desire, you know?”



“…”



Though knowing it was useless, Hiyama glared at his accomplice that stayed in the shadow. Even receiving his gaze, the person before Hiyama laughed normally.



Though he didn’t know all of this person’s plan, from their previous words, Hiyama could have guessed that it’d involve injuring the other classmates. For their own objective, they could easily betrayed their comrades, with whom they shared joy and sorrow with. Following that, a chill ran down in his spine as he couldn’t feel any guilt from that person.



(A nasty person as always… but, I also cannot back down anymore… I must do it to get my Kaori back… that’s all. There’s nothing to hesitate about. This is for Kaori. I am the justice here.)



Hiyama only thought of himself and his confusion had already been disappeared. Because of his accomplice, he was made to look away from the thing he must see, believing that his action was justified, while it all stemmed from his desire for Kaori.



The silhouette turned silent as it understood Hiyama’s feelings. Smiling, it waited for Hiyama’s answer.



“… Okay. Just like before, I will lend you a hand. However…”



“Aah, I understand. I will obtain what I desired, and you will obtain yours. Give and take, isn’t that a nice word? From now on is crucial. The case in the Imperial Capital too, can I leave that to you?”



Without minding Hiyama’s distorted expression, that person turned on their heels and disappeared, as if merging with the space between the trees. Afterwards, what was left was the fallen boy whose eyes were filled with darkness.



* * *



On the other hand, at the time the suspicious meeting happened in the outskirts of the town, another boy and girl were also standing under the moonlight.



They weren’t in the location where the secret meeting happened, they were on a small, arched bridge, above one of the waterways that passed through between the shops and back alleys of the town. A lot of waterways were built for the large number of restaurants and service buildings, and the boy on the bridge was looking down on the flowing water’s surface as it reflected the moon above it, under the moonlight.



More accurately, he wasn’t looking but “drooping his head”, moreover, his expression was dark, far from its usual shine. The boy’s appearance was just like that a person whose company bankrupted, incurred large amount of debt, and was now despairing about his future as he looked far into the distance, into the twilight. It was our hero, Amanogawa Kouki.



“… Do you not want to talk?”



A voice called out to Kouki who didn’t look away from the moon reflected on the water surface. It was his childhood friend for ten years, the pair of the girl that went away, Yaegashi Shizuku.



Unlike Kouki, Shizuku was entrusting her back to the bridge’s railing, looking up at the moon in the sky. Towards the railing, her trademark ponytail was swaying, playing in the wind. Without looking at his childhood friend, and Shizuku who also not looking at him, Kouki replied as he continued to look at the moon.



“Is there something you want to say?”



“…”



There was no answer, no, Kouki just could not answer her. Even though he was looking at the moon reflected on the water’s surface, what was in his mind was the spectacle of Kaori speaking her feelings. Within her anxiety and rejoice, as if praying, she spoke her feelings without any hint of a lie, which even convinced Kouki, whose denseness was at the level of a chronic disease.



Kouki and Kaori were friends for around ten years, but he was hurt when he saw her beautiful strength, he had never seen Kaori made such expressions. It was just like a bolt out of the blue for him.



Every time he recalled her expression, an unspeakable feeling sprang up in his mind. It was dark and heavy, a truly murky feeling. Unconditionally, without any basis, he believed his thought was a natural one. That was that, his childhood friend, Kaori, would always be by his side, without any change. It could be said he thought of Kaori as his. In other words, he was jealous.



That jealousy, Kouki himself didn’t know as to whether it came from love or just his desire to monopolize her, but the feeling that she was “snatched” from him was swirling in his mind, intensely.



However, it was Kaori herself that decided to go along with the one who “snatched” her away, Hajime (though he would surely object to it). Moreover, he didn’t want to believe and tried to deny the existence called Hajime by challenging him to a duel where he was defeated. His misery, resentment towards Hajime, doubts about Kaori’s feelings, and a lot of other feelings were mixed together, making Kouki’s mind a mess, just like the inside of kicked trash can.



Thus he kept looking at the water and unbeknownst to him, his other childhood friend was already standing beside him without saying anything… his reply from before was also truly not like him. Unable to find his next word, Kouki turned silent.



Sneaking a glance at such a Kouki, Shizuku frowned her brows and with an atmosphere that expressed “It can’t be helped,” she moved her mouth.



“… Right now, Kouki, you are being a pain.”



“… A pain?”



Shizuku’s unexpected reply made Kouki inadvertently parrot her. Shizuku moved her gaze from the moon towards Kouki, and continued her words.



“That’s right. About Kaori, from the beginning she isn’t yours, you know?”



“… That’s… then, are you saying she is Nagumo’s?”



Prick, Kouki’s eyes were shaking as he guessed that, he desperately tried to object that as if cursing it. Hearing that, Shizuku answered with a strong forehead flick. “It hurt-!?,” Kouki instinctively covered his forehead, and leering at him, Shizuku scolded him with a cold voice.



“Idiot. Kaori is her own. Whatever she chooses, wherever she goes, it is up to Kaori to decide that. Of course, even who she wants to be with… is up to her own decision.”



“… Since when? Shizuku, you must have known that, right?”



Without asking “what do you mean,” Shizuku nodded.



“You know… Kaori met Nagumo-kun in middle school… Well, he must have forgotten about it… Rather I also don’t know in what kind of situation they met.”



“…What’s with that. Just what are you trying to say?”



“That is for you to ask Kaori yourself. After all, it is bad for me to say it without her permission.”



“Then, the reason Kaori was always talking to Nagumo in class was truly… that is… because she loves… him?”



“Hmm, that’s right.”



“…”



Shizuku easily told him the truth he didn’t want to hear, which made Kouki make a reproachful gaze. However, Shizuku only thought of it as a passing wind. Angered by her attitude, just like a child throwing a tantrum, Kouki began to spit out what was in his mind.



“… Why, why is it Nagumo. When we were still in Japan, he was an otaku, unmotivated, and he nothing special in terms of sports or studies either… always forcing his laugh, and being out of place… He took a noncommittal attitude whenever Kaori talked to him… he was an otaku… if it was me, I wouldn’t treat Kaori coldly. I’d always think of her as important, and I would do my best for Kaori’s sake… Besides, Nagumo was waited upon by those girls in such a manner, isn’t he the lowest to treat them like that? Not only that, he is a murderer! He killed a non-resisting woman. So, do you think I was wrong!? That’s right, it is strange for Kaori to like such a bastard after all. He surely must have “SWISh!” Guhah!?”



Heating up as he spoke, Kouki began to badmouth Hajime with fabricated truths which once again awarded him a forehead flick (No Beat ver.) from Shizuku. What are you doing!?, was conveyed by Kouki’s glare which was ignored by Shizuku who was wearing an amazed expression.



“Again, your bad habit is coming out, you know? I’ve kept saying until now that you should stop interpreting things at your own convenience.



“Interpreting things to my convenience… there’s no way—”



“Haven’t you noticed it yet? Kouki, you don’t know anything about Nagumo-kun, right? You don’t know anything about the time we were still in Japan or in this world… and those girls looked happy, no, they really were happy, you see? But you ignored that fact and said something selfish… The current Kouki is only trying to make Hajime out to be a bad person who is unsuitable for Kaori. If that isn’t called as interpreting things at your own convenience, then what is?”



“B-But… it is the true he killed a person.”



“… At that time, even I was about to kill her. However, I couldn’t muster my strength. Even in the future… if a similar thing happens, then I will surely swing my sword to kill, for the sake of surviving, for the sake of the people important to me. Though I don’t know whether I can do it, since I will only know when the time comes… For now, the thing I did was only attempted murder… but, are you going to despise me if I become a murderer?”



Shizuku’s confession made Kouki speechless. His childhood friend, Shizuku, held a stronger sense of responsibility and justice than others, so he suddenly felt like she was a distant existence after hearing she was truly going to kill. However, Kouki shook his head when he noticed the shadow of anxiety and the fear of injuring a person in Shizuku’s bitter smile.



Seeing Kouki’s reaction, Shizuku continued her words which could be called a soliloquy.



“Certainly, his transformation is surprising… and thinking about his character when we were still in Japan, it’s not an exaggeration to say he’s a different person… Well, even so, it looks like Kaori still thought of him as “Nagumo Hajime,” and it looks like not all of him has changed… but one thing you must not forget, he fought that woman to save us and killed her in our stead.”



“… Are you saying it is right to kill.”



“I… I don’t think it is right. A murder is a murder after all… I can neither justify it nor do I want to.”



“Then…”



“Even so, we aren’t qualified to criticize Nagumo-kun. It was no one’s fault, but our own weakness…”



In short, he should solve it himself if he has a problem with it. It was simply that he was not strong enough, so he couldn’t reach the result he hoped for. It was a mistake to complain about the result to the person he left everything with.



Noticing the unexpressed words, Kouki recalled that he could only crawl at the time Hajime displayed his peerlessness. Unable to object, he fell into sullen silence. His dissatisfied expression was obviously saying, “But, it is the truth that he killed a person!”



Towards Kouki’s obstinacy, with an admonishing tone, Shizuku tacitly warned him about what had happened thus far, along with what she felt after coming to this world.



“I don’t hate Kouki’s straightforward sense of justice.”



“… Shizuku.”



“However. I think it’s about time for you to start doubting whether you are actually in the right.”



“Doubting my justice?”



“Certainly, a strong feeling is necessary to get things done. But, a distortion will surely appear if you don’t doubt it and just keep moving on, blindly believing on it. That’s why when that happens, I want you to react to it by wondering if you are really in the right, or whether you still need to do it “even” if you know it is wrong… it isn’t bad if you continue to think like that, okay? … truthfully, it is difficult to keep on living rightfully. Having come to this world, I cut lives even though they were demonic beasts… I’ve come to think so.”



Totally ignorant that Shizuku was thinking thus every time she killed a demonic beast, Kouki became pop-eyed.



“Kouki. You are not always the correct one and even if you are in the right. You should know that your rightfulness can become a lethal weapon. Well, the way you interpreted things at your convenience this time was not coming from your conviction of “justice,” it was coming from your jealousy.”



“N-no, for me to feel jealous…”



“It is uncool to make an excuse to deceive me here, you know?”



“…”



Kouki once again cast his gaze down, looking at the moon on the water surface. However, the dark mood from a while ago had weakened, and he seemed to be thinking deeply about something. Anyway, he had avoided rushing into a spiral of negativity, and Shizuku leaked out a relieved sigh, knowing that.



Thus, thinking it was necessary to leave him alone for now, Shizuku stopped leaning on the railing and tried to quietly leave the place. Then, Kouki’s mutter came from behind Shizuku, who had already turned on her heels.



“Shizuku… you won’t go anywhere, right?”



“… What’s with this all of a sudden?”



“… Please don’t go, Shizuku.”



“…”



Kouki’s words were as if he was petitioning her. It was a line that would made the female students in Japan and the girls of the Kingdom that fell for him go kya kya, but unfortunately, Shizuku only displayed an “amazed” expression. He might be weakened by the feeling of loss because Kaori had gone… Shizuku looked over her shoulder, towards the blurring moon. It was the moon that was on water surface which Kouki had been looking at previously.



“At the very least I am not like the “moon”… I won’t just leave a man that is depending on me.”



Saying thus, Shizuku left the place. Left behind, Kouki watched the alley where Shizuku disappeared for a while, then once again, he looked at the moon reflected on the water surface. Next, he noticed the meaning behind her words.



“… I see… the moon reflected on the water’s surface.”



Flowers reflected on a mirror and the moon reflected on the water’s surface. Those were words speaking about a thing that could be seen but not be reached, visible but with no substance, just like a reflection. He unconsciously looked at the reflected moon as Kaori, and certainly it was not something he could reach. Especially after seeing Kaori’s expression at the time she confessed her feelings to Hajime.



Shizuki said she was not “the moon reflected on the water’s surface”. So, it’s possible for him to reach her. However, her next words were severe. Kouki inadvertently made a wry smile. He thought about what he had just said to his childhood friend.



Kouki stopped looking at the reflected moon, he looked up at the sky. He had unconditionally believed that he could reach “it” if he just stretched out his hand, but he realized “it” was awfully quite far. Letting out a deep sigh, Kouki began to think about the words coming from his strict and gentle childhood friend.



To change or not to change… it was up to Kouki.





Volume 9 Chapter 2




Prologue of fourth arc.



The event happened sometime later.



Three weeks had passed since the time Kouki’s party had received shock from the reunion and the complex feelings because of to the separation in «Post Town, Hol-ad».



Currently, there was one thing Kouki’s party must immediately deal with: to kill people. They wouldn’t be able to fight anymore as long as it was not dealt with, so they returned to the Imperial Capital. It was necessary for them to experience “murder” if they wanted to participate in the war against the Demon race. They would only be liabilities in the war if they could not overcome it.



To begin with, they wouldn’t be able to think about it properly since not much time remained. The event that occurred in Ul had already reached their ears. It was obvious the Demon race’s movement had became more active since they themselves had also been attacked, and everyone could guess the war was drawing near. Therefore, as quickly as possible, Kouki’s party wanted to overcome this problem by all means.



Currently, Kouki’s party were doing battle practice against the Knights commanded by Meld. Ryuutarou, Kondou’s party, and Hiyama’s gang; those who were already prepared for it actually repeatedly asked themselves if they could really do it after seeing Hajime shoot the Demon race woman’s head. There wasn’t much time left, but they would be broken if they were forced to murder, so Meld and the Knights were also looking for a solution.



Towards the gloomy them, a small, good news had arrived.



It was the return of Aiko’s party. Normally, Kouki’s charisma would be able to pull the classmates together. However, the hero was depressed, which made everyone depressed, too. The reason for them not to be broken from the severe defeat and the current problem was thanks to Suzu’s mood making which followed by the prudent people such as Shizuku and Nagayama. Even so, their minds swallowed by uneasiness forced themselves to look more than welcoming to the adult they were familiar with and trusted. Everyone truly wanted to meet the teacher who always did her best for her students.



Hearing Aiko had returned, Shizuku made the first move. Shizuku wanted to consult AIko about various things, so she rounded up her training. She also wanted to hear the impression of the classmates who met Hajime much earlier than her, and she wanted to exchange information objectively with Aiko who neither assume nor prejudices.



Wearing the jet-black sheath she received from Hajime and belt for another jet-black, double-edged sword, Shizuku walked through the passage in royal palace. Her appearance somehow made more noble ladies and maids blush comparable to other men. It was a problem that haunted Shizuku even in this different world. She really wanted to be spared from being called “Onee-sama” by the women who were older than her.



Having heard the things Hajime did in Ul, Shizuku wanted to directly asked Aiko as to what she thought of Hajime. Depending on Aiko’s impression of Hajime, Kouki’s currently balanced mind would possibly leaned towards undesirable point. It was Shizuku’s nature that burdened her with hardship wherever she goes.



“Surely, there was also a mess when they were in Ul… but he also gave me this katana-like sword… Seriously, what’s with “sturdy and able to cut anything nicely.” Isn’t it an artifact at a level of a national treasure.”



Talking to herself, Shizuku silently moved her hand onto the Katana hanging on her waist. Walking towards Aiko’s room, Shizuku recalled the time she visited the Kingdom’s smithy for the sake of her katana’s maintenance.



Shizuku called her katana simply as a black katana and shown it to the Kingdom’s best blacksmith. At first, the blacksmith were formal before her as one of “God’s Apostles.” However, his attitude completely changed as soon as he examined the black katana with appraisal magic, and he asked Shizuku while grabbing her shoulders. Thus, as if his previous attitude was just a lie, he barraged her with questions, no he interrogated her with words, such as where did she obtained it and who was the creator.



Although she was dumbfounded, Shizuku somehow managed to regain her calm and asked what happened. The blacksmith said that even within the Kingdom’s treasury, this sword should be more or less at the same as Holy Sword. Although its output and capacity for receiving magic power didn’t reach Holy Sword, it’s functionality and minute details as a weapon were above Holy Sword.



Next, detailed examination found that if it was supplied with magic power, the blade would be extended by 60 centimeters in form of wind blade. Furthermore, two more blades would form beside the extended part, and they could be fired.



Then, the sheath was examined. It was understood that the sheath would be cladded in thunder if it was supplied with magic power and there was a switch-like part on the sheath’s mouth that would shoot needles with tremendous force.



The blade part was made of azanthium so it wouldn’t be chipped and there was almost no need to undergo maintenance. The maintenance was only to replenish the needle if it was used.



However, there was a problem, it didn’t have magic array to supply it with magic power. It was a natural thing. Hajime was capable of directly manipulating magic power and he was originally never thought of giving it to anyone. So, it wasn’t a mistake when he said “sturdy and able to cut things nicely” if it was used by Shizuku.



Those were the only functions installed, and the mysterious black sword (or so the blacksmiths had seen it as) could only be used by manipulating magic power directly, made the Kingdom’s blacksmiths burn with fighting spirit.



‘Even though we can’t make a weapon with such minute details and functionality, we will make this sword usable!’ was what they thought. In short, they would somehow make the user’s magic power supply into the sword by any means. Resultantly, after three days and nights, the blacksmiths, with the best one as the core, set aside all of their other works and somehow succeeded in creating the magic array.



As such, Shizuku would be able to pull the black katana’s abilities without using a chant. Afterwards, the blacksmiths whose magic power was dried up were slept for several days with truly happy expressions.



Shizuku was looking in the distance as she recalled the terrific craftsmanship spirit, then she arrived at her destination, Aiko’s room. She knocked, but there was no response. She heard Aiko was going to report to the King and the other officials, so Shizuku thought she must have not return. Leaning against the wall, Shizuku decided to wait for Aiko’s return.



Thirty minutes had passed until Aiko returned. Her footsteps could be heard from the inner corridor which somehow sounded depressed. Aiko was walking without looking ahead, and her serious expression made Shizuku understandd Aiko was desperately thinking about something in her head.



Thus, Aiko didn’t even notice her room with Shizuku right beside its door and passed them. While wondering what had happened, Shizuku called Aiko to stop.



“Sensei… Sensei!”



“Hoeh!?”



Raising a silly voice, her body twitched in surprise. Aiko looked around and finally noticed Shizuku. Afterwards, Aiko sighed in relief seeing Shizuku’s healthy look, then she smiled in joy.



“Yaegashi-san! Long time no see. Have you been healthy? Are you unhurt? Are the others safe?”



Even though she had been depressed up until now, the things she said were only her worries about her students. Towards the unchanging Ai-chan sensei, joy also entered Shizuku’s gaze as she smiled, and sense of security filled her mind. For a while, the two were happy for each other’s safety and their reunion, then they entered Aiko’s room for consultation and exchanging information.



* * *



“So that’s what happened… Shimizu-kun was…”



Shizuku and Aiko were alone in the room, and they mutually exchanged information as they drank the tea inside the tea cups with cute, cat-like legs. Hearing the things happened in Ul, those words were Shizuku’s response.



Inside the room, an awkward mood hung in the air. Aiko dejectedly drooped her shoulders; she was obviously depressed about Shimizu. Thinking about Aiko’s personality and sense of responsibility, Shizuku could not help worry no matter what the circumstance was, but she could not find the words needed to be said.



However, although Shizuku was reluctant to let Aiko continue being depress, so as cheerful as possible, she rejoiced about Aiko’s safety.



“I feel bad about Shimizu-kun… however, I truly am glad that Sensei is alive. I really want to thank Nagumo-kun.”



Towards the smiling Shizuku, Aiko was reflecting because she once again made her student worry about her, then she returned a smile.



“I see. At our reunion, he didn’t have any interest in us and this world… but he came to save Yaegashi-san and the others. Furthermore, he even protected a small child… Fufu, it is possible that some part of the past him had come back. Or should I say he is growing up as he change… he has become reliable.”



Saying so as she looked at the far distance, somehow Aiko’s cheeks were… slightly dyed in red. Shizuku was confused while thinking, Isn’t that a strange reaction for just remembering one of her student? She watched as she Aiko sometimes laughed while reminiscing, “Fufu.”



Noticing Shizuku’s gaze, Cough!, Aiko cleared her throat. However, she was unable to smooth things over, her cheeks convulsed, and she gained a bad premonition. Shizuku decided to press on. While half persuading herself that it couldn’t be possible, Shizuku said,



“… Sensei? From our talk, Sensei said he saved you from a dangerous situation, can you tell me the details?”



“Eh!?”



“Well, it was said Sensei might have died, so I want to hear how did you recovered from that…”



“A-About that…”



Shizuku recalled the special medicine that quickly healed the near-dead Meld, she thought it must be that, so she played the fool and asked Aiko. Aiko’s cheeks began to turn redder than before. Aiko’s gaze was swam around and hesitatingly, she muttered her words… it was indeed suspicious.



Like a swordsman she was, Shizuku cut to the case.



“… Sensei. Did something happened between you and… Nagumo-kun?”



” !? Th-There’s no way anything happened, you know? J-Just what are you trying to say? It was just the usual me as a teacher and him as a student!”



“Sensei. Please calm down. Your expression had turned strange.”



“!”



Aiko was truly shaken. Frantically, Aiko muttered, “I am a teacher, I am a teacher…” Aiko must have thought she was muttering in her mind, but she wasn’t. Thus, Shizuku was convinced. Although Shizuku didn’t understand in what stage it was, Aiko began to hold a special feeling towards Hajime different from the other students!



“Nagumo-kun! As a person! What did you do to Ai-chan!?”



Already, anyone could see Shizuku’s cheek was convulsing while she was thinking so. Hajime had already became a flag raiser whose level couldn’t even be compared to Kouki. Though unlike Kouki, Hajime wasn’t dense towards affections from others and he had answered to it clearly… and he must had told that to Aiko, too.



Her best friend’s rival appearing in an unexpected place made Shizuku looked at the ceiling with her hand covering her convulsing cheek. Regardless of gender, Shizuku had come to hate that side of Hajime, and a dangerous idea of seriously spreading a painful nickname had crossed her mind… which she managed to give up.



Aiko and Shizuku tried to smooth things over by repeatedly clearing their throats, then they continued their previous conversation as if nothing had happened.



“Then, Sensei. Did something happen when you reported to the king? After all, it seemed to have been a serious talk.”



Shizuku’s question made Aiko recall something and she made a bitter expression where anger and distrust mixed.



“… Officially, Nagumo-kun is branded as a heretic.”



“!? That’s—!… What do you mean? No, I somehow can guess it… but isn’t that decision a hasty one?”



Hajime was powerful. With only several people, he repulsed more than 60,000 demonic beasts while using mysterious artifacts. Hajime’s comrades also possessed unbelievable power. However, his stance was he would not cooperate with Church of the Saints and would even oppose them depending on the situation. It was true Hajime was a truly dangerous existence for the Kingdom and the Church of the Saints.



However, it was truly too hasty to brand him as a heretic so quickly. The brand of a heretic was given to those who disobeyed the teaching from Church of the Saints and became the God’s enemy, and such branding would make it legal for anyone to subjugate Hajime any time, any where. And according to the situation, even the Temple Knights and Kingdom’s army might move out.



Following that, by attacking Hajime because he was a heretic, they would receive the treatment of an enemy from Hajime, his merciless and severe attack. There was no way the King and Church people didn’t know the danger. However, Aiko said they decided it right away. There was no way Shizuku would not be surprised by that.



Shizuku had guessed up until that point, which made Aiko nod in admiration towards the unchanging fast-learner.



“It is completely as Yaegashi-san said. Moreover, no matter if he has tremendous power and not following the church, he ended up saving Ul, but they ignored my protests. Nagumo-kun had expected this situation, so he bolstered by title “Goddess of Bountiful Harvest.” Also, I heard from the bodyguards that the name “Goddess of Bountiful Harvest” and “Goddess Sword” had spread further into the other towns. So, by branding him as heretic, it is also means the church is denying “Goddess of Bountiful Harvest” who saved the people. Thus, they shouldn’t be able to easily ignore my protest, or so it should be. But those people forced the decision. They were obviously being odd… also, I recalled that other than Ishtal and church’s people, the king and other royalties’ appearances were strange…”



“… That’s troubling. Just what are they thinking… But the thing they couldn’t help and think of now is “who” they should send to the powerful Nagumo-kun, right? And that’s the point here.”



“… It is so. Perhaps…”



“Eeh. There’s only us… but I will absolutely refuse that, you know? I don’t want to die. If I become Nagumo-kun’s enemy… I don’t even want to imagine it.”



Shizuku shivered, and Aiko made a wry smile understanding what Shizuku felt.



Thus, before the Kingdom and Church told Kouki and the others to fight Hajime, Aiko decided to tell them about the things Hajime told her. About the Mad Gods and his purpose during his travels. She held no proof, so she didn’t know whether Kouki and the others would believe it. Furthermore, up until now they did their best because they believed the God would return them to their original world as long as they won the war against Demon race.



In truth, the God takes delight in people’s reaction to His doing, and the possibility of returning is extremely low. So let’s look for the dwelling of those who rebelled against the gods in the old times and look for a way to return ourselves! No one would believe it if those words were said all of a sudden. After Kouki and the others heard what she told them, whether they would see it as nonsense and continued to fight like before, or believed her and looked for another way… That was not something Aiko could predict. However, she must nail it to them not to blindly believing the Church. Aiko convinced herself to do that now.



“Yaegashi-san. Nagumo-kun knows his information is an unbelievable one and will be antagonized by Amanokawa and the others, so he said this only to me.”



“Information… is it?”



“Yes. It is about the God worshipped by the church and the objective of Nagumo and the girls’ travel. He didn’t give any proof about it… but it is a truly important information, so tonight… no, this evening, I want to tell this to everyone.”



“That’s… no, I understand. Then, should I call everyone now?”



“No, it is an information I don’t want to be known by the church’s side, so I want to tell it at a time when everyone has gathered naturally; at dinner. And we should be able to talk among ourselves if I said I want to spend time with the students I haven’t seen for a long time without any outsiders.”



“Indeed… I understood. Then, at dinner it is.”



Afterwards, a good amount of time had passed while Shizuku and Aiko chatted. However, they couldn’t have known that the promise for the dinner could not come to pass…



* * *



The time was evening.



While the sun was setting, it gave a parting gift of vivid orange color, and Aiko was walking along the empty corridor. The evening sunlight entered the corridor from the windows and drew an obvious contrast on the wall and floor at the other sides.



Aiko went towards the dining room while her gaze was captivated by the evening sun, but she immediately stopped after she felt someone’s presence. When she looked forward, she saw a woman-like figure inside the shadow. The woman walked in the middle of the corridor, and gracefully stopped her feet with a straight stature. Her clothing was the nun’s habit of Church of the Saints.



The woman was beautiful, however she spoke to Aiko with a somewhat mechanical and cold voice.



“Nice to meet you, Hatayama Aiko. I’ve come for you.”



Aiko felt a chill ran down her spine when she heard her voice, but she feigned her calmness as to not become impolite to someone she met for the first time.



“Umm, nice to meet you, too. Coming for me… you mean the dinner with the students?”



“No, your destination is the main church.”



“Eh?”



The sentence which didn’t give her a chance to answer, made Aiko inadvertently ask her again. At that time, the woman moved out from the shadow into a place lighted by the evening sun. Seeing the woman, Aiko held her breath. Even Aiko, who was the same gender as her, was instinctively charmed by the woman’s beauty.



Her silver hair was sparkling while it was being reflected by the evening sunlight. With big, long and narrow blue eyes, and her mysterious and wonderful features that seemed to be both of an adult woman and a young girl; all of her parts were perfectly positioned. Her height was tall for a woman, around 170 centimeters, which forced Aiko to look up at her. Her white skin was as smooth as a white porcelain, her hands and feets were slender. Her breasts neither big nor small, it was a truly exquisite size if one was thinking about the balance of her entirety.



However, she was regrettably had no expression. Rather than expressionless, it was as if she wore a Noh mask. No one would doubt if it was said she was a statue — the best masterpiece by a famous sculptor. The woman possessed an inhumanely artistic beauty.



Towards Aiko, who held her breath, the woman smiled and indifferently continued her words.



“We feel the thing you are going to tell them will inconvenient us. After all, what your students will be doing now looks “interesting” to us. That’s why, until the time come, you will temporarily leave the stage.”



“Wh-What are you…”



The beautiful nun slowly approached Aiko without even making a footstep, and Aiko instinctively backed. Then, Aiko saw the nun’s blue eyes shone. Aiko felt her mind grow hazy. Immediately, she concentrated as though she was going to invoke magic, and her haziness dispersed in a snap.



“… I see. As expected, I can only disregard that you are calling yourself a “God.” For you are capable of resisting my “charm”. There’s no other way. I will just take you by force.”



“D-Don’t come! Wh-What I want—… ugh!?”



The pressure from the woman’s true character made Aiko immediately tried to activate her magic. However, faster than her finishing the chant, the nun momentarily shortened their distance and drove her fist into Aiko’s stomach. Aiko collapsed, and at the time she felt her consciousness about to be swallowed by darkness, she heard the nun’s mutter.



“Don’t worry. I won’t kill you. You are an excellent piece, and you might be useful against that irregular.”



The white-haired, eye-patched boy floated inside Aiko’s mind. Following that, while knowing it wouldn’t reach him, she shouted his name in her mind right before her consciousness completely disappeared.



———— Nagumo-kun!



* * *



“?”



The nun easily shouldered Aiko as though she was weightless, then she looked around the corridor as if she had sensed someone. For a while, the nun silently searched for something. Then, she slowly opened the guest room’s door along the corridor.



Following that, she entered the room, looked around, approached the closet without any sound of a footstep, and she forcefully opened the door. However, there was nothing inside, so the nun tilted her head and looked around once again, looking here and there. Before long, after not finding anything, she shouldered Aiko again and went outside of the room.



With silence returning into the room, a trembling murmur could be heard.



“… I must tell this… someone—”



No one was inside the room. However, retreating footsteps could be heard, and before long, the room completely regained its silence.





Volume 9 Chapter 3




A brown world.



«Guryuu-en Great Desert» was a place those words expressed, perfectly. The sand was brown, formed by millions of miniscule grains. The wind that was blowing constantly threw up the sand and dyed the air brown, and in a 360 degree radius, there was only one color as far as one’s eye could reach.



Moreover, there were numerous sand dunes, big and small, whose surfaces were always stirred by the wind. Moment by moment, the surface’s pattern of the dune was constantly changing, as if expressing “I am alive.” The blazing sun and its unreserved heat made the temperature of the sand on the ground shoot up quickly. It easily exceeded 40 degrees celsius. Coupled with the fluttering sand, it was the worst environment to travel in.



However, it was only for “ordinary” travelers.



Currently, inside such a severe environment, a black, box-shaped vehicle, a magic-driven four-wheeler in fact, was advancing casually while raising a dust storm. Though there was neither road or pathway, it was solved by the compass installed inside the vehicle.



“… The outside is amazing… I am really glad that this is not a normal carriage.”



“This one agrees. This one doth not know how it became such an environment… but indeed it isn’t a place this one wants to be actively moving in.”



Sitting on the rear seat while watching the sand battering the window and observing the brown-colored world, Shia and Tio muttered so, wholeheartedly. No matter how much of an M Tio was, this environment only depressed her.



“It’s completely different from when Myuu came here before! Here’s very cool, and Myuu’s eyes aren’t hurting! Papa is amazing!”



“That’s right~. Hajime-papa is amazing, right~. Myuu-chan, do you want to drink cold water?”



“Want to~. Kaori-oneechan, thank you~.”



Sitting on the lap of Kaori, who was seated on the window side of the front seat, Myuu was excited because it was different from the time that she was here when she was kidnapped before. Myuu was looking at Hajime, who created such a comfortable space, with sparkling eyes.



That was natural. It would have been terribly severe for Myuu, who was a member of sea-dweller tribe, to cross the desert. For a young child around four years old like her, it would not be strange for her to have died due in her weakened state. Having endured such an environment made Myuu’s surprise further increase at the gap between that time and now. After all, this four-wheeler was equipped with air conditioning.



Following that, the one who agreed with Myuu, took out cold water which normally didn’t exist in the desert even if one hoped with all their might, was the one who made an impactful confession to Hajime and declaration of war to Yue in Hol-ad, and, before he knew it, she had become one of his companions. She was Kaori. Incidentally, the water was taken out of the refrigerator installed in the car.



“You know, Shirasa-… Kaori. Please stop saying Hajime-papa. It is somehow made me felt terribly itchy over here.”



“? But, isn’t Myuu said that as if it was the norm?”



“Well, I don’t mind Myuu. However, for a classmate to call me papa is really…”



Due to her personality which liked to look after others, Kaori somehow became the one who took care of Myuu and she mostly called Hajime as Hajime-papa when she was by Myuu’s side. And for a classmate, and a girl at that, to call him papa, Hajime felt a different sense of resistance from when Myuu called him that, and he wore a truly subtle expression.



Incidentally, for Hajime to call her as “Kaori” was a result of her petition. Her reason was, Hajime-kun calls everyone by their own given name, so it is unfair for me to be called by my family name!, something like that.



“Is that so? Then I won’t… but, someday when I also have a child… at that time…”



Kaori said so with her cheeks dyed crimson, while sneaking a peek at Hajime. Thus a strange atmosphere wrapped everyone inside the vehicle, except for Myuu. Then Yue answered Kaori in place of Hajime who pretended not to hear anything.



“…Unfortunately, I have made that appointment already. Hajime promised it to me.”



“!? … Hajime-kun, what does she mean?”



“… I don’t think it is something that strange. After all, it is something still in the far future.”



“… fufu, Hajime already promised to introduce me to his parents.”



” !?”



“…He’s thoroughly made a bright family plan.”



” !?”



“…Even the dates in Hajime’s hometown.”



” !?”



Yue’s vigorous attacks couldn’t be stopped! Those words, one by one, became stakes, driven into Kaori’s chest. However, Kaori wasn’t a woman that would be done so easily. She believed in Hajime’s survival even in such a despairing situation and she held the courage to challenge Yue, who obviously owned a special bond with Hajime. In the moment Yue’s words were stopped, she began her counterattack!



“I, I know a lot of things about Hajime-kun that Yue doesn’t know! For example, Hajime’s dream for the future, his hobbies, even his favorite genre! Does Yue know the anime and manga that Hajime-kun likes?”



“Hmph… that’s… but, those aren’t related to the current us. There are no such things here. Hajime can just teach me once we arrive in Japan…”



“How naive. Just look at the current Hajime-kun. Doesn’t he looked like an anime character?”



“Geh!?”



It should’ve been a fight between Kaori and Yue but somehow Hajime received the damage.



“White-haired with an eyepatch, moreover his magic eyes… those are certainly the things Hajime-kun’s favorite characters have… even his weapon, that Cross Bit is modeled from funnel… ah, but the one Hajime-kun likes is 00, so is it GN Bit? Whatever it is, the current Hajime-kun is still quite the otaku.”



“GAH!? K-Kaori…”



“Mu, muu… for Hajime’s weapon to be derived from that.”



“Yue, can you say it is your victory if you don’t know the things the one you love likes?”



“… Kaori… that’s some courage… then, let me teach you myself. About the things that Hajime likes on…the bed.”



” !? … W-, w-, w-, on bed, uu~, as I thought…”



“Fufufu… it is good that you now know the difference between us.”



During their travel, Yue and Kaori had already made so many sparks against each other that the other party members already came to ignore them. In the beginning, Shia watched them anxiously, but in the end, it didn’t become a serious problem, so she stopped getting herself involved with them.



In a way, it was Hajime who received most of the damage. Hajime was the source of the two’s quarrel, so the content of their fights made him want to writhe. Even now, he received mental damage because the things he worried about the most were being pointed at.



Now Yue boldly told them about the “night” activities which made Kaori close her ears, not wanting to hear it. Hajime himself didn’t want Myuu to be exposed to that, so he tried to stop Yue.



However, faster than Hajime, Myuu unexpectedly came to stop the two’s quarrel.



“… u~, Yue-oneechan and Kaori-oneechan always quarrelling! Myuu hates it if big sisters don’t get along!”



Saying so, Myuu moved from Kaori’s laps towards Shia’s lap in the back seat. Moreover, Yue and Kaori became flustered. It was because the four year-old girl said she would hate them.



“Geez, you two are unbecoming in front of Myuu-chan. Rather, that was bad for her education. I also understand how much you two think of Hajime-san, but please be more prudent.”



“! …What a failure. To be scolded by Shia…”



“I-I am sorry, Myuu-chan, Shia.”



To be admonished by Shia made the two droop their shoulders.



For Yue, Shia was akin to a friend and younger sister, and although Shia also held affection towards Hajime, Shia also thought similarly towards Yue which made Yue didn’t think of her as a love rival. As for Tio, she was just a pervert. That’s why, Kaori, who made a full-frontal declaration of war towards Yue, was the first love rival she ever had.



Yue was convinced that there was an absolute bond between her and Hajime. She held an unwavering confidence that she was Hajime’s “special person.” That’s why she was confident that she would be able to easily defeat the challenger, Kaori, when the confession and declaration of war happened.



However, although her confidence didn’t change, Kaori sometimes made the flowers bloom between her and Hajime when they were reminiscencing about Japan, which was unknown to Yue and the others. Towards Kaori, who knew the past Hajime that she didn’t know of, Yue’s sense of rivalry budded before long.



As a result, just like children boasting about their collections, their quarrel turned from a serious one into such a situation and today, Myuu and Shia finally got angry at them.



Normally, Hajime was the one who should be stopping Yue, but he was the one who received most of the damage from the two’ quarrels. And now, he could only look far into the distance, as if it didn’t have anything to do with him, to heal his wounded heart.



“Nn? What is that? Master, there seems to be a commotion in the direction at three o’clock.”



Yue and Kaori were desperately appealing that they were getting along to mend Myuu’s mood and Shia was also calming Myuu with a wry smile. Hajime muttered, “I am not a chuuni” with hollow eyes. While those happened, unexpectedly, Tio who watched them in interest called out to Hajime. She seemed to have discovered something outside the window.



Hajime looked towards the place Tio mentioned, a big dune at his right. There, numerous worm-like demonic beasts, sandworms to be precise, had gathered. Their numerous heads could be seen at the top of the dune.



Those sandworms were 20 meters on average, large-scale demonic beasts while the largest ones were around 100 meters in length. They lived in this «Guryuu-en Great Desert» and would usually submerge themselves underground and attack prey in their vicinity by opening their big, fangs filled mouths from below. They specialized in surprise attacks due to being hard to detect and were feared by people who crossed the large desert as the gods of death.



Fortunately, the sandworms themselves weren’t very perceptive, so as long as one wasn’t so unfortunate as to come near them by accident, they would neither notice nor aim at anyone who was far away. As such, it could be said that there was someone who was not that fortunate at that dune, but…



“? Why are they just squirming around?”



That’s right, Tio would have not made a doubtful face and asked Hajime if there were just sandworms appearing. With Hajime’s perception skills, he would have noticed any of the sandworms’ surprise attacks, and they’d be able to get out of the sandworm’s range with four-wheeler’s speed. What was abnormal was that if the sandworms were attacking someone, rather than attacking, the sandworms were squirming around in their surroundings.



“It’s as if, they art confused as to eat or not, right?”



“Well, from what I see, isn’t that so?”



“This one hath no knowledge of this place. But those art all-eaters, they shouldn’t be hesitating to eat anything…”



Although Tio was a masochist pervert, she had lived far longer than Yue and unlike the imprisoned Yue, her knowledge was pretty vast. That was why she owned reliable information about demonic beasts. For her to be looking doubtful must mean that something extraordinary is happening.



However, they didn’t have any reason to be involved with it. Hajime decided to get as far away as possible without confirming or getting involved in it.



And at that time,



“Kh!? Everyone, brace yourselves!”



Hajime shouted so and immediately accelerated the four-wheeler. Morrow, from behind the four-wheeler, starting with a small part of its body surfacing, a gigantic figure with the same color as the desert jumped out. With its mouth open, it was a sandworm. Apparently, Hajime’s party were also unfortunate ones.



Hajime further steered to the left and right, advancing through the sand at high speed. Under the four-wheeler that drew an “S” letter, a second and third sandworm jumped out.



“Kyaaaa!”



“Hiu!”



“Wawawa!”



In order of screams, there was Kaori, Myuu, and Shia. Met with a strong centrifugal force, Kaori turned behind, worrying about Myuu in the back seat. But her balance crumbled and she fell into Hajime’s lap with her hip on Yue’s lap.



Blinking her eyes, Kaori’s cheeks were flushed, and as she was, she clung tightly to Hajime’s waist. Her position was actually pretty bad. It made Hajime’s cheek cramp. Incidentally, the other half of Kaori’s body was crushing on Yue.



“Oi, Shira-… Kaori! What are you doing in such a situation!”



“It’s a dangerous! A dangerous situation! So, I’m just clinging to Hajime-kun!”



“…Damn you, Kaori. To pin me under, is it… a surprise attack?”



While receiving an ambush from the sandworms, Kaori used this chance to hug Hajime. Yue was slapping Kaori’s butt even now, but the blushing Kaori was still clinging to Hajime’s waist, not moving at all.



While they were like that, the three appearing sandworms, with their upper bodies out of the ground, were glaring at the four-wheeler that evaded all of their ambushes. This time, those gigantic figures came forward to attack from overhead.



If it was a normal carriage, everything would’ve ended with that attack. However, it was an artifact created with a portion of Hajime’s otaku soul. It wasn’t even daunted at being made out as prey.



Besides…



“Ah, this is the first time I am using THIS!”



Saying so, Hajime turned around the four-wheeler with a drift, advancing backwards, he poured his magic and activated the installed function.



CLANK! KA-THUNK! KA-THUNK!



At the same time the mechanical sound effect rang out, a part of the four-wheeler’s bonnet slided open and an arm with a set of four rockets came out. The arm moved as if looking for its’ prey and when it turned towards the incoming sandworms, wooosh!, such an sfx rang out accompanied by the deadly warheads scattering their sparks.



Shining in an orange color, the rockets entered right into the sandworms’ opened mouths and after a moment, they created great explosions as they destroyed the sandworms from the inside. The sandworms’ crimson blood and flesh poured down like a shower and some stuck on the windshield of the currently back running four-wheeler.



“Uhee… Shia, don’t let Myuu see it.”



“I did that already~. Anh! Myuu-chan, was it painful? But please hold on for a while.”



Hajime asked Shia to do so at the time the rockets were fired into the incoming sandworms because the stimulation might be too strong for Myuu. Like that, in synchronization with Hajime, Shia was already embracing Myuu closely to her chest so as she would not see it. However, maybe because she could not breath from her face being buried in Shia’s breasts, Myuu tried to sip out and inadvertently touched a part of Shia’s body. Inadvertently, Shia moaned. Hajime decided that he did not hear anything.



Currently, although Kaori was clinging onto Hajime’s waist, Yue was finally able to fix her seatbelt. Indeed it was not a situation where he could be defeated by his own impulse, even though his ears were dyed in red with his face cramped.



“E-Excuse me, Hajime-kun. I am sorry. That, that I impulsively… there’s no perverted meaning to it. That is, for a bit, I just wanted to hug…”



“… then if things go well, are you going to satisfy Hajime like that?”



“Un, that is so… wait, no! Yue, don’t put such strange things into my mouth. I am not as lewd as Yue.”



“…You said I am lewd… certainly, I can’t refute that when I am alone with Hajime.”



“…Girls, please shut it already. Also, Yue, please don’t talk about night activities because it’s embarrassing.”



With the three sandworms crushed by the rockets installed in the four-wheeler, Hajime sharpened his gaze because the sandworms on the dune before could be seen moving due to perceiving the explosive sound and impact.



However, on his side, Kaori and Yue were conversing just as usual which reduced his tension. Inadvertently, he admonished them due to him being embarrassed.



To begin with, in his mind, the “night” Yue was certainly a lewd one and, when he was alone with her, he thought of her as pretty erotic. Kaori who seemed to have seen through him was teary eyed. Yue, with a bewitching smile, was looking at Hajime while licking her lip. Kaori, who saw that, raised a cute groan. Unconsciously, her fighting spirit blazed further.



From the back seat, Shia said, “I understand your feelings, Kaori-san. We are comrades here,” while patting Kaori’s shoulder with sympathetic eyes.



Hajime ignored them and the moved four-wheeler above another dune. He could see the group of sandworms on the lower side of the ground with their lower parts still underground. They didn’t hide anything as they slightly raised the sand. They might have guessed that they had been noticed by Hajime’s party, so they chose speed over another surprise attack.



Hajime put the rocket launcher away and activated another piece of weaponry in its stead. The center of the bonnet slid apart and a rectangular machine appeared from inside. Following that, the rectangular box extended its barrel with kashun! sound effect, and it became a rifle was similar to Schlagen.



Next, bright red sparks gushed out from the four-wheeler’s Schlagen. With its arm adjusting the angle, DUuuoo!!, came a roaring, firing sound as a line flashing line tore through the brown world.



The bullet, which was fired at a high-velocity, advanced as it raised the sand on the ground upon impact and grandly raised a dust storm. On the sand column that was raised just like an eruption was, of course, a lot of sand colored meat and red blood.



The Schlagen installed on four-wheeler continued to fire bright red flashes, one after another. The sandworms that were hunting their prey exploded on the ground and became small bits of nourishment for the barren ground.



“Hajime-kun! Look at that!”



“…A white person?”



When four-wheeler’s Schlagen, which was trailing white smoke, was stored back, Kaori let out a surprised voice and pointed her finger. In the place Kaori pointed at, just as Yue muttered, was a collapsed person who was wrapped in white clothing. It was probably the one the previous sandworms were looking at. However, from their distance, it was unknown as to why it wasn’t eaten.



“Please, Hajime-kun. Let’s go there… I am a “healer” after all.”



Kaori looked at Hajime, petitioning. Even Hajime was interested as to why that person was not attacked by the demonic beasts of the desert in such a situation, so he accepted Kaori’s request. It was possible that the person carried a method or item capable of keeping demonic beasts away. And in actuality, there was a mineral called the Faeadren crystal that carried such an effect in the sea of trees. The crystal only made it difficult for demonic beasts to approach, but there’s a possibility that even stronger items exist.



As such, the four-wheeler came near the collapsed person. The person wore clothing that was similar to galabeya (egyptian clothing), and it wore a hood that was large enough to hide its’ face. Its’ face couldn’t be seen. Falling prone, the hood hid it.



Getting off the four-wheeler, Kaori ran with short steps towards the fallen person.



“!… This is…”



When the hood was taken off, a man’s face could be seen, a young one that was still in the middle of his 20s. However, what surprised Kaori was not that but the young man’s state. With a pained expression, he was drenched in sweat, his breathing was rough, and his pulse was fast. He generated an intense heat from all over his body that could be felt even through his clothing. Moreover, blood vessels could be seen as if they were being pressed from the inside of his body, and he was bleeding from his eyes and nose. It was obviously an abnormal situation. It was neither a sun stroke nor cold.



Hajime became cautious towards the virus-carrier like young man, but he decided to keep quiet and watch as the healing specialist was examining him. Kaori activated “Infiltrate and Examine.” Using magic power to infiltrate the other’s body, she could examine one’s state and the result could be seen on her status plate.



With one hand placed on the young man’s chest, Kaori’s other hand was holding her status plate where the result of the examination was displayed. The result was…



“…Rampaging magic power? Does it mean the magic power inside his body is out of control because of poison?”



“Kaori? Do you understood anything now?”



“Y-Yeah, but this is…”



Saying so, Kaori shown what was displayed on her status plate,



Condition



Symptom



Cause



“It is just my guess, but he must have drunk something which resulted in his magic power going out of control… moreover, because he can’t release it outside, his magic power was pressuring from inside his body and his body couldn’t endure it… if this keeps up, his internal organs and blood vessels will explode. It is also possible that he will be weakened to death due to a large amount of hemorrhaging… I am requesting a blessing unto this location, “Ten Thousand Heavens.”



Concluding so, Kaori chanted her healing magic. “Ten Thousand Heavens” was what she activated. It was onne of the middle-ranked healing magics with the effect of curing abnormal conditions. It was the magic used to undo Suzu’s petrification.



However…



“…There’s almost no change… why? For it to be incapable of curing it… does it means too much time has passed?”



Apparently, “Ten Thousand Heavens” could not cure the man, it could only delay the progression. Next, maybe because of the pressure from inside his body, the young man groaned in pain. His bleeding didn’t stop. At the moment, because she didn’t have any clear treatment method, Kaori ground her teeth and decided to use her emergency measure.



“Here I declared the light of grace, here is my realm, my sanctuary, which crushes all evils just as I intended to, “Holy Ground.””



High-ranked light attributed healing magic, “Holy Ground.” It was a magic that transfers peoples’ magic power to the others within the area. Basically, by transferring one’s magic power to one’s companion, that person would temporarily escaped from magic power exhaustion. It was a magic that aimed to supplement another if s/he didn’t have a sufficient amount of magic power to shoot a strong magic.



Moreover, it wasn’t limited to the user’s magic power, so it could forcefully transfer someone else’s magic power to another within the area. It held the same principle as magic drain. However, it needed a lot more time to extract the magic power from another person and it was impossible to extract a lot of it at once. This was the reason it is only a “High-ranked magic.”



To begin with, it only became practical because Kaori was capable of activating magic which originally needed ten notes with only three notes of chanting. It showed how capable Kaori was.



The reason she used this magic on the suffering young man was of course to release the rampaging magic power that was building pressure inside his body towards the outside. It was displayed on the status plate that the young man was in state where he “cannot release magic power to outside of the body,” so she decided to try “if” it could be solved by forcefully draining it using high-ranked magic.



The pure-white light expanded from the center of the young man’s body, and firefly-like, fleeting lights sprang about. It was a mysterious sight. With her eyes shut, the appearance of Kaori, who placed her hand on the young man’s chest as she concentrated and was wrapped by the fleeting light, was divine.



Kaori, who easily activated high-ranked magic, made the ones well versed in magic, Yue and Tio, inadvertently leak “Hou…,” voices of admiration. While being held by Shia, Myuu watched Kaori in an entranced expression and muttered, “Beautiful…”



Without noticing that her new comrades in the surroundings were raising voices of admiration, Kaori put the magic power extracted from the young man into the bracelet made of God Crystal that she received from Hajime. Apparently, the forced drain from the high-ranked magic was effective.



Incidentally, the reason it was not a ring was because Hajime didn’t want to repeat the past misunderstanding.



Gradually, the young man’s breathing became steady. The redness of his body also disappeared as it seemed the bleeding was also stopped. After deactivating “Holy Ground,” Kaori activate beginner-ranked healing magic, “Blessing,” which healed the young man’s blood vessels.



“For the time being… I don’t think it will have an immediate effect as I don’t see any real solution for it. There’s also the possibility of a slow death from over magic power extraction, so I only extracted it until the level where the pressure inside his body is decreased. If this keeps up, I think the possibility of a slow death from either pressure from inside his body or fatigue is… high. I also have no memory of such a symptom from the things I studied… Do Yue and Tio know anything about it?”



With the young man out of the crisis, Kaori was somewhat relieved but anxious as she could not heal him completely. Thus she asked Yue and Tio whose knowledge was deep. The two’s gazes wandered around as they searched about it inside their memory, but there was none. In the end, it became a situation where they could not even say that it was a disease of an unknown cause.



“Kaori, just to be safe, try to examine us too. After all, there’s also the possibility that it is an unknown disease that is spread by aerial infection too. Well, there’s no need to worry about it if it is just a rampaging of magic power.”



“Un, you are right.”



Nodding at Hajime’s words, Kaori examined everyone and didn’t find any abnormalities. Therefore, because it seemed not to infect anyone from respiration, Hajime’s party patted their chests in relief.



When they did that, the young man raised a groan and his eyelids trembled. Thus, he woke up. Slowly opening his eyes and then looking at his surrounding, the young man saw the nearby Kaori was watching him in worry and he said, “Goddess? I see, so this that world…”



Following that, the young man began to heat up for different reason and tried to reach out towards Kaori only to have his stomach trampled by Hajime, who didn’t conceal his irritation from the already annoying heat and sand.



“Ufffph!?”



“H-Hajime-kun!?”



Leering at the groaning young man, whose body bent into <, and Kaori, who raised a surprised voice, Hajime began to question him.



Hajime knew that the garaveya-like clothing and overcoat worn by the young man was a specialty of the «Dukedom of Ancadi» that was located in the biggest oasis of «Guryuu-en Great Desert». He studied it as way of escaping reality at the time he was called “incompetent.” If the young man says that a kind of disease was spreading in Ancadi then they would change their next destination due to the current one being a danger zone. Thus he asked the young man.



Regaining his senses after being trampled by Hajime, the young man didn’t even look at Hajime’s party surrounding him and stared at the black object, blinking in confusion. After hearing the rough circumstances from Kaori,and understanding that Hajime’s party were his life benefactors, he bowed his head, said his thanks, and began his story.



Hearing the young man’s story, is it those Gods playing tricks on us?, Hajime was looking at the sky doubtfully because trouble always followed them wherever they went.





Volume 9 Chapter 4




Because of his peculiar condition before, the young man, though he regained consciousness, could not stand straight. Furthermore, because of the danger of dehydration due to the desert’s temperature and his considerably sweating, the young man was invited into the vehicle and allowed to drink some water inside.



The young man was forced to acknowledge that the four-wheeler was some sort of carriage, and he feels giddiness from the comfortability inside it. However, when he recalled that he could not finish his mission if he stopped mid-way, he pulled himself together as there was no time to enjoy such luxury. Then, he introduced himself to Hajime’s party who saved him.



“First, let me say my appreciation for your help. Thank you very much. When I thought I was going to die in this state… Ancadi would be finished. My name is Viz Fuad Zengain. Son of the Dukedom of Ancadi’s ruler, Randzi Fuad Zengain.”



Surprisingly, the young man called Viz was an important person. Ancadi itself is the key point in transporting marine products so the freshness would not drop by much from Elisen, where 80% of marine products were produced in that northern part of the continent. In other words, by being the main supplier of the food from the northern part of the continent, Ancadi held the monopoly. Ancadi’s ruler himself was not only a distinguished noble but a great noble who was trusted by Herrlicht Kingdom.



Hearing Kaori’s identity of being one of the “God’s Apostle” and someone summoned from different world, as well as how Hajime’s party was made up of Gold-ranked adventurers, Viz was so astonished that his eyes popped out. Thus, he thought, Is this a command from God!? Even a Goddess is sent to us!, and he suddenly prayed to the heavens. In this case, the Goddess, Kaori, was dumbfounded by him. Hajime urged him to tell them the situation while leaking a slight Pressure, making Viz clear his throat and begin to talk while drenched in cold sweat.



What Viz told them was,



Four days ago, people collapsing with a high fever of an unknown cause began appearing one after another in Ancadi. It was really a sudden, with 3,000 people out of 270,000 falling unconscious in the first day, and those with similar symptoms reached 20,000 people. The medical center filled instantly, and it continued to fill up the communal center. The medical personnels were treating the patients while looking for the cause of the disease, but, just like Kaori, they could only delay it without curing any.



While it happened, the number of patients kept increasing one after another. Before long, infected medical personnels began to appear. The number overwhelmed the magic users capable of delaying the disease, and under such chaos, dead finally appeared among those who didn’t receive the treatment. Despair shrouded the people due to the fact that people died only after the second day they were infected.



Within those, one pharmacist accidentally used “Liquid Judging” on the drinking water. Resultantly, it was known that the water contained poison, which resulted in rampaging of magic power. At once, survey team was formed. They examined Ancadi’s oasis while assuming the worst situation in their mind, and as they thought, the oasis had been polluted.



Naturally, the oasis is a lifeline for a country located in the middle of the desert, so the guarding and maintenance were strictly managed by the one in charge. Thinking about it normally, it was not an exaggeration that it was impossible to take out the guards of Ancadi and poisoned the oasis even with all prepared measures.



From where, how, who… The survey team could only tilted their heads, but more importantly, because the stock of water from two days ago were not plenty, they didn’t have any more water to use. Thus, it resulted with them having no other ways to save those infected from drinking the polluted water.



However, it wasn’t like there wasn’t any other method — there was a method to heal those infected. The method needed a mineral called “Serene Stone.” This “Serene Stone” is a special mineral hat carried an effect to calm the magic power’s activity and a small amount of this valuable mineral could be harvested in the northern rock zone near «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». If the “Serene Stone” was made into powder and drunk, it would be able to calm the rampaging magic power inside the bodies of the infected.



Even so, the northern rock zone was too far that it needed at least one month of travel using carriage. Moreover, Ancadi’s adventurers, especially those capable of entering «Guryuu-en Great Volcano»’s dungeon, harvesting “Serene Stone,” and returning, had already fallen to the disease. Half-assed adventurers could not even able to go through the desert storm wrapping «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». Besides, even if there were people with power to do so, they also did not have any stock of water safe to use, so it was necessary to ask for help from the Kingdom.



The requested help asked for water that could temporarily relieved 270,000 people in the Dukedom of Ancadi, in addition to powerful people capable of going to the dungeon of «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». However, it was not easy to arrange powerful people capable of doing that. Even though the request from the Dukedom could not be disregarded, the Kingdom would rather choose to investigate Ancadi’s current condition first. Furthermore, the Kingdom would also deliberately make the procedures as a slow one.



That’s why, Zengain, the one in power, thought it was necessary for Viz to be the representative and directly asking for reinforcement.



“Father, mother, and my little sister were infected, too, and although they managed to recover using the stock of Serene Stone in Ancadi, they were in a truly weakened state that they are incapable of going to the nearby city much less to the Kingdom. That’s why I am the one to ask for the help and left Ancadi yesterday along with bodyguards. At that time, I didn’t have any symptom… but I might have been infected. The appearance of the disease likely differs depending on the individual. I was agitated by this situation… my family falling sick, the duchy fell into disorder, and how we were argued on who was to immediately ask for rescue. It is also necessary to procure Serene Stone. And even right now, the lives of Ancadi’s people are perishing… but I am in such a miserable condition!”



Even though he could not put strength into his body, Viz put strength into his fist and hit his thigh. He seemed to have a strong sense of responsibility towards the people as the next Lord of Ancadi. He might also be mortified by how his bodyguards were annihilated when the Sandworms attacked.



However, it was fortunately the Sandworms hesitated to eat him due to sensing the disease. Though he was exhausted due to the disease, it was also what caused the Sandworms not to attack him and resultantly, he met Hajime’s party. Life is where one is unable to know what would happen next.



“… I want you, no, I request you as the formal representative of the Lord of Ancadi Dukedom. Please lend me your strength.”



Saying so, Viz bowed his head. Silence filled the vehicle for a while. The sound of sand carried by the wind and hitting the windows greatly resounded. Viz himself knew that as the Lord’s representative, he should not easily bow his head to someone else, but he was so desperate not to let go of such good fortune.



All gazes moved to Hajime. Though they left the decision to Hajime, everyone’s gazes, except Yue and Tio’s, were obviously telling him they wanted to help. Especially Kaori; she could not disregard such a situation as a “Healer.” Her gaze was petitioning him. However, Myuu was more direct.



“Papa~. Won’t Papa help him?”



She said while looking at him with a truly pure gaze. She seemed to believe Hajime could solve whatever the problem was, unconditionally. For Myuu, Hajime was her one and only hero. Towards Myuu, and Kaori’s expectant gaze, “It can’t be helped,” Hajime shrugged his shoulders with wry feeling.



“Fufu,” Shia and Tio chuckled at Hajime. Hajime immediately looked over his shoulder towards Yue, and Yue was… just the same as always. No matter what Hajime’s decision was, she will lend him all of her might. Even without words, Yue’s feelings were clearly transmitted to him. Hajime stroked Yue’s cheek, and Viz his agreement to undertake the request.



To begin with, he had planned to go to «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», and he thought of entrusting Myuu to Ancadi at that time. After all, it wasn’t right to bring along a four year old child into a Great Dungeon. As such, they didn’t have any problem of procuring “Serene Stone” while conquering the dungeon, and there was no danger for Myuu, a child from demi-human race, since the source of the rampaging magic power disease was known. In the end, it was a problem Hajime could solve while completing his own agenda.



“With Hajime-dono’s class being “Gold,” I wanted you to gather “Serene Stone” from the Great Volcano first, but it is necessary to go to Imperial Capital first to secure our water. Can this movement type artifact be used by someone else other than Hajime-dono?”



“Well, except Kaori and Myuu, everyone can use it, but… there’s no need to go all the way to the Imperial Capital. I will somehow secure the water, so I want to go to Ancadi first, what do you think?”



“Hajime-dono can somehow secure it? What does it mean?”



The words that Hajime was capable of securing the water for several hundred thousand people made Viz dubious, and it was natural to doubt it. However, even without transporting it, Hajime had a method to obtain water. It was to collect the moisture in the atmosphere using water element magic.



Of course it might be impossible for an ordinary magic-user, but by his side was the rare magic genius, Yue. Moreover, Yue had many means of instantly recovering her magic power. Also, Viz or Randzi would still have enough time to go to the Kingdom to ask for help again if they regained their physical condition and took the remaining Serene Stone in Ancadi along.



After briefly explained those, Viz could not believe it at first. After all the chance was so small for him to make it into the Kingdom in his current condition, but he agreed to return to Ancadi after being persuaded by Kaori, a “God’s Apostle.”



While being surprised once again from how four-wheeler moved in high-speed as if it was sliding in the desert, Viz wondered why a “God’s Apostle” like Kaori was alone accompanied by the adventurers, why a child of Sea-dweller tribe called Hajime, a human, Papa, why they got along with someone from Rabbitman tribe, why a black-haired blooming woman made a disgusting smile though she being abused, but his chest was heated by the hope that came into his view.



* * *



Within the fluttering brown sand, the Ancadi they arrived at, just like Neutral Commercial City of Fhuren, was surrounded by wall and a milk-white one in this case. The outer wall and buildings were milky white in color, which created a beautiful contrast with the brown-colored outside world.



However, what differed from Fhuren were the pillars of light coming from the enclosing, irregular-shaped wall, which climbed towards the heavens. The pillars of light joined together in the sky, forming a gigantic dome, covering the entirety of Ancadi. At times, it was as if the surface of water had something thrown into it; ripples were appearing, creating a mysterious and beautiful spectacle.



Apparently, this dome was preventing sand from entering the city. And although large sand storm sometimes appearing in time of full moon, the dome made none of the sand entered Ancadi and it was only looked like a cloudy weather from inside.



Hajime’s party entered Ancadi from the shining, huge gate. Even a magic barrier was erected on the gate to not let sand entered. The gate guards, though surprised by seeing magic-driven four-wheeler, they didn’t have energy to question it because of the gloomy atmosphere surrounding Ancadi; they seemed to have given up. However, when they noticed the next Lord sitting on the back seat of four-wheeler, they stood in attention, seeming to regain their energy as soldiers.



Ancadi’s entrance gate was located in higher elevation. It seemed to be built in consideration of letting visitors to enjoy Ancadi’s beauty.



Hajime’s party were certainly admiring its beauty. The oasis in the east was glittering while being reflected by the sunlight, and a lot of lush green vegetations growing, surrounding it. The water from the oasis was flowing within the town like rivers and there were small boats moored here and there even though it was in the middle of desert. Lush green plazas were set up around the town which made one understood how spacious the city is.



On the north was the farmland. To prove the story of Ancadi’s abundance of fruit production, Hajime could see numerous amounts of fruits growing as far as his “Farsight” could see. To the west side was a big, palace-like building with pure white color unlike the other buildings which were milky white. The impressiveness and scale made one understood that this is the dwelling of the Lord. Boorish looking buildings were lined up around the palace in order which was likely to be the government ward.



While it was a desert nation, it was also just like a capital of water… that’s how Dukedom of Ancadi is.



Normally, this place would be actively doing business for fruits since it was the relay point from Elisen. Moreover, it was a popular place for sightseeing and should’ve been filled by vigor and clamor. But now, it was covered in a gloomy atmosphere. There were only few people on the street and no store was in business. All of the doors were firmly shut, as if they were quietly waiting for the storm to pass, crouching. The silence ruled the town.



“… I wanted to show our country filled with vigor to Miss Apostle and Hajime-dono. Unfortunately, we aren’t in time for that. So, let me guide you around myself once everything is solved. For the time being, let’s go to my father. He is in the palace.”



The party nodded at Viz’s words, and they advanced with the oasis as the background.



* * *



“Father!”



“Viz! You, wh—… No, wait, what’s with you!?”



Entering the place using Viz’s face as a pass, Hajime’s party entered the Lord’s, Randzi’s, office. They heard the Lord was pretty weakened, but apparently he had used a lot of healing magic and medicine, and now was working in vigor.



Randzi was surprised that his son, who departed to the Imperial Capital to ask for help, had returned. Just like the workers inside the palace, Randzi was pop-eyed seeing his son’s state.



It wasn’t strange. After all, Viz was floating mid-air at the moment.



More accurately, he was in a falling prone state while being carried by a Cross Bit in mid-air. Viz was severely weakened, and although Kaori’s healing magic managed to help him keeping his consciousness, he could not walk by himself. When Kaori couldn’t bear with it any longer and tried to help, “Ah, Apostle-sama, for me…,” Viz blushed and began to watch Kaori with moistened eyes. Thus, Hajime forcefully made the Cross Bit carried him.



Incidentally, it made it seemed Hajime was jealous. Thinking so, Kaori’s cheeks were reddened and she took a peek at Hajime, but it was simply because Hajime didn’t want to create another Kouki or Hiyama.



Even though he was in such a miserable appearance, clinging to the Cross Bitt, Viz quickly finished explaining to his father. As the talk advanced, a butler-like person came bringing in a powdered form of Serene Stone which Viz drank, who was still receiving Kaori’s healing magic. Thus, he was cured as if there was no obstacle to prevent him from being cured.



Even so, it was only a feeling; the toxin itself was still inside his body’s liquid. It was simply the effect of Serene Stone doing its work. The toxin was merged with his body’s liquid, so there was possibility of it being excreted, and there was nothing more that could be done.



“Well then, we should get going. Kaori, you go with Shia to the medical center where the patients are. Bring along Magic-Crystallization Stones. The rest will be securing the water. Lord, is there a broad space around 200 meters on all sides at the lowest?”



“Hmm? Um, though there’s one in the farming area…”



“Then, other than Kaori and Shia, we will go there. Shia, you must go to Yue if the Magic-Crystallization stones are full.”



Hajime issued instruction to all of the members. What Hajime’s party needed to do was simple. Just like Viz’s case, Kaori will use “Holy Ground” to extract magic power from the patients little by little and delayed the disease’s progression using “Ten Thousand Heaven.” The extracted magic power will be stocked inside Magic-Crystallization stones. Then, it will be carried to and used by Yue to create water once they were filled.



After he helped Yue create a reservoir, Hajime will go towards the Oasis. He was going to investigate the cause. He will solve it if he find the cause, but if not, he will just go to «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». It was such a plan.



Everyone nodded vigorously towards Hajime’s instruction.



* * *



Currently, the Lord, Randzi, the guards, and his attendants went to a corner of the farmland area in northern part of Ancadi, followed by Hajime, Yue, Tio, and Myuu. The plain was almost three times of the 200 meters on four sides. Normally, it was the place where a certain crop was grown, but it was now in its resting period.



Currently, the dubious Randzi was staring dagger into Hajime’s party expressing that if not for the emergency situation, they would receive capital punishment. Although he truly wanted to secure water, common sense told him Hajime’s plan was an impossible one thus it couldn’t be helped that Randzi was glaring at him.



However, his doubting gaze was instantly turned into an astonished after Yue used her magic.



“”Threat Destroyer.””



A black, swirling orb immediately appeared above the farmland where her right hand was outstretched to. That orb changed its shape above the farmland, into a thin square which spread horizontally and the square was already around 200 meters in length. Thus, after a moment of stagnation, it fell to the ground without making a sound and casually crushed the ground.



The ground sunk due to the terrific pressure, and the earth tremored. It was as if the ground itself was screaming. After a moment, the 200 meters on all side of the farm that had received the supergravity pressure formed a huge reservoir with five meters in depth.



Hajime sneaked a look at Randzi and his subordinates, and every single one of them had their jaws dropped far that their jaws might have dislocated. Their eyes widened and seemed to pop. The impact was too strong that they turned speechless, all of them were shouting, “Huwwhuuattt—!?”, in their minds.



Having activated Age of Gods magic with half of its output, “Fuu,” Yue exhaled. Although her magic power was exhausted by suddenly consuming a large amount of magic, her expression did not change since she felt only a slight tiredness. Though it would be okay if she took the magic stored inside Magic-Crystallization stone just like the battle in Ul, she thought of keeping the magic power inside the Magic-Crystallization stone as much as possible because they were going to challenge «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» after this. Moreover, because they were not in a battle, Hajime used Yue’s other method of replenishing her magic power.



Yue’s body was swaying as if she was about to fall, but she displayed she didn’t need to be supported. It was something she wanted to do, so she didn’t want to fall because of this. Eventually, with a thud, Yue’s body leaned on Hajime’s arm.



From behind her, Hajime embraced Yue a little, and lifted her. This time he was embracing her from the front. Yue was smiling in joy, and answered his embrace by wrapping her arms on Hajime’s neck.



Following that, “…Thank you for the treat.” Then, she bit Hajime’s neck.



BITE!~ CHU~,



Blood flowed from Hajime’s body. Yue, absent-mindedly with moistened eyes, was licking Hajime’s neck multiple times. Yue’s amorousness despite her appearance was further increased when she sucked Hajime’s blood. It made one think pheromones was discharged from all over her body, turning the atmosphere into one of a bewitchment.



Nh, ah, chu chu, fuu



The appearance of the beautiful little girl using her tongue to lick the scruff of Hajime’s neck while making small, lewd, gasping sounds made everyone forgot to question Yue’s race, when thinking normally, was actually the hateful, bloodsucker. The surrounding men were slouching. Only the Lord, as expected of a Lord, had recovered from his astonishment and stared daggers at Hajime’s party. A lot of things were swirling inside his head. He thought they were being a little too arrogant, he thought of things seriously and his eyes became bloodshot.



Incidentally, though Tio also wanted to exhibit her pervertedness, she was completely blindfolding Myuu from behind because it was too early for Myuu, while being aroused herself. “Myuu can’t see~,” Myuu complained only to be hugged from behind and could not resist since her head was wrapped by breasts far bigger than Shia’s.



Converting Hajime’s blood into magic power using “Blood Conversion,” Yue quietly separated from Hajime’s neck after she licked it for once more. Then, she kissed Hajime’s lips. Hajime and Yue were looking at each other with burning gazes and Ahem!, it ended with coughs. They came from Randzi, the Lord, and the slouching men. Thinking they overdid it, Hajime and Yue made wry smiles… then they turned around and began to kiss again.



“No, no, no, you should do it where we can’t see… I also have various guesses about that thing, the bloodsucker, but for the time being, I want you to do the thing that should be done… Rather, shouldn’t you be the one who understands it the most!?”



The Lord’s rebuttal made Hajime and Yue shrugged their shoulders in reluctance, leering at Randzi and the others who were irritated by their gestures, they began their work.



Hajime went into the reservoir, and took out the four-wheeler from “Treasure Box.” Using land-leveling function installed in four-wheeler, he used “Mineral Separation” and coated the surface of the reservoir with metal so water couldn’t be absorbed. After Hajime returned when he finished the coating, Yue thrust out her arm and used water element magic against the instant-reservoir.



“”Fissuring Wave.””



It was one of the high-ranked, Water element magic which created a huge wave to crush the enemies. For an ordinary magic-user, though it was called a huge wave, it would only be a tsunami around ten to twenty meters, squarely. However, the number changed once Yue used it. A tsunami with width of 150 meters and height of 100 meters was created, immediately flowing into the reservoir. In the middle of it, she sucked Hajime’s blood so many times to replenish her magic power, and thus, as much as half of her magic power was saved. However, there was also a limit on how much blood Hajime had.



Any further, he would become anaemic due to loss of blood, but Shia came at this time. In her hands were the Magic-Crystallization stones from Kaori. Although it was drained little by little, the magic power was drained from several thousands of patients. Thus, a large amount had been saved up. Not even two hours had passed since Kaori came to the medical center, but in such a short time, Kaori was able to treat a large number of patients. She certainly was also a cheat-like character.



Shia returned to help Kaori again and at the same time, Yue activated “Fissuring Wave” in rapid succession. Before long, the forty thousand square meters reservoir was filled with fresh, unpolluted water.



“…Such a thing…”



Dumbfounded, Randzi was staring at the surface of water before him, reflecting by the sunlight and glittering just like an oasis. He was speechless.



“It is enough for now. Next, I am going to examine the oasis… if I don’t come to understand anything, then it is okay for you to ask for water from the Kingdom at that time.”



“Ah, yeah. Well, I have a lot I want to ask… but thank you. You have my gratitude. With this, my people won’t die from dehydration. Also, let me guide you to the oasis.”



Although Randzi was still recovering from the shock, he knew what should be done, so his attitude completely changed and he sincerely said his gratitude to Hajime’s party.



Hajime and the others moved straight to the oasis.



Unchanging, the oasis was beautifully glittering, reflecting the sunlight, and it did not seem to contain any poison.



However…



“…Nn?” “…Hajime?”



Frowning, Hajime stared at a spot inside the oasis. Noticing his change, Yue tilted her head and asked Hajime with a doubtful expression.



“Well, that, my Magic Eye was reacting to something just now… Lord, to what length has the survey team examined it?”



“… I am certain it was the substances inside the oasis and the river flowing from it. They also investigated the substance in various wells and the underground river. The water’s substance was just as you heard from my son, but no abnormality was found in the underground river. Moreover, the range of examination was only several tens of meters from the oasis. The bottom of the oasis itself hadn’t been examined.”



“Had an artifact sunk into the oasis?”



“? No, I don’t think so. Although the guards and the management of the oasis used an artifact, it was set up above the ground… It is a barrier-type artifact, so it shouldn’t be able to pollute the oasis. As for the proof, the oasis had never been polluted before.”



The artifact Randzi spoke about was called “Cutter of What Intended,” and it was actually the dome of light protecting Ancadi. It was a useful barrier that prevented sand from entering while allowing the necessity such as air and moisture to pass through, but the things capable of passing could also be decided by the setter. In addition, it was not just a simple barrier since it also had detecting function, and what was detected could also be set. By setting it in default, it was possible to detect whether one’s soul was affected by a magic of dark element.



In other words, if it was set to “those who have malicious intent towards the oasis,” the person who set it, Randzi, would know if the “Cutter of What Intended” was reacting to something. However, the Lord himself didn’t know whether there was a hidden requirement. Incidentally, up until now, a lot of people had been going in and out during the examination while the guards had been off-duty due to the oasis being polluted already.



“…Hee~. Then, I wonder what’s with that.”



Having the oasis of Dukedom of Ancadi polluted, the appearance of Randzi clenching his fists in bitterness made one think he was indeed Viz’s father. Looking at Randzi with narrowed eyes, Hajime laughed while understanding Randzi had misunderstood his words. Hajime’s Magic Eye was certainly seen “something” releasing magic power in the bottom of the center of the oasis.



The thing that shouldn’t be there made Randzi and the others agitated. Coming near the oasis, Hajime took out a 500ml pet bottle-shaped metal object from “Treasure Box” and supplied it with magic power. Next, he casually threw it into the oasis.



Trotting, Hajime moved away from the oasis and stood next to Yue. Though everyone wore doubtful expressions, Hajime didn’t say anything. Following that, Randzi finally came to ask Hajime. And at that moment,



BAAAANNNGGGG!!!



A huge explosive sound rang out accompanied by the oasis spouting a huge column of water. Randzi and his subordinates were once again slackjawed and pop-eyed.



“Tch, was it evaded? …No, it must be because it has high defense, huh?”



Saying so, Hajime took out ten of the same thing and thrown them into the oasis. Following that, after several seconds, huge explosions and huge columns of water appeared all over the oasis.



What Hajime threw were the so called torpedo. Because the next Seven Great Dungeon over the Elisen, «Meljeenae’s Seabed Ruin», was located at the bottom of the sea (according to the information from Miledi), Hajime made prototypes of weapons that could be used in the sea, the torpedo. He threw them because he now had the time and a place to experiment them. The result was, although it had a good amount of power, its homing and speed was not that good. Improvements were necessary.



The torpedoes were equipped with crystal created by Creation magic which was capable of “Specific Perception” and “Pursuit.” They would run after the enemy, and once the enemy was locked, it would explode upon contact. What it meant was, something was inside the water, and he used the experimental weapons to chase after it.



“Oy, oy, oy! Hajime-dono! What in the world are you doing!? Ahh! The pier is blown off! The fishes are dead! The oasis is dyed in red!”



“Tch, it still couldn’t be caught, huh. Well then, next will be 50…”



Randzi was screaming because of the scenery of the oasis was gradually turning worse, but Hajime muttered without a care and moved out. Randzi, along with his subordinates clung to Hajime, desperately trying to stop him.



From Randzi’s view who didn’t know about the “something” seen by Hajime’s Magic Eye, Hajime had suddenly threw out unknown objects which blasted the oasis one after another along with the pier and the fishes. It was a confusing situation since the barrier didn’t see it as an evil, destructive action. Randzi couldn’t conceal his confusion, however, he still desperately tried to protect the oasis.



Irritated by Randzi and the others clinging to him, Hajime tried to shake them off as he advanced. However,



WOOOOSH!



Numerous tentacles came out of the water cutting the wind, and it attacked Hajime and the others. Immediately, Hajime intercepted it some using Donner-Schlag and the tentacles coming out of the water were blown off. Yue froze them while Tio used fire to evaporate the tentacles.



As Randzi and his subordinates looked at the oasis, wondering what happened, but they were once again astonished by the spectacle of something appearing from the oasis. They thought the surface of the water raised because of anger from Hajime’s bombing. It kept rising up and became a little mountain with the height of around ten meters.



“What is… that…”



Randzi muttered with a blank expression, but his words were resounded clearly.





Volume 9 Chapter 5




The thing appearing in the oasis was 10 meters in length, it has numerous tentacles wriggling around, and a magic stone shining in red was inside of it. A slime… it was the most suitable word to describe it.



However, its size was abnormal. Slime-type demonic beasts were normally one meter in length, at best. Moreover, there should be none with power to manipulate the surrounding water. It should only capable of manipulating tentacles that were part of its own body.



“What the… what’s with that demonic beast? Is it… a Vachram?”



Randzi muttered in blank surprise. Vachram itself was a slime-type demonic beast of this world.



“Well, I don’t care whatever it is. In the end, isn’t this the thing polluting the oasis? So, it is most likely to have a peculiar magic that excreted the poison.”



“… What you’re thinking should be right. But, can Hajime-dono defeat it?”



While Hajime and Randzi were conversing, the Oasis-Vachram was still attacking in anger by using its tentacles. Yue and Tio were dealing with those tentacles with ice magic and fire magic respectively. Hajime was also intercepting while talking using Donner-Schlag, and though he aimed at the core-like red magic stone, he could not easily hit it since the magic stone moved around the body, as if it had its own will.



Seeing Hajime’s artifacts and magic from Yue and Tio, Randzi had given up being surprised and decided to just ignore them which resulted in him being capable of calmly ask Hajime that question.



“Nn~… yeah, there’s no need to worry. I’ve caught it now.”



Replying casually to Randzi’s question, Hajime quietly put Schlag back into its holster and used both hands to ready Donner while narrowing his eyes, following the track of the moving magic stone. His right arm thrusted straight forward and left arm’s elbow slightly bent. His feet, one positioned forward and one backward. It was the shooting posture called Weaver Stance, the pose to accurately fire Donner.



Hajime’s eyes sharply narrowed just like those of a hawk’s, completely capturing the movement of that magic stone. Then…



KABOOM!!



With a dry explosive sound, a line of flash cut through the air as though they were pulled by a magnetic force. The moving magic stone, while ignoring the law of inertia, was shot through by the flash, and it could be said the magic stone was being voluntarily being hit.



The impact and heat from the railgun instantly annihilated the magic stone, and at the same time, Oasis-Vachram lost its power and the water it manipulated returned into normal water.WoOoOoOSH~! A large amount of water poured down. Randzi and his subordinates were watching the generated rough waves.



“… Is it over?”



“Ah, there’s no more magic power reaction from the oasis now. I don’t know whether annihilating the cause is equal to purifying it though.”



With Hajime’s words indicating he easily repulsed the cause of Ancadi’s desperate situation only made Randzi and his subordinates puzzled. Even so, because the cause was certainly annihilated before their own eyes, one of Randzi’s subordinate came to examine the water’s substance in a panic.



“… How is it?” “… No, it is still polluted.”



Randzi asked with an expectant tone, but his subordinate was shaking his head in disappointment. They knew the people were infected by the water drawn from the oasis, but they could not conceal their disappointment after finding out that it was still polluted even though Oasis-Vachram was no longer there.



“Well, there’s no need for thee to be disappointed. With the cause gone, the pollution won’t advance. And the water from the oasis comes from the fresh water in the underground water pulse, so the oasis will be able to return to its normal state if the polluted water is exhausted.”



Tio told Randzi and his subordinates to comfort them, thus Randzi and his subordinates began to pull themselves together, displaying their wills. Their appearances, with Randzi, ruler of Ancadi, in the center showed how much they loved this country. It was a country that existed in a severe environment, so the patriotism was high.



“… But, I wonder just why that Vachram-like demonic beast is doing in the desert… Was it a new kind of demonic beast that came from underground water pulse?”



Having pulled himself together, Randzi tilted his head while looking at oasis. And Hajime was the one who answered him.



“It is just my guess, but… it was probably the work of Demon race, right?”



“!? Demon race? Hajime-dono, you must know something to be able to say that, right?”



Randzi was surprised by Hajime’s words, but he instantly regained his composure and urged Hajime to explain. Randzi was looking at Hajime, the one who secured the water and annihilated the cause of pollution, with respect and trust. There’s no more trace suspicion that he had in the beginning.



Hajime guessed the Oasis-Vachram was a new demonic beast created by Age of Gods magic Demon race had. There’s the peculiarity of Oasis-Vachram, coupled with the fact the Demon race was also aiming at Aiko in Ul and the Heroes in Orcus.



It was probably one of Demon race’s scheme, using demonic beast. The Demon race was investigating and erasing dangerous, unknown element and the key point in northern of the continent before the war. The proofs were how they aimed at Aiko, an existence that could affect food supply, and the Heroes from another world the Church of the Saints summoned to fight against Demon race.



As for Ancadi, it was the key point of food supply since it was the relay point of marine products from Elisen and it also produced large amount of fruits and other food ingredients. Moreover, if Ancadi was attacked, it was hard to call for help because it is located in the middle of the Great Desert. So, it wouldn’t be odd for Demon race to aim for Ancadi.



Being told so, Randzi raised a low groan with a bitter expression.



“I’ve heard about the demonic beast. We also did our own investigation about it but… I’ve never expected they could create such a thing… how naive of me.”



“Well, it isn’t something you can help, right? After all, even the Imperial Capital didn’t get information about new kinds of demonic beasts. Furthermore, the case where the Hero’s party was attacked was only recently. And that must have created commotions everywhere right now.”



“Maybe it is about time for them to move make a move, huh… Hajime-dono… although you introduced yourself as an adventurer… those artifacts and power, as expected, you are the same as Kaori-dono…”



Without saying anything, Hajime shrugged his shoulders, thus Randzi stopped asking, thinking Hajime must have his own circumstance. No matter what the circumstance was, it didn’t change the fact that Hajime’s party saved Ancadi. There’s no need to make any useless inquiry to their benefactors.



“… Hajime-dono, Yue-dono, Tio-dono. Let this Lord of Ancadi, Randzi Fuad Zengain, show his gratitude on behalf of this country. You have saved this country.”



Saying so, Randzi and his subordinates bowed their heads. It wasn’t an easy thing for the Lord himself to bow his head, but regardless whether Hajime is one of the “God’s Apostles,” Randzi would still bow his head. And although only a short time had passed, Hajime understood Randzi held an extraordinary patriotism. This was also the reason why his subordinates didn’t stop Randzi from bowing his head to someone who introduced himself as a mere adventurer, and they also bowed their heads. Such personality was also passed onto his son, Viz. Their gesture, speech, and behavior were alike.



Towards them, Hajime was smiling broadly while saying,



“Ah, you have expressed your gratitudes. Also, please don’t forget about this huge favor.”



He expected them to return this favor. Well, it was not something new. Hajime said, “No, please don’t worry about that. This is something natural to do as a person,” clearly and humbly, thus Randzi was inadvertently dumbfounded thinking Hajime had casually said he wanted something. Randzi himself actually didn’t mind giving him anything as his thank towards the country’s saviors, but he didn’t expect it to be said straight to his face.



Hajime had thought there’s no need for gratitude since it was necessary for him to make Ancadi secure because he needed to entrust them with Myuu, and there’s Kaori’s request, too.



However, because they made their way to express their gratitude, it wouldn’t be bad to have more people as allies in a time of emergency, so he clearly told them it was a favor. Hajime thought Randzi would sincerely correspond to it, but he was also a politician, so Hajime needed to make sure of it.



“Ah, ahh. Of course. It will be remembered forever… But, there are still many people suffering in Ancadi, can I ask your help in their behalf?”



It was something Randzi was used to, as a politician and as a noble, but Randzi was a little perplexed due to the too straight forward words said by Hajime. Before long, as if he had come to an agreement, Randzi nodded with a wry smile. Afterwards, he requested Hajime to procure “Serene Stone” for the sake of saving those infected.



“My original objective was «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». Thus, there’s no problem in getting it at all. However, just how much should I gather?”



With Hajime easily accepting his request, Randzi patted his chest in relief, next he told Hajime the current number of patients and the amount needed to be gathered. Although it was a considerable amount, it was not a problem because Hajime possessed “Treasure Box.” Normal adventurers might not be able to save all of the infected, so Randzi was thanking God to have met Hajime’s party.



* * *



Accompanied by Shia inside the medical center, Kaori displayed storm-like activities. She simultaneously extracted magic power from the more urgent patients and filled the Magic-crystallization stones. She also delayed the progress of disease for the patients gathered within radius of ten meters from her and used healing magic at the same time to recover the patients from their weakened state.



Shia was using her herculean strength to move the immobilized patients at once. She wasn’t moving using the wagon, but she lifted the wagon filled with the patients and jumped above the buildings, going back and forth the medical facilities. It was because it was more efficient to gather the more urgent patients around Kaori than her going around each of the facilities.



This method created an unbelievable spectacle starring the should be incompetent rabbit-eared girl, made a lot of patients begin to think their disease had gotten worsen, and thus created such illusion. Despair poured into the medical facilities, creating unnecessary chaos.



The medical staff themselves had used high-ranked magic in succession, and they became astonished when they saw Kaori used several healing magic simultaneously as if it was a natural thing. Once their astonishment passed, they now held deep respect towards Kaori, and treated the patients according to Kaori’s instructions.



Hajime and the others arrived at the group gathered around Kaori. Afterwards, Randzi spoke out loud about the water being secured and how the cause had been annihilated which resulted with everyone shouting out of joy at the same time. Smiles began to return to the people who were despairing from the amount of death and how they could not secure safe water in the middle of the desert.



The information was immediately conveyed to the other facilities. The infected people regained up their energies because they only needed to endure a little while and they would be saved.



“Kaori, we are going to challenge «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». So, how long can you hold on?”



“Hajime-kun…”



Inside the medical facilities filled with shouts of joy, Hajime walked up to Kaori, who didn’t stop treating the patients, and asked.



Kaori was so glad once she seen Hajime’s figure, but she immediately made a serious expression, watching an empty space. Next, she finished her calculation, turned to look at Hajime and answered with, “Two days.” She might have judged that was the very limit regarding both her magic power and the patients’ endurance.



“Hajime-kun. I, I will stay here and treat the patients. Please gather the Serene Stone. It seems to be a valuable mineral… but no one except Hajime can do it because a large amount is needed. I am sorry… even though I know Hajime-kun doesn’t concern himself with this world…”



“If it’s just that much, then I can just gather them while entering deeper into the volcano. It doesn’t matter if I need to search on the surface… In short, I only need to conquer the dungeon faster. Also, there’s no need for you to apologize. After all, it is something I decided myself… Besides, I couldn’t just leave Myuu in a place where people collapsed and died, right?”



“Fufu… I see. Then, good luck, and leave Myuu-chan to me.”



Kaori had heard about the Mad Gods and the purpose of Hajime’s travel on their way to Ancadi. She also heard Hajime would return to their original world even if it means to abandon this world. He also told her to return to Kouki and the others if she couldn’t agree to his way. Having heard all of those, Kaori’s will didn’t waver; she wanted to continue following Hajime.



Even in this current case, if Hajime decided to abandon Ancadi, and although she would try to persuade him, she would just give up if there’s no effect.



However, it was the truth that she wanted to become the strength for the people of Ancadi, if she could. She was inadvertently looking at Hajime with petitioning gaze at that time when Hajime was thinking about his decision. She wasn’t conceited that her desire would be the same as Hajime’s decision, but Kaori’s gaze must have influenced Hajime’s decision since he shrugged his shoulders a little with a wry smile when he received her gaze.



That’s why, the way it seemed that Hajime was going along with her selfish desire made Kaori hold a complex feeling.



However, Hajime only indifferently shook his hand towards the apologizing Kaori. Having seen through Kaori’s feeling, he told her not to mind since it was something he decided on. Kaori smiled at Hajime, who was worried about her although he said so in a blunt manner, and who casually showed a father-like attitude. She looked at him with a gaze filled with trust and affection.



“I will also do my best… so please come back safely. I will be waiting…”



“…O-okay.”



Kaori, who narrowed her eyes dearly and exuding an aura of a wife who sends off her husband to the battlefield, made Hajime stammer inadvertently.



Since before, Kaori had been a straightforward person. Even when they were in Japan, Kaori mercilessly cut down Kouki’s misunderstanding, dropping bomb onto Hajime which resulted in the classroom to suffer the storm of jealousy… those had become their daily life. And she was being even more frank since the day she confessed to him.



Hajime somehow managed to avert his gaze, but the place he averted to was… where Yue was. He saw it; Yue was watching Hajime in silence with dead, inorganic eyes. It was really terrible. He instinctively changed his gaze other way, and Kaori was there smiling with affection…



But seeing Kaori’s atmosphere, our idol, Myuu dropped a bomb.



“Kaori-oneechan, Kaori-oneechan looks just like Yue-oneechan from before. Is Kaori-oneechan going to kiss Papa~?”



“Oya? So thou saw it, Myu?”



“Uh~? Myuu saw it from the gap between the fingers. Yue-oneechan looked so lovely~. Myuu also wants to kiss Papa~.”



“U~m. Even this one hath not done that, thou know? So, Myuu need to wait until Myuu is bigger.”



“Uu~.”



Myuu’s innocent words made Hajime say, “This good for nothing!” an unjust anger towards Tio. As expected, with “Those eyes! Those eyess! Tres Bien!” Tio began to be aroused, but it was something trivial this time.



As for the reason, a katana-shouldering Hanya appeared right beside Hajime. Of course, it was Kaori.



“…What does that mean, ah? Wasn’t Hajime-kun going there to work on something? So, why did you kiss Yue? Tell me, how did it come to that? Was there any need to do that? While I was desperately treating the patients, the two of you were enjoying yourselves, ah? Did you even forget about me? Rather, did we separate just so you could be alone?”



Eyes without light, Kaori was looking at Hajime with a Hanya behind her. Cold sweats ran along Hajime’s cheeks. Hajime wanted to say it was because of the bloodsucking act; he and Yue wouldn’t be separated unless they kiss. But faster than him, Yue advanced.



Hajime had expected her to solve the misunderstanding, but he was a fool to expect that from Yue in this kind of situation.



Yue and Kaori looked at each other, and Yue puffed her chest in a dignified manner. Smiling after saying fu,



“… It was delicious.” She informed Kaori.



“Aha, ahahahahaha.”



“Fufu, fufufufufufu.”



Eerie laughter coming from the two beautiful girls was echoing inside the medical center. Up until now, the staff of medical center and patients thought of Kaori as a saint, but now they were taken aback and turned their faces away so their eyes would not meet hers.



It was something they couldn’t help. No one would think a person with katana-swinging Hanya behind then was a saint. Moreover, the one confronting her had a dragon clad in black clouds and thunders. They couldn’t help but wanting to look away.



Towards Kaori and Yue, who were staring at each other while laughing, Hajime sighed and quickly decided to approach them to deliver forehead flicks. Shwip! An unbelievable sound rang out from the impact of the flicks. Yue and Kaori spontaneously groaned and squatted. With teary eyes, they looked up, expressing, “What are you doing,” which made Hajime raised an amazed expression.



“Kaori. It’s not like I and Yue had wanted to do such an act. You understand it, right? Besides, Yue is my lover. We don’t need your permission to do such a thing.”



“Uh… that is so… but I don’t think it is the real reason…”



Angered by that, Kaori objected to Hajime. Hajime sighed again and said, “Yue, too, there’s no need to always bicker like that.” However, hmph!, Yue turned her face and refused to listen to him, “This is a woman’s fight… there’s no need for Hajime to interfere.”



Randzi and the others could only stand in place by the suddenly generated carnage. Shia reflected, “I noticed that recently my presence had been thinned.” Tio was still panting hard, while Myuu turned into angry mode because Yue and Kaori were quarrelling again.



Hajime gave up on controlling the situation and decided to go to «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» as fast as possible. Kaori was not the only one being busy in the medical center, since although Hajime had told Randzi beforehand, he once again told Randzi to take care of Myuu. Smiling wryly at the relationship between Hajime and his party, Randzi readily agreed to take care of Myuu.



Myuu had been persuaded beforehand, but as soon as she guessed Hajime was going to leave, Myuu looked down with a lonely expression. Hajime kneeled to match Myuu’s eye-level and patted her head.



“Myuu, I am going. Be a good girl and wait for me, okay?”



“Uh, Myuu will be a good girl. So come back quickly, Papa.”



“Ah, I will return as fast as possible.”



Grasping the end of her clothes tightly with both hands, Myuu was enduring her tears. And the appearance of Hajime gently patting Myuu, even if they weren’t related by blood, made everyone see them as nothing but a father and his child. The cold, post-carnage atmosphere has turned warm. Hajime pushed Myuu’s back towards Kaori’s side. Yue, Shia, and Tio moved out in order.



Hajime was about to turn on his heel, when Kaori called out to him.



“Ah, Hajime-kun… that’s, have a safe journey.”



“Ou, please take care of Myuu.”



“Un… also, that is… can I ask for a, kiss? Like… a kiss to pray for a safe trip.”



“… Of course you can’t. Rather, what’s with that?”



“On cheek is okay, too, you know? Still no?”



Although she was fidgeting with flushed cheeks, Kaori’s tone was unexpectedly a strong one. Apparently her rivalry with Yue made her think she must not back out at such a time. Hajime recalled that he noticed Kaori was rather proactive at the time they were still in Japan, but the Kaori after confessing to him was even more proactive.



Hajime ignored the rabbit-ear who said, “Ah, then me, too!,” from behind him and decided to flatly refuse Kaori, but he was attacked by an unexpected enemy.



“Myuu, too~. Myuu wants to kiss Papa, too!”



Kaori took an advantage of Myuu, who innocently reached out to Hajime. Hajime wanted to say a lot of things and evade her (Myuu isn’t that strong after all), but finally,



“Papa, Papa hates Myuu?”



Saying so with teary eyes, Myuu endured herself from crying.



In the end, Kaori, Myuu, and somehow Shia were kissed on their cheek. And this time, in a place where a lot of patients were lying down, they were watched with warm gazes although they didn’t know why. Afterwards, Hajime, as if running away, went towards «Guryuu-en Great Volcano».



By the way, although Tio also wanted a kiss, Hajime rashly insult her because she was being too cocky which resulted in her being even more excited. Let just say it turned into something disgusting.





Volume 9 Chapter 6




«Guryuu-en Great Volcano»



It is situated 800 kilometers towards the north of the Dukedom of Ancadi. From what could be seen, it was a huge mountain five kilometers in diameter and 3,000 meters in altitude. It didn’t have cone-like appearance similar to those of normal active volcanos. It has dome-like, flat top made of lava, and it would be more appropriate to call it a gigantic hill than a mountain. However, the altitude and scale were just abnormal.



The «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was commonly known as one of the Seven Great Dungeons. However, unlike «Orcus Great Dungeon», it wasn’t much visited by adventurers. It was because of the danger inside and how troublesome it was. In addition, unlike the «Orcus Great Dungeon», demonic beasts from whom the magic stones were gathered from were scarce… those were the basic reasons, but the foremost was actually because only few people were capable of reaching the entrance.



The reason was,



“… It looks just like Laputa.”



“… Laputa?”



Hajime unconsciously muttered while recalling the scene of that masterpiece anime, which made Yue and the other girls look at him with questioning glances. Hajime only shrugged his shoulders and watched the gigantic swirling sandstorm from inside the four-wheeler.



That’s right, just like how the floating castle was wrapped by cumulonimbus cloud, the «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was wrapped by gigantic, swirling sandstorm. The storm’s scale was so huge that it completely hid the «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», and the tornados of the sandstorm were just like a flowing wall.



Moreover, a large amount of demonic beasts such as Sandworms were lurking inside the sandstorm, and they would mercilessly make surprise attacks within the place that had limited range of view. Thus, Hajime could only nod at the tale where people with average ability wouldn’t be able to pass through the sandstorm, and into «Guryuu-en Great Volcano».



“I am glad we aren’t walking here.”



“Indeed, even I doth not wanteth to enter it with mine own body.”



Looking at the giant sandstorm from the window just like Hajime, Shia and Tio were grateful to the four-wheeler. Smiling wryly, Hajime said, “Then, let’s go.” and the four-wheeler dashed out. For this case, they didn’t come to conquer it leisurely. There wasn’t that much Serene Stone on the surface, so it was necessary to go into the untouched depth of the dungeon to obtain the amount needed. And if they go into the deepest part, there should be a shortcut similar to what they have experienced until now. As such, they would be able to immediately return to Ancadi.



Hajime, himself, wasn’t interested in the safety of Ancadi’s people, but he didn’t mind helping them. By doing so, he would at least not to feel guilty towards his companion, Kaori, nor would he let Myuu see a spectacle that would bring great shock to her.



While thinking this, Hajime regained his spirit and charged into the gigantic sandstorm.



Inside the sandstorm was a world painted in brown. Just like in the fog of«Halteena Sea of Trees», it was hard to see ahead. It was also capable of influencing one’s physical condition, so it might be more troublesome than that fog. Thus, even using magic, breaking through this place filled with hidden demonic beasts was indeed virtually impossible.



Light coming from the headlight made out of Green Light stone cut through the dim place where the sunlight could not reach. Their speed was 30 kmph. If the information they got before was accurate, they would break through the sandstorm within five minutes.



And at that time, Shia’s rabbit ears stood straight and Hajime also reacted, one beat after her. “Brace yourself!,” Hajime raised his voice, and grandly turned the steering wheel.



Three sandworms with their big mouths opened and jumped out from below. Evading the ambush, the four-wheeler created S-letter on the ground, and Hajime kept running away without a care. With four-wheeler’s speed, it would be better to quickly get out of the sandstorm than fighting each time something appeared.



Two more sandworms came to attack from both sides of four-wheeler while it was dashing out and ignored the previous three sandworms. Their timing was so good that the four-wheeler’s body would receive body blows. However, it would hit without damaging the four-wheeler at all, and the four-wheeler would only be turned sideways. That’s why, once Hajime grasped the surprise attacks using “Sign Perception,” he immediately tried to drift to evade. However, Yue and Tio stopped him.



“…Nn, leave it to me.”



” Just leaveth it to this one, Master.”



Hearing the two, Hajime unhesitatingly kept the steering wheel straight as it was. Then, the gigantic worms dashed out of the brown colored world.



However, the attacks coming from the sandworms from left and right side couldn’t even touch four-wheeler.



“””Wind Blade.”””



Seeing the sandworm on the left, Yue muttered and a blade of wind was instantly produced outside the four-wheeler and fired, drawing a trajectory using the sand on the air. Thus the sandworm that jumped out before them was horizontally slashed, and blood scattered from the divided sandworm.



That spectacle was similar to what happened on the right side, which Tio had taken care of.



“Hmm, as expected of thee, thee fired a good wind.”



“… There’s no way I won’t use the wind from the sandstorm. Tio, too, as expected of you.”



Similarly, they instantly chose to use wind element magic, “Wind Blade,” and though it was a beginner-ranked magic, the “Wind Blades” previously fired were as strong as mid-ranked magic. The reason was because they used the raging wind outside. Simply, the strength of magic wasn’t only affected by magic power, thus the best magic used was selected according to the condition and environment of the location. However, even though saying it was simple, it was difficult to actually do it. For Yue and Tio to be capable of doing it, it was indeed as expected of their competency.



Behind them, the three sandworms from before were still following. They had considerable speed as they advanced under the ground. Irritated by them, Hajime activated four-wheeler’s gimmick. Briiing!Such a sound came from back part of four-wheeler and one of its rear part opened. Several black, round objects rolled down from there.



The moment some met up with the sandworms pursuing the four-wheeler, they created huge explosions. The impact blew away the ground, and the sandworms advancing underground came out of the ground while scattering flesh and blood. Towards the sandworms, more black object, grenades, rolled and caused more explosions that blew away half of each of the sandworms. Their upper-bodies were blown off, fluttered mid-air, and disappeared inside the sandstorm.



“Uhya~, amazing. Hajime-san, just how many functions are installed in this four-wheeler?”



Shia asked Hajime while looking at sandworms that were flashily blown away from the back window. Hajime was wearing a mischievous smile.



“It is capable of transforming into human-shaped weapon, a gigantic golem.”



“””…”””



Although they wanted to say it was impossible, they knew Hajime could do it, thus not only Shia, Tio and Yue were also began to silently look around inside the vehicle. Smiling wryly, Hajime said, “It was a joke. As expected, I can’t make such function… I want to though.” However, Yue and the girls were convinced that Hajime would someday capable of creating that.



Afterwards, the composed Hajime’s party were also attacked by brown-colored, gigantic spider, and ant-like demonic beasts. However, all of them were crushed by four-wheeler’s armament and magic from Yue and Tio without accomplishing anything, not even halting the party’s advance.



Ignoring Shia who said, “I am useless here,” from the back seat, Hajime’s party easily broke through the gigantic sandstorm that had obstructed a lot of adventurers.



Buuahh! Hajime’s party came out of the sandstorm and arrived at a rocky mountain several times bigger than Ayers Rock. It was a silent place surrounded by the wall-like sandstorm where the blue sky could be seen up above — the eye of the storm.



The entrance into «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was at the top, so they continued to travel up on the slope using four-wheeler. The exposed rocky surface was reddish red in color, and steams gushed from here and there. Though it was an active volcano, the point where it never erupted was a Great Dungeon-like wonder.



Before long, the angle became more difficult for four-wheeler to advance, so Hajime’s party got out of the four wheeler and went towards the top of the mountain on foot.



“Uwau… i-it’s hot.”



“Nn~…”



“Indeed. … the heat is in a different scale compared to the heat of desert’s dry weather… Even without the time limit, it would be better to quickly conquer the dungeon, huh.”



“Hmm, though this one feels comfortable here… this one can’t wait… to feel so hot that this body would writhes in agony.”



“… I will drop you into the magma later.”



Attacked by the heat as soon as they got out of the four-wheeler, other than Tio, all of them made dissatisfied expressions. Due to them being in air-conditioned place before, they felt even hotter. As adventurers in another world and travelers, for them to have withdrawal symptom similar to shut-in was… just reaping what they sowed.



They didn’t have much time, so while complaining about the heat, they quickly went towards the mountain top, climbed the rocky place quickly as if they didn’t feel any weight. As a result, Hajime’s party reached the top of the mountain in less than one hour.



They arrived at the top, a complex place buried by rocks of various sizes. There were rocks with pointed surface and also those with slippery, smooth surface. It was just like an exhibition of strange objects. Also, they could feel the top of the sandstorm nearby.



There was an exceptionally huge rock, and a group of strange-shaped rocks. It was an arch-shaped rock with the length of ten meters.



Hajime’s party went there and found huge staircase that continued on into «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» under the arch-shaped rock. Hajime stood before the staircase and looked over his shoulder towards Yue, Shia, and Tio’s faces in order. With a confident expression, he said a word to challenge the Great Dungeon.



“Let’s do it!”



“Nn!”



“Yes!”



“Umh!”



* * *



The inside of «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was even more unexpected than «Orcus Great Dungeon» and «Raisen Great Dungeon».



Rather than the difficulty, it was the interior’s structure that was unexpected.



First, magma was flowing mid-air. Not flowing like the waterway in dem-ihuman country, Faea Belgaen, but the magma was in the mid-air and flowing like rivers. The streaming, scorching red magma in mid-air was just like huge, jumping dragons.



Thus, the magma flowing around the passage and broad space made not only the dungeon challenger be cautious about the magma on the ground, but also above them.



Moreover,



“Ukya!” “Woops, are you okay?”



“Ha~, Hajime-san, thank you. It was impossible for me to perceive that… the magma would suddenly spout from the ground.”



Exactly what Shia said, the magmas abruptly spouted from all around the walls. It was really abrupt that it was difficult to perceive any prior sign of it. It was similar to that of a booby trap. Fortunately, Hajime has “Heat Perception.” Without it, their conquering speed would’ve fallen due to the need to be cautious.



Following that, the thing that made it truly difficult was the boiling heat — extreme heat. It was naturally hot due to magma streaming all around the passage and broad space which made the party feel like being inside a sauna, or to be more accurate, above a heated frying pan. The heat was the most troublesome thing about «Guryuu-en Great Volcano».



While sweating, Hajime’s party continued to advance while evading the drops of and the spouting magma. And in a certain broad space, they found the place has artificial cut all over the place. The place was worn down by cuts that seemed to come from something like a pickaxe, but there was a small, faint pink-colored crystal peeping from one part of the wall.



“Oh? That thing. Serene Stone… right?”



“Hmm, twas indeed that, Master.”



Hajime’s questioning-like words were confirmed by Tio whose knowledge was broad. Apparently, this seemed to be the place the adventurers, who passed through the sandstorm and entered «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», mined the stone.



“… So small.”



“The ones at others’ places were also in a size of small stones…”



Just as Yue said, the remaining Serene Stone was only almost as big as little finger. Though those could be taken out and carried, but the size was indeed too small. As expected, it was too inefficient to gather the ones on the surface, so it was necessary for them to go into the depth to be able to obtain a lot of it in a dash.



For now, Hajime used “Mineral Enquiry” to search around for Serene Stone. After he stored those that could be gathered easily, he urged Yue and the girls to move ahead, quickly.



While being disgusted by the heat, they descended into the seventh floor. It was the highest floor recorded to be reached by the adventurers. None of those who moved farther than this had come back alive. So, bracing themselves, Hajime’s party descended into the eighth floor.



At that moment,



GRuuOoOOOO!!!



When they felt fanned by a strong hot wind, a huge blazing flame came to attack Hajime’s party from right ahead of them. It advanced as it drew a spiral on the orange-colored wall.



“”Absolute Calamity.””



Yue’s magic activated against the blazing flame. A black, swirling orb appeared before Hajime’s party. It was a gravity magic. However, it was not used to crush the object on the ground.



The flame that could easily burn a person to ash was pulled by the sphere which was only 60 centimeters in diameter and disappeared without a trace. The flame swallowed by the sphere was actually nullified. The black, swirling sphere, the gravity magic called “Absolute Calamity,” was generating its own gravity, pulled those coming near it, and swallowed them into the inside of it, like a black hole.



When all of the blazing flame was swallowed by Yue’s swirling supergravity, the party could see the identity of their attacker.



It was a bull. It stood in the middle of the magna, and its whole body was also cladded in magma. It had two sharp curved horns on its head, and flame was coming out of its mouth from time to time. The heat-proofness of this demonic beast made Hajime instinctively wanted to retort on it.



Maybe because the Magma Bull was angry that its peculiar magic, the blazing flame attack, was easily nullified, sounds of thud! Thud! could be heard from its legs and it turned into a charging stance.



To the Magma Bull, the swirling supergravity Yue created immediately moved as if being pulled toward the Magma Bull. At that moment, Magma Bull also attacked using compressed flame. The laser-like, compressed attack from the Magma Bull carried several times the power of normal flame attack.



Even now, the Magma Bull was still charging head-on. However, Yue literally received and returned the fired attack.



KABOOOOM!!



The space vibrated accompanied by an explosive sound, and the Magma Bull that stood on the magma was blown away by the attack. Blown backward by the impact, the Magma Bull struck the wall. However, “GRAAAAH!!,” it only raised an angry shout and instantly stood up. This time, it began to once again charge with all of its might to repel the intruders.



“Hah… as expected, flame attack isn’t effective on it.”



“Well, it is cladded in magma… so it can’t be helped.”



Yue, who deflected the blazing flame shot back, raised a grunt. Laughing wryly, Hajime tried to take Donner, but Shia raised a hand.



“Hajime-san, please leave it to me!”



Although Hajime doubted Shia who already held Doryukken in her hands, she snorted in full spirit. His doubt turned into trust, and he expressed his acknowledgement with a wave of his hand. It was after he had guessed Shia wanted to test the new features installed in Doryukken when his magic eye saw Shia was supplying her magic power into Doryukken.



“Alright~! I am going to do it!,” Shia raised a yell, and after few light steps, she jumped towards the Magma Bull who had moved several meters towards the party.



Rotating once in the mid-air and riding on the momentum, she swung down Doryukken towards the Magma Bull on the ground with such a perfect timing. Her aiming wasn’t off, the Doryukken swung down directly hitting the Magma Bull’s head. At that moment, ripples of faint blue-colored magic power spread around the center of the place where it struck, followed by tremendous impact. The Magma Bull’s head popped, exploded.



Using the nailed down Doryukken as a fulcrum, Shia rotated again. She jumped over the sliding Magma Bull’s body and splendidly landed on the other side.



“O-Ohh Hajime-san, I, the person who used it, now know that this new feature generated an amazing amount of force.”



“Ah, looks like it… I’ve thought what kind of thing is this “Conversion : Impact,” but this is good…”



Not only Hajime, Yue and Tio immediately raised words of praise towards the blow that Shia did with considerable force. It was thanks to the peculiar magic Hajime said, “Conversion : Impact.”



This “Conversion : Impact” was a new peculiar magic Hajime acquired, a derivation from “Magic Power Conversion.” The effect was just as the words expressed, it converted magic power into impact.



It was the ability of the horshead Hajime instantly turned into minced meat several days ago in«Orcus Great Dungeon». He had actually collected the meat in secret, and when he recovered the stake, he ate it.



If it was an average demonic beasts, neither the stats nor Hajime’s the skill would increase, but he ate it since he thought it might have an effect because the horsehead was able to hold on against Kouki’s party along with the Kouki in limit break… But as he thought, his stats didn’t change at all; he only gained the horsehead’s peculiar magic.



Then, he used Creation magic to add “Conversion : Impact” to an ore and installed it into the newly built Doryukken.



Hajime watched the Magma Bull’s head blasted in interest, but he was urged by Yue to hurry.



Afterwards, the demonic beast variations increased as they descended the floors. There were bat-like demonic beasts that scattered magma from their wings, scorching red moray-like demonic beasts that jumped out from the wall it melted, hedgehog-like demonic beasts that shot out numerous needles of flame, chameleon-like demonic beasts that only produced its face from within the magma and attacked using its magma-covered tongues like a whip while swimming on the gravity-defying magma river overhead, and there were even blazing serpents…



It was indeed troublesome since the demonic beasts’ bodies were clad in magma or ablaze which nullified any half-assed magic, and some were using surprise attacks from the flowing magma rivers where they hid their body. The demonic beasts not only would try to inflict fatal wound by using body blow, a lot of them were also using the surrounding magma to attack; a situation where they have infinite weapon. Besides, they would run into the magma to ensure their safety.



It was indeed true that even if the adventurers were capable of breaking through the sandstorm, they wouldn’t be able to descend further than seventh floor and return. Moreover, even if the demonic beasts could be defeated, the size and quality of the magic stones were the same as the demonic beasts in forties floors of «Orcus Great Dungeon» and the existence of Serene Stone, a valuable mineral, didn’t affect the income much. So, it was understandable that no one want to challenge this dungeon.



Following that, the most troublesome thing was the heat gradually increasing.



“Haa, haa… it’s hot.”



“… Shia, you feel hot because you think it is. Those flowing thing is just water… See, it’s cool now, fufu.”



“Ah, Master! Yue is starting to break! The eyes hath became hollow!”



Other than Tio, Hajime’s party were downed by the strong heat. For now, he took out air-conditioning type of artifacts… but it just like sprinkling water over dry soil. Their sweat flowed like an unstoppable waterfall. Seeing Yue and Shia whose consciousness began to become hazy, Hajime thought it was necessary for them to take a little rest while he wiped off the sweat on his chin.



When they reached a broad space, Hajime used “Transmutation” on a wall away from the magma and created a tunnel. He urged Yue and the others inside, and shut the entrance to the limit so the heat from magma would not reach them directly. Furthermore, he used “Mineral Separation” and “Compressed Transmutation” to coat the surface of the room’s wall with solid material so they wouldn’t be attacked by any moray-like or magma spout.



“Fuu… Yue, please create a block of ice. We will rest here for a while. If not, it would not be odd if we make a fatal mistake later.”



“Nn… okay.”



Although her eyes were hollow, Yue conjured ice magic and a huge block of ice appeared in the middle of the room. Though Tio didn’t mind the heat, she made the wind blow with the block of ice as the core. Thanks to the wind created by Tio, the cold air from the block of ice instantly cooled down the room’s temperature.



“Whaa~~, it’s coool~, I can live on noww~.”



“… Hmmmm~.”



Collapsing in a girl’s sitting pose, Yue and Shia narrowed their eyes in delight. The birth of squishy-Yue and squishy-Shia.



While thinking the two were moe, Hajime took out towels from “Treasure Box” and handed them over to everyone.



“Yue, Shia, it is good that you’re enjoying yourselves, but wipe your sweat. Your movement will become duller if you get too cold.”



“… Nn~.”



“Roger~.”



With elongated words, Yue and Shia slowly took the towel. Seeing them, Tio spoke to Hajime.



“Master, doth not relaxed thy guard yet, okay?”



“You, too. This heat is indeed dangerous. I must create better air-conditioning type artifact…”



“Hmm, for it to be capable of defeating master… This is probably this Great Dungeon’s concept.”



Rather than defeat, hot is hot, and Tio, who also wiping her sweat with towel, made Hajime doubtful with what she said.



“Concept?”



“Mhm. This one hath heard many things from Master, but there is the thing called trial, right? If this was to challenge the God… then, there should be various concepts it based on, or so this one thought. For example, the «Orcus Great Dungeon» that this one heard from Master hath a lot of demonic beasts, so various battle experiences would be gained as one advanced through. «Raisen Great Dungeon» nullified strong power called magic, polishing one’s flexibility against any kind of attacks. This «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» probably uses the heat to obstruct one’s concentration and how one would react against the surprise attacks under this situation, right?”



“… Indeed… I never thought of it because in the end, I only needed to conquer it… but the trials are used by the Liberators to “teach” us, huh.”



“I see,” Hajime nodded at Tio’s conjecture. She has deep knowledge even though she’s a complete masochist, and the prudent Tio was normally could be thought as a beautiful, black-haired woman who exuded sensual and amorousness… so Hajime looked at her with a truly pitying gaze.



However, seeing Tio’s sweat flowing from the scruff of her neck disappearing into the valley of her bountiful breasts, Hajime averted his gaze. His gaze turned towards the clothes of Yue and Shia sticky from all the sweat. Noticing the disappearance and appearance of their bare skin, his gaze was pulled towards Yue.



Probably because she was wiping her sweat, a large amount of her skin was peeping from her pure-white dress. Her skin had a tinge of red due to heat. Her bare skin glossy from the sweat and her rougher-than-normal breathing was truly erotic.



Unconsciously, Hajime even forgot to look away and continued watching her, but his gaze suddenly met Yue’s raised gaze. Having forgotten the situation due to being charmed… and getting somewhat aroused, Hajime tried to look away in guilt.



However, just before he looked away, Yue who caught Hajime’s gaze revealed a bewitching smile. With the still disarrayed clothes, arching her back like a cat, she slowly got down to all fours and approached Hajime. Her hazy eyes that wouldn’t let Hajime’s gaze escape, flushing cheeks because of heat, and showing a tint of breasts every time she moved…



Yue, who immediately approached Hajime in all fours, sat on Hajime’s cross-legged legs, sending him an upward gaze, and with a spoiled, sweet tone…



“… Hajime, wipe me?”



Hajime unconsciously received the towel from her, and his gaze remained fixed on Yue’s eyes. In his mind, “Ah, crap. I can’t win against Yue in this situation,” he thought with a wry smile. Quietly, he tried to glide his hand on the scruff of Yue’s neck… but was stopped by Shia’s protest.



“Y-O-U T-W-O! Please mind the time, place, and occasion a little! We are in a hurry and this is a Great Dungeon! Geez! Seriously, geez!”



“No, well, umm. It’s not like I could help it, right? Yue is too erotic. So, I couldn’t ignore her.”



“… Hajime who was quietly staring was cute.”



“Can’t you two at least reflect a little? To begin with, why didn’t Hajime-san look at me? Even though I was right beside Yue-san and in such condition, too… Gosh, my confident plummeted~. Hey, Tio-san should say something, too.”



“Well, the two art infatuated with each other. So methinks it can’t be helped, right? This one also wants Master to abuse one without minding the place… however, well, Master reacted a little to this one’s breasts~. This one will be satisfied with just that this time. Kufufu.”



It was the usual perverted remarks of Tio. However, Hajime was found out that he felt the sweat that flowed into Tio’s breasts made her looked sexy. Hearing that, “I am not even looked at!,” Shia was angry. Shia forgot about the TPO (time, place, and occasion) she said a little while ago and began to strip before Hajime. Then, this one will strip too, but Hajime fired rubber bullets to silence them because it would turn bothersome otherwise.



Hajime continued to wipe off Yue’s sweat before the writhing Shia whose breasts was completely bare and the writhing Tio with her disgusting smile. Hajime sighed while secretly relieved that Kaori wasn’t there.





Volume 9 Chapter 7




«Guryuu-en Great Volcano» probably has fifty floors.



Since it was the current floor Hajime’s party was in. The “probably” part was because the floor’s situation was a little special. Frankly, they didn’t understand anything about the current floor.



But more accurately, Hajime’s party were currently on board a brown colored boulder, like a small boat, on the magma that was flowing like a big river, mid-air.



“It feels like Indiana-san in hard mode eh…” Hajime muttered while recalling the Earth’s most famous and too aggressive Archeologist.



As for the reason why they were in this situation… truthfully, it was Hajime’s mistake. Hajime’s party had noticed the magma that continued to scorch them, was sometimes making unnatural movement while they were searching for the Serene stone right before they completed the floor.



More accurately, the flow of the magma greatly changed even though there was nothing obstructing it before, or the current suddenly slowed, or there was only a part of magma flowing in the air, and it overflowed, thus the magma dripped below.



However, those happened on the magma away from the passage, so they didn’t worry about it because it would not disturb them from conquering the floor. However, Hajime by chance used “Mineral Enquiry” to the surrounding and found out that the cause of the magma’s unnatural movement was “Serene Stone.” It seemed the magic power inside the magma was calmed by “Serene Stone,” similar to obstructing the magma flow.



Hajime’s party then thought that the place where the magma’s movement was strongly obstructed would have a large amount of “Serene Stone.” Thus they searched for it and they indeed discovered a large amount of “Serene Stone” buried in that place. While noting the magma’s movement, Hajime’s party collected a considerable amount of “Serene Stone.” Afterwards, they came to a certain location while thinking there would be much stone in reserve.



It was a place enclosed by the magma flowing in mid-air like a huge wall. Hajime transmuted a stair to approach it and came to know that a large amount of “Serene Stone” was buried there when he used “Mineral Enquiry.”



Immediately, Hajime used “Mineral Separation” to only collect “Serene Stone,” but he was careless because he kept collecting “Serene Stone” due to lack of concentration from the heat. He didn’t put much attention to the surrounding wall of magma.



Hajime noticed this mistake when he stored the “Serene stone” into “Treasure Box.” It was because magma spouted with tremendous momentum from the wall the moment the effect of “Serene Stone” had disappeared.



Hajime immediately jumped back, but the magma was spouting with tremendous power just like water gushing out from the cracked and thus collapsed dam. The hole from where it spouted expanded and more rushed out.



The overly tremendous momentum of the magma made the surrounding immediately filled with magma. Hajime used transmutation to create a small boat before Yue’s barrier was broken, and the party boarded it. The small boat was immediately heated up by the magma, but there was no problem since Hajime had strengthened the boat using “Strength Endowment” derived from “Vajra.”



Following that, they continued to drift along the flow of the magma and was flowing mid-air before they were aware of it. They flowed into the depth of «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» using different route from the stairs. Flowing as they felt the scorching heat from the streaming magma, and ended up where they were currently at.



By the way, normally they would’ve stopped on the riverbed when they were about to ride on the magma’s sky road, but Shia used “Effect Endowment” of gravity magic to reduce the boat’s weight, and thus they were able to get on the magma. “Effect Endowment” made it possible to adjust the weight of the thing Shia touched as if it were her own.



“Ah, Hajime-san. There’s another tunnel.”



“We art almost at the level of the foot of this mountain. Be prepared, okay?”



Seeing the direction Shia pointed at, Hajime’s party was would indeed continue to flow into a big hole on the wall along with the magma. They understood the magma was continuing to flow downward. Until now, they’ve entered a tunnel every time they descent a floor, it might be a shortcut if compared to normally using the stair.



While nodding at Tio’s advice, Hajime’s party drifted into the tunnel. The magma’s sky road was continuing in the middle of the big tunnel like a snake. After the magma’s sky road was going lower, it suddenly cut off right after a curve. No, more accurately, it was a sudden downward slope similar to a waterfall.



“Again… everyone, don’t get shaken off!”



Yue and the girls nodded at Hajime’s words and they either clung to the edge of the small boat or Hajime’s waist. After feeling the anxiousness similar to when the climbing jet coaster about to go down from the first falling point, Hajime’s party’s boat finally fell.



Fwiish Swiish



Sound of wind entered their ears. Shia used gravity magic to shift the weight while Tio controlled the wind as they descend on the rapid magma. The magma’s speed increased by times as if it didn’t have any viscosity.



Transmuting spikes on his shoes to fix his posture, Hajime cautiously watched over the surroundings. After all, usually at such time…



“Tch, they come after all.”



Clicking his tongue, he pulled out Donner at the same time, and Hajime unhesitatingly pulled the trigger. Explosive sound resounded. It rang out three times accompanied with three flashes that cut through the air without deviating and destroyed the targets. The ones that came attacking Hajime’s party were the bat-type monsters that scattered magma from their wings.



These Magma Bats were not much of a threat alone. They only have considerable speed and capable of scattering magma like flame bullets. They were only small fries to Hajime’s party.



However, the troublesome point about Magma Bats was they attacked in group. Thirty more could be found if one was seen, just like Black G demonic beasts, appearing from the crack of the boulder wall.



Even now, although Hajime instant-killed three Magma Bats, as expected, they could hear sound of a large amount of fluttering wings amidst the wind coming from the rapid descent.



“… Hajime, leave the left and behind to me.”



“Ah, I will leave it to you. Shia, Tio, you control the boat.”



“Roger!”



“Mhm, leave it to this one. How about ass spanking as a reward?”



Ignoring Tio’s perverted remark that could neither be taken as joke nor real, Hajime and Yue were back to back diagonally on the boat. Then, crowd of Magma Bats could be seen.



It was not an exaggeration to call them as one living creature. The numerous Magma Bats were moving as one big mass, like a group perfectly ordered birds. Their appearance was just like a dragon if seen from the side. It might be more accurate to call it a fire dragon because each of its wings was cladded in blazing magma.



The mass of Magma Bats approaching Hajime’s party divided into two on their way, creating pincer attack from the front and behind. No matter how weak they were alone, the numerous them were moving as one huge creature and normally would overwhelm anyone with their number.



However, the party here were a group of cheat-like individuals. The demonic beasts that became fertilizer on the ground near the town of Ul were the proof the party wouldn’t be so weak being overwhelmed by just number.



Hajime took out Metzelei from “Treasure Box,” set it beside his waist and pulled the monster’s trigger.



BAAANNNG



With the ringing of the peculiar shooting sound, the storm of death exhibited its undoubtable might and one rapid fire pierced through various targets. The bullets crushed the wall of the cave in the distance while the Magma Bats were killed and fell into the ground without being able to resist.



Furthermore, Hajime took out Orkan using the other free hand, placed it on his shoulder, and mercilessly fired it. Spark created, and the rockets flew and pierced into the middle of Magma Bats who were grouping due to Metzelei’s barrage, scattering violent impacts along with roaring sounds.



The result was clear. The crowd of Magma Bats were crushed and falling just like a short squall.



Similar thing happened to the Magma Bats attacking from the rear.



“”Storm Dragon.””



Yue’s right hand thrust straight, and the moment she muttered that, a green sphere of wind was created. Following that, the sphere transformed, forming a dragon in less than no time. The wind dragon, who was a compilation of green-colored wind and called “Storm Dragon,” glared at the crowd of Magma Bats once, and it opened its jaws, moving to devour its preys.



Naturally, the Magma Bats shot flame bullets towards “Storm Dragon,” then they divided into two again to dodge the dragon. However, all of Yue’s “dragons” were a compound of gravity magic and other element. Naturally, “Storm Dragon” was not just composed of normal wind; it was composed of wind blades that were pulled by gravity to create a dragon. Once it moved, it would be difficult for the prey to escape.



Magma Bats, just like the other demonic beasts that became the food of “Thunder Dragon” and “Azure Dragon,” couldn’t resist from being pulled towards “Storm Dragon.” Thus the body cladded by wind blades cut the demonic beasts’ bodies to pieces, scattering flesh and blood. It should be noted that the reasons Yue didn’t use “Thunder Dragon” or “Azure Dragon” was because the Magma Bats were strong against heat and Yue judged it was enough to just cut their wings.



In the end, “Storm Dragon” came within the crowd and released the million wind blades formed its body in all direction, completely annihilating the Magma Bats.



“Um~, Master and Yue’s annihilating force art fearful no matter how many times I has’t seen i.”



“Indeed~.”



While controlling the boat on the rapid current, Tio and Shia were praising them with awkward feeling. Shrugging his shoulders as he put out Metzelei and Orkan into “Treasure Box,” Hajime lightly touched the Yue’s cheek with his chest then returned to look at the front. Yue, after narrowing her eyes in happiness from being touched, returned to look at the surrounding with caution.



Hajme and Yue who casually took the chance to flirt made Shia exuded aura that expressed, Shia is lonely! Hold me!, which Tio took advantage of. Making slightly troubled expression after thinking it couldn’t be helped, Hajime lightly stroked Shia’s rabbit ear then pinched Tio’s cheek. Hajime was troubled such things could make the two raised joyed expressions.



Hajime’s party were considerably composed even though they were attacked by demonic beasts as they descended the rapid, magma’s sky road. However, as if to take down their composure, the descending magma up until now suddenly began to ascend.



After climbing several tens of meters with tremendous speed, they could see light ahead of them. It was the exit of the tunnel. However, the problematic thing was the magma was cut off for real this time.



“Hold on tight!”



With Hajime’s command, Yue and the girls once again clung to the small boat. Having ridden on the magma rapid’s speed, the small boat was thrown outside with tremendous momentum.



While having his dantian attacked by the feeling of being in mid-air, Hajime quickly confirmed the condition of the surrounding. The space Hajime’s party falling into was similar to the room where the last trial of «Raisen Great Dungeon» took place; a vast space.



However, it wasn’t spherical like the room in «Raisen Great Dungeon». It has distorted shape which made it impossible to completely understand how vast the space was, but it was at least more than three kilometers. Almost all part of the ground was filled with magma, but the boulders appeared in some places and created footholds. On the surrounding walls were protruding places and conversely, there were also shaved off places. In the air was as expected, numerous rivers of intersecting magmas, and disappearing below, into the ocean of magma.



Flare-like pillars of fire spouted from the boiling, scorching ocean. If there was something called boiler of hell, it must be looked like this. That was the impression Hajime’s party got.



However, the most noticeable thing was the small island in the center of the ocean of magma. The island was raised around 10 meters above the magma’s surface, an island or rock. If it was only that, then it would just become a foothold big enough for them, but the island was covered by dome of magma. The spherical magma was just like a small version of sun, but the thing in the middle of the island was enough to catch the attention of Hajime’s party.



“”O’ wind.””



The small boat turned over by the momentum was fixed by Tio in the air, then each of them returned to their own duty as they once again boarded the small boat. Yue used “Soar” to adjust the boat’s falling speed. The boat softly landed on the ocean of magma, and the party maximized their vigilance because this place was obviously different from the ones they had seen.



“… Is that the dwelling?”



Yue muttered as she took a look at the middle of the magma-domed island.



“From the depth, I think it is okay to think so… but, if it really is…”



“There should be the last guardian of some sort… right, Master?”



“We used something similar to shortcut, so is it too farfetched to say we have passed the test, Hajime-san?”



Hajime’s thought was confirmed by Tio, who was looking at the surrounding with sharp gaze, made her not to be thought as a perverted masochist if some small accidents were overlooked. Even seeing their tightened expression, Shia muttered optimist words while looking at a certain direction.



Tracing Shia’s gaze, Hajime could see a staircase beyond the large foothold. The staircase continued into the wall made him think that perhaps they would’ve come from that staircase if they used the proper route.



Even so, no matter how impossible it was for someone to use magma’s sky road, it was too much of an optimist to think the shortcut even passed through the last trial room. It’d be nice if it really is~, Shia said, but her cautious look expressed that even she couldn’t believe that.



It was correct for them to be cautious because immediately, bullet-like magma shot out from the magma flowing in the air.



“Hmph, leave it to this one!”



Tio shouted as she activated her magic, thus masses of flame shot out from the ocean of magma, countering magma approaching from above.



However, that attack was only the beginning signal. Immediately after Tio countered the incoming blazing masses and scattered them, more blazing masses were shot out from the ocean of magma like a machinegun.



“Tch, scatter!”



Judging they would only be a target on their current place, the small boat, Hajime told the other to scatter as he jumped towards the nearby foothold, abandoning the small boat. The numerous blazing masses crushed the small boat where Hajime’s party were before, thus it sunk into the ocean of magma.



With each of them in different foothold, Hajime’s party intercepted the incoming blazing masses. Though they easily intercepted those, Hajime’s party were irritated because it didn’t seem to ever end. They were also irritated the heat coming from the ocean of magma that the distorted air.



To break from this situation, at the same time Hajime finished reloading Donner-Schlag using gunspin, and aimed Schlag muzzle over his shoulder without turning around. Thus the elbow of his artificial arm was faced forward and fired to intercept the masses of magma in front, while Schlag rapid-fired to shoot down the masses of magma approaching Yue behind him.



His intention was completely read by Yue without a word. She immediately activated gravity magic using this chance.



“”Absolute Calamity.””



At the same time the name rang out, a black, swirling sphere appeared in the middle of Hajime’s party, pulling the incoming masses of magma one after another. The black, small star swallowed everything and used its supergravity to compress them.



With the room between the barrage of magma masses by Yue’s magic, Hajime used “Aerodynamic” to jump into the air, trying to reach the magma-domed middle island.



The most troublesome thing about the barrage that attacked Hajime’s party was the endlessness. This place was obviously the last trial of «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», but because there’s no visible enemy unlike the other dungeons he had been in, he didn’t know what to do to clear it. As such, Hajime thought of getting on the suspicious island.



While running in the air towards the middle island, Hajime used “Telepathy.”



“I am going to look around the middle island. Cover me.”



“Roger.”



The masses of magma outside of the range of Yue’s “Absolute Calamity” came to attack Hajime, but Tio intercepted those using numerous flame bullets from the ocean of magma. Shia didn’t expand Doryukken and used its shotgun mode to intercept. Yue, while maintaining “Absolute Calamity,” also intercept using numerous flame bullets from ocean of magma just like Tio.



With covering from Yue and the girls, Hajime approached straight towards the middle island, and he was about to do the last jump using “Aerodynamic.”



However, at that moment,



“ROOOOOOOOOOAAAAAR!!!”



“Kh!?”



Hearing the bellowing, majestic roar, a gigantic serpent came to attack from right under Hajime who was in mid-air with its opened mouth.



Maybe because its whole body was clad in magma, neither heat perception nor sign perception noticed it in this place filled with magma. Moreover, the ocean magma itself was filled with magic power so magic power perception also didn’t notice it, so the gigantic Magma Serpent was able to completely make a surprise attack.



However, Hajime twisted his body using his superhuman reflex and was barely able to evade the mouth.



In the place Hajime was before, crunch, the Magma Serpent chomped and passed through. Hajime flipped his body in mid-air just like a cat, aimed the muzzles at the passing Magma Serpent’s head and fired. The flash with certain killing destructiveness didn’t miss its mark and hit the Magma Serpent’s head, blowing it away.



“What !?”



However, the raised voice was not the Magma Serpent’s death throes, but Hajime’s astonished voice.



Naturally, the cause was the Magma Serpent. After all, the Magma Serpent’s head was certainly hit and burst, but the thing scattered was only magma, none of the inside matter. He had seen demonic beasts cladded in magma in «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», but they were only wearing the magma, and had their own flesh. None was composed of only magma.



Hajime immediately recovered and tried to shoot the other parts of the creature to experiment. Numerous flashes mercilessly penetrated the Magma Serpent’s body, but as he thought, there’s no flesh at all. This Magma Serpent seemed to be composed of only Magma.



Though surprised, Hajime had immobilized the Magma Serpent for now by blowing all over of its body, so he once again jumped towards the middle island using “Aerodynamic”, passing by the serpent’s side.



However, the Magma Serpent’s attack hasn’t ended yet. At the moment Hajime passed through its side, it suddenly hurled its body towards Hajime even though it had lost its head and parts of its body.



Hajime made the shotshell in his artificial arm burst and barely succeeded to evade using its recoil. And at this time, a chill ran down Hajime’s spine. Following his instinct, Hajime burst out the shotshells in succession immediately and used “Aerodynamic” to withdraw from there in high speed.



One attack after another, the Magma Serpents came out of the ocean of magma, chasing after Hajime’s track. Those huge mouths crunch, crunch, chomped.



Retreating while rotating in the air, Hajime landed on a nearby foothold. Yue and the girls came to his side. The barrage of blazing masses temporarily stopped.



“… Hajime, are you unhurt?”



“Ah, no problem. More importantly, the real things finally appear.”



Yue, who was worried about his safety, touched his arm. Hajime returned her touch, and answered without looking away from the front. Fwuush With each sound, Magma Serpents appeared one after another before Hajime.



“As expected, that middle island is the last stop. Well thee seemth to say defeat us if thou want to pass.”



“But, the one Hajime-san shot before regenerated, you know? Are they beatable?”



Around 20 Magma Serpents appeared, glaring at Hajime’s party. Even the Magma Serpent that received gunfires from Hajime before had already restored to its former appearance as if nothing had happened.



Shia was frowning as she pointed that out. At Raisen Great Dungeon, she was confused by the regenerating knights, but now she was calmly thinking on how to pass this. It was shown by how her rabbit ears were restlessly moving about. Wryly smiling at Shia who became quite courageous, Hajime told them his guess.



“It might be similar to the Vachram from before, having a core, a magic stone, to form the magma body. Though my magic eye cannot specify the location because the obstruction from the magma… there’s nothing else but to destroy the core.”



Everyone nodded at Hajime’s words and they simultaneously attacked the 20 Magma Serpents.



The Magma Serpents rose like the solar flare shot out masses of flame from their mouth as they tensed. The twenty attacked from all direction. Normally, one would be swallowed by the numerous masses of magma without being able to escape.



“It hath been a long time since this one used this attack! So, taste all of it!”



A huge amount of black magic power appeared before Tio’s thrust her hands out. It then compressed in less than no time, and fired in the next moment. It was the Ryuujin tribe’s Breath.



Thus the black flash, whose dreadful power forced Hajime to defend with all of his might, eliminated all of the Magma Serpents in front of Tio without any trace left. Furthermore, she swung it as if it was a black colored flash blade and annihilated other Magma Serpents.



Immediately, eight Magma Serpents were annihilated, thus Hajime’s party dashed out from the hole of the encirclement.



As expected, by annihilating them without leaving a trace, the magic stone would also be annihilated no matter where the location was, but it was the Great Dungeon’s quality to not make it that easy.



The 12 remaining Magma Serpents instantly crushed the foothold where Hajime’s party were before, falling into the ocean of magma and disappeared, but their numbers went back up to 20 the next time they re-appeared.



“Oi oi, I’ve confirmed the disappearance of the magic stones, you know? Was defeating it not the condition to clear this trial?”



Hajime’s expression distorted from the doubt. Hajime had activated “Light Speed” at the time Tio’s breath was about to reach the Magma Serpent and he confirmed the moment when the magic stone inside Magma Serpent was annihilated by the Breath using his increased kinetic vision.



Hajime came to doubt the condition for conquering this dungeon, and Shia raised her voice while pointing at the middle island.



“Hajime-san! Look at that! The wall is shining!”



“What?”



When he looked at the middle island, it was indeed as Shia said. A part of the rockwall shot light as big as a fist. He didn’t notice it up until now, but the orange-colored light was coming from some kind of crystal buried under the wall of rock.



Hajime used “Farsight” to confirm it, but although it was difficult to confirm due to camouflage, he understood a large amount of similar crystals were buried on the rockwall of the middle island in orderly fashion. The middle island was cylindrical, so considering the interval between crystals and the island’s surface area, around 100 crystals were buried. And the crystals that currently shooting out light were eight… the same number of Magma Serpents Tio annihilated before.



“I see… so we need to defeat a hundred of these Magma Serpents to clear it, huh.” “… In this heat, fighting a hundred of them… it matched the dungeon’s concept.”



Needless to say, having suffered from the heat and surprise attacks, the challengers were driven into the situation where they needed to concentrate the most in the very end; nastiness suitable for a Great Dungeon.



Indeed, even Hajime’s party were quite exhausted, mentally. However, their expressions didn’t show any exhaustion, they were wearing fearless smile because they had found out the method to conquer the dungeon.



They regained their spirit when they came to understand what they must do, and they once again attacked the Magma Serpents. Along with the downpouring masses of magma, the Magma Serpents made irregular movements to catch and burn their prey.



Hajime’s party spread out again and respectively began to counterattack.



With dragon wings grown out of her back, Tio floated using the wind she regenerated and used tornado along with vacuum blades to attack, bombarding the serpent. It was a wind element, mid-ranked offensive magic, “Imperial Cannon.”



“This is the ninth! Presently, this one is leading, Master! If this one defeated the most of them then this one wants a lot of rewards (punishments)! Of course, only two of us at night!”



Tio shouted while slashing the ninth Magma Serpents to pieces. Hajime tried to refuse with an amazed expression, but Shia interrupted him.



“Wha-! It’s unfair if it’s only Tio-san! I am also entering this challenge! Hajime-san, one night with me if I win!”



After shouting, Shia jumped above a Magma Serpent and swung down Doryukken onto its head from upper-stance. At the moment of impact, ripple of light blue colored magic power spread, next a violent impact was generated. The serpent immediately exploded from the head part until the ocean of magma. Sparkling minerals fluttered from the remains of Magma Serpent. It was the magic stone crushed by the impact from “Magic Shockwave”.



Masses of magma were approaching Shia, who was still mid-air from killing one of Magma Serpent, from behind. Shia used the recoil from Doryukken’s outburst and evaded. However, as if it was aiming for this, a Magma Serpents with its mouth opened come attacking to where Shia would fall.



However, Shia wasn’t that worried about it, she threw a disk taken out from the holster on her back into the air. It was a disk with diameter of 30 centimeters, and it didn’t fall but floated slightly lower place than Shia. Shia put her foot on it weightlessly and once again danced in the air.



The disk used the same principle as Cross Bit to float in the air, becoming foothold, and moving according Shia’s will by using induction stone. This, coupled with Shia’s weight adjustment, made it possible to do a combat like “dancing in the air”.



With its calculation coming off, the Magma Snake passed through the empty space under Shia. Transforming Doryukken, Shia aimed the muzzle towards the serpent and pulled the trigger. What shot out wasn’t the usual bullet but a slug bullet.



However, it wasn’t a normal slug bullet. It was a bullet created from special ore that Hajime endowed with characteristic of “Magic Shockwave,” thus it would generate shock wave from the supplied magic power at the same time it hit the target. By force alone, it far surpassed the grenade bullet.



Along with the roar of Doryukken, the fired slug bullet didn’t miss its target while hitting the Magma Serpent from back of its head, thus from its head to its body, the Magma Serpent was swallowed by the regenerated explosion. That impact once again crushed the magic stone which now fluttered as it sparkled in the air.



“Oi, girls. You, don’t just selfishly…”



“… Then, I want one day of date for the two of us.”



Hajime opened his mouth to retort on Tio and Shia’s one-sided competition, but he was interrupted by Yue who also wanted to participate in the competition of annihilation. Putting aside the things at night, the increasing number of companions decreased their time alone, so Yue seemed to want a one full day of just the two.



Exuding aura of having fun, however, the magic Yue activated was a brutal one. It was her latest favorite, “Thunder Dragon.”



However, due to her being more and more skillful on using it, the “Thunder Dragon” that appeared was numbered seven. At almost the same time, they moved toward their respective targets. Thundering roars rang out. The Magma Serpents who were trying to devour Yue was conversely devoured one after another by the group of Thunder Dragons without even leaving a mass of magma behind, so their magic stone inside their body had also broken.



Seeing that spectacle, Shia said, “As I thought, the most powerful enemy is Yue-san~!” Tio said, “Yue is bugged! Twas absolutely odd!” Both of them made hasty expressions while cursing. They pull out more severe attacks, adding the number of things they annihilated.



“… It’s not like I care. But, they seem to having fun.”



Shrugging his shoulders towards the three enthusiastic girls that made him as the prize of the competition, Hajime somewhat given up. Then, without turning around, he rapidly fired Schlag over his shoulder towards the incoming Magma Serpent behind him.



The bullets were fired evenly on the Magma Serpent’s body and the impacts blown the serpent’s body. At the same time, the impacts made the magic stone fluttered in the air. Repelling the masses of magma that flew from the previous half body, Hajime pinpoint shot through the falling magic stone right before it fell into the ocean of magma.



The bullet Hajime fired from Schlag was the similar exploding bullet like Shia’s. However, because it would be problematic if the bullets were too big, their power didn’t reach slug bullet’s. Of course if he used Schlagen, then it would be possible to bring out that much of a destructive power. However, it was the first time the bullets were used, similar to an experiment, so he only used the two guns.



The normal sized bullet didn’t have the power to blow away the Magma Serpent along with its magic stone, so Hajime now used around 2 shots to blown off the magma armor and sniped the exposed magic stone using Donner’s pinpoint attack. Naturally, the Schlagen was capable of ignoring the magma armor and penetrate through the magic stone, but it had too much penetrative power added that it wasn’t easy to locate the magic stone thus wasn’t suitable for aiming at the magic stone.



Now, another two Magma Serpents were attacking Hajime from his right and left, but he withdrew in high speed using “Aerodynamic” and “Ground Shrinker.” He flipped mid-air and fired Schlag in inverted pose.



BOOOOM!



One explosive sound rang out. However, the fired masses of killing intent were four. The Magma Serpents, who were attacking from right and left with tremendous momentum didn’t have any chance to be confused from the suddenly disappearing prey. They were attacked by the impact coming from above thus had its magma bodies dispersed, exposing the core, the magic stone.



At the same time, two flashes of light were fired from Donner and shot through the two magic stone without even one millimeter of error.



If one looked, the crystals regularly buried on the outer circumference of the rockwall of the middle island mostly emitted light, only eight haven’t. That was done even though not that much time passed since the real fight begun.



If Hajime’s party’s guess, where «Guryuu-en Great Volcano»’s concept was for a prolonged battle while having one’s concentration down due to nasty environment, was right, then the expectation of the creator of this trial could be said as completely off the mark because they were Hajime and his party.



Tio’s Breath destroyed more Magma Serpents



— Six left.



Shia used a blow from Doryukken and at the same time fired the slug bullet into another Magma Serpent, blasting them.



— Four left.



Two Magma Serpent were trying to do a pincer attack on Yue, ambushing from below where the ocean of magma. However, above them was “Thunder Dragon” coiling around Yue, obstructing them thus it became a standstill. Following that, the two Magma Serpents were now attacked by four “Thunder Dragons” from both of their sides, and were devoured.



— Two left.



A Magma Serpent was rapidly charging at Hajime while scattering bullet-like masses of magma. However, Hajime was swaying like a dancing falling leaf and avoided the masses of magma. When he was about to be devoured by the Magma Serpent, he fired Schlag and they passed through each other. The serpent blown away while the inertia made the magic stone jumped out which then sniped by Donner and Hajime didn’t even need to look at it.



Finally, the last Magma Serpent was surprise attacking from the ocean of magma below. Hajime flew up using “Aerodynamic” and fired Schlag, towards the interior of the opened mouth of Magma Serpent coming from below.



At the moment of impact, red shockwave scattered the magma. The gap created slightly revealed the magic stone. Hajime poised the Donner in his right hand. When he was about to fire the last attack, he watched Yue and the girl’s satisfied looks.



“This is the end.”



Looking at it in the edge of his vision, Hajime fired the last attack for the sake of conquering «Guryuu-en Great Volcano».



— And at that moment.



FUUUUWIIIIIISHHHHH



A beam poured down from above.



The light looked like divine punishment shot from the heaven, was the light that mortally injured Hajime before. No, it might be far stronger than that. The attack even made the air screamed was fired, aiming at the time of battle where Hajime most wide opened — swallowing Hajime along with the last Magma Serpent.





Volume 9 Chapter 8




Without any warning, the white beam suddenly shot down from the heavens.



The light attacked Hajime with a perfect timing; when he was about to finish the last Magma Serpent. Thus, Hajime was swallowed by a destructive storm carrying fierce heat and impact.



“Ha-Hajimee!!!”



Yue’s scream rang out. Slightly away from Hajime, Shia and Tio could only watched Hajime being swallowed by the beam absentmindedly, only to regain their senses when they heard Yue’s sorrowful scream they never heard even once ever since they met.



Pouring down from right above Hajime, the beam also swallowed the last Magma Serpent and reached the scorching sea, grandly blowing away the surrounding away, and temporarily disclosing the bottom of the magma sea. The beam kept piercing the sea of magma for a while, but gradually became thinner and thinner before finally disappearing as if merging with the air.



Yue, who frantically jumped to where Hajime was, Hajime appeared from the disappearing light and was floating in the air, even though he had become tattered. However, having crossed his arms to protect his chest and face, Hajime immediately lost his balance and began to fall towards the rampaging sea of magma because of the beam’s impact.



“Kh! “Soar”!”



Thinking Hajime had lost his consciousness; Yue used magic to stop Hajime from falling on his back. Using this chance, she hugged Hajime and they landed in the nearby foothold.



“Kh! Hajime! Hajime!”



Maximum uneasiness could be seen on Yue’s face while she made Hajime drink the holy water she took out. Hajime’s condition was quite miserable. His right arm was burnt so badly that even the bone could be seen, while his artificial arm half melted. His eyepatch was blown off and blood kept flowing from the deep wound on his cheek. Furthermore, his abdomen was burnt black, carbonized. Even so, as a proof of his growth, his internal organs weren’t damaged.



At that time, in the moment the beam was about to swallow Hajime, he twisted his body to face the beam by a hair-breadth and used “Concentrated Strengthening” and “Strength Endowment,” derivations from “Vajra.” Thanks to that, his head was defended by the reinforced artificial arm while his heart and lungs were protected by his right arm and Donner. The clothing around his belly, made from a special demonic beast’s leather, had its defense raised further by “Strength Endowment,” Hajime himself had an abnormal magic resistance, so there was no danger to his life but…



“Nh… recovery is too slow!”



Apparent with Yue irritated mutter, the recovery using holy water didn’t advanced much. Thus, Yue gritted her teeth.



Previously, Hajime had been burnt and collapsed after receiving the beam attack to protect Yue during the fight against the hydra in «Orcus Great Dungeon»’s last trial. Thus, Yue didn’t want to see it again, and she vowed to never let Hajime experienced such a thing again. However, the spectacle of Hajime being swallowed by the beam and collapsed powerlessly was just like the reproduction of that time. It made Yue’s normally expressionless face warped from regret.



And at that moment,



“Fools! Above thee!!”



Tio warned and at the same time, numerous flashes poured down. These were small version of the beam. Each had the power and scale of a tenth of the previous beam, but each of light of death could surely destroy one’s body.



However, Yue hadn’t notice the incoming flashes above because she was occupied with making Hajime drink the second vial of holy water. It was a situation where Yue’s magic wouldn’t make it in time since she had only looked up now because of the warning. In another three seconds, no, one second… between the time it felt like it enlarged, Yue desperately constructed a defense magic in her head.



“Won’t let thee! “Tempest Void”!”



Tio let Yue earned another few seconds. “Tempest Void,” was a mid-ranked defense magic of wind element. The wall of compressed air received the rain of death. The barrier of wind bent greatly at the moment of impact. Normally, the attack would bounce back, but there was no chance to do that. The mini-beams hitting one after another made the air shrieked. The time it could be intercepted was truly only a few seconds.



However, that was enough.



“”Divine Interruption”!”



Yue’s defense magic activated. Normally, she would use “Absolute Calamity,” but the time shortened to activate it wasn’t much even though she had become more skilled in using it. It was because the time to construct and activate gravity magic couldn’t be compared to magic of other attributes. Thus she decided to use “Divine Interruption,” the best defense magic she could immediately activate.



Barrier of light that shone brilliantly appeared before Yue’s thrust out hand, covering Yue and the unconscious Hajime in semi-sphere. In addition, the “Tempest Void” activated by Tio was finally unable to endure the storm of mini-beams, and collapsed accompanied by sound of air being ripped. At the same time, the non-declining torrent of destruction poured into the barrier of light below it.



WOOOOOOSSSHHHH!!!



The huge waterfall-like pressure didn’t annihilate Hajime and Yue, but it continued to attack them. Yue’s “Divine Interruption” cracked. Judging it would be bad after receiving more force than she imagined, Yue transformed the all-covering barrier into a shield that only covered overhead in the middle of its activation. The strength increased conversely to the range it covered.



The surroundings were destroyed by the mini-beams and parts of the foothold other than where Yue and Hajime were, already sunk into the sea of magma.



These mini-beams stubbornly aimed at Hajime, they didn’t even pouring at the nearby footholds where Shia and Tio were to halt them. However, Shia and Tio were forced to stay where they were because the power and density of barrage from the mini-beams were that abnormal.



“Hajime-san! Hajime-saan!”



“Calm down, Shia! Thou willth die if thou come out of this one’s protection!”



“But! Hajime-san is-!”



Tio frantically admonished Shia, who tried to dash into the downpour of mini-beams with tearful look while she moved the shield of swirling wind.



Tio was also worried about Hajime. She understood how painful it was for Shia. However, they mustn’t defenselessly charge into the minimized version of the attack that had severely injured Hajime, and had an effect of weakening the recovery rate of holy water. Gripping Shia by the scruff of her neck, Tio desperately averted the threatening lights.



After ten seconds or maybe one minute… the storm of beams that seemed to continue through the eternity, poured down particularly intense, and the end finally could be seen. The surroundings were in miserable condition, and white smokes were rising here and there.



Yue and Tio had used up their magic power. Panting, they refilled their magic power using the magic power stocked inside Magic-Crystallization stones.



And at the same time, a man’s voice that was half-amazed and half-admiring descended from the sky.



“… A force that cannot be overlooked; indeed it was the right thing to ambush here. You are all too dangerous. Especially, that man…”



Yue and the girls looked up towards the ceiling where the voice came from. Following that, their eyes opened wide in astonishment. As for the reason, several dragons and a pure white, gigantic dragon that couldn’t be compared to the rest were flying, and there was a red-haired, black-skinned, slightly pointed ear, a man from Demon race on the white dragon’s back.



“For the Breath of my white dragon to be incapable of killing him… and in addition, he had strong unknown weapons not written in the report… these women, too. It is truly unbelievable for you to not be finished with a barrage of 50 Ash Dragons. You, just what are you? Just how many Age of Gods magic do you have?”



The man was glaring from the sky with his dangerously narrowed golden eyes, similar to Tio’s. He asked that question while being cautious of Yue and the others who glared back at him. He thought Yue and the girls’ power came from Age of Gods magic from the Great Dungeons.



“Before questioning, how about you introduce yourself first? Does the Demon race have no manners?”



The one who answered the Demon race man was the previously unconscious Hajime. The Demon race man frowned. However, Yue and the girls’ voice rang out before the man even opened his mouth.



“Hajime!”



“Hajime-san!”



“Art thou okay!? Master!?”



Hajime somehow managed to raise his upper body, but he once again fell because his injury was indeed severe. Yue promptly supported him while Shia and Tio jumped from the nearby foothold to where Hajime was, worried.



Hajime smiled to tell Yue and the girls, who were worriedly looking at him, that he was alright, and stood up by himself. However, he wasn’t in a condition where he would be able to immediately fight. This was displayed by his forehead drenched in sweat due to sharp pains he felt. Even so, Hajime moved his gaze from Yue and the girls towards the Demon race in the sky, and was showing a fearless smile.



“… There’s no need to introduce myself to those who will die soon.”



“Same here. I am asking just because it was normal to ask. I am not interested either, so don’t mind it. By the way, how’s your friend’s arm?”



Hajime asked as if to ridicule to stall for time for his recovery. The Demon race man had said “report” and “ambush,” so Hajime recalled the Demon race who was behind the scene inside the town of Ul, whose arm blown off and got away with his life. Thus, his information might have come from there.



With his eyebrow twitching for an instant, the Demon race man answered with tone somewhat lowered than before.



“I change my mind. Bury this name of mine into your flesh and bones. My name is Freed Baghuar. A God’s Apostle who will give divine punishment to the heretics.”



“God’s Apostle… I see. How exaggerated. Were you allowed to introduce yourself as that because you obtain the Age of Gods magic? It wasn’t the kind of magic that control the demonic beasts, right? …Although the demonic beasts fired the beams, they seemed to do it at their own discretion. So, it must be a magic that created demonic beast, right? Of course, those who can create a matchless army can introduce themselves as God’s Apostle, heh.”



“That’s right. For “Alv-sama,” who had obtained God’s powers, told to me directly, “My apostle.” Therefore, all of my being is devoted to realize my master’s wish. Thus, I will use my all to deny you, whose existences will only be an obstacle.”



Closely resembling Ishtal of Church of the Saints, the Demon race man, Freed Baghuar, was denying the existences of Hajime’s party up front. However, Hajime fearlessly laughed with fierce denial. Though his recovery rate was slow, Hajime had used “Recovery” derived from “Magic Conversion” to change his magic power into recovery, and his bleeding had stopped. Though he could not use his left arm, it was possible for him to use his unbroken right arm even if the bone could be seen. Hajime psyched, “I can still fight!”



“That’s my line. Those who obstruct me are enemies. And I will… kill my enemies!”



After shouting so, Hajime endured the sharp pain to aim Donner at Freed and pulled the trigger. He held down his screaming right arm and body due to recoil, and used killing intent aimed at his enemies. Furthermore, he activated “Light Speed” and took out Cross Bits to attack. At the same time, Yue’s “Thunder Dragon”, Tio’s Breath, and Shia’s exploding-slug bullet fired.



However, when several of the 3-4 meters long Ash Dragons entered the attack trajectories, numerous piled up, triangular, reddish black barriers immediately appeared and received all of the attacks from Hajime’s party.



The barrier that received the force of Hajime’s party’s attack and didn’t even held on for a few seconds before it cracked, but more Ash Dragons came from behind and piled up another similar barriers, and thus it wasn’t possible to break through. When they looked carefully, there were turtle-shaped demonic beasts on the dragons’ back. Their shells were shining in reddish black, so these turtle-shaped demonic beasts were most likely the ones that activated the barriers.



“Did you think I only brought along these dragon-type demonic beasts? You wouldn’t be able to easily break through their defense, you know. Well then, I will show you. I will show the other power I had obtained — the power of Gods!”



Freed began to focus and recited the chant in mutter. On his hand, there was a large fabric where complex and bizarre magic array was drawn. According to what he said, it was another power of Gods. He probably meant the Age of Gods magic he obtained in this «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». Knowing the great effect of an Age of Gods magic, Hajime’s party began to attack furiously, to not let him finished his chant.



However, once they broke through the barrier of the Ash Dragons, a new barrier would immediately activated behind the previous one, thus their attacks could not reach Freed. Normally, Hajime would’ve asked Yue and the other two to cover him and go forward using “Aerodynamic,” but he still haven’t completely healed, so it would be difficult for him to beat the group of Ash Dragons. Thinking so, Hajime grinded his teeth.



Hajime put away Donner, and fired all ammos of Orkan whose recoil was small, but they only blew away several of the Ash Dragons’ barriers, that’s all. They weren’t able to reach Freed. Even the Cross Bits that had quite the power couldn’t completely destroy all of the barriers.



And the time was up. Freed finished his chant.



“”Boundary Piercer.””



“Kh! Behind you! Hajime-san!”



At the same time as the last letter of the magic’s name was said, Freed and the white dragon disappeared. More accurately, shining membrane-like thing appeared and they jumped inside. The time Freed said the magic’s name and Shia’s warning were the same, so Hajime’s party, without having time to be wide eyed from astonishment, turned their heads around.



There was… right before Hajime a white dragon’s whitely opened mouth and Freed on top of it, aiming at Hajime. Inside the dragon’s mouth were extreme heat and magic power which concentrated and compressed until the limit. Hajime immediately used Orkan as a shield and at the same time, the beam was fired from zero distance.



BOoOoOoOoOOOM



“Ghh!! AaAAAH!!”



Accompanied by a roaring sound, the held up Orkan was hit by the beam and Hajime was blown away. The severe impact and the damage made his flesh screamed, and Hajime raised an agonized groan from his clenched mouth.



“Hajime!”



Wanting to help Hajime who was blown away by the beam, Yue and the girls immediately tried to attack the white dragon, but the Ash Dragons attacked in a barrage as if they knew what the girls would do.



While he didn’t receive a direct hit from the beam, the impact from being blown away made Hajime’s wound reopened, and his blood sprayed. Hajime was desperately holding Orkan with his wounded right arm and braced himself using “Aerodynamic.” Then, thinking he would be dropped into the boiling sea if this keeps up, Hajime activated “Limit Break.”



It was a dangerous bet to activate “Limit Break” with a wounded body. Normally, he would only be exhausted after using “Limit Break,” but with his current condition, he would likely to become paralyzed afterward. Even so, Hajime judged that using it was indeed necessary to break through this situation.



Hajime’s body wrapped inside a torrent shining brightly red, his power swelled up explosively.



“RAaAAA!!”



Roaring, he slanted Orkan to forcibly avert the beam up. Even so, he could not completely avert it, and he was blown away while spouting blood because of the beam.



The white dragon continued attacking by firing numerous light bullets which was the same as Hydra’s. However, the dragon’s beam was far tougher than the hydra, so the light bullets also couldn’t be underestimated. Furthermore, its combination with a user of Age of Gods magic made it extremely troublesome.



“Cross Bitt!”



With the incoming light bullets, Hajime concentrated to his limit, entering the slowed down world and was evading like a swaying fallen leaf. Following that, he put away Orkan that had become useless because it had melted, and fired Donner, while also making the Cross Bit fly to assault Freed at the same time.



“How tenacious! To dodge a decisive blow by a hair-breadth-!”



Covered again by the barrier of the turtle-shaped demonic beast, Freed was grinding his teeth as he watched the seriously wounded Hajime’s tenacity in wonder. Then, he once again begin to recite the chant while the white dragon flew at high speed.



“This one won’t let you!”



Towards Freed and the white dragon who endured the fierce attack from the Cross Bits while firing the light bullets and backing away from Hajime to regain time to finish the chant, a mysterious voice suddenly resounded in the entire space. At the same time, they were attacked by a terrific impact from the flank.



Blown away, Freed stopped his chant and instinctively clung to the white dragon. He then looked at the one who blew away the ten meters long white dragon. He opened his eyes wide in astonishment.



“Black dragon!?”



“It seemth thou hath forgotten thy place and got carried away! This one won’t let you hurt Master anymore!”



The one who blew Freed and the white dragon away was the “Dragonformed” Tio. Having accepted the risk that the Demon race would know about the Ryuujin race, Tio demonstrated her appearance. And even though she was one size smaller than the white dragon, her pressure far surpassed the white dragon.



The reason Tio decided to join Hajime’s party on their journey was because she came to like Hajime, but also to observe the people who came from another world, and to find what her future move would be. With that, she wanted to conceal that she came from Ryuujin tribe. It was also her race’s law, so she naturally would do that. After all, no matter how strong her race was, they wouldn’t be able to fight against number. It was something that permeated inside their people from the persecution 500 years ago.



However, Hajime, who she was convinced to be invincible and could not be injured, had sustained severe injuries. Thus, when she saw Hajime had powerlessly collapsed because of the beam pouring down from the above, Tio’s mind was attacked by fierce agitation.



She thought she had misunderstood something. Hajime is a human. If wounded in a moment of carelessness, it was possible for him to easily die. Tio gradually recalled this, and her, who had forgotten common sense due to her long life, was now clearly conscious of her feeling thank to her devotion towards Hajime. He was an object of her interest, but not as her Master. She understood now that Hajime was a “man” that she, as a woman, did not want to lose.



Therefore, she decided to “Dragonform” in front of others. She wouldn’t be able to puff her chest and call them comrades if she was unwilling to do it in this crisis. Above all, the pride of Tio Clarce of Ryuujin race would not allow her to choose the law above her important person’s life, neither could she do that.



“Young one! Remember this! This is the “Dragon”‘s Breath!”



ROooOOOOooOaaaAAR



Accompanied with a roaring sound, a black flash immediately came to swallow the white dragon along with Freed. The white dragon twisted its body and fired its Breath beam towards the incoming Breath. Black and white flashes collided, scattering violent shock wave. The ocean of magma right below, centered on the colliding point, was rampaging and generating gigantic tsunamis of magma.



At first, Tio and the white dragon’s Breaths were equal, but Tio’s Breath began to gradually push the white dragon’s.



“Kuh, for me to meet a survivor of Ryuujin race here… there’s no other way. Although it is risky, I will use magic to make the space…”



“Do you think I will let you?!”



“Kh!?”



Maybe because he didn’t have any report about the Ryuujin race, Freed was truly surprised. Seeing this situation, he gritted his teeth, took out another fabric from his pocket, and tried to chant the Age of Gods magic again.



However, he was interrupted by the impact followed a voice behind him.



It was Hajime who arrived behind Freed, unbeknownst to him, and fired Donner in succession while blood was spouted from his wounds. Six bullets were fired with one firing sound. All of the bullets, without deviating even a millimeter, were hitting the same place.



The turtle-shaped demonic beast by Freed’s side had activated the barrier faster than Freed could react, but once impacted in almost zero distance by the flashes; the barrier shining in reddish black was easily smashed. Following that, Hajime slipped into the bosom of Freed who displayed his irritation and panicked.



Activating “Wind Claw” on Donner, Hajime swung it at once.



“Guaah!?”



By a hair’s breadth, Freed escaped from being cut in two by falling behind. However, a horizontally slashed wound was carved on his chest. Hajime didn’t stop his attack, rotating using the momentum from slashing Freed, he activated “Magic Shockwave” from “Magic Power Conversion” and back kicked Freed.



BAAAM!



“GAaAHH!!”



Freed barely guarded using his left arm, but he could not kill the momentum, and thus his left arm was crushed and his organs were damaged. Freed was horizontally blown away from the white dragon.



Noticing his master’s disappearance, the white dragon lost its concentration and the black Breath approached it in a dash. Immediately after Hajime jumped off the white dragon, Tio’s Breath grandly blew off the beam along with the white dragon.



“Roarrrr!!”



Screaming as it was being blown away, the white dragon somehow managed to regain its balance mid-air even after its belly received the attack from Tio’s Breath, and it immediately flew towards the ceiling. Once again, Freed was on the back of an Ash Dragon with Freed. Reunited in the air, Freed once again boarded the white dragon.



Hajime tried to pursue using “Aerodynamic,” however…



“Gh!? Gahakh!!”



The bright red light enveloping Hajime was disappearing rapidly, and not only from his wounds, but he also vomited a large amount of blood. His “Limit Break” had reached the time limit. In his wounded condition, the damage was further deepened from breaking his limit, and thus the time limit came earlier. Hajime was falling into the ocean of magma because his “Aerodynamic” was deactivated.



“Master! Hold on!”



“Guh, Ti-Tio…”



Tio flew to put the falling Hajime on her back. Hajime, whose damage deepened from “Limit Break”‘s after effect and should have collapsed, managed to somehow get into kneeling position and his eyes shone as he glared at Freed above.



From what he saw, even the Ash Dragons that were attacking Yue and the girls had gathered by Freed’s side.



“Hajime!”



“Hajime-san!”



Shouting Hajime’s name, Yue and Shia came running. Tio landed in the nearby foothold. She did it because the possibility of the current Hajime not being able to endure Tio’s battling movement and fall was high. Having jumped onto the same foothold, Yue and Shia immediately came to Hajime’s side and supported his body.



“… What a dreadful force. Those women are also not normal. A Ryuujin race that should have been annihilated, no-chant no-array using magic-user, and a Rabbitman tribe with unexpected power and ability to see the future… They are also possibly users of Age of Gods magic. And to have cornered me now… it would have been my side that would have gotten beaten if I didn’t first attack, huh…”



Squeezing his words, Freed was exchanging gaze with Hajime, creating sparks. Panting, Freed touch the wound carved on his chest with his unhurt right hand.



“Why are you assuming this is the end? I can still fight.”



Hajime’s expression turned ugly because of Freed’s words. But even with his tattered body, Hajime’s eyes were shining with killing intent while he declared the battle to continue.



“… Of course. The torrent of killing intent overflowing from you expressed you would not give up no matter how wounded you are. Not only do you have dreadful powers, you also have killing intent that could devour your enemy… No, was it the attachment to survive…”



Guessing once, then Freed made a resolute expression and glared at Hajime again.



“I don’t want to use this method… but it is necessary to use it if it can kill powerful enemies like you.”



“What did you say?”



Not answering Hajime’s question, Freed said something to the small bird-shaped demonic beast, unknown as to when it landed on his shoulder.



Then,



RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE, RUMBLE!



SPLASH!



KABOOM!



Great tremor shook the entire space, no, the entire «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», and the ocean of magma began to rampaging, accompanied with a terrific, roaring sound.



“Uoh!?”



“Nnah!?”



“Kyaa!?”



“Nuoh!?”



Suffering from the sudden shockwave from below, Hajime’s party got on all fours and screamed, while desperately trying to balance themselves. The great tremor was gradually becoming even more intense, and could be said to reach seven in the richter scale. From the ocean of magma, numerous fire pillars, no, magma pillars began to spout.



“Hajime-san! The magma level-!”



With Shia’s words, the magma surrounding the foothold, where Hajime’s party were, was indeed rising in level.



“What did he do?”



Hajime squeezed his words and asked the obvious culprit behind this situation, Freed. Having moved to the ceiling above the middle island, Freed answered the question.



“I only destroyed the keystone.”



“Key… stone?”



“That’s right. Didn’t you think it was strange when you saw the magma? «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» is obviously an active volcano. However, there’s no record of it erupting until now. What I mean, is there must be something controlling the activity of the underground magma reservoir.”



“That’s the “keystone,” huh… Don’t tell me!?”



“It is. I have destroyed the gigantic keystone that calmed down the magma reservoir. Thus, this Great Dungeon will soon be destroyed. And although I deeply regret that I can’t give my kins the Age of Gods magic of this dungeon… it isn’t that regrettable if it means I can kill you here. Be destroyed along with this Great Dungeon.”



Coldly looking down at Hajime’s party, Freed held a pendant on his neck towards the ceiling. Then, the crack on the ceiling began to be open. Along with the circular hole on the ceiling, several doors above it also opened.



Apparently, Freed had opened the shortcut to the outside using the proof of having conquered «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». For the last time, Freed glared at Hajime’s party then turned on his heel along with the white dragon, disappearing into the passage on the ceiling.



With the surrounding magma rampaged like the sea influenced by a hurricane, the number of spouted magma pillars kept increasing. The magma began to swallow the edges of the foothold where Hajime’s party were. It was a spectacle worthy to be called the end of world.



In a short while, Hajime closed his eyes and was thinking of something. Having decided on something, he stood up despite his injury. Immediately, the Ash Dragons left behind by Freed and the white dragon began to simultaneously fire small beams. They seem to want to kill Hajime’s party here by all means.



While Yue was intercepting the small beam attacks using “Absolute Calamity,” Hajime put his hand on the “Treasure Box.” Then, he put his hand on the hard dragon scale covering Tio’s cheeck, who was firing Breath towards the Ash Dragons overhead, to make her face him.



“Tio, listen. Take this and you alone must escape from that ceiling to the outside.”



For a moment, Tio was blinking, not understanding what was said. Then, she realized it in the next moment and raised a voice which mixed with sadness and anger. Hajime’s words were as if telling her to let herself survived, casting him and the other two away.



“Master, is this one, is this one not worth spending the last time with thee? Art thou discarding this one? This one…”



“That’s not it, Tio. I will say it just once because there’s not much time left. I am not giving up anything at all. I will get the Age of Gods magic and I will someday beat that bastard. Also, I am going to fulfil my promise to bring back the “Serene stone.” However, it is impossible to do it alone. That’s why I want you to lend me your power. If it is not you, it is impossible to break through everything and return to Ancadi… Please, Tio.”



Hajime looked at the dragonformed Tio with a serious gaze he had never looked at her with before. With his pride and arrogance, Hajime had said he would be able to do anything by himself, but he relied on her. Expressing he needed Tio’s cooperation to accomplish his wishes, and to overcome all of the difficulties. He said he needed Tio’s power. There was neither trace of him giving up, trying to sacrifice himself, nor was he excluding Tio at all.



The sadness and anger in Tio’s heart changed radically into one of joy as she trembled. She was “entrusted” with something important by the man she liked, no, the one she wanted to be her partner in this life and death situation. She would not be a woman if she didn’t answer him.



Therefore, Tio only answered with one sentence.



“Leave it to this one!”



Hajime put “Treasure Box” in the inner part of Tio’s scale. Doing so, he was directly touching the Tio’s body while she was in her dragon form.



Confirming the “Treasure Box” with her skin, Tio quietly rubbed her head against Hajime. It was the best expression of love she could do now. Hajime also gently stroked Tio once before he parted. Tio turned her gaze to Yue and Shia. Then, she nodded powerfully having felt that the two also haven’t given up.



“Tio, deliver this message to Kaori and Myuu. “I will meet you later.” Okay.”



“Fufu, acknowledged.”



The too nonchalant message Hajime gave made Tio laugh inadvertently, and after a beat, she flew at once while cladded by a powerful wind. Using barrelroll to evade the incoming small beams, Tio immediately tried to pierce through the group of Ash Dragons. The Ash Dragons, sensing the crisis from the black dragon’s movement, concentrated their attacks on Tio.



The rushing small beams were counterbalanced by Tio’s Breath, but it wasn’t easy because the beams keep coming one after another. However, the moment the balance about to collapse, a beam gushed out from below and blew several Ash Dragons that were attacking Tio.



It was the small beams compressed and fired by Yue’s “Absolute Calamity.” In addition, exploding-slug bullets were fired and the shock wave blew the Ash Dragons away.



Suddenly, maybe because Freed and the white dragon had reached outside, the doors on the ceiling began to close. Realizing she didn’t have much time, Tio focused on accelerating with resolution of receiving the bombardment. Tio’s flight speed was further increased, but the fired off small beams began to break Tio’s dragon scale.



“Hmph, a pain only of this degree, it feels good! Bring it on~!”



Just as she said, Tio’s mood brightened along with the increment of her speed whenever the attack from the Ash Dragons damaged her body. It was the effect of “Pain Conversion” in “Dragonform.” The more pain she felt, the more her tension increased along with temporary boost of her ability, an awful skill derivation. Incidentally, it was something she obtained when she met Hajime after living for several hundreds of years. So, rather than “breaking through the wall (as in the wall before the skill derived),” it was more like “the door had opened.”



With the Ash Dragons somewhat taken aback, Tio passed through the storm of small beams and passed through the door right before it closed. Looking above, a small, nostalgic light could be seen. It was the light of the outside. There were still several doors that had begun to close one by one.



Without thinking about the consequence, Tio used her magic, except some that would be used to maintain “Dragonform,” to the limit and manipulated the wind. Recalling the long life she had, it was a speed she had never use before. She literally flew, turning into a gale.



She passed through one door, two doors, three doors, and she finally arrived at the last door; a thick door connected to the outside. Tio was going forward while surrounded by black wind like a cannonball. And light bullets attacked her from above.



Apparently, Freed and the white dragon had noticed Tio, and thus they stopped to attack her. Now, more than half of the door had been closed. Rotating while evading, Tio didn’t lower her speed even if she could not evade the bombardment, and the white dragon fired off the beam.



Exhausted of its magic power, the beam didn’t have the force it had in the beginning. It was only half of its usual power at best. However, the damage, if Tio was hit by it, would still surpass the one she received from the small beams. Furthermore, her speed would fall if she evade or intercept it. If so, she might not make it in time before the door closed.



Tio steeled herself, and she further raised her speed using “Pain Conversion” right after the bombardment of the light bullets.



And at that time, several shadows passed through Tio’s side, appearing in between Tio and the incoming beam.



They were things Tio knew just by seeing. The floating crosses, all-ranged weapons, Hajime’s Cross Bits. They had followed right behind Tio.



The three Cross Bits that came out were clad in bright red light, tried to change the angle of the beam, and averted it to the side. Although they were destroyed one after another by the force of the beam, they had interrupted the beam and protected Tio. Furthermore, another four Cross Bits flew to Tio’s side to protect her.



“Nuhaa~, can’t hold it! Masterrr, this one love you~!”



Even though he might get overcome by the torrent of magma, Hajime had still controlled all of the Cross Bits from the ground to protect Tio. Thus, Tio roared towards the world, shouting her love. Being especially strong even amongst the Ryuujin tribe, Tio had never been protected by a man up until now. It was always her who did the protection. That’s why, the fact that she was protected during such an extremely difficult situation made her exploded in joy from the sensation she had never felt.



“Guuroarrr!!!”



With a dragon’s roar, she passed through the last door. Having turned into a mass of black wind, Tio flew out vertically, dancing under the sunlight that poured down surrounded by the gigantic sandstorm.



“For the situation to turn out like this…-! What a monster! But that black dragon is covered in wounds. I will kil-!?”



Tio who flew overhead made Freed on the white dragon astonished, but he immediately sharpened his gaze and tried to attack. However, his plan and words were interrupted. The four Cross Bits had surrounded Freed and the white dragon from all directions before they were aware of them.



Freed made the turtle-shaped demonic beast he took during his escape to promptly put up a barrier. After all, it had been proven that the Cross Bit’s offensive power could not destroy the barrier. And although the result might have been different if they were loaded with explosive bullets, the exploding-slug bullets in Shia’s ranged attack were scarce, and Hajime had given priority to the bullets on Donner-Schlag, thus he had no time to implement it on the Cross Bits.



However, the Cross Bits have one more powerful attack method. This method made Freed’s composed expression freeze, proven by how he was blown away along with the white dragon after receiving a huge damage.



KABOOOOOOM!



When thinking it was odd the Cross Bits didn’t shoot and abruptly shined red, but in the next moment, they exploded.



The four Cross Bits had been positioned in all sides to not let their targets escaped from the impact. The grand, powerful impact and the bullets that scattered like a storm easily destroyed the barrier, attacking Freed and the white dragon.



“GAaAAH!!”



“RUaAAAAn!!”



The master and servant were mutually screaming as they were blown away.



In addition, Tio attacked with tornado, pushing Freed and the white dragon into the sandstorm. Tio had wanted to shoot out Breath to kill them for sure, but she could not because she didn’t have much strength left.



Tio watched the place where Freed and the white dragon had disappeared for a while, then she moved her gaze after she to confirm there’s no change at all. She quietly watched the «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» before her without even a trace of her perverted tension remaining. Next, nodding as if expressing “This one will believe in thee,” she turned around and flew towards Ancadi.



After several tens of minutes, a great earthquake with «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» as the epicentre, with sounds surpassing roaring sounds, a great explosion occurred that even cracked the atmosphere, and temporarily blew off the sandstorm. Black, black smoke rose from «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» while scorching rocks went flying, and sparks scattered from the volcano.



It was a great eruption of «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» that was recorded to have never erupted in history. In a way, it was a historical moment. After a few minutes, the volcano was once again wrapped with a veil of gigantic sandstorm, concealing its bizarreness.



Even so, the roaring sound that seemed to be the scream of the world along with the spouted black smoke was certainly seen by the people of Ancadi. Their uneasiness grew stronger. It was also felt by the girl and little girl who were waiting for their important people to return.





Volume 9 Chapter 9




“… Self-destruction is a man’s romance.”



“? … Hajime?”



“Hajime-san?”



Hajime who suddenly muttered with a grin while the small beams poured from above, made Yue and Shia looked at him with dubious expressions. Shaking his head to tell them it was nothing, Hajime was supported by the two and somehow managed to jump and arrived at the edge of the middle island.



The surrounding magma had become more and more rampaging since the time Tio flew away, and there was no other foothold except the middle island. The middle island would also be swallowed in less than five minutes.



Yue swallowed the pouring down small beams using “Absolute Calamity” while Shia swung down Doryukken at the Ash Dragons, who became impatient and came to directly attack them, making them fell into the magma. Already ten of Ash Dragons were defeated.



The magma dome they saw in the beginning above the middle island had already disappeared, and they could see a jet-black building in exchange. Nearby the building was a disk floating a few centimeters above the ground. It might be the thing normally used to get out from the shortcut that allowed the ceiling to open earlier.



Leering at the Ash Dragons desperately trying to dodge the magma pillars gushing out and attacking them, Hajime’s party approached the jet-black building.



At a glance, it only looked like a tall building without any door, but a part of the wall had the same crests of the Seven Great Dungeons carved in. Standing before that part of wall, the wall soundlessly slid and the party entered the building. The party entered the building at the same time the magma flowed, swallowing the middle island. Once again, the door closed soundlessly and halted the magma from flowing inside within a hair’s breadth.



After watching the door for a while and seeing the door didn’t melt nor were there any magma flowing inside, Hajime’s party breathe sighs of relief. They had expected the dwelling to be built here and have prepared for such a case. Thus, the result was a relief.



“We are safe for the time being… Even so, for this room to even intercepted the vibration…”



“Nn… Hajime, over there.”



“A magic circle.”



As soon as he entered the room, Hajime was surprised from not feeling the major tremor. Responding to his mutter, Yue, who was by his side, pointed her finger. The thing she pointed at was a complex and exquisite magic formation. The magic array for Age of Gods Magic. The party nodded at each other and came into the formation.



Just like the time in «Orcus Great Dungeon», their memories flowed out without permission, tracking how they conquered the dungeon. Thus, after it was confirmed that they conquered it from subjugating all of the Magma Serpents, the Age of Gods magic was directly carved into their brains.



“… I see, this is Spatial Magic.”



“… The seed for instant movement.”



“Ahh, just like that guy who suddenly appeared from behind, right.”



Apparently, the Age of Gods Magic resided in «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was “Spatial Magic.” Another magic that could interfere with an unexpected thing. As usual, the magic at the Age of Gods was far from being normal.



Yue was referring to Freed’s surprise attack. The very first surprise attack was likely to appear from above using the Spatial magic. Although she didn’t understand whether he teleported or just distorted the space to hide, it didn’t change the fact that it was troublesome. Even his second surprise attack would have hit Hajime if not for Shia’s “Decided Future,” derived from “Foresight.” A fine play.



At the same time Hajime’s party mastered the Spatial magic, the light from magic formation dimmed and shiiiing, a part of the wall opened and shining letters began to appear on the wall before them.



“I sincerely wish for the free will of the people in the future.” – Naiz Guryuu-en



“… How simple.”



Upong seeing the message, that was the impression Hajime had. Seeing the surroundings, he noticed that the dwelling of the founder of «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was quite dreary. The feeling where someone lived here just like in the dwelling of Orcus couldn’t be felt. It was truly a place with nothing but the magic formation.



“… It seems to be his own arrangement.”



“Looks like Naiz-san didn’t leave anything except the magic.”



“Now that I remember it, that Naiz appeared in Oscar’s note. He seemed to be a truly taciturn person.”



With Shia supporting Hajime’s left flank, Yue walked to the wall with fist size opening and took out the pendant from inside. It was similar to the proofs of conquering other dungeons, but the circular pendant had different designs. Yue quietly put in on Hajime’s neck.



“… Now that we have obtained both the magic and proof. Next is how we get out of here.”



“… Does Hajime have any idea?”



“Hajime-san must have an idea, right? The outside is probably had been completely filled with magma, you know?”



Although they told their worries, not a trace of uneasiness could be felt from Yue and Shia. While feeling glad from the two’s trust, Hajime told them his escape plan.



“Of course, we are going to swim inside the magma.”



“… Nn?”



“… Come again?”



The far too insufficient information was too difficult to understand, making Yue and Shia think, “Was his head severely damaged after all?” The two asked again with expressions worrying about Hajime’s head.



“I will explain it properly so please don’t look at me like that. Hmm, actually, I have prepared a submarine that can be used immediately after we get out of this building. It is something I created because I thought it was necessary for the «Meljeene, Bottom of the Sea Ruin». Honestly, I was a little worried whether it could endure the magma, but that small boat was okay after being cladded with Vajra, so I tried it myself. And as expected, it looks like it will be okay.”



“Ju-just when in the world did you make that…” Shia spoke in amazement, and amazement could also be seen in Yue’s eyes.



Actually, at the time Freed said he destroyed the keystone, Hajime had directly transferred the submarine from “Treasure Box” into the magma. He had thought of forcibly breaking through the ceiling along with Tio if it melted. But since it didn’t melt (using induction stone), he knew they would be able to escape even if the space was filled with magma.



However, because the scale of the tremor of the «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» was obviously a dangerous one, along with the things collapsing all over the place, they would likely to be incapable of escaping smoothly. Thus, with the time limit approaching for them to return to Ancadi, they didn’t have the time to leisurely looking for the escape route. As such, he decided to let Tio escaped before them. It was so that the “Serene Stone” would be brought back within the time limit.



“The escape route is of course the shortcut on the ceiling. Yue, I leave the barrier to you until we get into the boarding gate of the submarine. You can do it, right?”



“Nh… leave it to me.”



Nodding at Hajime’s words, Yue concentrated and created triple layers of “Divine Interruption.” The shining barrier covered Hajime’s group of three. The three nodded at each other and stood before the door. Afterwards, the door connected to the outside filled with boiling magma, opened.



Bang! A sound immediately rang out and the scorching torrent of magma flowed into the room. And although “Divine Interruption” indeed protected Hajime’s party from the magma, their views were instantly dyed in crimson. With unbelievable spectacle of seeing magma while being submerged, even though they were prepared, Hajime’s party still found themselves at a loss for words. And although there was a saying “the world is wide,” there probably have been no one but Hajime’s party who have experience such a spectacle.



“It is right outside. Let’s go!”



“Nh.”



“Y-Yes!”



With Hajime’s instructions, the three slowly went outside. And although it was a closed room they didn’t know anything about, just like what Hajime said, upon reaching it with “Divine Interruption,” they immediately stood before a place they understood was the gate. While Yue adjusted the barrier, they arrived right in front of the hatch, and the three were finally able to board on the submarine. And instinctively, Hajime’s party were relaxed.



And at that moment,



DOOORUUUUUUNNNG!!!



A tremor far greater from the ones before now attacked the entire space. The magma suddenly began to flow into one direction with a tremendous momentum. The submarine was swept by the swift current. Inside it, Hajime’s party were as if they were inside a mixer as they keep spinning in all of directions.



“Guwah!?”



“Nnya!?”



“Hau!? It hurts!”



Each of them had their bodies thrown all over the wall and screamed. Yue immediately activated “Absolute Calamity,” used the small, black, swirling orb to pull them, and they somehow managed to get out of the shaker-like situation.



“P-Phew. Thank you, Yue.”



“Thank you very much, Yue-san.”



“Nn… more importantly.”



Yue moved the “Absolute Calamity” and carried Hajime to the place that seemed to be the control seat. Hajime supplied his magic power and tried to control the submarine inside the viscous and intensely flowing magma, but as he thought, the rudder could not be controlled.



“Tch, if it is an eruption then being thrown outside is a lucky thing.”



“… Is there something else?”



Hajime’s bitter expression made Yue tilted her head.



“Ah. I have installed a certain stone just like the one in Cross Bits to lose sight of directions inside the magma. I know the location of the shortcut in the ceiling from the Cross Bits going outside of the dungeon before they exploded, but… this flow is moving away from the exit.”



“Eh? Does it mean we are diving underground?”



“Yeah, well, rather than diving underground, it is more like it’s moving diagonally… Now then, I wonder where it’s connected to… Yue, Shia. We can’t return immediately after all. There’s nothing we can do except to go with the flow.”



Hajime’s resolute expression made Yue and Shia only relaxed their gaze and quietly drew close to him.



“… I will be by your side until the end. I don’t have any complain as long as that is fulfilled.”



“Fufu… Literally, even if it is inside the fire and the water, eh. Me, too, I will go “anywhere” as long as I can be together with the two of you!”



“… I see. I am the same.”



Hajime relaxed and returned a smile towards the two.



Hajime’s group of three were drawing close to each other inside the submarine while they were swept by the scorching torrent.



* * *



At the time Hajime’s party were swept by the magma underground into the unknown after being unable to escape from «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», a shadow was flying unsteadily above the brown, raging sand of «Guryuu-en Great Desert».



Needless to say, it was the “Dragonformed” Tio.



“Ugh… this is rather bad… for the love of, that was a nasty Breath… there’s no other way. Master, sorry about this.”



Having forcibly broken through, Tio was basked in a large amount of beam whose toxin ended up aggravating her wounds. As such, judging she would be collapsed before she arrived at Ancadi, Tio apologized to Hajime for taking out from “Treasure Box” and crunched the vial of the special potion, the Holy Water, without permission.



Although she had consumed a large amount of magic power from firing Breaths in succession, surpassing her body’s limit, and reinforcing her flight ability, she had now considerably recovered. Moreover, even though her wounds didn’t instantaneously healed, the toxin had been suppressed.



Afterwards, she flew for several hours and she could finally see Ancadi in her view. If she kept flying any more than this, the people on the watchtower would be able to see Tio’s current appearance. For a moment, Tio wondered whether or not to release her dragon form. However, thinking it would surely be necessary for her to be in her dragonformed while she travels with Hajime, since the Demon race man named Freed was likely to still be alive, she decided to come clean about it.



Also, her hidden town wasn’t something that could easily be found. Even if it was found by chance, the Ryuujin race would not go downed that easily. Besides, if it turned into the nightmare (persecution) just like five hundred years ago, Hajime would surely lend Tio his power if she asked for his help. After all, Hajime was sweet to his companion.



While thinking so, she was finally only several kilometers away from Ancadi. From what she could see, the watchtower was in a commotion. Thus, because it would be a hassle to be attacked due to a misunderstanding, Tio made a detour towards the entrance gate and landed slightly away from it.



ZIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIP!



Ancadi’s Soldiers moved towards Tio, who landed and created sand dust, with row formation. If one looked above the walls, many Soldiers were standing by with bow or magic array-carved staff in hand.



The sand dust was clearing away. The Soldiers could be heard gulping from nervousness. However, what appeared from the sand was a beautiful, gold-eyed, black-haired woman who looked extremely exhausted, making the soldiers looked at each other in bewilderment.



From among the confused Soldiers, a girl came out. It was a girl whose hair was black like Tio’s, Kaori. Behind her, the Soldiers and the Lord’s son, Viz, were telling her it was dangerous, but Kaori completely ignored them and she fiercely running towards the kneeling, panting Tio.



Having heard the report from the watchtower and knowing Tio was from Ryuujin race, Kaori had guessed Hajime was returning and ran in a hurry.



“Tio! Are you okay!?” “Huh, Kaori… ugh, this one is rather okay. This one is just a little tired.”



Kaori’s expression changed when she saw Tio’s body covered in wounds, and looking very exhausted. She immediately knelt nearby Tio’s side, and hurriedly examined her condition. When she came to know there was an unknown toxin in Tio’s body, she instantly began to activate detoxification and recovery magic at the same time.



“How… for it to not be detoxified…”



However, even the Holy Water needed time to detoxify the beam’s toxin. Thus, Kaori’s magic was unable to immediately detoxify it. However, although Kaori’s face was distorted, Tio had considerably recovered thanks to the effect of the previously taken Holy Water, and Kaori’s extraordinary recovery magic. She said to Kaori, “There’s no need to worry, it will be detoxified soon,” with a smile as she patted Kaori’s head.



Guessing there was indeed nothing to worry about judging by Tio’s expression, Kaori relaxed and smiled in relief. Following that, she looked around the surrounding and her expression gradually turned into one of unease.



“Tio… um, what about Hajime-kun and the other two? Is it only you? Also, what was… that eruption…”



“Calm down, Kaori. This one will explain everything. But first, tell the soldiers behind thou to calm down and take this one to a place where we can have a talk.”



“Ah, nn, I will.”



Only now did Kaori noticed the confused Soldiers behind her, and thus she nodded powerfully even though her expression was one of unease. Tio’s expression that didn’t contain any grievance was also a factor that helped Kaori to calm down.



Kaori ran back towards Viz, the Soldiers, and Randzi who had come, too. Explaining the circumstance, she took Tio to a place where they could talk in peace.



* * *



“So, about Hajime-kun and the other two…”



“Hmm, they will surely return soon. After all, Master didn’t think of giving up. And although this one didn’t hear anything due to not having time for that, Master certainly had a plan to escape.”



Having heard what happened in «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», Kaori turned pale while clenching her fists tightly. The uneasiness she felt since the time she and the people of Ancadi saw the gigantic eruption swelt up.



Towards Kaori who clenched her fists and seemed like she would collapse at any time, Tio quietly put her own hands on top of Kaori’s. Afterwards, she watched Kaori with a powerful gaze.



“Kaori. This one hath a message from Master.”



“From Hajime-kun?”



“Mhm. Actually it is for both Kaori and Myuu… “I will meet you later,” Master said.”



Kaori had thought it would be something like “I will surely return” or “Don’t worry” kind of words to reassure Kaori and Myuu. However, the too nonchalant words as if he was saying “I am going to a convenience store now, so let’s meet later,” made Kaori openmoutedly dumbfounded.



Crossing her mind was Hajime’s figure who raised a fearless smile and said, “Such a thing is nothing if I become serious, you know?” It was a reassuring figure that would break through any kind of difficulty while smiling. While she was naturally imagining his figure, Kaori was smiling wryly because it was the most reassuring message rather than some kind of unskillful, tough words.



“I see, then it will be okay, huh.”



“Mhm, no matter how desperate the situation looks like, Master will surely return like nothing’s happened. It is something this one believes…”



“Un… Hajime will be okay. That’s why, I must do the things I can here.”



“That’s right. This one will, of course, help thou.”



Recalling how Hajime had missing in the Great Dungeon, Kaori thought Hajime would surely be okay, and like Tio, she believed in him while clenching her fists tightly. Kaori stood up, and she had a resolute look in her eyes to heal the weakened people, who had distributed with the powder from the large amount of “Serene Stone” that was passed on to Randzi’s group earlier.



Afterwards, they explained the situation to Myuu who was entrusted to the Lord’s daughter, Airi (14 y.o), in the palace. And although Myuu was going to cry because her Hajime papa didn’t return, Tio told her that Hajime’s daughter must not cry easily, so she endured it with puffed cheeks.



Although Myuu was someone from the Sea-dweller tribe, knowing she was a companion of a “God’s apostle”, Kaori, and after looking after her for a while, the people of the palace were knocked out by Myuu’s cuteness. Airi, who was prohibited from going out due to her still weakened state, was especially fond of Myuu.



Although there was still the situation about Tio being from the Ryuujin race, Randzie and the other didn’t make a big commotion about it because although they were still in doubt, it didn’t change the fact that she was the dukedom’s benefactor, risking her life to bring them the “Serene Stone.”



Kaori and the others healed the patients one after another, but Hajime’s group still haven’t returned even after two days passed, thus their expressions gradually darkened. Tio had searched for any trace of Hajime’s group along the route to «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» several times, but she was at a loss from not finding anything.



Then, after three days had passed since Tio’s return, Kaori made a suggestion to Myuu and Tio.



“I think there’s no more patient that needs treatment from me now. They only need to rest after this, so it won’t be a problem to leave it to the medical center’s staff members. That’s why… let’s go to look for Hajime-kun’s group.”



“Papa? We are going to meet papa?”



“Hmm, thou art right. This one hath also thought it was about the time to make a move.”



Myuu gladly leaned her body to Kaori’s words while Tio was agreeing with eager expression.



“But, I think we can’t take Myuu along to «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», after all.”



“Thou art correct. If not, there will be no meaning for Master to entrust Myuu to this place. Besides, the eruption from before made it hard to search for them safely.”



“Yeah. I think so, too. That’s why I thought of going to Elisen first to return Myuu-chan to her mama.”



“Fumu, it is indeed a good idea… Yup. Then, it will be better for thee to ride on this one’s back. If it is only until Elisen, this one doesth not even need a day. We will arrive at the evening if we move out in the morning.”



The advancing conversation made a large amount of flowers of “?” bloomed above Myuu’s head. After Kaori explained to Myuu in an easily understandable manner, Myuu made a sad expression because they were not going to meet Hajime. However, she also wanted to meet her mother. After the two told her they were going to wait for Hajime papa with her, Myuu somehow consented although in reluctance. How Myuu was balancing her real mother with her papa made Kaori and Tio could not help but making wry smiles.



The next day, while watched by the Lord who seemed to want to restrain them, and Viz with his feverish gaze, Kaori and Myuu got on dragonformed Tio’s back and flew to the west. From behind, the voice of gratitude and Kaori’s name were grandly resounding from the people.



Thinking about her dear person who was once again missing, Kaori vowed to find him again for sure, and she looked straight ahead.



Afterwards, they never thought they would too easily be reunited with him…





Volume 9 Chapter 10




Blue as far as one could see.



A clear sky stretched into the horizon, and the sunlight poured down brilliantly. However, it wasn’t that hot, and the climate made it easy to spend the time here. The gentle breeze blowing time after time felt good. Only, there wasn’t a single “thing” no matter how much one looked at the surrounding which made one feels a little lonely.



To begin with, that feeling wasn’t something that could be helped with. It was in the middle of ocean after all.



At the very center of the ocean, was a ship swaying, drifting about the waves. Well, it wasn’t known whether it was okay to call it a ship. After all, the people of this world wouldn’t be able to recognize this as a “ship”.



As for the reason, the ship’s body was a black, lustrous streamline shaped, without a place for passenger to board it unlike normal ships. Normally, the body would also have two small wing-like thingy on both side creating V shape and a screw-like rudder attached behind it… but the only thing that could be seen was the devastated remain of them. If it was smoothed out, the original slightly flat orca-like shape could be seen.



However, surely the people of this world would agree to call it a new kind of demonic beast rather than a ship. The orca-shaped ship was a submarine. Needless to say, it was Hajime’s artefact, allowing its passengers to narrowly escape from death after being thrown inside the magma in «Guryuu-en Great Volcano». In return, it was broken to the level of bring majorly damaged.



Lying above the floating submarine while it was being swept by the waves, with both hands at the back of his head was Hajime sporting an extremely satisfied look. His artificial left arm that was melt after being attacked by the beam and unable to move properly had been fixed using the material from the submarine and returned to its original form. However, the gimmicks installed couldn’t be used.



“… Hajime, how’s your condition?”



While dozing off cradled by the warm sunlight and the rocking wave, the hatch behind him suddenly opened. Yue popped her head out and asked his about his condition worriedly. It was because Hajime had received huge damage from the beam, and because of the beam’s toxin, the wound doesn’t easily recover.



“There’s no problem at all. All the wounds are already closed. But I feel it will need at least another day for a complete recovery… More importantly, how’s the thing on Yue’s side? You are considerably exhausted, right?



“Nn… I am okay. Shia gave me her blood after all.”



Hajime’s words of worries were joyfully answered by Yue who got out from the hatch and came Hajime’s side, who was lying down, in all fours. Thus, with an extremely natural movement, she laid on top of Hajime. Her soft butt was pressing up against Hajime and stimulated him in a really bad place.



“… Yue-san, why did you get on top of me?”



“… Because Hajime is there.”



Although the answer was just like a certain mountaineer, Yue’s gaze was serious. Next, Hajime was attacked with a muttered, “… stay like that,” concealed with bewitchment as she flop her body. She licked Hajime’s neck, bit him, and licked the blood that flowed out.



“… Nn, almost all of the toxin has disappeared. It seems like there’s no need to worry.”



Apparently, she licked the Hajime’s blood to confirm how much the beam’s toxin remained.



“Didn’t I say there’s no problem at all?”



“… Nn. But, I can’t help but worry. Our current location is also problem… But I am glad Hajime can rest easy.”



“Well yeah. It was a truly rapid development. I don’t know whether we are lucky or unlucky…”



Hajime, who was smiling wryly, made Yue frowned with furrowed eyebrows, troubled. The two recalled how they got swallowed by the magma in «Guryuu-en Great Volcano», drifting until they got to where they were at now, in the vast ocean. They had suffered a lot of misfortune that could be lamented on along the way, but it was a happy and lucky thing that they survived. A kind of delicate mindset.



After they were thrown into the magma and drifted underground, Hajime’s party were exposed to the swift current for one full day. Because they couldn’t always use the attracting force of Yue’s “Absolute Calamity” to control the position of their bodies, Hajime somehow managed to create gravity stone using Creation magic, producing floating seat after much trial and error inside the stormy submarine. So, although the submarine kept producing sound just like a toy crashing into walls, the floating seat somehow managed to keep them away from a shaker-like situation.



Following that, with Yue and Shia clinging on his right and left, he spent the sleepless time lighted by the faint light of Green Light stone.



‘Could it be we are going straight into the planet’s mantle?’ Hajime began to question accompanied with cold sweat. However, their underground travel onto the unknown finally ended. Hajime’s party was attacked by the biggest impact they had felt until now. The tremendous impact broke through the defense of “Vajra” and damaged the submarine. Along with the impact, the submarine was blown away with tremendous speed.



Hurriedly reactivating “Vajra” after the intense impact, Hajime questioned what happened and used the remote camera function from “Farsight stone” installed even in the Cross Bit to confirm the surrounding. Following that, the spectacle that entered his view was not the red world filled by magma, but magma writhing like a snake and greatly boiling the rampaging “sea.”



Apparently, Hajime’s party was blown away by the so called phreatomagmatic explosion when they spouted from a submerged volcano. The impact damaged the hull, but fortunately the water didn’t flood in, or maybe it should be said as expected of Hajime’s artifact.



Narrowly escaping from death, Hajime’s party was relieved to be able to return to the surface, but their suffering continued.



After being dumbfounded from turning round and round by the eruption, and then thrown out into the sea, the party immediately regained the control of the submarine and began their sailing. Both wings and stern were seriously damaged, but it was possible to sail by supplying the submarine with magic power. There was no problem other than the fuel consumption rate was overwhelmingly worse compared to when the screw, wings, and stern could be used.



Because it wouldn’t be able to endure another eruption, Hajime’s party hurriedly moved away, but a gigantic shadow followed the orca-shaped submarine. It was a gigantic squid-like creature. With length reaching 30 meters, and with more than 30 wriggling tentacles, its appearance was similar to a sea monster, the Kraken.



The monster mercilessly attacked the submarine. Twined by tentacles, the submarine was about to be crunched by sharp fangs that in the middle of its mouth. However, the monster was repelled by the submarine’s weapon (torpedo) and Yue’s magic.



Nevertheless, it didn’t end even after they repelled the Kraken-like monster. This time, they were attacked by a flock of sharks. The sharks were a kind of demonic beast, annoying enemies that cooperated while shooting out water tornados.



In the end, the ammunition inside the submarine was depleted and they could only rely on Yue’s magic. It was a situation where Yue used the magic power stocked inside Magic-crystallization stone and sucked Shia’s blood, since Hajime had already loss a large amount of blood. They somehow managed to get away while repelling the sharks, but they fought in «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» before so Hajime’s party had indeed exhausted all of their energy. Although Shia didn’t really do anything, she collapsed from anemia due to offering her blood to Yue because it was “the least” she could do.



Letting Yue and Shia rest, Hajime moved the submarine to the surface. They were in a location where there was only the sea and blue sky as far as the eye could reach, so they advanced towards the continent. Then, after sailing for half a day, due to calm climate and wave, Hajime halted the sub and rested, basking in the sunlight outside the sub.



The development from conquering «Guryuu-en Great Volcano» until the present time was truly a rapid one. No matter what, it could be said that other people except Hajime’s party wouldn’t have any possibility of surviving at all. It was alright for Hajime to unconsciously want to shout “What a bad luck!” like a certain user of gender-equal punch.



“How’s Shia?”



Although he was looking at the distance, Hajime asked Yue who’s currently seated on top of him.



“… She is still sleeping. I drank a lot… so she probably won’t wake up for a while.”



Yue’s reason was that the amount converted to magic power wasn’t as efficient compared to when she sucked Hajime’s blood. It was because the amount converted was several times more from Hajime, her partner of “Blood Pact,” than Shia who wasn’t. After picking the partner for “Blood Pact,” the effect of “Blood Conversion” from other people lowered while the effect became several times bigger if it was her contracted partner.



“I see. Well, it’s better for her to rest now. Anyway, we don’t know our current location much less about the time needed to reach the continent. We also don’t know what will happen so it is better to take our time to recover.”



“…Nn.”



The sea was at the west of the continent, so they only needed to head for the east to reach the continent. There was no problem because they could create water from magic and catch fish for meals. Things like fishes wouldn’t be able to escape from the submarine and magic, so even though they were in the middle of the vast ocean, it wasn’t a situation to be panicked about. Also, as long as they can confirm their location using the star at night, they could determine the course towards the continent. As such, they rested when they should.



The warm sunlight and breeze made Hajime relaxed. Watching Hajime with narrowed eyes, Yue…



“… Yue-san. What are you doing?”



“… Making Hajime energetic.”



Before he was aware of it, Yue exuded a bewitching aura and moved slowly. She seemed to want to energize him. But although she didn’t say which part, when Hajime saw Yue’s blurred eyes, he didn’t even think of resisting.



“Ngh… fufu, Hajime has become energetic.”



“… Wait, to do it in the middle of the ocean… Well, if it was me from half a year ago, I wouldn’t even imagine it.”



In the place they felt safe about while they were glad to be alive, Hajime and Yue showed each other’s body. For a while, the submarine was shaken by something other than the small waves.



* * *



“Seems you’ve been enjoying yourselves…”



After being refreshed from various ways, they returned inside the submarine and were stared at by Shia.



“Ng? You are awake, eh. How’s your condition?”



“Acting as if nothing happened, but I am thankful for the worry. My drowsiness was blown away thanks to the intense shaking, the very entranced voices, and those fresh sounds. My physical condition is excellent from energy converted from emptiness and loneliness. Yeah, with this, I will be attacked, too, or so I thought.”



“I see, then that’s good.”



Hajime was truly glad that Shia recovered, but since he didn’t show any feelings of guilt, it made Shia, “Uu~,” groaned with teary eyes. Her appearance made Hajime thought he ignored her too much. Smiling wryly, he told her to make space and sat beside her.



Waking up without anyone inboard and hearing the sounds of Hajime and Yue making love from the opened hatch, made Shia truly lonely, and thus she hugged Hajime who sat beside her, tightly. Yue also sat by Shia’s side, not Hajime’s, and patted Shia’s head to comfort her.



While the two were comforting Shia, Hajime supplied his magic power to start the submarine, advancing to the east. From time to time, they were attacked by demonic beasts, but were repulsed by Yue’s magic, and they advanced for one full day. Having advanced through under the starry sky, Hajime finally caught the sight of land when the morning sunshine brightened the world.



According to the position of the stars they saw last night, the party was currently located in the north of Elisen. As such, as long as they moved towards the left side over the land, they would surely come to see the harbor along with Elisen and «Guryuu-en Great Desert».



Relieved from seeing land, they advanced south for two days.



When the sun reached the zenith on the second day, the party stopped the submarine to take a break, and had lunch above the submarine while being swayed by the wave. The menu was of course the fishes they caught in the sea. Using “Lightning-clad” to roast the food, made him recalled the time he was in the abyss. The party didn’t have any cooking utensil or any seasoning because the “Treasure Box” was entrusted to Tio.



Even so, the fish the three happily ate while absentmindedly watching the horizon was quite the delish. The location and atmosphere were compensating for the seasoning. Those who lived in the sea, or opened a stall during a festival, all of them were uses this kind of compensation.



And when Shia was enjoying the roasted unknown fish, her rabbit-ears suddenly stood straight then began to move restlessly. Following that, “Nn?,” Hajime also noticed a presence of something. Filling his mouth with a fish of about 60 centimeters in length, he moved his gaze.



Surrounding the submarine, zoom!, several people appeared from inside the sea and thrust their tridents. There were about 20 people. All of them have emerald green hair and ears that looked like fan-shaped fin. By their looks, they were a group of Sea-dweller tribe. Their eyes were overflowed with caution and dangerously narrowed.



Among them, a man faced Hajime with thrust spear and asked him.



“Who are you? Why are you here? And what’s the thing you are riding on?”



Hajime was busy chewing the fish that filled his mouth to the point of his cheeks swelling. He didn’t plan on opposing them, so he wanted to answer quickly, but unfortunately the fish he was currently eating was chewy and large. It took time before he could swallow it.



Hajime took a serious pose, but considering how he calmly ate his meal even though spears were pointed at him while being surrounded, made others see him as nothing but an impudent fellow.



Veins appeared on the forehead of the man who asked him. Anyhow, even if they had their doubts, it was too much for them to be this menacing after finding humans in the sea. Shia thought of breaking the volatile situation by answering in the place of Hajime.



“Ah, umm, please calm down. We are…”



“Silent! A Rabbitman tribe like you should not open your mouth!”



The Rabbitman tribe’s position was low even among Demi-human race outside of the Sea of Trees. How they were strangely agitated and how they stubbornly wanted Hajime, who was looking down on them (from their POV), to answer them might also be a factor. Changing the target of his spear, the man grandly thrust the spear at Shia.



The attack of a Sea-dweller tribe would not pass through Shia’s defense with her strengthened body; the thrust spear would only shallowly cut Shia’s cheek even if she didn’t dodge it. The man probably wanted to slightly hurt her to give Hajime a warning. As expected, the party felt it was abnormal. After all, the Sea-dweller tribe wasn’t this fierce.



However, that was a bad move no matter what their circumstances were. No matter, if it was for a warning, Hajime would not let go those who tried to hurt Shia.



In a moment, huge killing intent and pressure poured down like a huge cataract, spreading on the sea’s surface like a ripple, causing rough waves.



BOOOOM!!!



With his eyes opened wide, the man who was staring at Hajime’s sudden change was, blown away from his spot, accompanied by a loud sound. He bounced several times on the surface of the sea, flew while spinning, and finally sank into the sea.



With dumbfounded expressions, the remaining Sea-dweller tribe’s members moved their gaze from the blown man to Hajime who somehow was gripping the tail of a large, roasted fish with a pose of someone having done a full golf’s swing.



The splashing sea water was sparkling as it reflected the sunlight. Even the eyes of the dead fish were somehow shining.



“Wh-, wh-.”



The Sea-dweller tribe’s members were flustered.



Shouldering the somewhat eaten fish, Hajime glared at the man beside the blown away man. Needless to say, having received a pressure he never felt before, the man of Sea-dweller tribe thrust his spear while shouting as he panicked from being glared by Hajime.



“ZeeAAh!!”



Even in all of the man’s life until now, it was an attack that satisfied him the most. Having premonition of death, he instinctively did a sure-kill attack. However, the sure-kill attack pierced into the mouth of the white eyed fish and was easily stopped.



“Eh? What? H-How…”



When Hajime swung the fish, the man was dumbfounded after seeing the unbelievable spectacle, and thus the spear was easily snatched. The swinging momentum made the spear fly out from the fish’s mouth, directly hitting the face of another person of Sea-dweller tribe. Leering at the person from Sea-dweller tribe who groaned as the blood gushed out from his bleeding nose, Hajime once again swung fish.



The man whose spear was taken and thrown away had cramped cheeks because of the nonsensical scene of the white-eyed fish approaching his face with its opened mouth and somehow shining in bright red.



Then,



BAM!!!



“Hmmm?!”



He was blown away just like the man earlier.



“Munch, munch… gulp… Now then, I actually don’t want to fight against the Sea-dweller tribe. As such, why don’t we calm down and have a talk here? However, indeed I can’t stay silent if someone tries to hurt my companion… Ah, the people blown away wouldn’t die because I held back, okay?”



With the limp fish in one hand, which lost its shine, Hajime proposed after deactivating his “Pressure.” Hajime himself didn’t really want to fight the Sea-dweller tribe’s people who were of the same tribe as Myuu. Although the other side tried to kill him, he actually didn’t even see them as a neighbourhood uncle (totally ignoring them).



However, the Sea-dweller tribe didn’t seem to accept his proposal. It was because their pride seemed to have been damaged by Hajime who looked down at them expressing “you are not even my match” even though humans were at a disadvantageous position in the sea, and he had blown away their comrades even though he said they didn’t die.



Moreover, because of their abnormally high alert against the human race, they could not trust Hajime’s words at all. We must not let our guards down! They took distance from Hajime’s party, and took a stance ready to throw the short harpoons on their backs.



“I see. It’s not enough to kidnapping that child, huh? That’s why you come here again to kidnap other children of ours?”



“We won’t give you the time to cast any magic! The sea is our territory, don’t think you can return unhurt!”



“We will make you spit that child’s location even if we need to chop your limbs!”



“Don’t worry. We will keep you alive until we hand you over to the Kingdom. Your safety isn’t guaranteed though.”



It seemed to be an abnormal situation. Rather than being cautious, strong grudge could be seen lodged in their eyes. Hajime somehow understood the cause of their agitation from the words “kidnap other children.” These people were likely to have misunderstood him as the one who kidnapped Myuu. Riding on unknown transportation and taking along a slave from Rabbitman tribe while wandering around the territory of Sea-dweller tribe… It wasn’t so strange for a human like him to be misunderstood.



The Demi-human race held a very strong unity and affection towards their race. It was certainly so for their own race, but it was even stronger among their own tribe. Haulia tribe went out of the Sea of Trees just for Shia, while the Bearman tribe ignored the decision of the Chiefs’ conference to take revenge on the one who injured their chief. Even the Sea-dweller tribe wasn’t any different. Any children of their tribe are important, even they weren’t their own.



Secretly, Hajime was sulking a little as he complained, “Even if she doesn’t go her way to treat me as her father, she has these people treat her like their daughter, eh.” The mutter mixed with a wry smile was aimed at Myuu who wasn’t here. Following that, Hajime tried to say Myuu’s name to solve the misunderstanding.



“Ah~, you know, about that kidna-…”



“Get ’em!!”



However, faster than his words, the Sea-dweller tribe began to throw the harpoons one after another. Even though the lower half of their bodies was underwater, treading on it, the harpoons were flying with a considerable speed and indeed they were aimed at the shoulders or feet, and not to kill them. In thoroughness, they were also stabbing the submarine which shook it intensely.



If it was a normal human, he would have his balance broken and would either be pierced by the harpoons from being unable of taking evasive maneuver or fall into the sea and suppressed by the Sea-dweller tribe. Well, if it was a normal human.



“”Wave Castle.””



With Yue’s mutter, the sea water compressed as it surged, obstructing the harpoons coming from all directions. Following that, while the Sea-dweller tribe were still astonished by the non-chanted magic, Yue made around 20 thunder balls floating around her.



At the same time the sound of upsurge seawater had literally became a rampart, returned to normal. The people of Sea-dweller tribe witnessed the floating and sparkling thunderballs around Yue.



“Kh!? R-Retreaaatt!!”



A scream of order rang out. The paled tribe members panicky turned on their heels to run away. However, they were too slow.



Fwoosh!! Bzz! BZzz! BzZZzz!!



Each of the thunder balls flew towards a different direction, not letting even one of the Sea-dweller tribe away… mildly electric shocked them. “ABABABABABABABAh,” such a scream could be heard from them. After a while, the 21 people of Sea-dweller tribe were floating on the surface.



“Yue, cheers for the good work.”



“Nn… Hajime, about the thing these people were saying.”



“Well, it must be about Myuu.”



“A lot of things happened even when we were going to Elisen. As expected of Hajime-san. Not even having the time spent in a town, a problem had already appeared…”



“Please stop, Shia. I am actually a little worried about that, too… damnit. There should’ve been no problem here if Myuu was here…”



Hajime was sighing while he worried about it. Then, for the time being, he moved to gather the people of Sea-dweller tribe’s drowned bodies.



* * *



After he instantly remodelled the sub by making a carrier where he put the afro-haired, white-eyed people of Sea-dweller tribe, the party continued their voyage.



Yue effectively weakened one of the thunders, which made the person immediately awake. That person guided the party into the harbor after they explained the situation to him.



At first, because Hajime knew Myuu’s name and characteristics the man said, ‘So you are the culprit after all!’, as he raged. However, Hajime was already irritated, so he expressionlessly slapped him until the man calmed down, and the man heard the party’s story after being disciplined.



Following that, when the party told him Myuu was currently in Ancadi and will immediately returned to Elisen. The man asked the party to allow him to tag along with them to Ancadi. For the man, he could not just swallowed Hajime’s party’s story without any proof, so he wanted to go along with the party to Ancadi to at least find a clue about Myuu.



Beside the young man before them who was guiding them, the people who previously were bellowing at Hajime were those who directly knew Myuu. Myuu’s mother was also injured when Myuu was kidnapped, thus these people were becoming emotional. And, because he would feel awkward when he reunites with Myuu after having beaten up her acquaintances, Hajime reluctantly accepted the young man’s request.



Following that, after advancing on the sea for a few hours,



“Ah, Hajime-san! It has come into view! The town is! Finally, a place with people!”



“Nn? Ohh, it really is in the middle of the sea, eh.”



Shia was pointing at «Elisen» with sparkling eyes and said to Hajime. Moving his gaze, indeed a big town floating above the sea had come into his view.



Hajime moved the submarine towards the place with a lot of protruding piers. After leering at the Sea-dweller tribe, human tourists and merchants who became pop-eyed after seeing Hajime riding on an unknown vessel, the party moored at a vacant spot.



The people of the Sea-dweller tribe came before the party, witnessed the tens of unconscious people of Sea-dweller tribe on the submarine’s carrier, and raised a commotion. However, Hajime thought it would be okay because he had explained the situation to the young man, so for the time being, he and the young man unloaded the fainted people onto the pier.



After they did that, fully-armed people of Sea-dweller tribe and human soldiers had already crowded in. The young man took a step forward to explain the situation and began to talk like a big shot. Hajime had wanted to quickly return to Ancadi and meet Kaori’s group so when he watched the young man, he became irritated and said inwardly, “Just decide who will travel with us already!”



Hajime wanted this to end peacefully, but it indeed couldn’t be that smooth. Pushing aside the young man who was confused, the soldiers rushed to the party. Hajime’s party were surrounded without a place to escape on the small pier.



“Be obedient. Let us restrain you until we can clarify the truth.”



“Oi, oi, didn’t you hear the story?”



“Of course. And it is better if we are the one who go to confirm it. There’s no need for you to go.”



Words without any chance of refusal. Hajime became even more irritated, but he controlled himself because here was Myuu’s hometown.



“Listen here. Our companions are waiting for us there. But, even though we want to immediately head to Ancadi, didn’t we come all the way here to return those who mistakenly attacked us?”



“Regardless if it was a misunderstanding or not… even if the kidnapped child is indeed in Ancadi, you’re suspicious because you wandered around Elisen’s territory on an unidentified vessel. There’s no saying you won’t run away on our way to Ancadi, right?”



“What’s with this situation this time? If we want to run away, we can just annihilate these people and escape right after that.”



“There’s also that point. But, it didn’t change that you entered our jurisdiction without permission. Furthermore, you attacked the vigilante corps that discovered you, there’s no way we can release you that easily.”



“It was them who didn’t listen to us and attacked due to their agitation. Even so, you think we would obediently let you restrain us? … just cut it out already.”



Hajime’s eyes narrowed dangerously. The man who seemed to be the leader of the soldiers before him was frowning from the heavy aura overflowing from Hajime.



On the leader’s chest was the badge with Herrlicht Kingdom’s crest, surmising that he was the commander of the regiment sent under pretext of the Kingdom’s protection. Among the Sea-dweller tribe, there were people who might be from the vigilante corps, and they didn’t back away even though they were taken aback by Hajime’s aura.



For Hajime, this place was Myuu’s hometown and he didn’t want any problem in Elisen since he thought it was likely to become the party’s base because they would surely take time to search «Meljeene Bottom Sea Ruin», whose location was unknown. It was the truth that Myuu was in Ancadi, and he understood the suspicion could be solved. However, Hajime’s hostility to the injustice in this world could be called a conditioned reflex. As such, he wouldn’t easily accept this.



It was a truly explosive situation.



Within the raised tension, Hajime thought that he must not rampaging in Myuu’s hometown, and by the time he wanted to concede,



“Nn? Just now…”



With her rabbit-ears moving about, Shia began to look around the sky. Hajime didn’t look away from the commander and asked, “What is it?” However, before Shia could answer him, Hajime also felt a small presence and voice.



“—!”



“Ah? What?”



“—pa— !”



“Oy, it can’t be!?”



“—Papaa~!”



Hajime hurriedly looked up and somehow a small shadow was falling from the empty sky!



With arms spread, the shadow that was free falling full of smile was…



“Myuu-!?”



That’s right, it was Myuu. Myuu was skydiving. Without parachute. Looking carefully, behind her was the black dragonform of Tio, who was hurriedly descending, and riding on her back was Kaori who was also in a panic.



As soon as he recognized the falling shadow was Myuu, Hajime activated “Aerodynamic” and “Ground Shrinker.” He immediately jumped from his spot, ignoring the pier that was blown by the impact and the soldiers screaming as they fell into the sea.



Hajime that had instantly jumped for more than 100 meters in height thanks to “Aerodynamic,” to jump towards the place Myuu was going to fall through, and activated “Light Speed.” Inside the slowed down world, he made sure Myuu was in his arms, and he fell with a regulated, miracle-like speed, perfectly nulled any kind of shock.



With Myuu in his embrace, Hajime used “Aerodynamic” to hop and bounced until he reached the ground. Inwardly, the cold sweat was flowing like a waterfall.



“Papa-!”



Without even knowing a shred of what Hajime was thinking, Myuu rubbed her face on Hajime’s chest with a smiling face. Perhaps, it was Tio who told her Hajime was right under them.



Thus, although he didn’t know whether it was accidental or perhaps deliberated, she fell towards Hajime. Seeing how she was smiling as she fell, there’s no mistake she believed Hajime would surely catch her.



Even so, it took an extraordinary courage to do a free-fall with a full smiling face. Restrain yourself!Hajime retorted at the four year old child in his mind. Hajime was frowning as he thought of scolding her. But when they got to the ground, he patted Myuu.





Volume 10 Chapter 1




“Hic, sob, hic.”



A sobbing sound of a young girl resounding nearby the pier that had turned into wreckage. The onlookers and soldiers were crowding there, but there was not even a clamor, and the place was strangely quiet.



It was because of the should be kidnapped girl of Sea-dweller tribe who flew down from the sky, the human boy who jumped into the sky and caught her, and there was the black dragon with a girl riding on its back in the sky. However, the biggest reason was how the boy greatly scolded the girl from Sea-dweller tribe. Well, actually, it was how the young girl called the boy who scolded her.



“Sob, Papa, sorry…”



“Promise me you won’t do anything that dangerous again, okay?”



“Un, Myuu will.”



“Okay, that’s good. Come here.”



“Papaa~!”



The figures of Hajime, who was on one knee as he scolded the young child, and Myuu, who obediently reflected as she scolded by him though she cried then and jumped into Hajime’s chest when she was forgiven… were as normal as that of a father and his child. It was also shown by how Myuu repeatedly called him “Papa.”



The situation where the should’ve been kidnapped child of Sea-dweller tribe “adoring” a human boy enough to treat him as her father, and how Hajime treated Myuu as his own daughter made everyone dumbfounded, not understanding what had happened. Their minds were asking the same thing. Which was, “How did it come to this?”



Hajime lifted Myuu with his arm and patted her back to calm her, and finally, the surrounding people returned to their senses and began to cause a great commotion.



As he leered at the clamoring, perplexed people, Hajime patted Myuu’s back and someone hugged him from behind… when he looked over his shoulder, there was Kaori’s figure whose head was on his shoulder, slightly trembling.



“I’m glad… I am really glad~, hic, hic.”



This time, Kaori had begun to cry. Even though she acted firm, inside, she was worried Hajime might be dead. She believed in Hajime’s survival, but there was no way she didn’t feel worried about him. That added to how he went missing for the second time shortly after they finally met again, enduring it was impossible for her



“I am sorry to make you worry. But as you can see, I am full of life here. That’s why, please don’t cry… if Kaori cry… I will be imensely troubled.”



“Uh, hic, th-then, let me stay like this for a little more…”



Troubled, Hajime patted Kaori’s head whose hands were wrapped around his arm. However, maybe because she couldn’t stop crying, Kaori buried her face more and more into Hajime’s shoulder. Both of her hands were now tightly embracing around Hajime’s stomach from behind.



“Oi, you, explain what are yo-gah!?”



“Muh? Sorry.”



The above was the commander-like person who was dripping wet due to being blown away into the seas as the consequence of Hajime’s jump. He didn’t read the mood and tried to question Hajime. However, he was knocked by Tio (deactivated her Dragonform when she landed) who was running in short steps towards Hajime, thus the man once again fell into the sea.



Not minding the man that much, Tio came beside Hajime, held his head and pressed it into her cleavage.



“What the—!? Oi, Tio.”



“This one believes, thou know? This one believes… even so, Master… too much time hath passed until this reunion.”



When Hajime quietly looked at Tio’s face from her cleavage, her expression was one of ascerting her important one inside her arms with tears accumulated on the edges of her eyes. This time, Hajime felt it couldn’t be helped and let her do as she pleases because he had relied on her to do something unreasonable.



While that happened, Myuu said, “Myuu will hug Papa too~,” and she clung to Hajime’s nape. Shia, who was beside Yue, who was beside Hajime, began to hug his free arm.



The surrounding gazes couldn’t even see Hajime, as his whole body was covered by a beautiful little girl, beautiful girls, and a beautiful woman. The surrounding gazes were gradually changing from one of perplexion to one of looking at them warmly. Even the agitated vigilante corps and soldiers had lowered their arms, dumbfounded.



“You people… not only once, but twice… I will arrest you for obstructing the Kingdom’s soldiers’ work.”



Once again crawled up onto the pier, the commander-like person was angrily glaring at Hajime’s party. With weapon in hand, he seemed to be ready to attack at any moment. Though Hajime couldn’t be thought of as the kidnapper from how the kidnapped Myuu was abnormally too attached him, there were too many unknown things about him, so of course the man wanted to question him.



Ever Hajime since the beginning had wanted to explain that he was entrusted by the head of Fhu-ren’s guild branch, Ilwa, to escort Myuu. However, he was troubled as he had nothing to prove that, but now it was at hand.



With “Treasure Box” returned by Tio, Hajime took out his status plate and the request form from Ilwa, then he presented them to the commander.



“… Let me see… a “Gold” rank!? Moreover, a direct request from the head of Fhuren’s branch!?”



Other than the request form, there was also the letter from Ilwa where the details were written. It was addressed to the Elisen’s mayor and the top brass of the soldiers who resided in this town, the man before the party. After reading the letter intently, the commander spated a big sigh and after he hesitated a little, he gave up as he drooped his shoulder then saluted.



“… The request has been completed. Nagumo-dono.”



“It is good that all doubts have been cleared. You must have things that you want to ask, but we are in a hurry. So I want you to not ask anything because… I want to let this child meet her mother right now. It’s okay, right?”



“Of course it is. However, as a soldier of this Kingdom… I can’t overlook about the dragon, you jumping, and the ship-like thing from before.”



Radically changing from the previous oppressive manner, the commander’s attitude became one which paid Hajime with respect. Even so, he appealed with his strong gaze to Hajime that it was impossible to overlook those.



“About that, can we just talk about it in another time? I am going to stay in this Elisen for a while, after all. I also think there’s no need to report about it to the kingdom because they probably already know about it…”



“Mm, I see. Anyway, it’s good as long as we can have a chance to talk. Now please return that child to her mother… does she know of her mother’s condition?”



“No, she doesn’t. But it’s okay. After all, we have the best medicine and healer here.”



“I see. Then let me question you once things are settled.”



The commander lastly introduced himself as Saluz, then he went to control the crowd by dispersing the onlookers. A dutiful person.



The people who know Myuu seemed to want to call out to her, but Hajime used his gaze to stop them because much time would pass before she returns to her mother if they did that.



“Papa, Papa. We are returning to home. Mama is waiting! Myuu wants to meet Mama.”



“Of course… so let’s hurry and meet her.”



Pulling Hajime’s hand, Myuu urged on with “Hurry, hurry!” It had been around two months since the last time she returned to her house and mother. So it couldn’t be helped. Though she was usually laughing as she was taken care of by Hajime’s party on their way, at night when the time to sleep came, she wanted to be spoiled because she indeed missed her mother.



On their way to Myuu’s house, with Myuu as their guide, Kaori came close to him and asked him with a small, uneased voice.



“Hajime-kun. About what the soldier from before said…”



“Well, it doesn’t seem to be life threatening. It’s just that her wound is rather severe and it’s also the physiological one… well there’s no need to worry about the latter with Myuu being here. So please check her injury.”



“Un. Leave it to me.”



While having that kind of conversation, they heard a commotion from the road ahead. It was the voice of a young woman and several voices of men and women.



“Lemia, calm down! It’s impossible with the condition of your legs!”



“That’s right, Lemia-chan. Myuu-chan will surely come back!”



“I don’t want to! Didn’t you say Myuu have come back!? Then, I must go to see her! I need to welcome her!”



Apparently, the woman tried to get out of the house, and she was stopped by several men and women. It was likely because an acquaintance had told Myuu’s mother of her return.



With the resounding of the frantic voice of the woman called Lemia, Myuu’s face bloomed and shone. Then, as loud as she could, she called out to the woman in her mid twenties, who had collapsed at the entrance door, while running.



“Mama~~!!”



“—!? Myuu!? Myuu!”



Running with all her might and with an expression full of smile Myuu jumped into the bosom of the woman — her mother, Lemia, who tried to steady her legs before the front door.



Seeing the figures of a mother closely and tightly embracing her daughter, expressing she didn’t want to be separated again from her child made the surrounding people look at them warmly.



For so many, many times Lemia repeatedly said, “I am sorry,” to Myuu. It was either because she had lost sight of Myuu or her incapability to come looking for her or may both.



Tears fell as Lemia both feel relieved from her daughter’s safety and also the grief from being incapable of protecting hear. Looking at Lemia with anxious eyes, Myuu gently patted her mother’s head.



“It’s okay. Mama, Myuu is here. So there’s nothing to worry.”



“Myuu…”



Never did she thought she would be comforted by her four year old daughter, so Lemia’s teary eyes unconsciously wide opened and she watched Myuu.



Myuu was also looking straight at Lemia and there’s indeed worry about Lemia lodged inside her eyes. Myuu was a mama’s girl and couldn’t stand being alone before she was kidnapped, and although she also had painful times herself, she was more brokenhearted about her mother than herself in this reunion.



Surprised by that, Lemia was unconsciously watching Myuu in seriousness which made Myuu smiled, and this time she was the one who hugged Lemia tightly. Lemia wasn’t that badly injured both in body and mind, but she was suffering from the sleepless night, overly worrying about Myuu, but it seemed her daughter had returned all grown up more than before.



This fact made Lemia inadvertently raised a wry smile. With her shoulders relaxed and her tears stopped, Lemia was looking at her daughter with eyes filled with love.



Myuu and Lemia once again hugged each other, but suddenly, Myuu raised a scream-like voice.



“Mama! Your legs! What happened!? Are you injured!? Is it hurt!?”



Apparently, Myuu noticed the state of Lemia’s legs from over Lemia’s shoulder. Both of her feet peeking from Lemia’s long skirt were bandaged all over, they were in a miserable state.



This was the thing Saluz talked about, and it was what Hajime’s party heard from the young man on their way to Elisen. The thing that made the Sea-dweller tribe agitated was not only was Myuu kidnapped, but also how her mother was seriously injured that it became impossible for her to walk.



Though Myuu said she was kidnapped when she was separated from Lemia, the Sea-dweller tribe wouldn’t be able to say it was a kidnapping unless there’s an eyewitness. They were able to declare so because it seemed Lemia had actually encountered the kidnappers.



Lemia had discovered suspicious men erasing their footprints in the sand near the coast when she was looking for Myuu when she got separated from her. Though she felt a bad premonition, she approached the men to ask whether they know her daughter… the men’s faces were expressing “Oh shit” and began to chant all of a sudden.



Convinced the men had a part on Myuu’s disappearance, Lemia tried to somehow get Myuu back, running along the footprints.



However, one of the men fought back by firing flame bullets. Fortunately, she avoided being hit on her upper body but her legs were hit instead, then she was blown into the sea by the impact. Lemia lost her consciousness from both the pain and impact. When she woke up, she was being helped by the people from vigilante corps who went looking for her because she have not returned.



Her life was saved, but as the time passed, Lemia still couldn’t feel her legs, thus she became unable to walk nor to swim. Naturally, Lemia tried to search for her daughter, but she couldn’t due to her legs. In the end, she could do nothing but to leave it to the vigilante corps and the Kingdom.



Lemia was in a state where she couldn’t even stand properly now.



Lemia smiled to try not to make her daughter worry more than this, so she tried telling Myuu, “It’s okay.” However, faster than her, Myuu asked for help from her “Papa” whom she depended on the most in this world.



“Papaa! Please help Mama! Mama’s legs are injured!”



“Eh!? M-Myuu? Just now…”



“Papa! Hurryy!”



“Ara? Arara? You said Papa? Myuu, who is this Papa?”



Confused, lot of “?”s floated above Lemia’s head. The surrounding people were also clamoring. A lot of absurd remarks were flying from here and there such as:



“Lemia… has remarried? No… NO WAY.”



“Finally, Lemia-chan’s spring has arrived again! Congratulation!”



“It’s lie, right? Someone, please tell me it is a lie… My Lemia-san…”



“Papa… Myuu said Papa!? Isn’t it me!?”



“I am sure it is someone with stage name like Ku***ngpapa, yup, it must be it.”



“Oi, time for an emergency conference! All members of “Watching Lemia-san and Myuu-chan warmly” gather now! Storm is coming!”



Apparently, Lemia and Myuu, this mother and daughter were popular here. Lemia was still young, in the mid of her twenties. Although she was considerably emaciated now, she had a well-sculpted looks similar to Myuu’s. It was easy to imagine how attention grabbing her beauty would be once she was recovered, so it was understandable for her to be popular.



With the commotion that kept growing, Hajime’s expression cramped expressing, “I don’t want to go there now.” Though he thought these people would understand once he explained the details about how Myuu came to call Hajime papa, he was just a “substitute (though inwardly they didn’t think so)” of her Papa, and he wasn’t aiming to marry Lemia, but the current misunderstanding were growing at an uncontrollable pace.



However, Hajime thought it was a godsend. After all, Hajime and his party wouldn’t be able to continue their journey unless they left Myuu to her mother. It will be a goodbye once his party conquered «Meljeene Bottom Sea Ruin». Hajime thought Myuu had come close to Hajime’s party because she was in a place away from her hometown and been forcibly separated from mother, so once she returned to her mother her desire to be by Hajime’s party’s side would surely weakened as time passed, though she would be saddened at first. The surrounding people were strongly concerned about Lemia and her daughter, so they would surely helped them.



“Papaa! Hurrry! Please help Mama!”



Myuu’s gaze was firmly looking at where Hajime was, thus Lemia and the surrounding people noticed Hajime once they traced Myuu’s gaze. Hajime gave up and walked to where the mother and daughter were.



“Papa, Mama is…”



“It’s okay Myuu… I will surely heal her. So please don’t make such a tearful look.”



“Okay…”



Hajime rustled Myuu’s hair who was looking at him with tearful expression, then he moved his gaze to Lemia. Lemia was watching Hajime, dumbfounded. While thinking it couldn’t be helped for her to do that, Hajime decided to carry her into the house to heal her because his appearance had made the commotion grow we more.



“I am sorry, but excuse me for a moment, okay?”



“Eh? —!? Arara?”



Hajime lifted Lemia in princess carry while looking like he didn’t feel her weight at all. Then, he carried Lemia into the house guided by Myuu. With Hajime carrying Lemia, screams and roars were raised behind them, which he ignored. Lemia herself could only blinking from being suddenly lifted and carried by Hajime.



Having entered the house, he found a sofa in the living room, so Hajime slowly lowered Lemia there. Following that, while watching the blinking Lemia who was sitting on the sofa before him, Hajime called out to Kaori.



“Kaori, how is she?”



“Let me look at her… Lemia-san, I will touch your foot. Please say if it hurts.”



“Y-Yes? Umm, what’s with this situation?”



When she thought her kidnapped daughter had suddenly returned, a man whom her daughter adored and called Papa appeared. Furthermore, unknown beautiful girls and a beautiful woman gathered in her house. Such a situation made Lemia eyebrows frowned, troubled.



While that happened, Kaori’s examination ended and she told Lamia that her damaged legs’ nerves would be able to be recovered with her healing magic.



“However, it will take some time. The damaged nerves were in delicate places, so I will need around three days for there not to have any side effects to occur. Also, I think it will be better for them to heal little by little. Although it will be inconvenient, please hang on until then because I will surely heal you.”



“Ara ara, maa maa. I had thought I wouldn’t be able to walk anymore… how can I repay you…”



“Fufu, don’t worry about it. You are Myuu-chan’s mother after all.”



“Umm, come to think of it, what is everyone’s relation to Myuu… furthermore, umm… why did Myuu call that person “Papa”…”



While Kaori immediately begin to treat Lemia’s legs, Hajime’s party decided to explain Lemia the details about things. About how they met Myuu in Fhuren, the riot, and how did Hajime came to be called Papa. Having heard everything while being treated by Kaori, Lemia deeply bowed her head in place, then repeatedly thanked them in tears.



“Truly, how can repay you for this… It is thanks to you that I was able to reunite with my daughter. I will surely repay this kindness of yours even with my life. As long as it is something I can do, whatever it is…”



Although Hajime’s party told her to not mind it, Lemia couldn’t consent not to repay the benefactors of her daughter’s life. In the mean time, the treatment from Kaori ended for today. When they told Lemia they were looking for an inn, Lemia thought it was a godsend and asked them to just use her house.



“Please at least let me do this much. Fortunately, this house is big, so there’s room for everyone. Please don’t hold back and use this house while you are staying in Elisen. Besides, Myuu will be happy with this. Right, Myuu? You are happy that Hajime-san and the others stay in our house, right?”



“? Papa is going somewhere?”



Hearing Lemia’s words, Myuu who was resting her head on Lemia’s lap woke up, blinking, she was dumbfounded. Apparently, she seemed to think it was a natural thing for Hajime to stay in her house. Her expression said she didn’t understand why Lemia asked her that question.



“I thought of putting a little distance once she returned to her own mother…”



“Ara ara, ufufu. It isn’t good for Papa to take a distance from her daughter, you know?”



“No, didn’t I explained it before? We are…”



“I know that you will continue your travel sooner or later. However, that’s why please keep being her “Papa” until that day comes. If you take a distance know, then it would be a sudden goodbye… right?”



“… Well, if you say so…”



“Ufufu, it is okay too for you to always be her “Papa”, you know? After all, I have said “with my life” before…”



Saying so, “Ufufu &#9825”, Lemia laughed with one hand on her slightly blushing cheek. Such a calming and beautiful smile would normally calmed anyone… but a blizzard generated around Hajime.



“Please don’t joke like that… the atmosphere turned cold now…”



“Ara ara, how popular. However, it is almost five years since I lost my husband… Myuu also want a Papa, right?”



“Fue? Isn’t Papa Papa?”



“Ufufu, she said it, so Papa?”



The blizzard became much more intense. Though he didn’t know whether Lemia actually notice the cold atmosphere, her calm aura made her words neither be taken as a joke nor a serious one. “That’s a good courage, you!,” was what Yue and the girls’ gazes said, which was easily warded off by Lemia with a smile along with, “Ara ara, ufufu.” She might be an unexpectedly great person.



In the end, the party decided to stay in Lemia’s house. When time to allocate the rooms, Lemia said, “Shouldn’t the husband and wife be together?” which responded with silent reply from Yue and the girls. Then, Myuu said, “Myuu will sleep with Papa and Mama,” which turned the place into a chaos, but at least it calmed down for now.



The party were going to conquer the next Great Dungeon from tomorrow onwards, so they needed to resupply and mend the broken and lost fixtures while it was also necessary for them to train on the newly acquired Age of Gods magic. However, while thinking he couldn’t neglect his few remaining time with Myuu, Hajime dozed off on the bed.



* * *



Three days after that.



How strangely short distance between Lemia and Hajime made the bloodshot glares of envy from men of Sea-dweller tribe stabbed Hajime. The neighbourhood aunties were also gossiping about Hajime and Lemia. In addition, Yue and the girls’ approach became even more intense as they became ill-humored. Yue at night was also becoming more lovely. Even so, Hajime completed the party’s preparation and about to begin to search for «Meljeene Bottom Sea Ruin».



When the time come for them to part, Myuu wore a truly lonely expression. She greatly pulled Hajime’s back hair, but he somehow managed shake her off on the pier and board the fixed submarine. Waving her hands, Myuu firmly shouted, “Papa, have a safe trip!” Following that, with an atmosphere that could neither be taken as a joking nor a serious one, Lemia waved her hand saying, “Have a safe trip, D-A-R-L-I-N-G &#9825.”



From the side, they could be seen as wife and daughter who were sending the husband off to work. Sharp glares were coming from Yue and the girls behind him and the surrounding Sea-dweller tribe. It made Hajime slightly hesitant to return here after conquering the next dungeon.





Volume 10 Chapter 2




Northwest, 300 kilometers away from?Sea Town, Elisen?.



It was the location of one of the Seven Great Dungeon, ?Meljeene Bottom Sea Ruin?, that the party once heard from Miledi Raisen.



However, the party didn’t have much time to listen to Miledi at that time, so she only told them that the “moon” must be accompanied by “Guryuu-en’s proof” without the detailed location.



And so, Hajime’s party only advanced through the vast ocean in accordance to the direction and distance they were told. However, they didn’t find anything when they searched the pointed location in the bottom of the sea during daytime. The party had thought they’d be able to find some kind of trace because it was a bottom sea ruin, but it seemed they were too naive.



The pointed location was rather shallow compared to the other place in circumference of 100 kilometers, so it must be the correct place… that was what Hajime thought.



Reluctantly, the party decided to stop the search and wait until night, when the moon has come out, as Miledi had told them. The current time was sunset. The sun was shining in red with half of itself hidden beyond the horizon, brightening the world for the last time today. The sky and sea were dyed in orange while a straight road was produced by the reflection of the sun on the sea from over the horizon.



A beautiful spectacle of nature no matter whichever world it was. Hajime was watching the setting sun on the deck of the moored submarine. Abruptly, he thought of something unbelievable, which was whether it was possible to return to Japan if he advances on the road of light leading towards the sun. He smiled wryly as he was thinking about something.



“Did something happen?”



Noticing the change in Hajime, Kaori called out to him.



Because she was taking a shower inboard a while ago, her hair was damp. No, not only Kaori. Yue, Shia, and Tio had gone up to deck before he was aware of it. Everyone had taken the shower inside the sub that Hajime took pride in. Their flushed cheeks, the damp hair stuck on their cheeks, and nape, made their figures truly captivating. The water from the shower room was set to rain right from the ceiling, so it wasn’t a problem for the four of them to shower all at once.



Incidentally, the reason why Hajime was on the deck, looking at the sunset was because of the possibility of taken into the shower room if he was careless.



When the girls were about to take the shower, Tio invited Hajime which gained approval from Kaori, Shia, and of course, Yue. Then, the four cut off the escape routes of Hajime’s refusal. Hajime, who will not embrace any other woman except Yue, had clearly said he won’t have a naked skin ship with other woman.



However, the girls ignored Hajime as they smiled. Leering at Yue who was blushing while making a flirtatious smile, Kaori and Tio who were pinning Hajime from the sides, and while Shia tried to put Hajime unconscious using Doryukken from behind. Feeling the impending danger of his body, Hajime seriously ran away and went to the deck… but, isn’t it a shame for a man to deny the placed meal before him?



Hajime thought that was a foolish question and shook his head, then he replied to Kaori.



“I am just recalling a little about Japan. After all, the scene here isn’t that much different from there.”



“… I see. Yeah, it really is. It is just like the evening sun I have seen in the sea before… somehow it makes me feel nostalgic. Though not even half a year had passed, eh.”



“That’s because the everyday here is too eventful.”



Having seated beside Hajime, Kaori was agreeing Hajime’s words while looking at the distance. She must be recalling the days she went through in Japan.



Maybe because she felt the loneliness from the conversation of the two, Yue trotted her still flushing body towards Hajime and sat on his lap. She entrusted her back to Hajime’s chest even though she must be feeling hot. Then, she began to watch Hajime right under his face.



Her eyes were obviously expressing she wanted them to let her join their conversation. Yue was feeling lonely, and at the same time she wanted to hear about Hajime’s hometown. Hajime, while inwardly knocked out by Yue’s cuteness, stretched Kaori’s cheek, who was sitting beside him, to scold her because a Hanya had appeared.



With only that, her mood became better which made Hajime felt complicated. Hajime thought, ‘Why would she do this much for someone who won’t accept her feelings…’ Though he thought of that, he won’t say it out loud. After all, it would be rude to her feelings if he did.



While he was stretching Kaori’s cheek, and at this time, Shia drew closer to him from opposite Kaori with sparkling eyes. She was obviously signaling she wanted to be cared, too. With his empty other hand, he stroked Shia’s rabbit ear. “Ehehe~,” Shia made a relaxed smile.



His back was leaned to by Tio. She didn’t demand anything in particular, just quietly sitting back to back against him. However, he understood Tio was relaxed, and she entrusted her weight to him. It was slightly unexpected, since Hajime’s only thought was to throw her into the sea if she makes a perverted demand.



Then, maybe because she felt something from Hajime’s aura, Tio’s body shuddered and trembled for a moment while her breathing turned rough…



Hajime’s party cuddled close to each other above the vast sea. It would take a while until night time came, and the moon will begin to shine. So to kill time, Hajime began to speak a little about his hometown.



Hajime’s story fascinated Yue and the other two while Kaori was supplementing him with a radiant smile. Time passed swiftly as they enjoyed the peaceful atmosphere and the sun had completely gone down to the other side of the horizon, and the moon had began to shine in its place.



Thinking it was about the time, Hajime took out the pendant which was the proof of having conquered ?Guryuu-en Great Volcano? from his breast pocket. The design of the pendant was of a woman hanging a lantern and there was a hole on the lantern, becoming hollow.



Even while staying at Elisen, Hajime had taken out the pendant and held it towards the moon, and also supplied it with magic power, but there was no change in particular.



‘Just what should be done to the moon and pendant?’, was what he thought while tilting his head. For now, Hajime tried to hold the pendant towards the moon. The moon could be seen from hole of the lantern design.



He waited for a while, but there was no change. Hajime, not understanding what to do, sighed and began to try another method.



But at that time, change appeared in the pendant.



“Waah, the light is gathering in the lantern. It’s beautiful~.”



“It is… a mysterious sight. Even though the lantern part is actually hollow…”



Shia was admiring the sight and Kaori, with shining eyes, agreed with her.



Just as the two said, the lantern part was absorbing the moonlight and light began to accumulate inside it. In accordance to that, the hollow part was filled by the light. Also becoming interested in it, Yue and Tio watched the pendant Hajime held up.



“Even though I’ve also tried it last night…”



“Hmm, Master. It might be because it won’t do if it isn’t here, right?”



It might be just as Tio guessed. Before long, the lantern finished accumulating the light and the pendant was now clad in light. At the same time, a light shot straight from the lantern, pointing to a certain location on the sea’s surface.



“… What an exquisite production. Truly different from Miledi’s.”



“It is. It really is fantasy-like, even I’m rather impressed by it.”



“Guided by the moonlight,” it was such a romance-like thing which made not only Hajime, but also Yue and the rest raised voices of admiration. The impression gained by Shia, just like Hajime and Yue, was strong as someone who had entered Miledi’s ?Miledi Great Dungeon?.



The party didn’t know how long the light would be released from the pendant’s lantern, so the submarine immediately sailed, lead by the light.



The sea at night was dark. Or maybe it would be better to say that everything was black. And even though the surface of the was still bright because of the moonlight, they were lead into the waters and thus everything instantly turned dark. The light released by the submarine and the pendant was the only thing cutting through the dark sea.



The light, passing through the glass made from front crystal (a type of sturdy and transparent ore) in front of the submarine, was pointing at the bottom of the sea.



The location pointed was the rock wall zone of the bottom of the sea. Numerous distorted rock walls were joined to form a mountain range. It was a place the party had searched during the daytime but it resulted in nothing… but when the submarine approached the rock pointed by the pendant’s light, a tremor began to generated along with a strong rumbling sound.



The sound and tremor was caused by the rock wall that began to move. One of the rock’s part was split in two, opening to the right and left like a door. The dark road lead inside was as though it was inviting one to the netherworld.



“I see… so that’s why we can’t find it no matter how much we tried. How foolish of me to think we will be able to find it if we were lucky.”



“… There’s no helping it, but it was fun.”



“Yue is right. Don’t you think it was an amazing experience to sightsee the bottom of the sea of this different world?”



Hajime’s shoulders drooped as he understood the search they did during daytime was in vain, but it seemed Yue and Kaori quite enjoyed it.



Hajime moved the submarine and the party entered the crack. The pendant’s lantern still had around half of its accumulated light, but it had stopped releasing the light. Only the submarine’s light was shining inside the dark sea now.



“Umm~, this one had thought this since hearing about the bottom sea ruin, but wouldn’t it be impossible for ordinary people to enter this labyrinth without this “submarine” thing?”



“… It’s impossible unless one using a strong barrier.”



“It will also be impossible if they can’t control the air, light, and water current at the same time, eh.”



“But, it is necessary to conquer ?Guryuu-en Great Volcano? to come here, so I think people who are capable of conquering the Great Dungeon are able to enter.



“Maybe we are supposed to use Spatial magic.”



Entering deeper on the underwater road, Hajime’s party were considering other ways to conquer this dungeon without a submarine. They were impressed by the fantastic entrance, but indeed, once they thought about it normally, unless there were several top class magic users, it was impossible to enter the dungeon. A troublesome point similar to the other Great Dungeons.



With caution, Hajime’s party watched the bottom sea through the front crystal.



And at that time,



FwwwOOOOooooosh~!!



“Uwoh!?”



“Nh!”



“Wawah!”



“Kyah!”



“What the—!?”



The side of the submarine suddenly received an impact and immediately, the submarine was thrown towards a direction. Just like the time they were thrown into the magma’s swift current, the submarine was turned around and around, but the party had already came up with a countermeasure for it. Using the gravity stone installed at the bottom of the submarine to increase the weight, the party stabilized the it.



“Uh, I don’t want to taste this twirling again~.”



Shia’s face paled as she recalled the time they got swept underground of ?Guryuu-en Great Volcano?, and shook her head to stop recalling it.



“Didn’t we recover immediately? I already said it’ll be okay from now on. But more importantly, just where does this current led to…”



While smiling wryly at such a Shia, Hajime observed the outside through front crystal. The Green Light stone’s light was circulating around the dark cave, letting him pictured the surrounding. From what he could see, the party seemed to have been swept by the current into a huge round cave.



While operating the submarine, Hajime’s party advanced by following the current. After a while, the “Farsight stone” installed in the stern caught innumerable objects shining in reddish black.



“They seem to be approaching us… Well, they are most likely demonic beasts clad in reddish black magic power, huh.”



“… Shall we?”



When Hajime muttered, Yue, who was sitting by his side, was gathering magic power in her hand, and said in gangster-like tone, but she still looked cute.



“No, let’s use weapon here. I also want to confirm their effectiveness.”



Hajime operated the gimmick on the back of the submarine. Then, numerous pet-bottle sized torpedoes that had dyed Ancadi’s Oasis in red, was launched. Hajime thoroughly painted them so they looked like smiling mischievously sharks.



Because they were inside the swift current, the torpedoes’ propulsion could only move them to a small degree, and it resulted with them scattering like sea mines.



The submarine advanced ahead ,and before long, the numerous demonic beasts clad in reddish black magic power with appearance of flying fish entered the cluster of torpedoes.



BOOoOOoooOOoom!!!



Grand explosions generated in succession from behind the submarine and a large amount of bubbles wrapped the group of flying fish-lookalike. Afterwards, the bodies of flying fish-lookalike were tore apart by the impact and the flesh and blood were scattered from inside the appearing bubbles, looking like seaweed thrown into a swift current.



“Yup, it has more power than before. The improvement is a success.”



“Uwaah~, Hajime-san. Just now, there was something with eyes of a fish being swept outside.”



“Shia, those art actually dead fishes.”



“Once again it makes me think the artifacts Hajime-kun made are a foul.”



From then on, Hajime’s party advanced while easily beating the flying fish-lookalike they frequently encountered.



They advanced without knowing how long it would be.



At that time they began to notice the sense of incompatibility of the unchanging scenery. Hajime’s party arrived at a place where the surrounding walls had been randomly destroyed. When they looked carefully, torn heads of flying fish-lookalike were placed between the rock walls with their hollow eyes looking at the sea.



“… Hmm, isn’t this the place we passed before?”



“… Seems so. Are we going in circles?”



Apparently, Hajime’s party were going in circles in an annulus ring cave. They had thought the Great Dungeon was ahead of them so they advanced, but Hajime was doubtful that he had mistaken a road here, as if it was a normal bottom sea cave. Resultantly, the party now didn’t advance according to the laid road, and carefully searched the surrounding for any clues.



As a result,



“Ah, Hajime-kun. There’s one there too!”



“With this, it is the fifth place…”



The party discovered several place inside the cave that were carved with fifty centimeters long crest of Meljeene. The carved crest of Meljeene was of pentagram with lines connected to each five points and the center was carved with crescent moon-like design. It was similar to the five places in this annulus ring cave.



For a thorough examination, Hajime’s party approached the crest they first discovered. Because they were exposed to the swift current, Hajime took care in controlling the submarine.



“Well, there are five places with pentagram, so if the remaining light inside the pendant is used…”



Muttering, Hajime took out the pendant he wore on his neck and held it before the front crystal. Then, the pendant reacted and light was released straight from the lantern. Following that, the light touched the crest and the crest shone.



“It will be disastrous for people who come here using magic… if they didn’t notice this immediately, their magic power would be depleted.”



Just as Kaori said, this RPG-like method would be too cruel for people who somehow survived only by maintaining their magic. It might be because the objective was to make them reach their limit in a different sense than ?Guryuu-en Great Volcano?.



Afterwards, three more crest in their own location was poured with light from the lantern, and the party arrived before the last crest. The light collected inside the lantern decreased when it was released to light up the crest, and the remaining light had enough for only one more usage.



Hajime held up the pendant and poured the last crest with the light, finally, a way to advance from this annulus ring cave opened. With a rumbling sound, the wall of the cave split in two.



Not much happened as the party advanced into the interior, but the water was descending right to below. Then, the submarine was wrapped with floating feeling as it was falling down.



“Ohh?”



“Nh.”



“Hyah!?”



“Nuoh.”



“Hauu!”



Respectively the five of them raised different scream. Hajime was enduring the floating feeling between his groin. Then, the submarine hit the hard ground with a roaring sound. The severe impact was transmitted into the interior, and Kaori whose body wasn’t that strong raised a groan.



“Kh… Kaori, are you okay?”



“Uhh, I-I’m okay. More importantly, here is?”



While frowning, Kaori looked at the outside through the front crystal, and unlike a while ago, the outside was not sea water but a cavity. Because there was no sign of demonic beast, Hajime’s party went outside.



Outside the submarine was a huge hemispherical space. When they looked above, there was a large hole, but they didn’t know what kind of principle caused the water’s surface to sway to and fro. Without any drop of water, it was swaying to and fro, and it was the place where Hajime’s party fallen to.



“Looks like here is the real thing. Rather than a bottom sea ruin, it is a cave though.”



“… It’s good that there isn’t water everywhere.”



Returning the submarine into “Treasure Box,” Hajime urged Yue and the others to advance into the passage they could be seen inside the cave… but he called out to Yue before the party moved.



“Yue.”



“Nn.”



With just that, Yue immediately created a barrier around them.



Momentarily, laser-like water current attacked them like meteors from above. The laser made of compressed water was similar to “Rupture” Yue used in ?Raisen Great Dungeon?. If one gets hit by it, a hole would be easily created in their body.



However, Yue’s barrier was extremely strong even if it was put cast in a hurry. As a proof, it easily blocked the incoming attack from above. Because Hajime promptly perceived the rise in magic power and killing intent, Yue who promptly answered him, the surprise attack was no longer a surprising one. Naturally, the moment Hajime called out to Yue, Shia and Tio had guessed the attack and was undisturbed by it.



However, Kaori didn’t react the same way as them.



“Kyaa!?”



The too sudden, and the intense attacks made her instinctively raised a scream. She immediately clung on Hajime who was beside her.



“I-I am sorry.”



“No, don’t mind it.”



Sneaking a glance at Hajime whom she parted from, Kaori would usually blushing here, but Kaori’s complexion didn’t look good. She seem to be a little depressed from exposing her disgraceful behavior when she clinged onto Hajime.



Also, she was once again shocked by Yue’s proficiency in magic.



When she was still with Kouki’s party, Kaori also used defense magic to assist Suzu. She trained hard, and her activation speed was not inferior to a “Barrier Master” like Suzu. Even so, when compared it to Yue, her defensive magic was child’s play.



She had felt “that” when Hajime’s party rescued them from ?Orcus Great Dungeon?, she understood, but she pushed her “inferiority complex” into the bottom of her mind because only when she could do that would she be able to stay by Hajime’s side. However, the question whether she would only be a burden crossed her mind again.



“Are you alright?”



“Eh? Ah, nothing. There’s nothing wrong.”



“… I see.”



Kaori immediately tried to deceive him by making a forced smile. Although Hajime slightly narrowed his eyes towards her action, he didn’t say anything.



His action made Kaori feel a little lonely, but relieved at the same time. Then, she noticed Yue, who continued to block the rain of dread, staring at her. Her eyes seem to see through Kaori’s heart, which made Kaori put strength in her eyes and stared back at Yue.



Kaori would not let her feelings be laughed at like that time. After all, if that happens, the pretty girl before her who received Hajime’s love would stop to recognize her as a threat.



That… was something she wouldn’t be able to endure.



Receiving Kaori’s powerful gaze, Yue smiled a little and once again looked above. At the same time, Tio fired her flame to burn the ceiling. With that, the culprit of the attack fell in a tatter.



It was a barnacle-like demonic beast. A lot of them were sticking on the ceiling, shooting “Rupture” from the hole above. A physiological disgust-inviting spectacle.



Maybe because it was still an underwater creature, it was weak to flames and was immediately burnt by Tio’s flame magic, “Spiral Flame.”



After defeating those barnacle-lookalike, Hajime’s party walked into the passage. They went lower than the previous room, and even the seawater reached their thighs.



“Ah~, it’s hard to walk…”



“… Should I get off?”



With splashing sound as they advance through the seawater, Hajime started to complain. And so, Yue, who was sitting on his shoulder, asked. Yue was carried by Hajime because with her height, she would be soaked faster than anyone else.



Hajime returned a gaze saying there’s no problem while he ignoring Kaori’s and Shia’s envying gaz. Then, he put his hand on Yue’s thigh so she would not fall, firmly fixing her in place. Yue was also wrapping her hand around Hajime’s neck.



Kaori and Shia were sending even more and more envying gazes, but they were now focusing on another problem; an attack from demonic beasts.



The appearing demonic beasts looked like shurikens. They moved in a straight line towards their target while rotating in high-speed, but sometimes they also curved on the fly. Hajime smoothly pulled Donner and unhesitatingly fired, shooting down everything in the air. Although some died with their bodies still intact, the dead demonic beasts which floated on the surface of water had a shape of a starfish.



In addition, having perceived sea snake-like demonic beasts swimming fast in the water below them, Yue skewered them using spear of ice.



“… Aren’t they too weak?”



Except Kaori, all of the party members agreed with Hajime’s mutter.



Enemies inside a Great Dungeon were theoretically strong individually and became troublesome if more than one appeared. However, the starfishes and sea snakes were similar to the demonic beasts who attacked them in the sea once they got out of the sea volcano, or at least that weak. Truly unbefitting of a Great Dungeon’s demonic beast.



Excluding Kaori who didn’t know much about Great Dungeon, everyone was tilting their heads, but their answer would be shown inside the huge space on the other end of the passage.



“…The heck?”



As soon as Hajime’s party entered the space, translucent jelly-like body blocked the entrance to the passage.



“Let me do it! Uryaaah!!”



Immediately, Shia, who was at the rear, swung Doryukken to break the wall. However, the surface only scattered, but the jelly-like wall didn’t break. Following that, the scattered remains stuck on Shia’s breasts.



“Hyaa! What’s with this thing!?”



Shia raised a voice of confusion and shock. When Hajime’s party turned around, the clothing around Shia’s breasts was melting. The jelly thing wrapped around her clothing and undergarment, and Shia’s voluptuous twin hills began to become more and more exposed.



“Shia, don’t move!”



Immediately, Tio perfectly burnt the sprayed jelly-thingy. A little part of Shia’s breasts where the jelly was attached to was swollen red. It looked like the jelly blocking the entrance had a rather strong acidity.



“Kh! There’s more coming!”



Hajime warned, and right after they moved away from the wall of jelly, numerous tentacles attacked from above. They looked sharp like spears, but their appearance was similar to the jelly that was blocking the entrance.



“Honestly, the combination of Yue as defense and Tio as offence feels like a foul play.”



An impregnable defense and at the same time a one-sided offense. That’s why Hajime could do nothing but mutter so. Seeing it as a chance, Shia was slowly approaching Hajime’s side while empathizing her exposed cleavage. Truly sly, as she began to pleading with upward glance while blushing.



“Excuse me, Hajime-san. It’s burnt, so can Hajime-san rub it with medicine?”



“… Sigh, don’t you see our situation?”



“Well, I think it’ll be okay because Yue-san and Tio-san are unbeatable… Also, if I don’t do some appeal in this situation, I will be overshadowed by Kaori-san too…”



Shia said while approaching Hajime to show off the burn on her cleavage.



Then,



“Bring the holy ground and healing unto this place ‘Heaven’s Blessing.'”



Kaori healed Shia’s injury while smiling nicely. “Ahh~, even though it was a chance to get my breasts touched!,” Shia grieved while everyone was looked at her coldly.



“Hm? …Hajime, these jelly seems to melt magic, too.”



While he was giving the grieving Shia a cold look, Yue said to him. When he looked at it, he could see parts of Yue’s barrier melting.



“Mhm, this one thought so. This one felt it was strange that the previous flame lost its force. It seems it even melt the magic power inside the flame.”



If what Tio said was right, then these jelly was capable of melting magic power. It was a strong and troublesome ability. Suitable for a Great Dungeon’s demonic beast.



Though it must haven’t heard what Hajime thought of it in his mind, finally, a figure of a demonic beast that was manipulating the jelly had appeared.



The thing appeared as it was permeating through the small cracks in the ceiling, halted in mid-air, and began to reshape. A translucent humanoid with fin-like limbs, and its whole body carried innumerable specks sparkling in red with two feelers-like thing growing on its head. The figure that was swimming mid-air with its fin-like limbs was just like a Clione. Well, a ten meters tall Clione was nothing but a monster, after all.



Without any preliminary movement, tentacles were shot out from the Clione’s huge body. At the same time, jelly was spraying from its head just like a shower.



“Yue, attack it, too! Leave the defense to me! “Divine Interruption”!”



Using the derived skill, “Delayed Activation”, Kaori activated the “Divine Interruption” she chanted beforehand. Nodding at Kaori, Yue went to Tio, and together they fired flame towards the huge Clione. Shia also changed Doryukken to firing mode and shot it.



The Clione was hit by all of their attacks, and its body exploded and scattered in all directions. One hit kill!, Yue and the other two raised a satisfied expression, but Hajime let out a warning to them.



“Not yet! Its presence is still here. Kaori, maintain the barrier… What’s with this, the demonic beast’s presence is all over the room…”



Hajime’s perception abilities caught the presence of the demonic beast all over the room. Moreover, everywhere his Magic Eye see was dyed in reddish black color, as if the demonic beast was the room itself. It was a situation he had never encountered before, so naturally Hajime’s eyes sharpened.



Right after, as if to sense his anxiety, the Clione that was scattered in all directions was regenerated in no time. Moreover, on its belly were the starfish-lookalike and sea snakes they encountered and defeated. They melted while raising sizzling sound.



“Hmm, it seems the demonic beasts this one thought as weak were truly ordinary demonic beasts, and they seem to be this guy’s meal… Master. It doesn’t matter if it keeps regenerating. But where is its magic stone?”



“Now that Tio-san mentioned it, why can’t I see the magic stone although it is transparent?”



Agreeing to Tio’s assumption, Shia was now looking at Hajime, but Hajime had a troubled expression while he looked for the location of magic stone of the huge Clione.



“… Hajime?” When Yue called him, Hajime scratched his head and reported what he saw.



“… None. That guy doesn’t have magic stone.”



His words made everyone dumbfounded.



“H-Hajime-kun? For it to not have magic stone… Then, does it mean it isn’t a demonic beast?”



“I don’t know. However, if I must say, that jelly’s body, all of them are magic stone. My Magic Eye saw that guy’s whole body is dyed in reddish black color. Also, be careful since this whole room is also dyed in the same color. Or maybe we are already inside that guy’s stomach.”



The same time Hajime told them about the shocking fact, the huge Clione began to attack them again. This time, not only did the tentacles attack while the jelly rained down, but its feet entered the sea water and some parts of its body were fired like a torpedo.



Hajime took out a black, large rifle from the “Treasure Box.” The large rifle had a gas cylinder thing installed where the magazine should be loaded, and also an unbelievably large caliber.



That was natural. After all, it wasn’t a rifle…



FWOOOOSH!!



It was a flamethrower. The Flame ore in tar form made the flamethrower sprayed flame of 3,000 °C. It was not aimed at the huge Clione, and neither at the tentacles nor the sprayed jelly. It was aiming at the “wall” that was giving reddish black reaction. The Clione was left to Yue and the other two.



Maybe because the huge Clione had a mimetic ability, the wall seemed to be not out of ordinary, but the flame released by Hajime burnt it and peel it off from the wall just like a wallpaper. Hajime was slightly relieved the one on the wall was not another huge Clione.



However, the transparent jelly kept appearing from the cracks on the wall no matter how much he burnt it, and finally it even appeared from under his feet. His shoe soles generated sizzling sound.



The attack on the real body by Yue and the other two was also increasing in intensity, and even the huge Clione seem to have finally gotten serious as jelly sprung up from the entire wall with a tremendous momentum. Moreover, the water level had raised before the party were aware of it. At first, it was around the thigh level, but now it has risen to around the waist. As for Yue, her chest area was already soaked by the water.



Yue and the other two had defeated the huge Clione so many times, but the surrounding jelly immediately gathered, and the end of the fight was nowhere in sight.



It was a terrible situation if they didn’t find a way to defeat it, and they would die by drowning. While their fighting power was being reduced, they wouldn’t be able to keep besieging the huge Clione. Even if they cast barrier magic and entered the submarine, it would melt unless they find the way to defeat it.



As such, Hajime decided to withdraw. However, all of the passages had been blocked by the jelly. Hajime frantically looked around. Then, he discovered a crack on the ground which generated a whirl.



“I will at least recover us from this situation. There’s also a place under the ground. Well, I don’t know where it is connected to, so brace yourselves!”



“Nh.”



“Yes~.”



“Understood.”



“Okay!”



Receiving everyone’s answer, Hajime, while turning the flamethrower around to burn the incoming jelly, used “Transmutation” towards the crack. The crack was forced to expand and gradually, a deep hole was opened.



While still underwater, Hajime took out a cylinder with length of 15 cm and diameter of 3 cm. In the middle was the mouthpiece part of a snorkel tube. It was small oxygen cylinder. It was created using the ore imbued with Spatial magic using Creation magic. Thus, the space inside where the oxygen was put into, expanded just like “Treasure Box.”



However, while he was making preparation in Elisen, Hajime had prioritized the broken and lost equipment. In addition, it was hard for him to use Spatial magic so the space created was much narrower compared to “Treasure Box.” Because of that, these small oxygen cylinder can only hold out for around 30 minutes.



Setting the time limitation in the corner of his mind, Hajime repeatedly “transmuted” the water, and before long, Hajime took out pile bunker from “Treasure Box” once there was no more reaction on the ground. After fixing the anchor under the water, it charged.



Screeech~!!!



Following that, he pulled the trigger to break the floor.



KABOooOOOOoom~!!!



Inside the water, a muffled thundering sound generated and spread with vibration.



In the next moment, water flowed into the penetrated hole with tremendous momentum. The seawater that had reached around the waist began to flow mightily all of a sudden, which resulted in Yue and the other three to be swept and thrown into the hole.



Inside the swift current, Hajime desperately braced against the current and took out a gigantic boulder and numerous incendiary grenades from “Treasure Box.” Then, he threw them at the same time he was swept into the space below alongside with Yue and the other three.



Behind him, muffled roaring sounds rang out. However, he was unable to confirm whether he was successful in gaining even a little time against the huge Clione’s pursuit.





Volume 10 Chapter 3




“Cough, cough, ugh.”



“Huff huff, are you okay, Kaori?”



“Y-Yeah, somehow… Everyone is…”



In front of Kaori, who was coughing from drinking a large amount of seawater, were Hajime, whose hand was coiled on her waist, and a pure-white sand beach. There was nothing else beside those around her, but she could densely see packed mangrove-like trees in the distance, and the surface of the waving sea high in the sky. The seawater was like a barrier, preventing any intruder. It was a vast space.



“Looks like we are getting separated… Well, I gave everyone a smaller version of “Treasure Box,” so they should be able to do something by themselves.”



“… Nn.”



Hajime lightly said after letting go of Kaori, and fixed his hair. However, Kaori’s mind seems to be somewhere else.



While watching Hajime stand up and began to change his clothing, Kaori recalled what happened a while ago.



Hajime’s party attempted a strategic retreat from the huge Clione.



The place they fell into was a gigantic, spherical space with tens of tunnels, where there were spouting seawater with tremendous force. Or maybe it could be said that they were flowing from there; a place with storm-like and messy current.



Swept by the swift current, Hajime’s party somehow managed to stick close together, but next the current mercilessly separated the party. Yue tried to control the current with magic, but it didn’t work well because the current was too random. Shia controlled the weight of Doryukken in cooperation with Tio; a fine play.



Hajime had actually wanted to take out the submarine and ride it, but it was impossible inside the swift current. Clenching his teeth, Hajime took out ultra-heavy, compression ore, and tried to use the weight to overcome the current just like Shia.



At that time, by luck, he saw Yue getting swept towards him, and Yue would meet up with Hajime thanks to the current. Shia and Tio had already disappeared into a tunnel somewhere, and their figures could no longer be seen inside the space.



Hajime tried to reach out to Yue so she wouldn’t get separated from him, but Kaori’s figure was being swept to the lower side had entered his view. The pained gaze of Kaori’s met Hajime’s. He previously reached out to Yue before him, but his and Kaori’s gaze had indeed met.



There were two choices.



If he catches Yue, Kaori would be swept alone into a tunnel. The same thing would happen to Yue if he was to catch Kaori. The current Hajime could only choose one of them. Within that moment, it felt like eternity. Hajime exchanged gazes with Yue, and he made a decision.



Using the weight from the ultra heavy compressed ore he took out from “Treasure Box,” Hajime rushed below, and then he caught Kaori. Kaori’s eyes were wide in surprise, but the two were immediately exposed to an even stronger swift current. Together, the two were thrown into a tunnel.



While being swept away, Hajime activated “Vajra” to protect Kaori in his arms, enduring it even when he was thrown at a rock wall. Then, he was able to see light coming from above once the current weakened and went up.



And there was the pure white sandy beach spreaded across the coastline.



“… Nee, Hajime-kun. Why… why did you save me?”



“Hah?”



Kaori questioned Hajime whose back was turned towards her. Hajime only tilted his head, thinking “what kind of question was that?”



“Why did you save me and not Yue?”



“Well, Kaori seemed to be dying and Yue can do something by herself. Yue’s eyes also told me to save Kaori.”



“… You really trust her, eh.”



“Isn’t that natural? We are partners, you know?”



“…”



The already depressed Kaori was even more depressed after hearing the answer. Suddenly, a shadow stretched over the downcast Kaori.



Puzzled, Kaori looked up and there was Hajime’s face very close to her own. His eyes and nose were right before her. A distance that would conclude in a kiss if he move even a little closer. Kaori felt as if she was sucked by Hajime’s eyes, and suddenly, her cheeks were pulled.



“Ift huwt! Waft au uing!” Kaori protested with teary eyes.



However, Hajime ignored Kaori’s protest and played with her soft cheeks without reserve for a while. After finally being released, Kaori looked up with a reproachful gaze while rubbing her red cheeks, but Hajime only snorted with “Hmph”.



“If you have time to be depressed, then it’s better to use and move. We’re inside a Great Dungeon, you know? Just until when will you stay wet like this? Or, are you trying to gain my sympathy?”



Hajime’s sharp words made Kaori’s face instantly reddened. It was of shame. She noticed what he unexpressed said, isn’t this the wrong place for that?



“Th-There’s no such a thing! I was just daydreaming. I-I will change my clothes soon. Sorry.”



“…”



Kaori hurriedly stood up and began to take off her clothes after taking out substitute clothes from mini-“Treasure Box” (around the size of a house’s storage) that was given to her before the party left Elisen. Hajime nonchalantly turned his back towards her. The normal Kaori would do an approach by saying, “It’s okay to watch,” though embarrassed, but the current Kaori hurriedly finished changing her clothes without saying anything.



“I-I am done… So, what should we do?”



“Let’s see… Even if we go to seabed again, we still don’t know where the others are… but there’s nothing we can do other than keep searching. Those girls would probably do so as well.”



After looking at the jungle nearby, Hajime turned around. Kaori nodded at him while smiling; a smile hiding her depressed heart. Hajime slightly narrowed his eyes at Kaori’s smile, but he didn’t say anything in the end and started to walk.



Advancing along the pure-white sandy beach, creating sounds as they walked, the two entered the jungle. The dense trees and bushes were cut by Hajime. Kaori was only following him from behind.



Then, Hajime suddenly halted and turned towards Kaori, put his hand on the back of Kaori’s head as if to embrace her.



“Fue? Ah, umm, Hajime-kun? Wh-What’s with this sudden…”



Kaori blushed, but Hajime immediately separated and she instantly paled when she saw the thing on Hajime’s hand.



It was a spider. With size almost as big as a palm, it was moving its twelve legs with violet liquid dripping from it. Some of the legs grew like a normal spider while some grew from its back; a structure expressing it was capable of moving using both sides! It looked disgusting.



“Don’t let your guard down, okay? A Great Dungeon is vastly different compared to the surface of Orcus. Don’t think of it as the same or else you’ll experience pain.”



“U-Un. Sorry. I will be careful.”



“…”



The spider Hajime caught didn’t have magic stone, a normal poisonous spider. The fact that she was almost killed by creature other than a demonic beast, and how Hajime helped her, made Kaori even more depressed.



When she was still in Kouki’s party, she was an all-rounder, however, in Hajime’s party, she isn’t at all useful. It made Kaori panic more and more inwardly.



As such, Kaori put even more attention towards the surroundings which caused the conversation between the two to lessen, and they got out of the jungle with a subtle atmosphere between them.



Ahead of them was…



“This… isn’t this the so-called ship’s graveyard?”



“Amazing… those are sailing ships, but the size…”



In the rocky area ahead of the jungle were several partly rotted sailing ships lodged. The sailing ships were around a hundred meters in length at the lowest, and in the far distant was an even bigger one with at least three hundred meters in length.



The bizarre spectacle made Hajime and Kaori unconsciously halted their advance. However, it didn’t take a long time for Hajime and Kaori to regain their senses and entered the ship’s graveyard.



They advanced by passing through the gaps between rocks, sometimes passing over them, while at other times, they walked on the ships.



“Even so… there are only battleships here.”



“Un. But only the biggest one there seems to be a passenger boat. It has luxurious decorations on it…”



The ships in this graveyard didn’t have cannons located at the starboard side like those battleship (sail-type) on earth. Even so, Hajime was able to conclude they were battleships because there were marks of fierce battle on all of the ships. From the appearance of the ships, they seemed to have received magic attacks. Some have their masts cleanly cut, burnt, carbonized decks, and petrified ropes and nets.



They didn’t have any cannon, so they used long-ranged magic to defeat the enemies which was a battle method imaginable from the marks remained.



Then, Hajime’s guess was proven to be a fact when he and Kaori were halfway through the ship’s graveyard.



— UoOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!



— WAaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!!



“-!? What the!?”



“Hajime-kun! The surroundings are—!”



When they felt they heard shout of many men all of a sudden, the surroundings scenery began to distort. Hajime and Kaori stopped walking from the surprise and they observed the surroundings to observe what was happening. The surrounding distortion became even more intense and before they were aware of it, Hajime and Kaori were already on a ship’s deck, above the vast ocean.



Following that, they looked at their surroundings, it was not the ship’s graveyard, but hundreds of sailing ships divided into two groups, confronting each other. Above the ships were people raising their weapons while shouting.



“Th-The heck is this…” “Ha-Ha-Hajime-kun? Am I currently inside a dream? Hajime-kun, you are here, right? Right?”



Both Hajime and Kaori were taken aback, but they somehow managed to get out of their confusion, however, they weren’t able to look at their surroundings.



While they did so, a big spark rose into the sky, generating firework-like loud voices followed by the hundreds of ships moving out simultaneously. The fleet on the side of the ship Hajime and Kaori rode on also moved out after the firework rose.



And when the ships approached a certain distance, they used the momentum to ram the other ships used its bodies, while magic were also fired.



GOoOOOOOOOO!! DOoGAaAAAN!! DOBAaAAAA!!!



“Owh!?”



“Kyaa!”



Flame bullets fired accompanied by roaring sounds and created holes in the ships’ bodies. Huge tornadoes advanced aiming at the masts. The sea’s surface froze, stopping the ships. And bullets of gray-colored sphere instantly petrified everything.



Even the deck Hajime and Kaori were on was hit by the flame bullets and began to blaze up grandly. The ship’s crews immediately activated magic to draw up the sea water and extinguished the fire.



It was literally a battlefield where innumerable people and ships fought on. The fired magic clad in killing intent grazed their skins.



Hajime and Kaori absentmindedly watching these spectacle, and once again fire bullets fired from behind them. The bullets’ courses were aimed straight towards Hajime and Kaori.



Hajime buried his question of why did they suddenly were involved in this war in his head, and he pulled out Donner because it was OK to kill everyone because they attacked first. Thus, he intercepted the fire bullets using the railgun.



The bullet fired was accompanied by explosive sound and a flash, but unexpectedly it didn’t even hit the flame bullets much more intercepting them. The bullet flew into the sky, and it disappeared.



“What!?”



Raising surprised voice for the nth times, Hajime embraced Kaori by his side and began to evade.



“Wait, I will obstruct them! “Light Severance”!”



With Kaori’s chant, the beginner-level defense magic of light attribute appeared.



Hajime tried to evade because the unknown magic kept going even after their cores were hit, but Kaori had activated her magic and couldn’t move away from there. Reluctantly, he activated “Vajra” and waited for the flame bullets.



However, Hajime’s worry proved to be groundless because Kaori’s barrier completely blocked the flame bullets. With dubious expression, Hajime thought whether he just misfired while tilting his head, and he once again fired at the incoming flame bullets. Even this time, Hajime’s Magic Eye indeed saw the cores being hit, but the bullet just passed through the flame bullets and flew towards the day after tomorrow..



“… Is that it?”



Seeing that, Hajime was guessing why his attack wasn’t effective and decided to try another method of attacking. Kaori tried to put up another barrier to block the incoming flame bullets, but Hajime stopped her and activated “Wind Claw” in Donner. Following that, he evaded, and at the same time, he slashed the flame bullets using “Wind Claw.” This time, the flame bullets didn’t pass through and slashed in two.



“Umm, Hajime-kun?”



“It doesn’t seem to be an illusion nor was it a real thing. The physical attack didn’t effective, but attacks that contained magic power are effective. Good grief, what’s with this situation.”



Hajime spat a sigh from this troublesome situation and “Gwaa,” an agonized voice rang right from behind him. While wondering what it was, he turned around and there was a young man crouching while suppressing his abdomen, while his other hand was holding a cutlass. Looking carefully, there was a pool of blood below him and blood covered icicle rolling nearby. He must have been shot with the icicle.



“Are you okay!?,” Kaori immediately raised her voice while approaching him, and then she used her healing magic. A pure-white light released from her and wrapped the man. He should be healed in a blink of an eye because Kaori was a “Healer”… or so she thought, but the result was unexpected. The moment the young man received Kaori’s healing magic, he turned into light particles and disappeared.



“Eh? Eh? W-Why…” After a little pondering, Hajime told the confused Kaori what he thought had happened.



“Wasn’t it because the effect and attribute of the magic didn’t matter as long as it carried magic power?”



“… Then, I-I just… killed that person…”



“Kaori, this is not reality. Just think of it as “an illusion where we can move freely.” Besides, you can’t call something that disappeared by being healed a human.”



“Hajime-kun… un, you are right. I am sorry that I was confused a little there. But I am okay now.”



Though slight, Hajime said words of concern to Kaori. However, Kaori didn’t feel happy like the usual her, only drooping her shoulders apologizing. Then, she smiled to smooth things over. Seeing her reaction made Hajime inadvertently muttered the thing he had thought since earlier.



“… You keep apologizing, eh.”



“Eh? Did you say something?”



“No, nothing.” Hajime moved his gaze from Kaori.



It was not because of the subtle atmosphere drifting around Kaori, but because he felt ominous presences. When he looked around, the soldiers were shouting and attacking the nearby ships, and before they were aware of it, several men with dark gazes were looking at Hajime and Kaori.



Kaori noticed Hajime’s gaze and looked at the direction he was watching, and the men immediately came to attack Hajime and Kaori.



“For the God!”



“Long live! Eht-samaa!”



“Pagans! Die for our God!”



They were in frenzy. With bloodshot eyes, they declared while scattering saliva around. Completely abnormal.



He was able to guess it was a war between countries from how the fleets looked like, and he finally understood the reason for it. It was a religious war. If he strained his ears, he could hear the other soldiers in the other fleets were shouting similar things. However, they were shouting different God’s name.



Kaori could only stand in blank surprise inside the frenzied atmosphere.



Embracing Kaori from behind, Hajime thrust out and fired Donner over his shoulder. Only, the fired thing was not a bullet but mass of pure magic power. Using “Magic Power Compression” and “Magic Power Emission” derived from “Magic Power Manipulation,” he was able to blow off magic power without affecting the target physically. In a sense, it was a flawless technique to disarm the target because human and even demonic beast wouldn’t be able to move if their magic power was exhausted. This move had always been kept inside of him because he would not use such a lukewarm method on his enemy.



However, this lukewarm method was the most useful in this situation. The bright red bullet fired by Donner momentarily cut through the space and pierced the forehead of one of the frenzied, cutlass swinging soldier. Without stopping, the bullet hit the soldier behind the previous one, too, and their bodies instantly dispersed.



“Kaori! We are going to jump! Don’t bite your tongue!”



“Eh? —Kyaaaaa!!”



It would be troublesome if they were surrounded on the deck, so Hajime jumped using “Aerodynamic” while embracing Kaori. Kaori screamed from the powerful momentum.



Kicking the soldier on the crow’s nest, Hajime landed in one of four crow’s nest on the masts.



Below them, the frenzied soldiers were looking up at Hajime and Kaori with bloodshot eyes.



Even though there were the enemies from other countries, too, somehow some of the men were targeting Hajime and Kaori. Moreover, the ones targeting them didn’t have any distinction between allies and enemies. Their numbers keeps increasing one after another just like a bad case of contagious virus.



Before even a moment passed and in front of their own enemies, the soldiers suddenly stopped moving and twisted their heads, staring at Hajime and Kaori. They immediately came crowding towards the two like a horror movie. The frenzied air even made Kaori pale.



“Now then, what shall we do to get out of this disgusting space?”



“… Maybe there’s something like… an exit?”



“We are in the middle of the sea, you know?”



“Maybe there’s an exit in one of these ships? … see, something like wherever door.”



Kaori recalled and compared it to the convenient tool of the blue cat robot. Looking at the surroundings, Hajime frowned and objected her idea because the ships were too numerous.



“… From what I can see, there’s at least six hundred ships here… it’s impossible to search one by one. Don’t you think we’ll be able to find the exit faster if the war ended?”



“Umm~, indeed, there are also the sunken ship… Then, shall we…end the war?”



“End it… I see, time to kill everyone, huh? Kaori also can say something extreme, eh.”



“Eh? Umm, I don’t mean that…”



“Yup, that must be it. No other thing comes to my mind, and I like it better this way.”



Firing bullets of magic power and shooting through the several soldiers climbing using the ropes on the mast, Hajime thought it would be better if he had make a magic gun. He thought so while he continued firing the bright red bullets along with “Remote Control” derived from “Magic Power Manipulation,” making them intercepted the incoming flame bullets.



“Kaori, I know you aren’t proficient in offensive magic, but even healing magic becomes offensive magic here. And even if we don’t know how to escape from here, it is the truth that we are being attacked, so let’s knock them all down.”



“O-Okay!”



Hearing Hajime’s words, Kaori began her chant with resolute expression while trembling. The frenzied battlefield seemed to shave off at Kaori’s mind, but she absolutely didn’t want to show a disgraceful behavior to the important one beside her.



Hajime was glaring at the surroundings as if protecting her.



Looking down, allies and foes were mixed as they boarded the ship, killing each other. Unlike what happened when Hajime and Kaori attacked, the killing in this illusion was full of bloodshed.



On the deck were someone’s entrails, cut limbs, and splattered heads. Everyone was repeatedly shouting “For the God,” “Pagan,” and “Divine Punishment,” with frenzied eyes as they spread killing intent.



Within the fresh blood of the soldiers scattered just like a storm of cherry blossom, the crow’s nest where Hajime and Kaori, no, it was more like the soldiers were obstinately targeting Hajime and Kaori.



Time to time, bright red bullets flew about in all directions, shooting through the enemies. Furthermore, they flew around Hajime and Kaori to protect them, positioned as both offense and defense at the same time.



However, the frenzied soldiers weren’t even worried, repeatedly attempted suicide attacks. Tens of the soldiers used flight magic while there were those who approached by going from one mast to another. It could be seen that the fight was concentrated on the ship where Hajime and Kaori rode. Hajime’s Magic Eye also caught the fluctuation of magic power of highest-ranked magic from the hand of the magicians aiming at them.



At the time, Hajime thought of sniping them, but Kaori’s chant ended and she activated highest-ranked magic of her.



“— — people, held out your arms as this is the place where Holy Mother smiling at, “Scripture”!”



Then, ripple of light spread into the battlefield with Kaori as its center.



The ripple throbbed as it expanded for so so many times, reaching one kilometer in radius. The enemy who touched by the ripple was wrapped by light.



Highest-ranked healing magic of light attribute, “Scripture.”



It was a super wide-ranged healing magic with effect of healing everyone inside its area. The range itself was depended on the amount of user’s magic power and proficiency, but at its worst, its effective range was 500 meters in radius. Moreover, if the user gave out the “sign” beforehand, it would be able to heal specific object. And normally this magic was used with tens of magician, and took a lot of time to chant along with its stupidly gigantic magic array. To be able to activate it in only one, two minutes alone was impossible unless one was a cheat-like character.



At the same time the light of “Scripture” activated by Kaori wrapped the battlefield, all soldiers inside the effective area had their bodies dispersed without distinction of ally or foe. When the magic ended, Kaori’s body tilted from magic power exhaustion, and was thus promptly supported by Hajime.



“Ohh, a mass reproduction of the Mary Celeste, huh. You did great, Kaori. No, should I say as expected of you?”



“Ah, uh, th-there’s no such a thing. Hajime-kun and the others are far more amazing…”



Honest praise from Hajime made Kaori’s cheeks blush from embarrassed. She made a self-ridiculing smile as she thought Yue would be able to use more powerful magic quickly. Then, she muttered “”Replenish,”” to replenish the lost magic power from the pendant given by Hajime. Hajime had improved the pendant with magic array and the ability of taking out the stocked magic power by chanting because Kaori was incapable of directly manipulating magic power.



Hajime slightly knitted his eyebrows and wanted to say something when he saw Kaori’s expression, but he put it aside for now because he had to deal with the new incoming enemies. The battle had restarted.



With the ineffectiveness of physical attack, it was a situation where the large amount of soldiers didn’t falter against any kind of attack as they battled on the ship. Normally, it might be a hard situation, but there were cheat-like monsters present.



Big fleets of two countries were afterwards annihilated by the two humans in a span of one hour.



* * *



“… Uuh, cough, kafh, sorr-…”



“It’s alright. Just endure it.”



Immediately after the last soldiers were annihilated, their surroundings were once again distorted. They noticed that they had returned to ship’s graveyard from before.



Wondering if the annihilation was indeed the correct answer, Kaori immediately sighed in relief, ran to the nearby rock, and vomited. However, she vomited nothing since the dinner she ate had already been digested, and thus she felt a pain from trying to vomit.



With tears accumulated in the corner of her eyes, Kaori used one hand to tell Hajime “Don’t come,” to stop him.



However, Hajime still approached her and rubbed her back. Kaori didn’t want to show such a pitiful sight to him, but she felt comforted from the gentle and warm feelings transmitted to her back. Her nausea and spirit gradually recovered.



Hajime took out apple juice-like drink from “Treasure Box” and presented it to her. Kaori obediently drink it heartily and her energy returned. The sweet and fresh taste, flushed the sour taste of gastric juice.



“Sorry…”



Kaori who knitted her eyebrows and apologized for the trouble made Hajime narrowed his eyes.



“Well, I think it is inevitable. Even I feel disgusted by it. I never thought humans would be so frenzied because of their blind belief. …Anyway, let’s rest for now. Even I want to recover my considerably used magic power.”



“… Un. Say, Hajime-kun. What was that illusion? Is it related to these ship wreckages.”



Kaori stood up then sat on the nearby rock, and then she asked him. Hajime took a little time to think before told her his conjecture.



“It is just a maybe, but I think the illusion might have been reproducing a battle in the past. … well, it seemed there’s also some improvement to attack those challenging the dungeon… or it might have been the concept of this dungeon.”



“Concept?”



“Yeah. Tio said it when we were in “Guryuu-en Great Volcano”. She said ‘isn’t it possible that each of the dungeon had its own concept prepared by the “Liberators”?’ If that’s true, then here is…”



“…To know the misery brought by the Mad Gods… maybe?”



“Aah, I think so, too.”



Continuing Hajime’s words by muttering the answer, Kaori recalled the spectacle from before, her face once again turned pale, and her body trembled as if she was suffering from a cold.



What made Kaori felt sick was the madness from the soldiers. Their behavior and speech were exactly of those so called “Fanatic” while she also couldn’t help but feel disgusted from the killing.



The people continued to laugh loudly in a frenzy even when blood were spraying from their bodied. There were even those who died from gouging their own hearts out, raised it towards the sky as an offering to their Gods. There was also an older brother who stabbed through his own younger brother just to attack Hajime and Kaori, while the younger one laughed proudly. War itself was a place filled with madness, but one they just saw was far too ghastly. And it was wage all “For our God,” so…



Seeing Kaori covering her mouth because she couldn’t endure it, Hajime sat right beside Kaori and grasped Kaori’s hand. He couldn’t leave Kaori, who sickened by the madness, alone. Kaori was slightly surprised, looked at Hajime, relaxed, and squeezed Hajime’s hand back.



“Hajime-kun, thank you…”



“Don’t mind it. I understand… the pain from being exposed to the madness. I felt that when I fell into the abyss…”



“… Then, how? … Wait, there’s no need for you to answer… It was… Yue-san, right?”



“Yeah, it was because of her. If I hadn’t met her inside the abyss… I wonder how I would have ended up.”



Hajime looked into the distance in affection and nostalgia. He was surely recalling the time he met Yue. Seeing his expression made Kaori felt her chest squeeze.



“It’s mortifying. To defend, to protect Hajime-kun… I wanted to do that. But even if I said that, it’s not like I can do anything. Since it’s me… who I couldn’t even protect a promise. Ah~, Yue is a really powerful enemy~.”



Kaori joking laughter made Hajime narrowed his eyes again. Kaori’s smile was not the usual warm, positive smile because it might have also included self-torment and self-ridicule.



“… You’ve been apologizing since we came here, and don’t make such a smile.”



“Eh? Ummm…”



Hajime’s sudden words made Kaori raised “?” above her head. However, her smile immediately collapsed and her expression stiffened from Hajime’s next words.



“… Listen, Kaori. Why did you follow us here?”



“… That’s… am I just a burden after all?”



The downcast Kaori made Hajime sigh, and he didn’t answer her question.



“I remember the talk we had under the moonlight while drinking that disgusting tea that day. That’s why, honestly, I don’t think it’s weird that you have goodwill for the current me.”



“Hajime-kun, I…”



“However, I have no intention of denying it. I am sure Kaori had things only you can see, and that’s what stirred your heart. Thus, there’s no meaning for me to deny the decision you made. I have given you my answer, “even so” I think it’s a good thing that you favor me. Even Shia didn’t even feel discouraged. Rather, she recently made me seriously worry if she was going to attack me in my sleep.”



Hajime recently felt the dread as he thought of the rabbit-eared girl with bugged physical strength. Seeing such a Hajime, Kaori made a wry smile in agreement.



“… Un, I think her aggressiveness and positiveness amazing.”



“I treated her harshly at the beginning. I didn’t think of anyone as “special” other than Yue… I honestly thought she was going to give up quickly.”



“…”



“No matter how harsh I treated her, how I treated Yue as special, and she was always neither angry nor did she cry, but she seemed happy about it. She couldn’t compare to Yue in magic usage because she didn’t have aptitude in magic, and even if she was defeated in a mock battle against Yue, she didn’t stop to move forward. She didn’t cower even though she was attacked by her own inferiority complex.”



“I-I, thing like inferiority complex…”



Kaori who silently listening to Hajime, couldn’t help to object and stood up. However, she was exhausted and immediately sat back.



“Didn’t you notice it? You’ve been apologizing since we came here. Even the way you smiled is completely different than the usual.”



“Eh?”



“Listen, Kaori. Don’t keep looking down. Raise your face and look into my eyes.”



That being said, Kaori finally noticed she had been looking down for a while now. Before, she made sure to look at the other person’s eyes when talking… thus, when Kaori met Hajime’s gaze she realized.



“Listen here, I will not say it for the second time. I love Yue. Even if I thought of others as “important,” it won’t change that only Yue is “special.” So if you feel pain from it, if you feel you are inferior compared to Yue… Kaori, you should part from me.”



“Kh…”



The blunt words made Kaori look down again. Hajime continued talking even though he did see her reaction.



“The reason I allowed Kaori to accompany us at that time is because of the same reason as Shia; I judged it’d be the best for Kaori to be by my side, because I trust Kaori. You understood my feelings, “even so” you moved ahead for your wish. That’s why I thought it’d be okay for you by my side if you favor me… but, I don’t feel the same way now.”



When Hajime ended his words, he separated his hand from the downcast Kaori’s. Then, he spun the ending words.



“Please think carefully about it once more. Why did you come along with us, and if should you stay by my side from now on… Kaori is not Shia. Shia likes Yue, too. …Depending on your answer, I will send you back to your best friend (Yaegashi).”



“I-I…”



Kaori wanted to say something as she watched the hand separating from her own, the words wouldn’t come out.



Inside the awkward atmosphere, Hajime urged Kaori to move because it was necessary for them to approach the biggest sailing ships enshrined at the distance.





after story 1




AN: Thank you very much for a lot of the review about the completion.



From here on too, Hakumei will enjoy myself while discharging wild idea bit by bit, and it will make me happy if you readers can keep accompanying me.



「……Wake up. Wake up, Hajime.」



His dozing off awareness was led to awakening by a soft voice and a gentle shake. Because of the brightness seen through the back of his eyelids, he could tell the curtains had been opened. It was morning, and the sun was insisting on its presence.



「……Don't mind me. Go on, ahead.」(TN: Here Hajime is using a line like a hero who will stay behind so other can escape safely)



「……It's no good using clichéd line like that. Breakfast will get cold. So wake up.」



He tucked himself into the bed like a bagworm and tried to take a journey into the dream world, this man who was trying to journey to the dream world with a voice that was going to disappear anytime, was the eldest son of this household――Nagumo Hajime. And then, the one who was making a troubled smile to such Hajime even while kept urging him gently to get out of the bed, was Hajime's beloved vampire princess that came from another world――Yue.



Yue sat down beside the bed and she gently stroked the black hair of Hajime who was curling in to himself. Her slender fingertips caressed through Hajime's hair, combing them down. And then, her eyes squinted affectionately and she quietly brought her lips toward Hajime's ear.



A small *chuu* sound resounded and Hajime twitched in reaction. Perhaps enjoying that reaction of Hajime, Yue's look was increasingly bursting open in happiness, next she held Hajime's earlobe into her mouth. Hajime once more twitched in reaction. Yue kept playfully nibbling then. And Hajime kept twitching from that.



Yue separated her lips from Hajime's ear with *chupa* sound before she opened her mouth while blowing a feverish sigh on Hajime's ear.



「……If you don't wake up……Hajime will be the breakfast.」



「I'll wake up.」



It was a lovely speech, but there were his parents downstairs, other than them there were also the freeloaders and his daughter. Making a ruckus complete with moaning sound 「aah-」from morning would be problematic in various meaning. The neighbors too would be guaranteed to look at him later with grinning expression saying 「oh my」. Therefore, Hajime pushed aside the futon with a snap and woke up.



「Good morning, Yue.」



「……Nn. Good morning.」



Hajime's hair that was curling up here and there was fixed attentively by Yue using her hand as comb. Since the morning the atmosphere of the two was already teeming with mushiness. It even felt like the morning sunlight brightly shining in through the window was growing dim in reservation from these two's lack in prudence.



Hajime who was exposing a dazed waking up face which was unthinkable if it was at the period when he was journeying the other world Tortus, was narrowing his eyes toward his lover that was caressing his head in front of his eyes. While he was at it he was also running his gaze through the surrounding relaxedly.



Inside the room, seventy percent of it was buried in bookshelves and the books and the games that were put there, and then there were a desk and reclining chair, a good quality desktop PC, and also a closet between the bookshelves. A window was attached at the wall that was facing south, a navy blue curtain the same color with the bed was hanging over it.



(…..I'm still feeling that this room is 'nostalgic'. it must be because the experience at the other side is too strong. If I still feel like this after going home for a year, then it might take a half more year to be able to live without feeling anything is out of place.)



Hajime sighed a bit inside his heart. And then, he clenched his left hand repeatedly as though to ascertain it. That arm didn't shine with dull metallic gleam, its appearance was that of a normal human arm. It had elastic skin and slight mark of suntan similar with his right arm.



Furthermore, Hajime also gently traced his right eye with his fingertip. There, he didn't feel the sensation of eye patch that was in the process of becoming his trademark in Tortus. Far from that, there wasn't even the bluish white shine that was the trait of god crystal. The eye's appearance was a dark brown eyes that looked like the eye of a normal Japanese as expected.



「……Nn? Hajime, what's wrong? It feels uncomfortable?」



Yue noticed Hajime's state, she then brought her face closer until their nose tip almost touched while tilting her head. The sweet fragrance that tickled Hajime's nasal cavity made him got slightly bewitched while he shook his head.



「No, there is no discomfort in both my arm and my eye. Thanks to Yue and others' cooperation, the artificial skin and the artificial eyes are all in extremely excellent condition. No one would notice as long as they don't get scanned in detail at hospital. If I have to say, perhaps I'm feeling discomfort from this situation where there is no discomfort.」



「……? Hajime feel discomfort from the appearance of your body?」



「Yeah. After all the experience over there was just too dense. The metallic arm, the crystal eye, and also the white hair, all those were already me. That's why, rather than calling this appearance getting back to normal, it feels like that I changed again. Well, it going to be really bad if that kind of unknown automail and strange crystal eye get discovered in this modern earth, so that can't be helped though.」



While smiling wryly, Hajime tapped on his left hand using his right hand. The artificial skin that used metamorphosis magic had reproduced a splendid skin texture, making the one touching wouldn't be able to sense the existence of metallic artificial arm hidden behind it.



The one who accomplished this was Tio. The technique of Tio that was the only expert in metamorphosis magic among his comrades, added with Hajime and Yue's help, remade the artificial hand smartly and disguised it as a normal arm in outward appearance and texture.



Also, Hajime's artificial eye was something that was remade using creation magic, while his hair color was due to Kaori's regeneration magic returning the hair color to before.



Of course, for Kaori whose hand had reached to the territory of time intervention, if she used regeneration magic seriously then it was possible she could even restore Hajime's altered body to normal human body. Whether it was his loss of limb or his change due to eating monster, all of those could be reverted if Kaori just returned Hajime's body to its previous state.



But, Hajime didn't wish for that. Actually, by returning to earth, things like tough body was unneeded, but for some reason it felt like turning his body to how it was before was like making light of his journey at that other world. And above all else, he couldn't be growing senile first and left behind Yue who would be living for a long time.



In the end possessing a monster class body where it wasn't even definite that it had life span was in agreement with Hajime's own wish. By the way, if they were using Yue's secret technique of apostle creation, then the problem of life span could be resolved to a certain degree even if they were using their original normal body, so Kaori and others also didn't view this matter as a problem.



「……Nn. Personally, there is no problem for me because I can enjoy various Hajime. Rather I feel happy.」



Yue said that and gave kisses in turn at Hajime's left shoulder, right eye, and his head. Every single action of Yue was overflowing with affection.



At that day, after they established the method of going home, since that day when Yue was proposed under the great tree of [Haltina Sea of Trees], Yue's expression of love was increasingly became polished. She had never been seen without the ring that was fitted in the ring finger of her left hand, and when Yue saw the matching ring that was fitted in Hajime's left ring finger, an aura of happiness would be scattered in full from her.



「Speaking of that, what about Yue? Have you get used with the world over here?」



「……Nn. There are still a lot of things, that I don't know, that I am not familiar with. This is really, a different world. There are a lot of unbelievable things……. But, it's fun. Every day is fun like opening jack-in-the-box.」



「I see.」



「……Nn. Besides, I will be happy anywhere if that is a place where Hajime is. Mother-in-law and father-in-law are also really kind. They treasured me like their real daughter, it feels really happy. Everywhere in Hajime's world, is filled with happiness.」



「I, I see……somehow, it feels hot even though it's morning huh.」



The gaze of Hajime who ate a straight punch of love was wandering around. Yue who understood that Hajime was being shy chuckled 「Nfufu」while snuggling at him like a cat. Hajime's hand was subconsciously moving and gently caressed Yue's fluffy hair.



An atmosphere that was overflowing with sugar content was running rampant since the morning. Yue quivered her long eyelashes while quietly closing her eyelids, her faint pink lips were pushing out to Hajime. Hajime easily surrendered seeing that obviously coaxing pose. His face was approaching near……



「Geez~, Yue-oneechan! Is Papa still not awake nano!?」



The one who opened the door of the room loudly with a bang while entering with a huff was a five years old girl who puffed up her flat chest. She was Hajime's daughter Myuu. However, now her emerald green hair became emerald blond, while her fan shaped ears that were the trait of merman race had changed into small and cute human ears.



The cause of the change was the illusion that was created by the ring artifact hanging down from Myuu's neck. The artifact was something excellent that surprisingly could reproduce even the touching sensation, so even if Myuu's ear was touched the person touching wouldn't feel the texture of fin, but the sensation of human ear instead. And so, Myuu's appearance was completely that of a beautiful little girl with blond hair.



The moment that Myuu energetically entered the room, she pointed her finger at the clichéd childhood friend morning scene which entered her eyes and raised a protesting voice「Aa~~!」.



「Geez-, Yue-oneechan! I always told you every time! Doing that to papa right from the morning is a no-no! Why aren't you protecting your promise nano!」(TN: Here Myuu said 'me-' to Yue. This is the way people in Japanese scolded their naughty child or pet, it's like saying 'bad' with scolding tone in English, though I translated it into no-no here.)



「……uu. Tha, that is because Hajime is……」



「Blaming others is no-no!」



「……au. I'm sorry.」



Toward Myuu who pointed her index finger at Yue's nose while saying 「Bad-」, Yue could only dejectedly hung her head down regardless of her big sister status.



It had been about a year since they moved into earth. Recently Myuu who had grown up remarkably was acting really proper and strict. When all the onee-chan who often became hopeless character that couldn't read the atmosphere when they got entangled with Hajime, like Yue right now, Myuu would remonstrate them with 'Bad' like this.



Actually, in order for Myuu to become used with this world quickly, and also because it was desirable for Myuu to have education in good taste, she was then enrolled into a nursery school about two months ago, but it seemed that in the school Myuu became awakened as 'onee-san' for some reason.



There was the factor of how based on her age she was included in the senior group in school, but additionally there was also how she had been piling up experience that should be too dense for a mere infant. She had been kidnapped, auctioned, traveled through desert, struggling through a scene of carnage at the devil king castle, and even participated in a legendary decisive battle. Looking from the point of view of such Myuu, the children the same age with her who were born in peaceful country like Japan were as expected looked really young and naïve.



Thinking 'I have to be proper and strict!', she imitated the outrageous onee-chan group around her and her mother that was overflowing with kindness, like that she acted too helpful toward the other kindergarteners……when she noticed, she had became the trusted and beloved leader of the kindergarteners.



However, her call of 「Gentlemen! And ladies of Myuu's friend!」when she was gathering the kindergarteners, or how she said 「Right now is exactly the time to blaze our soul!」when encouraging a child that felt down, or how she showed a fearless grin when there was a child that looked uneasy, those actions that looked a little bit unlike a kindergartener were conspicuous so the teacher there reported it to Nagumo household……regarding the state of Hajime when he received that contact from the teacher, let's just say that he was rolling around on the floor for real at that time.



「Really it's my bad, Myuu. Come on, I've already waking up here.」



Yue who possessed the absolute dignity as the legal wife toward the other wives was seriously feeling down from getting scolded by Myuu. Hajime sent a glance at such a Yue while crawling out from the futon. Myuu listened to Hajime's words and nodded, she then faced Hajime and reached out both her hands.



「Myuu? What's with those hands?」



「Papa, Myuu want to be carried nano.」



Even though she was scolding Yue just now, but right after that Myuu demonstrated a spoiled kid request. Yue went 'hah' in shock and moved her gaze to Myuu. Her eyes were clearly narrating her dissatisfaction 「Even though I was scolded when acting spoiled……」which was looking a bit lacking in maturity.



Toward that, Myuu said,



「Mama said, 『When Yue-san pulled back, immediately act spoiled(attack)』, like that nano.」



「……I'm going to speak a bit with Remia.」



Yue became enveloped with faint golden light, right after that she became adult mode. And then, in order to speak a few words with the mother who taught woman battle tactic to a little child, Yue silently, but quickly exited from the room.



And then, Myuu who kept holding her pose asking for hug directed a shuddering gaze toward Hajime who was left behind. This little girl in front his eyes was steadily mastering the lesson from the seniors around her. From here on, just what kind of growth this beloved daughter would show him after accepting the teaching of the women who had one or two peculiarities Hajime wondered……



「Papa, carry me nano.」



「……Okay」



With a cramped expression, Hajime hugged Myuu who was making a cute request with cute grin, and then he exited the room while listening to the tumult that was audible from downstairs.



Hajime who entered the living room at first floor with one of his arms carrying Myuu witnessed the scene of Yue laying down complaints incessantly to Myuu's actual mother Remia. In regard to Remia, similar with Myuu she was also exposing emerald blond hair and human ears, right now she was showing her usual 「my my, ufufu」smile while dodging Yue's complaints flightily――was how it looked like, but her cheeks were faintly blushing.



With the adult mode Yue as her opponent, as expected even a professional widow would find herself at disadvantage. Even though they were the same gender, yet being stared by adult Yue fixedly from very close range would make anyone unable to calm down. Adult Yue-sama, how terrifying.



「Ah, you finally woke up Hajime-san.」



「Fumu, as I thought perhaps having Yue in charge of waking up art no good.」



Shia who was helping with the preparation of breakfast was saying such thing with an exasperated face while giving her morning greeting, and Tio who was watching morning news at the living room looked behind while also similarly greeting him.



There was no change in Tio's appearance, while Shia's prided rabbit ears were similarly hidden with artifact like Myuu and Remia. Right now her straight faint blue hair was put together using hair tie located around her neck and the bundle of hair was hung down forward.



「My, Shia-chan and also Tio-chan, you two are saying such thing, but if it's the two of you who are going to wake up Hajime won't you two also dive in?」



「Naturally desu, Kaa-sama.」



「Of course, Hahaue-dono」(TN: Both ways of calling have the same meaning of mother, but the kanji they are written with has the meaning of mother-in-law.)



Carrying breakfast from the kitchen……wasn't how she appeared, this person who appeared from the washroom as though to say that she had woken up just now, was Hajime's mother, Nagumo Sumire. Sumire was a famous shoujo manga artist, so there were a lot of times where she was staying until late at night in her workplace, she was extraordinarily weak in morning. Because of that, in Nagumo household there was no regular habit of taking breakfast properly but……



There, Shia who was in charge of cooking at Tortus and Remia who was a mother with a child came. Hajime took home Yue and others from the other world, and not long after the girls became freeloaders, the kitchen became entrusted to the two of them.



「Everyone, good morning. Maaan, it's great that the house is brilliant right from the morning. Even after a year has passed, my heart is still dancing every time I see this. You damn son, how dare you came home after becoming a great man! Really thank you very much-」



「You are full with energy from the morning huh, Tou-san. And then, don't grin like that while looking at them. You are going to get punch flying you know……by Kaa-san.」



The short haired middle-aged man with tall stature who had been continuously in a state of 'Right now, I'm intensely moved!' since a year ago, was the central pillar of Nagumo household, the company president who managed a game company, Nagumo Shuu.



He who was a pure otaku seemed to be deeply moved everyday from witnessing Yue and others who seemed to come out straight from 2D. And then most likely, being called as 「Otou-sama」by beautiful girls and women was also undoubtedly greatly related with that.



Shuu laughed in good mood from being surrounded by the daughters-in-law, Sumire was in a daze, and Hajime was doing Myuu's hairstyle while the breakfast was lined up on the dining table.



By the way, Shuu and Sumire's yearly income far surpassed the earning of average salary man, so Nagumo household was quite large. And so, even when their family increased all of a sudden, the home didn't feel that cramped even when all of them lived in one house.



Although, because of the sudden increase in residence right now the renovation of the house was in progress, after several months passed the house would surely be completed into a splendid building twice the previous size that the neighbors would notice.



In addition, regarding the administrative concern of Yue and others like their resident registration and the like, Hajime had sneaked into the government office and finished forging the documents. For their peace of mind, Yue even used her soul magic to the government workers to plant suggestion in them so there would be no problem. It was a hard work because there was a lot of kind of documents that needed to be put in order, for example passport and identification paper and so on, but at the very least there should be no one that could discover any unnaturalness with their existences in Japan.



Even for example that they got found out, they could just use soul magic to deal with it every time, they were also planning to slowly left behind evidence of their existences at the foreign governments too. The government officials of the world would be opposed by age of god magic!



「Yup, Shia-chan, Remia-chan, today the food is also delicious. Before this I thought that putting food into your stomach right from the morning, is that some kind of torture huh?, like that……but if it's like this then I can eat no matter how much.」



「I get what you mean. Hajime, Tou-san is happy. My son became a splendid cheat harem bastard when he returned back. There is nothing that I can teach you anymore like this.」



「Tou-san, I don't understand whether you are praising me or speaking ill of me from your words, but I have never received any lesson or anything about being cheat harem bastard at all.」



Sumire sent an exaggerated praise at Shia and Remia excessively, while Shuu was sending Hajime words with condescending attitude, hearing that Hajime replied back with an exasperated state. To that, Shuu opened his mouth with irritating atmosphere as though to say 「Good grief, yareyare daze」.



「What are you saying? Haven't I beaten up the soul of otaku into you since you have awareness of your surrounding? In other words, that was also me beating up the soul of cheat harem into you. The reason that you were able to create cheat harem at another world, is exactly because of that. How is that? Can you feel the gratitude for your Otou-sama keenly in your heart now?」



「I think I have already talked with you about my experience in another world, but where is otaku soul is proving useful there――」



Shuu and Sumire had listened to all that Hajime experienced at the other world. About how much effort it took to recover his normal appearance, about how his arm and eye were artificial, about how his gaze turned sharp now, and above all about how his atmosphere now was completely different from in the past, Hajime told all of those personally without any falsehood or manipulation, nor he was even trying to do those.



In other words, Shuu and Sumire should have known about the sequence of event of their son's grand experience starting from his experience in the abyss, in spite of that Shuu now declared that otaku knowledge was useful in those experiences, hearing that Hajime was a bit unable to accept it.



And so, Hajime normally objected to Shuu, but Shuu and Sumire immediately grinned widely while cutting off Hajime's words.



「『Ladies and gentleman-, all of you warriors-』」



「-」



「『Right now in this time, is exactly the time to blaze your soul-』」



「!!」



「『If you said you are going to get in my way, I'll kill you.』」



「!?」



「『I'll protect Yue, and Yue will protect me. With that we are――』」



「I got it already-! Otou-sama, really thank you very much-! That's why, stop it-」



Hajime writhed while asking them to stop with a voice that sounded like scream. Toward their son who was enduring his shame that much, the father and mother were mercilessly dealing the pursuing attack.



「Oi oi, what's wrong Hajime? What are you feeling ashamed for? You were cool you know? In real life, there is almost no chance to say those kind of speeches you know? When Tou-san watched the image recording Tio-san showed to me, my heart was trembling hard. Oh man, it was really an amazing chuu――cough-, really an amazing heroic you know?」



「Yes, truly. Not only to the girl partner, but you even said 『she is my woman』to the girl's parent, when I watched that I thought, just from what galgame this conquering character came from. Really……」



After giving a glance at Hajime who was shaking in while holding his chopstick, Shuu and Sumire paused with a superb timing before continuing with splendid harmony.



「「Hajime-san, those were seriously awesome -ssu. Trully, thank you very much-!」」



「You two are noisy-. Don't screw around, stop messing with me using that material-」



Shuu and Sumire knew about the events in the other world not only from Hajime's story. While keeping it secret from Hajime, Tio used regeneration magic to leave behind recording image of every memory――obviously the events in the abyss were included, other than that, the time when Hajime accepted Shia, the time when Hajime spoke resolutely to Tio's grandfather Adol, and even Hajime's speech at his classmates in the devil king castle, etc.――and showed it to Shuu and Sumire, since then at every opportunity Shuu and Sumire would praise Hajime「As expected from our son-!」with teasing mixed in it to mess with Hajime.



The corner of Hajime's eyes lifted up fiercely and brutally put pressure on Tio in an outburst of anger. With a cough, Tio choked in the middle of slurping her miso soup. Miso soup was dripping fromher nose while her breathing was getting rough 'haa haa'.



「A, as expected from the parents of Hajime-san. Recently I have become used to it, but as I thought seeing the figure of Hajime-san being toyed around, the uncomfortable feeling that I get is not half-baked desu.」



「……Nn. But, the bullied Hajime……is also nice.」



「My my, Yue-san. Recently, it feels like if it is about Hajime-san then everything is fine for you. Fufu, Myuu too has to work hard like this. Also Tio-san, this is the dining table you know? Please don't go haa haa while dripping snot like that, eat your food properly. Right now your face is looking quite "over the age limit" you know?」



Shia smiled wryly toward the exchange between Hajime and his parents, while Yue's cheeks reddened for some reason, Tio was going 'haa haa', and Remia was going 'my my, ufufu' smilingly. This was the ordinary day of Nagumo household recently.



Just when Hajime was going to snap from the mess, Shuu and Sumire easily drew back and concentrated on their breakfast as though nothing had happened. Hajime who was trembling from losing the target of his anger was then comforted by Yue and others altogether.



With a sidelong glance at their son who was being taken care by beautiful women and girls, Shuu and Sumire faced each other and their expression burst into a smile.



「Nevertheless, that time when Hajime suddenly returned home, and in addition he also introduced Yue and others, it was really shocking huh.」



「You're right. For him to really go to another world and went home bringing cheat harem, that's something that I had never even dreamed of.」



While exchanging words with small whisper, both of them recalled that time when Hajime came home.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



For the time being, I’m thinking of writing a bit about the story of post-going home.



After all there are considerable request and also hope for present-day story (lol)



Hakumei himself is swelling out with wild ideas.



Next will be the story of Hajime returning to his home and reunite with Shuu and Sumire.



I think it most likely can be posted at 6 P.M Saturday next week.



Please take care of me from here on too.





Chapter 94




Hajime and Kaori looked up at the sailing ships. Even on Earth, early sailing ships couldn’t match the gigantic scale of this one.



No less than 300 meters in length, and as large as a ten story building, it was only being partly visible from the ground. All along their hull magnificent decorations were mounted. Although rotted, they still gave off a strong impression that made you want to admire them. On their wooden ship, Hajime, who also specialized in manufacturing the same decorations, was grudgingly impressed with the extent they had detailed their ships, and couldn’t help but admire the time and effort the artisans put into creating them.



While hugging Kaori, Hajime jumped up using “Void Grip” and landed on the Terrace at the top of the Luxury liner. Then, sure enough, the surrounding space began to distort.



“Again?… Kaori stay alert. Something is bound to happen.”



“Un. It looks fine to me.”



Hajime felt that Kaori’s laidback response wasn’t suitable for someone still in the middle of challenging a Great Dungeon. It had become clear for a while now that Kaori’s tension had dropped sharply. Even though she was still putting on a smile, Hajime could tell that it was different from all her usual ones. He was sure she wasn’t doing it on purpose, but her new distracted attitude wasn’t good for their current situation. She should at least hold it in check until the exploration of ?Meljeene Deep Sea Ruins?was done, Hajime thought while sharply scratching his cheek.



Hajime took a quick survey of their altered environment, this time it seems they were on top of a luxury liner sailing out at sea.



Presently it’s night time, with the full moon shining in the heavens. The luxury liner is shining with light sparkles, and on the deck there are various arrangements buffet-type style cuisines lined up with many people who were chatting about while having delicious-looking food in one hand. Presently it was night time, with a full moon glowing in the heavens. The luxury liner shone with sparkling lights, and on the deck were various arrangements of buffet-style cuisine lined up with a crowd of people chatting together while holding delicious-looking food in one hand.



“This is a party…isn’t it?”



“Haa, it sure is dazzling. Did we misunderstand Meljeene’s concept?”



Hajime and Kaori were standing upon a raised terrace, probably an area reserved for the crew, while looking down on the enormous deck and trying to get their heads around the difference between this cheerful party and the ghastly sight they had witnessed last time.



Then, just as they decided to take a brief rest, the door behind them opened and several chatting sailors walked out. Rather than risk losing this chance while they took a rest, they decided to mix in with the sailors and listen to their conversation.



From listening to the sailor’s stories they learned that this maritime party was apparently being held in celebration of the end of the war. The war that had continued for so many years, rather than ending through invasion and annihilation, had been resolved by signing a peace treaty. The sailors seemed happy, and if they looked closely they were able to see that not only were there humans on the deck but also devils and demi-humans. Without distinction for race, everyone was freely chatting among themselves.



“There was an age such as this, wasn’t there?”



“It certainly was a great achievement for all those people to give so much effort to end the war. Although I’m not sure how many years have passed since the end of the war, surely not all of the ill feelings have faded, yet they are still able to laugh so freely…”



“Surely the people down there must be similar to those who tried their best to end the war. Everyone is different, seeing this doesn’t necessarily mean that everyone is able to laugh together so soon.”



“That’s true…”



Getting caught up in the atmosphere and bright expressions of the people, Hajime and Kaori also naturally loosened up. After a while they saw an elderly man climbing up onto a stage prepared on the deck. There was a sense of respect in the eyes of the people below as they noticed him on stage and abruptly stopped chatting to focus on him.



There was another man who appeared to be an aide standing near the elderly man, but for some reason he was wearing a hood and trying to blend in with the background. Given the occasion, Hajime thought that his appearance was a bit rude… however it didn’t look like anyone else was concerned about the hooded man.



Eventually, when all the chatter had subsided, the elderly man began his speech.



“Gentlemen, those who wished for peace, the brave souls who ran through the war risking their lives, are the messengers of peace. Today, at this place, I truly feel that it’s a great fortune for all of us to be able to meet here together. It was a war that begun a long time, even for my generation, yet we were able to stand together in peace after bringing an end to the war. To see such a dream come true… my heart still trembles.”



Everyone was listening in silence as the old man spoke. As the speech continued, events such as doubt, crossing paths and incidents became stepping stones towards peace. He spoke of those who were often reckless in their attempts to overturn this, and the friends who scattered during the middle… as the speech progressed everyone eyes begun to look far away, yearning for their missed ones and suppressing moisture from the corners of their eyes, enduring the urge to let their tears flow.



It would seem the old man is the king of the Humans. Among the humans, even at the early stages of the war, it seemed as there was a movement behind the scenes for peace. The people now nod to show their respect.



Finally it seemed as though the speech ended. The king still seems quite worked up after his speech, the atmosphere on the deck is also still quite worked up. However Hajime is attacked by a bad premonition. Something feels off, he has seen the expression the king is wearing somewhere before.



“–and thus, one year has passed since the signing of the peace treaty …….. It was all so foolish.”



At the words of the King, for a moment the crowd appeared puzzled, Hajime thought he had misheard him. Everyone was looking at each other in confusion. In the meantime the King’s heated speech continued.



“Yes, it truly was foolish. To see both the beasts and the heretics talking about the future and exchanging drinks, it was ridiculous. Do you understand, gentlemen? That’s right, I am talking about you.”



“What on earth are you saying Aleist?! Hell, what’s wrong with sayin- gaah!?”



With the sudden change of King Aleist, one of the devils who was agitated stood up before him. Then, as he tried to question King Aleist…. the sudden result was a sword growing from his chest.



The demon tribe man who was stabbed, looked back over his shoulder to see the startled expressions of the human tribe. By looking at their faces you could tell they were all honestly surprised. With a final expression of disbelief, the man of the Demon tribe collapsed.



Screams arose and the entire deck fell into an uproar. “Your Majesty!”, cried several men and women as they rushed to the collapsed body of the Demon tribe man.



“Well gentlemen, as I stated originally, I am truly happy to bring everyone together tonight. We will create a country free from the races that were abandoned by god, where all can be equal.



From the Genesis there was only one god, ‘Ehito-sama’. Those who turned their backs on him, foolishly worshiping a false god, such pagans mustn’t be allowed to leave! It will end today! The only path to peace is through destroying all the heathens! Therefore, this day, as we sweep away the leaders of the non-believers, I cannot help but rejoice! Now, servants of God, pass judgement on these heathens with the hammer of justice! Aah! Ehito-sama, please watch over our work!”



King Aleist’s laughter echoed loudly as he fell onto his knees and gazed up towards the heavens. At the same time he signaled soldiers, who had been dressed as sailors, to completely surrounded the party on the deck.



The deck is positioned in the middle of the ship, sandwiched between a gigantic mast and the main structure, 10 floors high running from front to back. If you look, the soldiers are occupying the scaffolding on the terrace and mast, arranged so that they can focus on the targets below them. Out at sea there is nowhere they can escape to, the geographical advantage is entirely on the soldier’s side. Hajime would’ve been aware of this already, but the countries leader’s expressions of despair showed they were only just realising it now.



In an instant, all the magic was finally released and bombarded the deck. Although the passengers fought back desperately, they were at a disadvantage… it was a one-sided massacre as those who resisted were slaughtered.



Those who ran fled towards the inside of the ship, however most of them were killed as they ran. The deck had been completely changed into a sea of blood in only an instant.



“Ugh”



“Kaori…”



Kaori covered her mouth with one of her hands to suppress the nausea as she leant on the railing. The sight was so horrific that it was no wonder Hajime reached out and offered Kaori his support.



It appears King Aleist felt like hunting as he soon joined his subordinates in pursuing the remnants who had fled into the ship.



The hooded man followed the king into the ship. Just before he stepped inside he turned and looked back at the deck. In that instant a tuft of silver hair escaped from the fringe of his hood and shone brightly in the reflected moonlight. His hidden eyes met theirs and for a moment Hajime’s thought they had been seen.



The surroundings distorted, apparently the dungeon only want to show them that previous scene, Hajime and Kaori were soon back to on top of the derelict luxury liner.



“Kaori, rest for a little bit.”



“No, I’m fine. Although it was somewhat intense… but I wonder if that was really the end of that trial… we didn’t even do anything.”



“I think this ship graveyard is its ending point. Although we could’ve explored the sea beyond the barrier… if you think about it normally, people who wanted to proceed out into the depths of the sea would need to use the ship. Perhaps witnessing that scene was itself the purpose of the vision. To burn the gruesomeness of the gods work into your memory so you would feel compelled to explore this ship as a result. It’s a pretty nasty idea, especially for the people from this world.”



The people of this world, though few of them would make it here, are expected to have faith in the gods. To show them such a gruesome result of their faith… it would surely torture a gentle spirit, and this Labyrinth’s vital point for exploration is the power of magic which heavily relies on one’s mental state. In that sense, it was the reverse of Raisen Great Labyrinth. It was only because Hajime came from another world that the results of this mental pressure was of such a small degree.



Hajime and Kaori both looked over the deck with an expression indicating their reluctant remembrance of the ghastly massacre that had occurred here. However in Hajime’s case, his face looked more like he was remembering a bad sports foul.



Having made their resolve, the two of them jump down onto the deck and set foot near the door that King Aleist once entered who knows how long ago.



The inside of the ship was completely enclosed in darkness. Since the outside was bright, it wouldn’t have been strange for light to shine in through crevices in the rotted wood, but for some reason there was no light at all. In order to push forward into the darkness Hajime took a light out from his ‘Treasure box’.



“That sight earlier… Even though the war was already over… I wonder, did king really betray them…?”



“That’s what it looked like… However, wasn’t it a little bit strange? When he stood up on stage those people looked at him with eyes full of love and respect… If deep down you truly hated Demons and Demi-humans, would you really be able to earn such deep respect?”



“That’s true… Based on the way those people were speaking to him, it seems like there must’ve been a sudden change sometime during the one year after the end of the war… What could have happened to cause such a change of heart?”



“Well, without a doubt they were fighting for their god, they were shouting it loudly enough. They gave off an almost deranged feeling.”



“Yeah, they looked like Ishtar-san, abusing their religion to look down on others. It’s pathetic isn’t it?”



Apparently, from the high school girls perspective, the Pope of the Sacred Church was a pathetic person. However, Hajime only had the smallest feeling of sympathy for him upon hearing it. The two of them continued forwards, still thinking about the earlier scene, until they spotted something ahead shining in response to Hajime’s light.



Hajime and Kaori stop their feet and watched as the light slowly approached them. When it got closer they could see that it was a girl in a fluttering white dress. She stopped in the hallway in front of them and stood there, swaying slightly with her head looking downwards.



Kaori and Hajime felt something unpleasant and shuddered violently. Kaori’s expression became particularly stiff while Hajime, deciding that an ordinary girl wouldn’t be in a place like this, pointed Donner at the girl with the intention of killing her.



Instantly, the girl collapsed into the hallway with a soft thump. Then, at an angle impossible for a normal human’s joints, raised herself up onto her hands and feet like a spider and launched herself straight at them!



Ketaketaketaketaketaketaketaa! (TN: Spider girl’s laugh?)



Her bizarre laughter echoed throughout the hallway. Shining eyes, just like those from urban legends, glared at them from between her bangs, as Hajime shot at the approaching figure.



(TN: Actually genderless, but whatever. Editor wanted to add “her”. Meh)



(EN: We’ve already described it as a girl, seemed appropriate).



(TN: Meh. Whatever. I am tired.)



“NOOOOOOOOO!!!!”



“Wah!? Calm down Kaori! Don’t grab my arm!”



Just like the template for this situation called for, Kaori clung onto Hajime and let out a scream. The girl approaching them laughed at her mockingly. Hajime, who was trying to shoot the girl with Donner, had his aim shifted due to Kaori clinging onto him.



“Kegya!!”



In a moment the girl was at Hajime’s feet. Then, with her bizarre cry, she lept straight at Hajime’s face.



Hajime reluctantly gave up on trying to shoot her, and instead delivered a sure-kill yakuza-style kick straight into her still laughing stomach . As a precaution, he had clad himself and magic and used ‘Grand Legs’ to deliver the blow. (TN: “Grand Legs”. New spell or what? Don’t remember it at all…. It’s in the character introduction chapter, but what the hell?”



The moment Hajime’s kick hit her stomach the girl was blown away into the wall, before bouncing several times and coming to a stop at the end of the hallway. Her limbs were now in an even more unnatural position she slowly vanished, as though melting into the darkness.



Hajime let out a sigh and then gave the still shaking Kaori clinging onto him a bonk on the head with his fist. With a start Kaori looked up at Hajime, an expression of fear still on her face. Tears clung to her eyes as her mouth let out a small squeak, anyone could see she was still terrified.



“Hey Kaori, are you bad with these ghoulish type of things?”



“Is there such a person who is good with them?!”



“Wouldn’t you be fine if you just thought of them as apparitions?”



“…. Gusuu, I’ll try my best.”



As Kaori promised, she separated herself from Hajime, however she didn’t let her hand go of Hajime’s clothes.



Until earlier she had been worried about what to say to Hajime, she had seemed more reserved than usual, but now a strong will dwelt in her eyes. She would absolutely not allow herself to be separated from him! It was a type of desperation, while simultaneously being an expression of her love for him.



Just as Kaori had finished gathering her resolve the door ahead of them in the hallway flew open with a bang. On the other side of the door there were countless bloodstains on the floor, and when they looked up they saw the head of a woman with long, dripping wet, hair hung up on the ceiling looking down at them. At the same time they heard a noise and turned around to see a headless man dragging an axe along the floor behind him.



Hajime delivered another one of his yakuza-like kick to the headless man and readied his gun to follow up, but there was no need. The headless man was already dead from the kick.



“No more… I want to go back now… I want to see Shizuku-chan~”



As the proceeded further into the ship the strange phenomena became more and more violent, which caused Kaori to regress back into a child, clinging onto Hajime’s back and refusing to come out.



Ever since Kaori was small she had looked up to Shizuku as her knight & protector whenever she entered haunted houses or had to deal with Kouki and the boys. However, those feelings never crossed the boundary into being yuri.



Meljeene, the founder of ?Meljeene Deep Sea Ruins?, seemed to be trying to back them into an emotional corner. Hajime, having survived The Abyss, already had experience dealing with being surrounded by darkness and didn’t really find it very difficult to cope with, though he could understand how it would be difficult for someone with a more normal psyche to handle. However, he couldn’t imagine Tio or Yue sobbing from such surprises.



That was until a while ago when Kaori, while still half crying – half flirting, had stepped out and begun to repel the horrors using her healing magic. Seeing her sudden change in attitude had made Hajime want to tsukkomi “where did the scared and lost little girl like atmosphere from earlier go?” as he watched her. As they advanced Kaori began to get more unsteady again, but together they eventually arrived at the ship’s hold.



They stepped through the opened heavy doors. They proceeded towards the back of the ship’s hold, moving in between the sparsely spread out cargo. However, before they had progressed far the doors behind them shut themselves with a loud ‘boom!’



“Pii!?”



Kaori let out a strange voice at this surprising sound and Hajime began to worry whether or not she was keeping in mind their important talk about what she should do after finishing the labyrinth. It wasn’t the first time this thought had crossed his mind.



However Hajime just let out a sigh and began to calmly stroking Kaori’s shoulders. However the effectiveness of this tactic was disrupted when a thick fog began to slowly block their field of view.



“Ha-Ha-Ha-Ha-Ha-Hajime-kun!?”



“You’re beginning to laugh just like a cheerful foreigner. Don’t worry, just handle it like always. You’ll be fine if you just crush them with your magic.”



The moment Hajime replied they heard the ring of something as it tore through the wind, flying towards them. Hajime moved like a bolt of lightning and blocked the attack aimed at his neck with his left arm. When he lowered his left arm they could see an extremely thin thread stuck into it. They didn’t have time to stare, soon there was the continuous ring of the wind being cut as arrows flew at them from all sides.



“To come so far just for a trap? It’s so disgusting! That’s just typical of those damn liberators!”



“Come forth, Guardian of Light. Absolute Light!”



Hajime was caught by surprise for a moment, however, since they were only a primitive weapons Kaori was able to block them with her defensive magic. Soon though, the fog ahead of them began to swirl violently and a fierce storm struck Hajime and Kaori.



“Kya!?”



Kaori was blown away in the storm, her screaming figure disappearing into the fog. Hajime, made a sour face as he tried to find her using his perception ability. Unfortunately, it seems the fog had a function that inhabited skills of the sensing system, similar to inside the?Haltina Sea of Trees?, thus he quickly lost track of her.



“Che. Kaori, don’t move!”



With a sour face Hajime called out to Kaori, but instead of Kaori a knight wielding a longsword came tearing out of the fog ahead of him. Using an unusual technique, he lunged fiercely and swung the sword at Hajime.



Parrying the attack calmly with Donner, he struck the his large opponent in the chest with Schlag then fired a magic bullet into his stomach with Donner. A hole opened in the knight’s stomach and he silently vanished into the mist.



However, immediately after a line of swordsmen and knights with abnormal strength emerged from the fog. These warriors held a variety of different weapons, and used the fog to launch attacks at Hajime one after another, fading back into the mist after each strike.



“Damn, so troublesome…”



While spitting out curses, Hajime expanded red magic bullets around his body like a satellite, also activating “Lightspeed”(??) swiftly tidied up his surroundings. It was a concern to him that he could not hear Kaori’s voice.



Hajime was concerned that he couldn’t hear Kaori’s reply. While spitting out curses Hajime launched bullets of red magic and made them orbit his body like satellites. At the same time he activated ‘Lightspeed’ and swiftly tidied up his surroundings.



Shifting to Kaori, with Hajime gone from her sight she was finding it hard to keep up a brave front. Kaori was really bad with horror, it would be very difficult to overcome her current predicament even under normal circumstances, but now her body wanted to freeze up just from the fear of being alone. Add in her strong inferiority complex, though she wouldn’t admit it to herself, and the bottom line was that all she wanted to do was curl herself up and cry.



Kaori scolded herself, she mustn’t let herself be found cowering like this, and forced her body to stand back up. As soon as she was upright again she felt a hand on her shoulder. Hajime would often encourage her by patting her on the shoulder. Overcome by happiness, Kaori found herself turning around in delight.



“Hajime-ku-”



However, as she turned around Kaori noticed that something felt off about the hand on her shoulder. To be more accurate, it felt too thin and too cold. Kaori felt chills run down her spine as her intuition warned her that what was behind her was not Hajime.



If it wasn’t Hajime, then who on earth was it? Continuing to turn, now like a rusty machine, Kaori saw it. Eyes, nose, mouth… and then even more holes. It was the face of a woman dyed in a darkness as black as the abyss.



“Fuwah~”



Kaori’s spirit was over in an instant, and her defensive instincts rendered her unconscious.



In the 2 minutes it took Kaori to get up and faint, Hajime had already destroyed 50 ghostly warriors. This was only his rough estimate based on killing one of the ghostly veterans every 2-3 seconds.



Just as he was beginning to think he had wiped them all out, a large man wielding a greatsword tore out from the fog, charged straight at him and swung a blow that boasted of enormous hidden strength.



Hajime dodged the attack with the smallest movement of his body. However it wasn’t over yet. The warrior bounced the greatsword back into the air using the recoil from the blow to the ground and moved to attack again.



Hajime responded by activating ‘Vajra’, stopping the blow with his mechanical arm and jumping up onto the greatsword with his knees, forcing it from his opponents hands and trapping it against the ground. Then, with a swift motion he raised his gun and fired a magic bullet straight into the large man’s head.



At the same time the large man’s head was blown off the surrounding fog begins to fade away.



“Kaori! Where are you?”



Hajime focused all of his senses on finding Kaori’s presence. However, even without doing that Kaori was easily found.



“I’m over here, Hajime-kun.”



“Kaori, are you alright?”



Hajime divulged a sigh of relief upon seeing Kaori walking towards him with a smile. Once Kaori reached his side she snuggled up against against him with a beautiful smile.



“It was… very scary…”



“Is that so?…”



“Un. That’s why I want to be comforted”



As she said this Kaori threw her arms around Hajime’s neck and hugged him. At a distance so close they were practically nose-to-nose, Kaori locates Hajime’s mouth with her eyes and began to draw herself closer…



Gotsu (TN: Sound effect. *thunk*)



With a Gotsu~tsu sound (TN: *thunk*) Donner’s muzzle met Kaori’s temple.



“Wh-what…?”



Kaori appeared to be confused as Hajime narrowed his brutal-looking eyes and directed murderous intent towards her.



“What? Of course I’ll kill enemies, no matter how they look like” and without a beat of hesitation he pulled the trigger.



Karankara (*Clang-clang*)



There was the sound of a knife hitting the ground, it had fallen out of the hand of Kaori when she was shot. She had intended to stab him in the back as she was hugging him. With steady footsteps Hajime approached the collapsed Kaori.



Getting back up, Kaori begins talking to Hajime in a frightened and trembling voice.



“Hajime-kun, why would you do such a thing!?”



However Hajime response was to fire another magic bullet at Kaori.



“Don’t you dare speak with Kaori’s voice! Do not degrade her body by moving it! Did you think I couldn’t see the truth? You are nothing but a piece of trash possessing her body.”



Hajime’s ‘Magic Stone Eye’ had already revealed to him that there was a ghostly woman possessing Kaori.



With the truth clearly exposed Kaori, who until just a moment ago had been cowering on the ground, instantly changed her expression and burst into mocking laughter.



“Nyahahaha, even if you know the truth it is of no matter. You can’t do anything…this girl’s body is already mine!



As she said this the possessed Kaori raised herself off the ground and pushed Hajime down onto the ground into the mounted position.



“Wait, what are you doing? This is your woman! Do you plan to hurt her!?”



“Shut up! You’re giving me a headache. Didn’t I tell you not to move? I’m not going to hurt Kaori, the magic bullets will pass right through her body, the only one who will suffer is you.”



“If I disappear this woman’s soul will shatter! Is that really alright with you!?”



At those words Hajime inclined his head slightly in thought. Although there was a good chance it wasn’t a bluff, there was no way to verify if it was true.



Most people would probably become trapped by indecision in this situation, was the possessed Kaori hoping for this? She was giving her cat-like laugh again while motioning for him to step aside. Seeing this Hajime gave her his reply.



Zupan~! Zupan!



It was a pair of magic bullets. The possessed Kaori’s expression was too shocked to reveal as to whether she had felt any pain. Soon her expression shifted into one of frustration as she shouted at Hajime in an angry voice.



“Are you insane!? Do you not care what happens to this woman!?”



“Shut up you pile of trash! If I don’t attack then Kaori’s body would remain possessed. However, as long as you aren’t killed her soul won’t break, right? Until you feel like leaving her body everything will be fine if I just torment you without killing you.”



The ghostly woman was left speechless at his words. When she looked into Hajime’s eyes she was being stabbed by his murderous intent that dwelt there.



“I’ll make you regret thinking you could touch what’s ‘important’ to me. Even though you’re an enemy I won’t kill you, I won’t let you experience the relief of death. I’ll make it so you can’t escape Kaori’s body even if you want to. I’ll force you to suffer until you go mad from the pain.”



Red magic flowed out from Hajime’s body, his white hair was caught in the eddies and slowly began to sway in the energy. There was no rage, bloodthirst or insanity in his eyes, they were like frozen chips of ice.



Hajime was furious, more so than ever before. He wouldn’t be satisfied with just kill his enemy this time, they must experience cruelty akin to the depths of hell.



The ghost possessing Kaori had been too dense to realise she had picked a fight with something that should never be disturbed. Only now, as she felt her gaze trapped in Hajime eyes, did she finally realise what she had awakened; a monster, one you would normally pray to never meet.



With Donner’s muzzle again pressed against her forehead, the ghostly woman earnestly begged for release. Even if all it bought her was permission to disappear a single second faster, when she imagined what this monster would probably do to her even one second seemed like a blessing.



She was just an ordinary ghost. Although it did seem that her lingering essence was greater than than any of the other apparitions they had encountered, in the face of this atmosphere it all amounted to nothing. The frozen wrath Hajime was giving off was just that terrifying.



“Iwanttodisappear!Iwanttodisappear!Iwanttodisappear!Iwanttodisappear!Iwanttodisappear!Iwanttodisappear!”



The ghost’s sobs echoed louder as Hajime’s finger moved to pull the trigger, when suddenly the Kaori’s body began to shine. It was the sparkle of the restore-all-abnormal-status recovery magic ‘Ten Thousand Heavens’, which Kaori had prepared as a precaution ahead of time using the ability of ‘Delayed Invocation’.



While left dumbfounded by the feeling of unbelievable relief the ghost heard a voice from inside her.



“–It’s okay, I’ll send you off properly.”



Alongside these words the shining, pure white, light intensified. The ghost felt afraid as the light wrapped around her, dragging her gently along with it towards the heavens. However, as she gradually passed on to the next world and her consciousness began to fade she was overcome with a feeling of peace and relief.



With one clap, Kaori sent her off and slowly began to open her trembling eyelids. Hajime, still lying underneath Kaori in the mounted position, looked directly up into Kaori’s eyes. Ever since Kaori began to shine, the fading presence of the ghost’s existence had been reflected in Hajime’s Magic Stone Eye. For the moment he released his killing intent and focused on confirming whether the ghost had truly left Kaori.



Their faces were so close, and with Hajime’s lying underneath her, his gaze filled with a mixture of relief and worry as he focused his eyes intently on her pupils, it would’ve been enough to make anyone feel moved.



Gently lowering her head Kaori pressed her lips on Hajime’s. It was only the barest meeting of their lips, but for Kaori it was still her precious first kiss.



Hajime whole body went stiffened in surprise for a moment. In order to be certain that Kaori had been released Hajime had used almost all his concentration to examine her. With his mind so distracted, naturally it wasn’t possible for him to avoid a kiss.



After a while Kaori gently released his lips.



“What are you…?”



“Perhaps it’s my answer?”



“Your answer?”



“Un. Why did I follow you? Why do I want to keep on following you?…. This is my answer to Hajime’s questions.”



When she said this Kaori smiled at Hajime. It was smile he had always seen her wearing, warm like a ray of light from the sun. Ever since coming here it had become clouded and covered up by a false laugh, but now it shone once again.



In fact Kaori had still retained her consciousness while possessed, though it felt like watching the world outside while trapped inside a glass room. She had still been able to see Hajime in never seen before state of fury, saying things like Kaori was ‘important’ to him. It had flowed right through the ghost and reached her heart.



At the sight of this Hajime unbearable sadness had risen up in her chest, but at the same time she felt the nervous passion she had when she first confessed to him.



If she wanted to explain it, it was a feeling of selfish, of always wanting to be indulged, always make them vividly aware of your presence. Mixed in amongst the circle of girls Yue allowed to surround Hajime, Kaori found it intolerable that she wasn’t allowed to hoard him all to herself, yet at the same time she didn’t even want to imagine a future where she wasn’t by Hajime’s side.



She wanted to make them recognise that even if her capabilities were nowhere near Yue and the others, her feelings weren’t any less.



“I like you Hajime-kun, no, I love you. That’s why from here on I want our futures to be entwined.”



“Won’t it only leave you feeling bitter? Just like it is with Shia, even if Yue weren’t there, it doesn’t necessarily mean that I will love you back.”



“That’s true, it’ll probably be painful at times…. I want to be monopolised, I want you to only look at me. I feel so jealous of Yue sometimes, and so inferior when I compare myself to her”



“If that’s the case…”



“But I’ll only regret it if I allow myself to be separated from you here, I’m sure of it. For me, just being near Hajime is wonderful….and that’s how I’ve always felt. In time I want to close the gap between us even more, but for right now this is enough.”



Pinching Hajime’s cheeks between both her hands, Kaori smiled softly.



The expression on Hajime’s face was a complex mix of troubled and amazed, but Kaori had decided on her own, and if she believes that it’s the best decision for herself, Hajime wouldn’t say another word. Each person had their own idea of happiness, deciding Kaori’s happiness for her is something he couldn’t do, nor did he want to.



“…. I see. If Kaori is fine with this then I won’t say any more.”



“Un. Although I’ll probably cause a lot of trouble, please don’t hate me, alright?”



“What are you saying at such a late hour? From our time at school, up to our time here, you have always been an terrible troublemaker.”



“That’s not true!”



“Really? Back at school you never read the situation and would casually come over and talk to me, completely unaware of the word bombs you were dropping everywhere, and never noticing that every time the guys around us would seethe with anger. And then let’s not forget when a negligee-clad lady decided to visit a man’s room in the middle of the night…”



“Uu, I remember, all I wanted to do was talk to you…. Un, it was really embarrassing when I realized later that I had come to your room dressed like that.”



While Kaori was covering her blushing face with her hands, Hajime got up and offered Kaori a hand up. Then, with a grin, patted Kaori on the shoulder gently, and turned to start walking towards the magic circle that had begun to shine further inside the storeroom once the fog had lifted.



However, he was stopped by Kaori tightly grabbing onto his sleeve. If he looked carefully he could see that she was still a little unsteady. Apparently the possession had dulled her body’s senses a little. Now that the body had been released it hopefully wouldn’t take long for it to return back to it’s normal state.



“Let’s rest for a little bit.”



Hajime had suggested this, but it seems Kaori had an idea of her own and with a smile she hopped up onto Hajime’s back.



“….What are you doing?”



“Isn’t it better if we progress quickly? I don’t know when my magic power will return and if we hang around here the fog will surely come back, right?”



There was definitely some truth to her words,so Hajime replied with a “It can’t be helped” while scratching his head, and walked towards the magic circle while carrying Kaori.



Kaori wrapped her arms around Hajime’s neck and clung on tightly to his back. Although he didn’t say anything, Hajime was trying his best to ignore the soft feeling that pressing up against his back.



Kaori moved close enough that he could feel her hot breath in his ear. Her lips, close enough that they were almost touching his earlobe, opened gently and a sweet sound reverberated inside his ears.



“Hajime-kun… I want to asking you something about what happened earlier.”



“Earlier?”



“Yes. Why was it that you got so angry during that fight?”



“Saa, why was I angry? I don’t know.” (TN: “Don’t make a move on what’s ‘important’ to me.” …..Was he really an otaku before?)



“Mouu, please tell me~.”



Refusing to answer her questions or get caught up in her flirtatious atmosphere, Hajime continued to carry Kaori while moving forward at a brisk pace and without hesitation stepped into the magic circle.





Chapter 95




Faint light shone on the surface of the sea, and it made the swaying waves a ceiling.



In that space, a building that was like a temple existed in the center, which was supported by four huge columns. There was no wall between the columns. A delicate, complex magic formation was drawn at the place that seemed to be an altar at the center of the temple. Still, from the temple whose surroundings were filled with ocean water, the pathway that floated on the surface of the sea extended in four directions, and the end went on to become a circle. And, a magic formation was also drawn on the footing of that circle.



One among the four magic formations began to shine suddenly. Then, after the momentary light that was like an explosion, the shadows of people stood there. It was Hajime and Kaori.



“……Here is…… Is that a magic formation? Unexpectedly, was it captured?”



“Um, is there some problem?”



“No, I didn’t think that it was really already cleared…… Though I felt it was a little easy when compared to the other Labyrinths…… Though I expected that clione to at least come out at the end……”



Apparently, understanding that they seemed to have arrived at the dwelling of Meiru Merujine, Hajime made an expression like he was a little let down. In contrast to that, Kaori, peeking at his face from over Hajime’s shoulder, replied while smiling wryly.



“You know, Hajime-kun. This place was plenty difficult. The beginning is an undersea cave after all, and because normally you would not possess something like a submarine, you would continuously be consuming a lot of magical power the whole time until it was cleared, and if done poorly, as it is you would drown. The clione-like thing was an almost impossibly tough enemy, and because physical attacks were ineffective against the things that looked like ghosts, you will again rely on magical power. Because of that, breaking through cannot be done without fighting a large army. It’s a sufficiently ridiculous degree of difficulty.”



“Yeah, though I guess it might be so if you say so.”



“Not to mention, as for the people of this world the piety seems to be strong…… To display such madness……”



“Too much mental intensity……?”



Kaori’s point was, in short, that Hajime was too strong. When saying up to there, certainly, Hajime agreed that Guryuen Conflagration Mountain would have also been able to be captured flawlessly if not for the attack of Fried at the end.



And, come to think of it, they had arrived before joining up with Yue and the others, but at the time that he thought about what they were doing, the magic formation that was at the end of the path to the right began to shine like it had read Hajime’s thoughts.



When the bursting light had settled down, the figures of the three people of Yue, Shia, and Tio were there. It was exquisite timing.



“Good timing. Was it OK over there?”



“N…… Over there…… was it not safe?”



“Ah, Kaori-san are you alright!?”



“Mu? Are you hurt? What happened to recovery magic?”



To Hajime’s calling out, even though each of them showed an energetic appearance, they sent gazes like they were worried at Kaori who was being carried on Hajime’s back. Kaori’s reply regarding that was……



“Thank you for worrying. But, I’m fine. Because half was just me being spoiled.”



To Kaori who declared that boldly as she floated a truly cheerful smile, as Yue narrowed her eyes, Shia appealed with “I’m jealous. Please switch places with me~,” and Tio raised a broad smile with a “Hohoo,” seemingly amused.



“Hey, Kaori. Perhaps, can you already stand up?”



“Ehehe, actually from the beginning there was no problem with walking…… I’m sorry?”



“Haa, hurry up and get down.”



To Kaori who laughed like a little evil slipped out, Hajime let Kaori down while showing an amazed expression. And then, they joined with Yue and the others and faced the temple.



“And? What happened? Hey, try to say it, Goshujin-sama. It seems something happened with Kaori? Hey, hey, what happened? Say it without hiding – hebuu!?”



Because she began to question him with an absolutely annoying feeling while Tio smirked, Hajime who became irritated dispatched an open handed slap at once. As she sat at ease, Tio, who had crumbled down with a fascinating slanting posture, colored her cheeks while breathing roughly.



“I-impact after a long time~, haa haa, n, Goshujin-sama, isn’t it fine punishing me more? Isn’t doing a kick instead good?”



In the atmosphere that was expected somewhere, ignoring Tio who said such things as she pleased, Hajime and the others went towards the altar inside. From the back, “One more time, it is fine with one time! Please, hit me~,”though the disgusting words were heard, everyone ignored it with all of their power.



“……And? What happened?”



Yue asked the same question as Tio. However, the look was not at Hajime, it was faced at Kaori. Kaori, smiling sweetly in good humor as she matched gazes with Yue, dropped a bomb of words like the other day.



“I only kissed with Hajime-kun a little.”



“……Hou.”



“Eh!? Is that true!? From which one!? From which one was it!? It can’t be, from Hajime-san!?”



To Kaori’s words, Yue’s voice lowered one level, and Shia drew closer like she was excited.



“It was from me. ……Hajime-kun was angry for my sake…… I stole it not being able to endure it.”



“Waa, it’s the same as my time! I also stole one because I could not endure it. We’re comrades! Kaori-san!”



“Ufufu, that’s right, Shia. Next time, shall we steal one with two people?”



“In that case, should we rather make it to a fait accompli?”



Right at Hajime’s side, the two girls began to refine the Hajime attack plan. A cold sweat flowed on Hajime’s face. Though it looked like they were in high spirits going “Kya Kya” as they appeared to be joking, in fact, it was because the eyes of Kaori and Shia were serious. In the old days he never would have imagined Kaori turning carnivorous eyes towards him.



“……I thought you would run away with your tail rolled up.”



Yue turned a probing look at Kaori. Yue had noticed that Kaori was tormenting her heart as she felt an inferiority complex. Therefore, this time that became the first Great Labyrinth challenge for Kaori, possibly she thought about if she would run home failing. Of course, she had no intention to comfort the other party who had proclaimed a declaration of war to her. If she drew back here, it as just fine if she declared victory when she considered the extent of it.



However, it seemed that Kaori had gotten back on her feet, or rather, there was even an atmosphere of determination being made since before. She was anxious about what had happened.



“……That’s right. From Hajime-kun as well, I was told that doing so sooner was better. But, the various differences among other things with Yue…… I will show them now.”



“……Did you become defiant?”



“Indeed it might be called that. Or perhaps I should say, although I came along with you all becoming defiant from the start, showing the difference, it was surely only forgotten. I showed you a shameful place.”



“……Although it would be fine if you gave up as you were.”



“Fufu, are you scared? To compete together?”



“……Don’t get carried way by the rhythm. Troublemaker.”



“That, it was said also by Hajime-kun. ……I, do I have a constitution to make trouble like that I wonder……?”



To Yue’s sharp words, Kaori’s face stiffened. Though she felt a little down being called a troublemaker similarly by both her rival in love and the one she loved, she immediately pulled herself together. Incidentally, actually Yue as well, or perhaps you should say Hajime and the others, because everyone comparatively has a constitution to make trouble, though the words surely boomeranged considerably, the self-consciousness of it was not in Yue.



“Well, although it might be as Yue says……because I am at least Hajime-kun’s ‘Importance’, I decided to aim at ‘Special’ doing my best. Whatever anyone might say, right?”



“……I see. In that case I will accept your challenge the same as before.”



“Yes! Ah, even so, I don’t hate Yue, you know? A fighting friend or something like that, that sort of thing was yearned for just a little.”



“……Friends? Kaori and I are?”



“That’s right, friends. In Japan, there is something like a person who represents friend writing rival. In that case, isn’t it fine to read friend by writing love rival too?”



“……Japan…… Hajime’s birthplace…… It is a more mysterious country the more I hear about it. But…… I think it is a good sense.”



“Right. Ufufu, that’s why, please take care of me after this too?”



“……N.”



Though Yue and Kaori were emitting an atmosphere of good feelings somewhat, at the side, Hajime who heard the two people’s conversation was terribly uncomfortable. It was a feeling like a young man alone even inappropriately slipping into the midst of girls that were making girls talk. And, such things as Kaori knowing the words of a certain end of the century person called strong, although it cannot be helped wanting to tsukkomi because Yue’s return was the words of a certain cardboard box loving snake, he controlled himself because he read the mood.



Hajime and the others who arrived at the altar set foot on the magic formation with everybody. Going by the usual, it carefully examined the inside of their minds, and their memories were read. However, it was not just that this time, it was like looking at what the other people experienced at the same time. In other words, what Yue and the others experienced was shared with Hajime and Kaori too.



Somehow or other, it seemed that Yue and the others finally arrived at an abandoned metropolis that should even be called an undersea city in a huge underground space. Thereupon, the space warped the same as with Hajime and Kaori, and it was like war came in the metropolitan area with the armies of two countries. Because, that metropolis seemed that it was a place being invaded by the army of the Majin tribe in the human capital, and in the end, it seemed they were attacked from both the same as Hajime and Kaori.



There was a huge architecture that appeared to be the royal castle in the interior of the capital, and Yue and the others who pushed on while kicking about the armies heard the speech of the leaders in the invaded royal castle.



By all means, because the incident where the Majin tribe destroyed a human village was the impetus, although the humans’ country that made this metropolis the capital city began a war with the Majin tribe side, actually, that was like a conspiracy of the human side that did not hope for peace and desired the Majin tribe’s extermination. By the time it was noticed, the war that was already getting out of hand expanded, and finally it had become a situation where the united human side had the tables turned on them and was invaded until the royal capital….. It seemed that was the situation.



And, the person plotted that conspiracy, it seemed it was the high priest of the Light Faith Church that was deeply connected with the country, and this Light Faith Church apparently was the predecessor of the Sacred Faith Church. Furthermore, they appeared to be violently cornered. As though they were entreating a deity in troubled times, they tried to obtain the support of God offering sacrifices. As a result, several hundred human women and children were gathered from the metropolitan area, and it became a ghastly situation of a mass killing being done in the church’s cathedral.



Even Yue and the others, when they saw that scene it seemed to be quite intense as expected. Because the confirmation of memories by the magic formation compelled them to remember, it made their faces pale. Especially, Shia seemed like she would vomit at any time.



Finally the confirmation of memories ended, and everyone seemed to have been recognized as someone who had captured it safely. The new Age of Gods magic was etched within Hajime’s and the others’ minds.



“Was this magic here? ……Wasn’t it end to end of the continent? Damn Liberators.”



“……Found it, ‘power of regeneration’.”



Hajime breathed out abusive language. That was because the Age of Gods magic of Merujine Undersea Ruins that they obtained was Reproduction magic.



He remembered the wording of the lithography that was under the Great Tree of Hartsina Sea of Trees. He was certain that it was written that the “power of regeneration” was necessary before advancing. In other words, to capture the Great Labyrinth that was at the end of the east, it would not be obtained if you did not go until the end of the west, and it was absurdly troublesome for a person who had arrived at Hartsina Sea of Trees first. Though it was still better since Hajime and the others possessed the means of high speed movement with the magic driven vehicles.



When Hajime puckered his eyebrows at the repulsiveness of the Liberators, and simultaneously with the magic formation’s light paling, a parallelepiped came out from the floor and approached. It seemed like a small altar. When thinking that the altar shone faintly, in the next moment the light took the shape of a human form. Somehow or other, it seemed to be a message left behind similarly with Oscar Orcus.



The human form clearly changed into an outline gradually, and it became a single woman. The girl who sat on the altar was wearing something like a white one piece dress that became loose, and she possessed fan shaped ears and long, emerald green hair. It seemed that the Liberators’ one person Meiru Merujine was a woman who was related to the Sea Tribe.



She, the same as Oscar, told the truth of the Liberators after she introduced herself. She seemed to be a gentle woman, wearing a kind atmosphere even while carrying grief. Before long when she finished the same talk as what Oscar had reported, she spoke words at the end.



“……Please, do not cling to God. Do not rely on it. Do not get used to things that are given. Struggle for the sake of grabbing hold of and taking it. Decide by your own will, and advance ahead by your own feet. Any difficult problem, the answer is always within you. It is only within you. Do not be misled by the sweet answer that God deludes you with. Under free will for sure, there is happiness. To you, I am praying that a rain of happiness pours down on you.”



Finishing it so, Meiru Merujine vanished, becoming faint light again. Immediately afterward, a small magic formation shone as it appeared in the place where she had sat, and when the light settled down, a coin where the crest of Merujine was etched was placed there.



“The number of proofs is four, Hajime-san. With this, we are surely able to challenge the Sea of Trees Labyrinth too. I wonder how Father and the others are doing~?”



Shia was quick to think about her family and hometown that she really missed. However, because what came to mind was her father and the others going “Hyahha-!”, she dispersed that scene by shaking her head. As Hajime put away the coin of proof in the Treasure Warehouse, he recalled the Haulia going “Hyahaa-!” the same as Shia, and drove out the scene by shaking his head.



And, just as the proof was put away, the temple began rumbling. And then, the ocean water of the surroundings suddenly began to raise the water level.



“Uo!? Tch, forced expulsion, huh? Everyone, hold on!”



“……N.”



“Wahwah, it’s too unreasonable!”



“It’s like Raisen Great Labyrinth, no mooore~.”



“Water torture…… is being done.”



To the sea water that terrifically increased in force, Hajime and the others who did not even have time to take out and board the submarine were submerged in the blink of an eye. Right away, they were again individually no match for the draining, and everyone firmly grabbed on each others’ clothes and equipped a compressed oxygen cylinder in their mouths that was taken out from the Treasure Warehouse.



And then, immediately after that, the ceiling part opened like the shortcut of Guryuen Conflagration Mountain, and ocean water poured in with violent force. Hajime and the others also, flowing into the shaft, were blown away to the upper regions by the violent force like being pushed out in a water fountain from below.



Perhaps, though it might be the shortcut of Merujine Undersea Ruins, different from the Meiru Merujine with an atmosphere such as a kind onee-san being gentle, it was an absurdly violent shortcut. Furthermore, it was like compulsion. Unexpectedly, she might have been an extreme person.



Hajime and the others who were forced up finally noticed that overhead was a dead end. However, the moment they collided with it, the ceiling part slid again, and they were thrown out into the vast sea vigorously outside of the ruins. Hajime was convinced. Meiru Merujine was absolutely an extremely sketchy character contrary to her appearance.



Hajime and the others who were thrown out in the sea hurriedly took out the submarine from the Treasure Warehouse. And then, though they tried to board it from the hatch, that plan was obstructed. Mostly, because of an opponent they did not want to meet.



Zubaaaaaaaa!!!



A semi-transparent tentacle passed before their eyes with terrific force, and the submarine was sent flying.



[Yue.]



[Frozen Coffin!]



In the gaze that Hajime turned ahead, although it was a seemingly fairy-like modeling, making everything melt, it was the worst, brutal creature that regenerates infinitely – the huge clione. While grinding his teeth at the thing that appeared especially after the capture was finished, Hajime called out to Yue by invoking Telepathy.



The huge clione again shot a countless number of tentacles with a violent force like they were not resisted by the water. On the other hand, Yue froze the surrounding ocean water in a spherical shape by harmonizing in response to Hajime’s call, and formed a barrier of ice.



The barrier of ice was mightily blown away in the sea by the force of the tentacles that hit directly with Hajime and the others inside. Everyone was made to shake within the barrier at the violent impact.



[What should we do!? Goshujin-sama!]



To Tio who communicated by using the telepathy gem, Hajime answered.



[Everybody aim at the sea. We’ll be tortured to death underwater. I’ll buy us time!]



Hajime remotely manipulated the submarine by operating the ring type induction stone while saying so. From behind them, the submarine that should have been blown away and sunk plunged forward with extreme speed, and evaded the countless tentacles that came to attack while wrenching the hull. And then it shot a countless number of torpedoes from the bottom of the ship.



The number of torpedoes that could be shot all at once was twelve. If one thinks about it normally it would be plenty of destructive power. However, Hajime, judging that the situation would gradually get worse if he did not make a certain chance here, did not loosen his hand and shot all of the torpedoes consecutively that were loaded on the submarine. Making it navigate like making the hull slip sideways, he made a circle with the huge clione in the center. While implementing impossible movement if it was an ordinary ship, the number of torpedoes that were fired successively were 48 in general.



Those that rushed while drawing a line of bubbles brought violent destruction, directly hitting the huge clione without varying their aim.



Doou! Doou! Doou! Doou!



Such muted impact sounds reverberated, and the ocean water rose and swelled like it had expanded. From the sea, if one were to look above the huge clione, the sea level would instantaneously rise, and next they would have observed an enormous column of water spout.



Hajime and the others tried to surface by manipulating the water current immediately after all of the torpedoes exploded. However much it looked like a monster that even possessed regenerative power, it should have bought some time for a little while. However, the huge clione’s nonsensicalness seemed to have easily exceeded their predictions.



[Yue, above!]



[Tsk… no good, I won’t make it!]



A semi-transparent jelly was drifting above Hajime and the others who were trying to surface while recovering the remote controlled submarine, and it became a clione of three meter size when it gathered and solidified in several blinks. And then, when it opened its large head with a “Gapa!”, it swallowed the barrier of ice as it was. Naturally, Hajime and the others were in the clione’s belly together with the barrier.



[Shit, the regeneration is too fast!]



[It looked like it regenerated from a tentacle that was torn off!]



[This is bad, Hajime-san. The surroundings are full of jelly!]



Apparently, it was not just the tentacle that was torn off, the semi-transparent jelly seemed to have been distributed here and there by getting on the ocean current from the beginning.



[……Hajime. There is not much to maintain it! I can’t reinforce it because there is no ocean water in the belly!]



[Tch, everyone prepare for impact!]



Yue frantically resisted the barrier of ice melting with terrific force. Hajime, while strengthening its defensive power by cladding the barrier with Vajra, took out a large quantity of rockets and torpedoes from the Treasure Warehouse outside of the barrier, namely, in the belly of the clione.



Once more, the clione’s body exploded and scattered together with a thunderous roar. Because it began to melt even with Vajra in a short time, even Hajime and the others who bathed in the shock of the nearby explosion were grandly blown away, and the barrier of ice was also smashed.



They were thrown out into the sea. Hajime remotely controlled and moved the submarine in the sea as he caught Kaori and Shia who could not directly fight underwater.



However, this time the submarine was caught. One part of the huge clione had clung to the ship’s bottom before anyone was aware and opened a hole in it. In the gap where the cruising speed dropped as ocean water flowed into the interior of the ship, the surrounding semi-transparent jelly that had been scattered gathered in one go and wrapped up the submarine.



Furthermore, Hajime and the others noticed when they were surfacing that a large amount of semi-transparent jelly was expanding to cover overhead of them. Judging by the huge clione’s unusual recovery speed, it was not possible to break through in a halfhearted manner.



While spewing abusive language in his mind at his prided submarine being melted, Hajime called out to Yue with telepathy.



[Yue. I’ll rely on you for Spatial Piercing]



[……It will take forty seconds.]



[Hindrances will not be done. To escape from the sea, we have no choice but that.]



[N…… Leave it to me.]



Yue closed her eyes to concentrate and did not move. Kaori and Shia clung to her so that she did not get washed away by the current. The Spatial Piercing that Yue was attempting to use was one of the Space magics that was the Age of Gods magic acquired in Guryuen Conflagration Mountain. Making a hole in a point of two spaces, the space of the two spots were connected. In short, it was magic that made a warp gate. Still, because it hasn’t been long since it was learned, being used by Yue it will take that much time.



The tentacles that came attacking, Tio somehow mowed them down with a rapid fire of reduced version breath. However, since the breath’s magic power consumption is intense, and since the power and range fall considerably underwater, it was difficult to hit the tentacles because of the straight line attack and the annihilation power was weak. It will likely break through without being held for even several more seconds.



Hajime, taking out ores successively from the Treasure Warehouse, proceeded to continuously use Rensei, and like the barrier of ice that Yue formed not long ago, formed a physical barrier in the shape of a sphere.



[Goshujin-sama! It has already broken through!]



[I was able to do it, so everyone get in!]



The metallic barrier sufficient enough to take in five people was completed, and simultaneously with Tio getting into it last the hole was closed as it became a perfect metal sphere. Furthermore, that metal sphere was covered in red magical power. It was strengthened by Vajra. Tentatively, because gravity stones were also included, it would not keep sinking as well.



Immediately after that, the tentacles rushed the metal sphere, and began to wrap it up in one go.



The semi-transparent jelly that melts even magic power itself immediately destroyed and consumed the Vajra. And then, even the surface of the metal sphere was melted in a moment. However, when thinking that red sparks ran on the metal sphere, metal swelled from the melted edges, and the protective wall was just barely maintained.



That was because Hajime continued to constantly use Rensei from within. Fortunately, there was a kind of ore that was contained within the Treasure Warehouse to a literally rotting degree. Repeated Rensei seriously as he opposed the rate of melting, and then, the moment he impatiently waited for finally came.



[Spatial Piercing!]



Yue’s spatial transference magic was invoked. Within the metal sphere, a shining membrane of an elliptical shape was completed in the immediate vicinity of Hajime and the others. It was the gate that connected space.



[Everybody jump in!]



In accordance with the command of Hajime who continued to use Rensei by applying his hand to the metal sphere, everyone jumped into the gate all at once. Hajime also jumped in last. After Hajime passed through it, the gate immediately terminated, and several seconds later a countless number of tentacles pierced the metal sphere and melted it.



Hajime and the others who passed through the gate were attacked by a terrible floating sensation. It was because the movement done before was to the sky. To be separated from the sea even a little, Yue had established the exit one hundred meters in the sky.



Immediately Tio used Dragonification and floated as she placed Hajime and the others on her back. On Tio’s back Yue started to crumble down, and Kaori and Shia supported her from the sides. It was a state of magical power completely drying up. Hurriedly, she replenished it taking out magical power from the magic crystal stones.



“Yue, you saved us. As expected of you. Space transference is proportionate in difficulty.”



“……Haa haa, n. I did my best. But, it’s still not a level for combat.”



As Yue said, the handling of Space magic was difficult to the extent that it could not be compared with Gravity magic, and in the view of Yue it was still not at a level where it could be used in actual fighting. Much time is taken to construct the magic formation image by means of Imagination Composition, and the magical power efficiency is also still bad, as even though they made a spatial transition of one hundred meters, it was to an extent that it consumed magical power of two times that of superlative magic.



Nevertheless, because of Yue being skilled she was able to attain it and put it to use in a short period, and their escape was able to be done. Admiration was sent freely from Kaori and the others too, and to a certain extent, Yue who blushed was embarrassed.



Though everyone loosened their faces at the situation, the next moment, their expressions became frozen.



Doogoooooooo!!!



Zabaaaaaaaa!!!



Together with such a roaring sound, suddenly a huge tsunami swept down on them from the back of Hajime and the others. No, even calling it huge is presumptuous. Already there was a wall and the sky. The tsunami that seemed to easily exceed five hundred meters in height came to attack while raising wave crests in the distant sky where Tio flew about one hundred meters high in the sky. And the diameter seemed to be about one kilometer.



“Tsk, Tio!”



[Acknowledged!]



Tio recovered herself at Hajime’s shout, and accelerated in one go as she fluttered her wings. There was no escape anyway. Space transition would not be in time. If it was, there was nothing to think about but “To the other side”! She flew with a high speed that seemed to rival the time she escaped from Guryuen Conflagration Mountain.



“–Restraining Seal, Beyond Sage!”



“Beyond Sage.”



Kaori produced a rope of light that connected everyone to prepare for when they would be swallowed, while at the same time she expanded high grade defensive magic together with Yue. Shia gave a warning the next instant as she widened her eyes when concentrating on something.



“Tio-san, be careful! That is inside the tsunami! Tentacles are coming!”



She seemed to have reported the scene that she saw with her characteristic magic Foresight’s derivation Future Assumption. Tio, without even confirming Shia’s words, twisted her body instantaneously. Right afterward, countless tentacles extended from the tsunami and pierced the space where Tio was until now immediately.



She was able to avoid them successfully. However, the difference with the tsunami had been shortened because of that reason. The tentacles that still came attacking, though Hajime intercepted and burned them to ashes with a flamethrower……



“Damn it! Everyone get together!”



Hajime who was on Tio’s back covered Yue, Shia, and Kaori like he was hugging them, and then, right after that, the huge tsunami that should even be called a natural disaster swallowed them.



Because there was the Beyond Sage of the pair of Yue and Kaori, though they did not receive the impact of the tsunami directly, even so they were unreasonably tossed around by the fierce torrent and were sent back into the sea.



One piece of the Beyond Sage was completely smashed, and the other piece was already cracked. Supposing if they had not expanded anything but one piece, then at about this time they might have gone to a watery grave. Hajime and the others who shook their heads at the shock from being thrown into the sea raised their faces as they made grim expressions again.



“How should I put it, the aimed at prey isn’t let go?”



The huge clione was already in front of Hajime and the others who were protected by Beyond Sage. Furthermore, that figure was becoming even larger, and had already exceeded twenty meters. Was it still insufficient? While gathering semi-transparent jelly from the surroundings, it continued to grow even larger.



“I-it can’t be…… Things like not dying, melting anything, and manipulating even the sea…… What should we do?”



“……Hajime-san. Can you give me a serious kiss? I want to do it with Hajime-san at least at the end.”



“…….Fuu, Goshujin-sama. Me too, I desire a kiss at the end.”



Kaori darkened her expression in despair, and Shia pleaded to Hajime while floating a smile like she was embarrassed. Tio was also the same.



However, the girls who turned their gazes at Hajime shook their bodies with a “Biku”. Because, Hajime’s eye glittered with flames. The glint in his eye was sharp, carrying murderous intent of an insanely thick degree, and he was glaring at the clione that had become huge as he bared his teeth.



Hajime would not do something like giving up. There was not even a tiny bit of such a thought. What was in his head was: what should they do to kill the enemy before their eyes and how could they survive, it was only just that. Confronted with a formidable enemy of an impossible degree, if that was enough to give up, Hajime would not be standing in this place now. He surely would have perished in the abyss a long time ago.



And, understanding that, surely because they had escaped the verge of death in the abyss together, Yue also still frantically worked out her thoughts without carrying the likes of resignation at all.



At the eyes of Hajime that glittered, Kaori, Shia, and Tio, though they stiffened as they were and gazed at him with expressions that were engrossed for a little while like their hearts had been stolen, they regained their consciousness because the huge clione commenced its attack finally becoming a thirty meter class.



Panicking, Kaori formed Beyond Sage over again. Shia grasped for possibilities of victory with Future Assumption. Tio fired breath. In the girls’ eyes, there was no color of giving up anymore. The likes of a brave woman, if that was not a person who should be at Hajime’s side, it was because it was thought so.



Yue also, although she had not thought of a plan to to break the deadlock yet, for now she was going to crush both offense and defense for the sake of surviving.



Hajime did not do anything in particular, and just intently worked out his thoughts. In the given time that Yue and the others earned, he continued to search for a path to victory with high speed thoughts while invoking Lightspeed. He ordered himself to recall all of the information there was now. With terrific force within Hajime’s brain, the scenes until now flashed back.



And then, he remembered. He and the others had once gotten away from the huge clione. That changed into a question. “Although so much power exists, why did it overlook us once?” At that time, what differed with the present fight? ……That was…



“We’re not using fire much.”



Right, last time Tio and Yue grandly used magic of the fire system with reckless abandon. That time, the tentacles became ash, and should not have been used to regenerate.



Hajime found hope there. Though it was a guess without positive proof, probably, the regeneration of the clione was not infinite. The semi-transparent jelly that composed its body and appeared to be equal to infinite existed in mass quantities.



Also, it appeared likely that it was able to even create it on its own just by seeing the situation until now. Though, if it were annihilated in one go, it might need time to replace it. Therefore, last time because it replaced a large quantity of its annihilated body, it prioritized regeneration over pursuit, and Hajime and the others seemed to have been able to escape.



In that case, it was the same. It was fine if they could annihilate it faster that it could create or regenerate the semi-transparent jelly that composed the clione. However, this place was in the sea. It was sufficient to say that fire magic could not be used the most effectively as one might think. Though Tio’s breath is high temperature, it did not seem to be able to finish annihilating it. There was no method. There were no stored arms that could annihilate it. In that case……



“It’s just fine if I make it.”



Hajime, taking out torpedoes and ore successively from the Treasure Warehouse, began to produce something with terrific force for some reason.



“……Hajime? Did you think of something?”



“Yeah. To use fire in the sea there’s no choice but this. It should defeat it if it goes smoothly.”



“Hajime-kun, is that true!?”



“As expected of Hajime-san! I believed in you from the beginning!”



“……Shia, you, didn’t you solicit a kiss as you gave up in the beginning……? No, that aside, that’s our Goshujin-sama!”



“However, it will take time. You all, I’ll leave it to you.”



At Hajime who said so while smiling fearlessly as he lifted his lips, Kaori, Shia, and Tio immediately nodded their heads strongly, and even more, they confronted the huge clione increasing their concentration.



Hajime expanded his perception ability to the maximum using Lightspeed, and furthermore he demonstrated concentration power that exceeded the limit by using Limit Break at the same time too as he poured all of his power into the weapon creation.



One, though he completed another one, the mass production in one go does not go like the bullets whose degree of difficulty to create is extremely high. Nevertheless, when using them sporadically, the huge clione might finish regenerating or creating the semi-transparent jelly. The situation would gradually get worse if it became so. If he was going to do it in, he should do it in instantly. While wearing red magical power — the proof of Limit Break, Hajime’s frantic Rensei was repeated.



However, reality is heartless. As far as the huge clione is concerned in the sea was a place of its overwhelming advantage, and even with Yue and the others of the cheat group doing it, they did not seem able to rival it for long.



Though Yue, Kaori, Shia, and Tio were desperately standing firm with expressions that seemed strained, they did not seem to be able to hold out until the preparation was complete.



[Three minutes, the end at most, if there is three minutes!]



While invoking telepathy instinctively, Hajime shouted so. Finally, the huge clione whose fierce attacks they could not contain approached before their eyes, and swept down to swallow Hajime and the others as its head split with a Gapa!



Hajime reluctantly decided to fire even though it was only as much as he was able to now to try to survive this moment.



But, at that moment, neither Yue, Shia, Tio, nor Kaori either, it was a refined old man’s voice that responded to Hajime’s shout with telepathy.



[Yo, Ha-bou. Doesn’t it seem dangerous? Occhan will help you out.]



[-!? T-this voice, it can’t be, Li-san?]



[Yeah. Ha-bou’s friend, it’s Li-san.]



Yes, having appeared, the one who had been captured in Fyuren’s aquarium before, it was the human faced fish demon Lieman who Hajime called Li-san. Hajime, when he looked at the surroundings as he widened his eyes in surprise, suddenly a huge silver shadow rammed a hit into the huge clione’s body from the side. The huge clione that was in a posture of just being about to prey upon them as it opened its mouth was blown away as it received the perfect surprise attack, and was pushed away.



In that space, the human faced fish that was certainly remembered swam to the immediate vicinity of the Beyond Sage. At the abrupt situation, Yue and the others also were completely not able to follow. Seeing Lieman’s figure, Yue and Tio stared in wonder, Shia widened her eyes in surprise with “That time!”, and arriving at Kaori, she screamed with a “Hii!?”



[Was Shia jou-chan also in good health?]



“Fue!? Um, y-yes! I’m healthy.”



[That is splendid. Then, Ha-bou, what are you doing lazily? If you had three more minutes, would you be able to deal with the Akujiki somehow? If you have to do it, do it quickly. Do you not have so long?]



[Y-yeah. Although something wasn’t understood well, at any rate you saved us. Thank you, Li-san.]



Hajime moved the hand he had stopped at the sudden appearance of Lieman, and resumed the weapon creation in a hurry.



Meanwhile, the huge silver shadow, suicide attacking the huge clione, bought time doing an exchanging of attacks. Somehow or other, the silver shadow’s true identity seemed to be a group of fish. They were not even demons or the like and were just fish. Though they were just fish, tens of thousands, or, if the number equaled several hundreds of thousands, it seemed that even a monster opponent was able to be held off. Because they decreased in number by the staggering force, certainly, they did not seem able to keep it up for long.



Why was Lieman here? Shia, who was put out ahead forcibly as the representative because she seemed to be an acquaintance, asked that question.



[U-um, Li-san? Is that fine? Uh, what in the world is going on?]



[Hmph, it isn’t anything in particular. As I was properly hanging around this area, a telepathic communication was heard accompanied by a huge, familiar magical power. What I saw when I rushed over, wasn’t it Ha-bou being attacked by the Akujiki? Though there were a lot of questions, it was my friend’s crisis. It is the shame of a man to not do anything.]



“Uh, that group of fish…… is the Akujiki in it?”



[The Akujiki is that thing. Long ago, a monster that haunted the sea from ancient times… no, that fellow is a natural disaster. It could also be called an ancestor of demons. That crowd of fish is being guided by my ability. To our species that uses telepathy, the ability is possessed to manipulate the normal sea creatures to a certain extent.]



A surprising fact came to light. The human faced fish Lieman seemed to have been a fish user. The group of fish was almost destroyed in the timing that Lieman’s conversation ended, and the huge clione again attacked while opening its mouth as it went toward Hajime and the others.



However, the time that was earned by the noble sacrifice…… was precisely three minutes.



A group of larger than normal torpedoes were spread out in the surroundings of the Beyond Sage that enclosed Hajime and the others. The number was roughly 120. And, rings of the same number floated in the surroundings of Hajime who smiled fearlessly.



When Hajime activated the induction stone on hand, the group of torpedoes were shot all at once. 120 torpedoes rushed towards the huge clione that had opened its mouth at high speed while drawing a line of bubbles. However, only the torpedoes, because they would just scatter the body of the huge clione even if they exploded, there would not be substantial damage either and it seemed that it would immediately regenerate.



The huge clione attempted to intercept the group of torpedoes, sending out a large number of tentacles as it was upset at them becoming a hindrance to its meal, and everyone stared ahead wondering what they should do. Hajime who had exceeded the limit manipulated the torpedoes with the very limit of his concentration power and barely evaded them.



“Are you not going to avoid them? Then, I’ll let you eat to your heart’s content.”



Hajime’s mutter resounded. The huge clione that was previously the Akujiki, at the reason that it was able to melt anything, Hajime thought that might have been why it did not avoid the attack.



And then, the expectation was correct. The group of torpedoes that had finished dodging the barrage of tentacles directly hit and pierced into the huge clione’s whole body uniformly without it even showing an attitude of avoiding them.



However, an explosion did not happen. Buried in the huge clione’s body, although they were melting there was not an explosion of even one shot. The huge clione that had embedded the group of black torpedoes throughout its body was in a state like a flecked pattern was made as if poison had invaded the previous position.



Hajime, before the group of torpedoes completely melted, carried out the next move. He took out a massive quantity of black liquid into the empty space from the Treasure Warehouse. It was the tar that was made from liquified Flamme ore. To the inside of the surrounding floating rings, it was poured there like a waterfall.



Then at the same time, the whole body of the huge clione began to be stained black. As though, like water soaking into paper and changing its color all at once, the black liquid was encroaching on the semi-transparent, huge clione. The identity was the tar of liquefied Flamme ore that Hajime had poured into the surrounding rings.



These rings and the group of torpedoes, all of them were connected by a small gate. What passed through the inside of the ring jumped through space and arrived at the same ring used as an exit that had been built into the inside of the torpedoes. In other words, the torpedoes were not explosives, they were things to carry the rings, and at the same time, they were also a physical barrier of the rings while sending in the tar.



Naturally, though the tar itself was also melted, because of the total of 120 gates, the melting speed of the large quantity of tar that poured in without pause could not catch up to the encroachment of its whole body by the tar.



In an instant, the huge clione, though it tried to escape the encroachment by separating its body, Yue and the others did not allow it. The separation was thoroughly hindered with a barrier, freezing, and breath. Still, Yue’s gate was unable to be used because she was not able to open the gate on a pinpoint on a moving target yet. To be able to do it, two established points of space just had to be connected.



The huge clione, because it became serious, though it had been on the verge of finishing off Hajime and the others by a war potential with a volume of the maximum class done by gathering the semi-transparent jelly of the surroundings, now it had backfired. The tar that Hajime poured into it finished dyeing the huge clione black without leaving anything in the end.



Hajime, as he curved his mouth, he pierced the huge clione with fiery, glittering eyes. In his hand a tiny ember was being held.



“Burn in hellfire from inside of the body and die.”



The ember that was flicked by Hajime’s thumb, while drawing an arc, it hit directly like it was being inhaled in one of the tars that was pouring down. At that moment, a scorching heat of 3000 degrees Celsius surged and spread through the gate instantly.



Not long ago, it was dyed black, and the huge clione had tried to melt the tar inside its body with an atmosphere that it felt desperation somewhere, and this time, it had become dyed a scorching red. As Hajime said, from inside of its body, hellfire that was not able to be opposed did not allow even a moment of resistance, and its body was completely burned.



A large, crimson flower that bloomed in the sea finally appeared from inside the body of the huge clione accompanied by the coloring of a name called a mass of bubbles in the sea, and it was destroyed, frying even through the exterior. And then, the super high temperature flames raised a violent steam explosion as they evaporated the ocean water in an instant.



Goobaaaaaaa!!!



A terrific impact surged, and the distant sea burst open like a joke. In the sea that was also still raging, it was a state like a storm was called in. Inside the rough sea, Hajime and the others who let the impact go past them searched for the form of the huge clione beyond the barrier.



Though their gazes went around without negligence in the sea that was calming down moment by moment…… the form of the clione that was like a nightmare was nowhere to be seen. Hajime, though he carefully investigated using the magic eye stone and Farsight, as expected the huge clione’s traces were not reflected.



Hajime and the others were convinced. The monster of ancient times — the Akujiki subjugation had been completed here.



“Guh…… Somehow, is it over……?”



The rings that had floated in the surroundings scattered and sank as they lost their power, and the red magical power that covered Hajime’s body also quickly dispersed and vanished. At the same time, Hajime who staggered by the side effect of Limit Break went down on one knee inside the barrier of Beyond Sage, and distorted his expression from an intense headache because of overworking.



However, in his eyes that said “I killed it!”, great joy overflowed at having survived victoriously.



“……Hajime, are you alright?”



“Hajime-kun, I’ll heal you immediately!”



Yue immediately approached Hajime’s side and supported his body. Kaori also went to heal Hajime as she chanted recovery magic immediately. Shia and Tio also came to approach at the sides and embraced Hajime.



“You did it! Hajime-san!”



“As expected of Goshujin-sama…… you made a harsh killing scene. I felt chills.”



At Kaori’s healing, while feeling his headache lessen a little at a time, Hajime also loosened his cheeks at his companions that had gathered. While soaking in the reverberations of their victory, when it became peaceful, an old man’s voice who seemed to be a little displeased resounded.



[Yoo, Ha-bou. Please tell me if it’s going to explode. Didn’t you consider if I might die?]



[Ah, Li-san. Sorry. I thought about nothing but what I was killing.]



Apparently, Lieman seemed to have been completely blown away by the last explosion. Because he had used all of his power to kill the huge clione, his consciousness had not been turned toward Lieman. Moreover, the last explosion was not something Hajime had intended. For a bit, Hajime had also been surprised.



[Well, can it not be helped if it was to kill the Akujiki? Whatever was done, it was splendid.]



[If Li-san hadn’t come it would have been seriously terrible. Thank you.]



[You’re welcome. Well, I only stuck to my moral code. Don’t worry about it.]



[You’re an honorable man as usual. As expected of Li-san. I’m thankful too for the coincidence that you were here.]



[Ha-bou, coincidences that have accumulated, isn’t it already called inevitable? That Occhan was able to assist you was also inevitable, and that you survived like this is also an inevitability.]



Hajime loosened his mouth with a “hah” the same with the fish with the old man face that smiled broadly. At the two people who were communicating something to each other, the female formation in the background were discussing together with whispers.



“……What’s that? Aren’t they excessively communicating something with each other?”



“……Honorable man’s friendship?”



“Hajime-kun…… the friend that he was able to make in the other world is a Seama?? Even in Japan the appearance of him hitting it off with someone to that extent wasn’t seen!”(TN: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Seaman_%28video_game%29)



“There was such a feeling even before. Girls’ talk can’t help becoming boys’ talk if it’s a guy? Well, though the other party is an old man……”



From themselves, to the intimate atmosphere of Hajime and Lieman of a certain meaning, when Yue and the others turned complex expressions towards them without either trembling or bewilderment attached, the two people’s conversation also seemed to have just ended.



[Then, Occhan is already going. Ha-bou. Let us meet again if fate allows.]



[Yeah. Li-san also take care.]



With one mutual nod, Lieman turned back. However, when looking back as he advanced a little, he talked to Shia.



[Jou-chan. There seems to be many rivals, but do your best. When you are able to have children, let’s have them play with my children sometime. I will introduce my wife also. See you.]



When leaving only those words, without looking back this time, he disappeared into the ocean as he was.



Those that remained behind……



“””””You were married—!!?”””””



It was a grand tsukkomi of such a Hajime and company. Though he put on the airs of a wanderer, when thinking that he possessed a family, nothing but a normal useless old man was seen. For awhile, their tsukkomi echoed in the ocean.





Chapter 96




“Papa-! It’s morning-! Wake up-!”



At a corner of the maritime town Erisen, an infant’s voice resounded in the second floor of a certain house. The time, passing through the early morning slowly, was around when one started to feel the warmth of the day. From the window, like forecasting that it will become good weather today as well, the morning sun streamed in brilliantly.



Dosun!



“Aa~?”



It was Hajime who was fast asleep in bed that was being shined on by such a morning sun. And, calling such a Hajime Papa was Myuu who came to wake him up with an energetic voice.



Myuu, when determining the magnificent leap that does not make the weight felt just before the bed, the landing of a ten point perfect score was determined on the belly of Hajime who was her Papa as it was. Of course, it was not from her feet. It was a form that became her straddling him.



Although she was still a four year old child, the body weight was already around 15-6 kilograms. If such a weight jumps on the abdomen with added force, a normal person should even let out a groan, but naturally Hajime does not feel any kind of pain. Nevertheless, a sleepy groan did come out because of the forced way he was woken up.



“Papa, get up. It’s morning. Good morning.”



“……Aah, Myuu? Morning. Please stop *pechipechi*-ing since I’m up.”



Was she happy that Hajime had woken up? While showing a bright smile, Myuu drummed on Hajime’s face with *pechipechi* sounds with hands like tiny red leaves. Hajime, when holding Myuu as he raised his upper body while doing a morning greeting, he combed her emerald green hair gently. At Myuu who narrowed her eyes like it felt good, Hajime’s cheeks also loosened.



“……N……au……Hajime? Myuu?”



Inside such a heartwarming atmosphere, all of a sudden, a voice that made one feel seductiveness somewhere resounded. Hajime, when turning the sheets a little as he shifted his attention that way, the sleepy figure of a beautiful girl rubbing her eyes with the back of her curled up hand like a cat was there.



Long blonde hair hung down in waves that was not bed hair at all even though she had been lying down, and it sparkled because of the morning sun pouring in from the window, causing her to blink her crimson eyes that were the same as red spinel. Because she was not wearing clothes the same as Hajime, with her pure white skin without a single blemish, the pair of hills that could be seen from the gaps of her hair that hung down the front made one feel seductiveness together with loveliness coupled with the sound of her voice.



“How come Papa and Yue-oneechan are always naked?”



Myuu’s innocent question meant “the time they got up in the morning” to the utmost. By no means did it mean that the pair were nudists.



And, seeming to wonder, “Maybe they don’t have pajamas?”, Myuu looked alternately at Hajime and Yue with eyes that were possibly seeing someone a little pitiable. To the childishly pure question, with the likes of “That is, you, because clothes are obstructive?”, Hajime, who must not have even been able to do a response that was mistaken for sexual harassment, requested Yue to help him with a slightly troubled expression.



In her consciousness that cleared up gradually, Yue who guessed Hajime’s distress returned an adult’s template to the child’s innocent question.



“……Myuu will also come to understand it if you become even bigger.”



“You understand when you become bigger?”



“……N, you understand.”



To Myuu who tilts her head, Yue avoided clearly answering by force. Myuu’s sex education was left to Remia who was her mother. However, Myuu who tilted her head to the side with an expression like she was not quite able to agree with an “U~n”, when looking back slowly, she let out an innocent question again while staring at a certain spot, and cornered mainly Hajime.



“Papa also, do you know why this place became big? But, Myuu doesn’t have this. Myuu doesn’t understand?”



Saying so, at a certain place where the characteristic morning physiological phenomenon was caused, Myuu started to drum on it with her hands going *peshipeshi*. Although it was not with a significant power, Hajime, who shook at the impact on his delicate place, fixed how he held Myuu in a hurry to separate her as much as possible from “that”.



“Myuu, don’t touch that. Listen. It’s natural for Myuu who is a girl to not have it. It’s fine if you don’t worry about it. Another ten years, no, twenty years, better yet your whole life, it’s something you don’t have to be concerned with no matter what.”



Hajime said something foolish with an extremely serious face. Myuu nodded her head with a *kokuri* because it was something said by her beloved Papa even while floating “?” in her mind. Making a somehow satisfied expression at that, Hajime again untangled Myuu’s hair by combing it with his hand. Myuu also, like her questions from just now were forgotten, started to concentrate on being satisfied by that gentle feeling.



To such a Hajime, a gaze was turned towards him like feeling amused somewhere from Yue who was next to him. In those eyes, “Overprotective”, “Energetic because of the morning”, and “One advantage because of the morning?”, such feelings of this or that seemed to be contained in them.



Hajime faced the other way at that. Inside the warmth that increased a little at a time because of the light of day, that heartwarming scene continued until Remia and Kaori and the others, who fretted at the situation where Myuu did not come to wake them up, came crowding into it.



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



Hajime and the others, capturing Merujine Undersea Ruins, had returned to Erisen by getting on the back of Tio who used Dragonification because they had lost the submarine, and again six days had passed since they had supplied topics to the town. Since the day they had returned, Hajime and the others had been indebted to the house of Remia and Myuu throughout.



The town called Erisen was a floating island of intertwined wood with a huge population. Since the vast sea itself becomes an infinite plot of land, the whole town became an appearance where there is basically space made in the architecture and in the streets. Remia’s and Myuu’s house also, the largeness of it was more than enough for a house with two people living in it, and it was a comfortable living space to the extent that even with the five people of Hajime and the others staying there they did not even feel any inconvenience.



Thereupon they set aside time to replenish their equipment and master the Age of Gods magic that they had obtained. Though half of it was a vacation mood because Erisen had perfected seafood cooking, the wind and waves were also pleasant, and the location was very comfortable.



But, nevertheless, they felt that the rest was over a little on staying the sixth day. The reason, it goes without saying, was Myuu. It was not possible to take Myuu along on the journey beyond this point. A four year old girl without even any sort of power, it was absurd to take her along to the Great Labyrinth of the far east.



Not to mention that the two Great Labyrinths excluding Hartsina Sea of Trees were in even more troublesome locations. One was in the Majin tribe’s territory, the Freezing Cave of Schnee Snow Field. And the other one was surely that whatever Kamiyama. For either of them, they would need to go into the heart of a great power. To such a location, they were absolutely unable to take Myuu along.



Because of that, though they should bid farewell to this town, was it guessed somehow? When Hajime and the others tried to start that conversation, Myuu always went into ultra spoiled child mode, and they could not easily start talking because she invoked “Certain kill! Little Girl, Petition of Silence!” Eventually, dragging on the Age of Gods magic’s training and the new equipment’s completion, they stayed even the sixth day even though it was a made up excuse.



“Even so, if I don’t make reasonable departure……haa, what should I say to Myuu……will she cry, I wonder? Her crying……haa, it’s depressing.”



Hajime, while preparing some equipment with Rensei as he sat on the pier, muttered a soliloquy in seeming melancholy. The time when he had just exited from hell, although he thought that all of this world was inconsequential, now he was racking his brains at one farewell with a small child. At such a present state, in his mind, Hajime held complex feelings.



“I blame you, Sensei……”



To discard everything of this world, the thinking that did not dislike all of the sacrifices for the sake of just his objective had completely vanished, and Hajime used abusive language remembering his former teacher who was the impetus that led him to carrying such thoughts. However, Yue, Shia, Kaori, and Tio in front of his eyes, and seeing the smiling face of Myuu who was playing a game of underwater tag with the girls, the smile he floated on his face was the opposite of his words.



When it was unrelated to him, at that time, if he had abandoned Myuu, or if he had left Ankaji as it was, then if he left Remia alone, and if he quickly separated from Myuu…… surely, the girls might not have those first rate smiling faces.



Even if he discarded them for example, though it was separate from Yue and the others feeling unhappiness and it might not be a cause for their smiles to disappear, but could they possibly compare to those being shown now? That was surely because there was no doubt that the way it was for Hajime until this place was not “the lonely way of life”.



While watching Myuu who was enjoying the irregular game of tag splendidly running from place to place from the incarnations of cheats with all of her power(everyone excluding Myuu was “it”) as she perfectly showed the traits of the Sea-person tribe, again, Hajime let out a sigh. From between both legs of such a Hajime that were stretched out from the pier, suddenly a person’s figure appeared making a splashing sound. Having appeared dripping water from in the sea, it was Remia who was Myuu’s mother.



Remia, who had her long, emerald green hair in one loose braid on her back, was wearing a splendidly suggestive, light green bikini. At first when she reunited with Myuu she was considerably haggard, but now, having perfectly regained her previous healthy body because of the recovery effects of the foul play class Reproduction magic, you would not think that she was the mother of a child, no, it was so but she was clad in her former seductiveness.



The man company of the town, all of them aimed at being her second marriage partner, as she was a gentle system beauty, to the extent that one could nod even if there was a strange fan club of the mother and child set. She boasted a splendid figure almost equal with Tio, and the drops of water that ran off the surface of her body were absolutely bewitching.



Such a Remia, who was charming even under normal circumstances, appeared between his thighs suddenly. Hajime, who was racking his brains about Myuu, was inadvertently taken by surprise. Remia, as she supported her body setting her hands on Hajime’s lap, she looked up at Hajime from a place that was a considerably dangerous position.



However, in her face was the opposite of the position and the body that emitted seductiveness, and in Remia’s kind expression, instead it carried a color like she was worrying about Hajime.



“Thank you very much. Hajime-san.”



“What is it all of a sudden? Something like saying thanks……”



Hajime made an expression like he was doubtful at Remia who stated her gratitude suddenly.



“Ufufu, the person who also worries so much for the sake of the daughter……as her mother I also came to want to say one expression of gratitude.”



“That……was it found out? For the time being, though I was intending to hide it.”



“Ara ara, there wasn’t a person who didn’t know? Yue-san and the others also all seem to be thinking about it…… Myuu was able to meet with really wonderful people.”



As Remia looked back over her shoulder, though Shia had been stripped of her swimsuit by Myuu’s prank, even though they saw her figure chasing Myuu frantically while making a hand bra, she was showing a smile. And, again when turning her gaze to Hajime, this time she opened her mouth with an expression that was a little serious.



“Hajime-san. It’s already enough. Everyone has done more than enough. Therefore, please don’t be worried, and go forward for the sake of the things that you must do.”



“Remia……”



“Meeting with everyone, that child has grown up greatly. Although she only behaved like a spoiled child, she has come to be able to worry about someone other than herself…… That girl understands. That Hajime-san and the others have to go…… although she completely acted like a spoiled child unintentionally because she is still immature, even so, ‘Don’t go,’ was never said, right? That child also knows that it is wrong to detain you all more than this. Therefore……”



“……Is that so? ……If I’m being worried about by a child, it’s not taking care of her……I got it. Tonight, I’ve decided to tell her clearly. Tomorrow, we’ll depart.”



Myuu’s silent appeal, though she didn’t want them to go, he noticed that it was a manifestation of her fear about not wanting to trouble Hajime and the others by saying it, and Hajime, who looked up at the sky as he covered his eyes with one hand, became determined to say farewell. To such a Hajime, Remia again turned a gentle gaze towards him.



“Then, tonight let’s have a feast. Because it’s Hajime-san’s and the others’ farewell party.”



“That’s right…… I’m looking forward to it.”



“Ufufu, yes, please look forward to it, D*e*a*r?”



“No, that way of calling is……”



To Remia who was floating a mischievous smile somewhere, though Hajime started to insert a tsukkomi, because of a voice that contained a chill like a blizzard, it was interrupted like always.



“……Remia……good courage.”



“Remia-san, since when…… There was neither negligence nor a chance.”



“Fumu, by the angle seen, she even seems to be servicing Goshujin-sama…… Exposure play…… nice!”



“Um, Myuu-chan? Onee-chan’s swimsuit, can’t you return it soon? The public gaze from some time ago is……”



Yue and the others who returned to Hajime’s location unnoticed glared at Remia with half closed eyes. “It can’t be, is she aiming at Hajime for a second marriage partner for real?” seemed to be what was making them vigilant. These last few days, it was a sight seen often. The pervert was ignored. The swimsuit stolen by the four year old girl and the half crying rabbit ears were also ignored.



On the other hand, if one were to speak of Remia, who was in a state of being glared at, the appearance of her pulling back was not especially seen because she merely smiled with, “Ara ara, ufufu.” That easy breezy smile, because it hid Remia’s true feelings, the approach that was shown sometimes towards Hajime was difficult to distinguish whether she was being serious or joking. This, is it said to be a widow’s dignity or something……?



If speaking of the Hajime in question, he was captivated by the swimsuit appearance of Yue who was glaring at Remia in a state of crawling on all fours as she raised herself onto the pier. Though he saw her every day, his gaze was attracted at an unconscious level already.



It was a black bikini type. It was splendidly suggestive because it was the type that was tied by a string. The contrast coupled with Yue’s skin’s whiteness was exceedingly lovely. Doing up her hair in a rare twintail, although it made her feel more childish than normal, the gap one felt with the adult-like swimsuit was unbearable for Hajime.



Yue who was hurling sparks with Remia, when she noticed Hajime’s gaze, she spilled a smile seemingly in good humor with a “……Fufu,” because it seemed like she guessed that his heart had been stolen by her, and she approached Hajime as she was on all fours.



However, when she was absolutely not permitted to be far ahead forever, Kaori took Hajime’s arm from the other side. She pressed Hajime’s arm into the cleavage that peeked out from the white bikini with a *munyu*, although she was dyed red up to her ears from embarrassment. Her glance that looked at Hajime with upturned eyes was appealing in silence with “Look at me too?”



Furthermore, Shia from behind leaned on him while pressing her prided pair of hills onto Hajime’s back. Because her swimsuit was still taken by Myuu, she seemed to have the intention to hide her body too. But, for Hajime, besides the first-rate softness, the characteristic feeling of the two that were touching him was a place where he was extremely troubled.



Incidentally, though Tio also displayed a very charming swimsuit appearance, because the feeling was very bad as she started “Haa Haa”-ing in her delusion, Hajime made her cool off her head by force as he attacked with the piece of metal he was holding. That being the case, currently she had become a drowned body.



Like that, to the location of Hajime who was surrounded by by beautiful women and girls, Myuu came rising to the surface from in the sea. Myuu, who appeared like she was cutting in between Hajime and Remia, she jumped at Hajime as she was from the front. To Hajime who caught her in his arms in an instant, Myuu, with “Taken booty!” just hoisted Shia’s swimsuit and placed it on Hajime’s head. Apparently, it seemed to be a gift from his daughter.



“Mi-Myuu-chan!? Why, such a thing……is!? It can’t be…… was it requested by Hajime-san? Re-really! Hajime-san, if my swimsuit was on your mind, if you said so…… as much as you liked……”



“……Hajime, I’ll give mine too.”



“M-me too! If Hajime-kun wants it…… but because it’s embarrassing undressing here…… in the room later, alright?”



“Ara ara, then, me too…… Top or bottom, which one is better? Or else, both of them?”



Placing a woman’s swimsuit on his head, a man to whom girls from all sides were presenting swimsuits, Nagumo Hajime.



The water that dripped from Shia’s swimsuit with a *potapota* was quite surreal coupled together with Hajime’s expression that had stiffened his face. The man company who witnessed that scene were made to drop tears of blood. And, to what extent did rumors spread in the area that day? With a story of, “Be careful of the white haired eye-patch boy. That guy’s favorite dish is stripped off swimsuits. He is a pervert that finds supreme delight in wearing them from his head.”



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



The evening of that day, Hajime and the others informed Myuu of their farewell before dinner. Myuu who heard it grasped the hem of the one piece she wore tightly with both hands with a *gyu*, and earnestly resisted crying. The short silence continued for awhile, and it was Myuu who broke it.



“……We can’t meet anymore?”



“……”



It was a question that he was hard pressed to answer. Hajime’s goal was to return to Japan which was his birthplace. However, the concrete method was not yet known, and he did not know in what timing or in the shape of how he would return.



Before, Miledi Raisen said to collect all of the Age of Gods magics if he wanted to fulfill his wish. Perhaps it might become a thing where he immediately returned in that timing. Because it seemed that there was no need to come back to Erisen until the end of the journey, possibly, he could not deny the possibility that this would become the final farewell.



“……Papa, will you always stay Myuu’s Papa?”



To Hajime who was troubled over how he should answer, Myuu piled up words before listening to the reply. Hajime met her gaze directly and firmly grasped both of Myuu’s shoulders.



“……Myuu, if that is your wish.”



When replying so, Myuu made a smile with a *ni* as she loosened her mouth that had been clenched to resist tears. It was Yue and the others who made a *ha* in their expressions. In some respects it resembled Hajime’s expression at a time when he was challenging a difficult fight, and, for an instant, they appeared like a true parent and child.



“Then, take care. And, next time, Myuu is going to go meet Papa.”



“Going to meet……Myuu. I’m planning to go very far away. Therefore……”



“But, if Papa can go, then Myuu can go too. After all…… because Myuu is Papa’s daughter.”



For she who was worthy of being Hajime’s daughter nothing was impossible. Sticking out her chest as she seemed to be self-confident, if Hajime could not come to meet her, Myuu made a declaration to go to meet him herself. Of course, it did not mean that Myuu accurately understood that Hajime was going to be returning to his birthplace by crossing over worlds. Not to mention, the likes of Myuu obtaining all of the Age of Gods magics capturing the Labyrinths or crossing over worlds was impossible.



And so, it was an impossible objective to realize that came out from the child’s poor conception.



However, who in the world would laugh at that powerful declaration? Who in the world would foolishly discard her will? It was impossible to do. It should not be done. The words Remia said about Myuu having grown was well understood. Myuu, though it was a short time, nevertheless she came to grow watching the reliable backs of Hajime and the others. Can such a beloved daughter be parted with now? Was it fine to part with her? No, there was no way such a thing could be done. There was no way that doing it was fine.



Because of this, Hajime decided. Now, as he made one more vow here.



“Myuu, please wait.”



“Papa?”



Myuu, who sensed that Hajime’s atmosphere changed, tilted her head as she made a face that seemed curious. Until just now, there was not at all an expression that was worried anywhere, and the straightforward gaze that was always powerful pierced Myuu’s eyes. It was the eye that Myuu had always watched.



“When everything is over. I will come back to Myuu’s place without fail. Taking everyone, we will come to meet Myuu.”



“……Really?”



“Yeah, really. Have I ever told a lie to Myuu?”



At Hajime’s words, Myuu shook her head with a *furufuru*. Hajime gently stroked such a Myuu’s hair.



“When I come back, next time I’ll take Myuu along too. And, my home town, I’ll show you the place I was born. You’ll surely be surprised. Because my home town is a place like a surprise box.”



“! The place Papa was born? I want to see!”



“Are you looking forward to it?”



“A lot!”



Myuu made a delighted expression while jumping up and down with a *pyonpyon*. At such a Myuu, Hajime gently narrowed his eyes. Myuu, who smiled with her whole face had blown away the anxiety over the matter of meeting with Hajime again, and without changing the force of hopping up and down, she jumped at Hajime. Hajime, who caught her firmly, held Myuu in his arms as it was.



“Than, can you be a good girl waiting with Mama? Don’t do something dangerous. Listening well to what Mama says, can you do your best to help?”



“Yes!”



Hajime made an apology with his gaze to Remia who was staring at the exchange of the two such people while smiling. With, “Sorry, I decided it selfishly.”



In contrast with that, when Remia slowly shook her head, she nodded as she matched gazes with Hajime firmly. With, “Please don’t worry about it.” That warm gaze, there was not even a bit of the color of condemnation, instead it contained feelings of gratitude.



Was the eye contact of such a Papa and Mama noticed? While Myuu watched Hajime and Remia alternatively, she pulled Hajime’s clothes with a *kuikui*.



“Papa, Mama too? Is Mama also the same?”



“Aah, that’s……Remia?”



“Yes, what is it, dear? You’re not saying that only I am left out, right?”



“No, that is so, but…… seriously, this place is ‘another world’?”



“Ara ara, to the place that the daughter and husband go, is there any way that I won’t follow? Ufufu.”



With Hajime holding the daughter, the figure of Remia nestled close to there. It was a normal married couple. Kaori and the others cut in as if to say, “Like we’ll let you-!” and the tumult spread. Where did the serious mood that was done in the beginning go? With Kaori and the others and Remia unfolding a war of smiles, to Hajime who was left out of it before anyone noticed, Yue stepped up with a *tokotoko*.



“……You’re taking them along?”



“Are you against it?”



When Hajime responded so to Yue’s question, Yue shook her head, staring at Hajime with a gentle look somewhere, and replied.



“……If it is something that Hajime decided.”



“Is that so?”



“……But, what about if you can’t choose the timing?”



It was the same question as Hajime’s concern. Obtaining the Age of Gods magics, assuming that he even obtained the means to return to his home town somehow, it was not necessarily so that he could cross over worlds at a time whenever he liked. Or, there was fully the possibility too of it becoming a situation that was different from what he promised with Myuu. If it became such a thing, Myuu’s heart would surely be deeply wounded.



However, when Hajime shrugged his shoulders, he turned a strong look that carried determination towards Yue while floating a smile on his mouth. Yue also, because she just tried to ask tentatively, her mouth loosened like the reply was said that it was understood.



“I’ll do it one way or another. No matter what I’ll return to the place of Myuu, and show her Japan too. If we crossed over worlds leaving Myuu, then by all means, it’s fine if we come back to this world again. It’s fine if we cross over worlds any number of times. Is that the only difference?”



“……N. Only that.”



Floating smiles that they were understanding each other, Hajime and Yue matched their gazes closely. Yue thought she was feeling happy that Hajime was able to value something to the extent that he made a vow. Hajime also, appreciating that sort of her, again filled his heart loving Yue who was smiling at him. As always, Hajime’s and Yue’s combination ability “Pink Space” was invoked.



Neglecting the others’ tumult, to Hajime and Yue who were making a world of just two people, already Kaori and the others made amazed expressions. However, to Myuu who was the daughter, such an ability seemed not to apply, and when she forced her way between them magnificently, she demanded to be held again to Hajime-papa. Although they made a promise to meet again, it did not change that they were separating for awhile. The last night seemed to become a situation where she acted spoiled with all her might.



The next day, Hajime and the others, seen off by Myuu and Remia, began a trip from the marine town Erisen.





Chapter 97




It’s been a day and half since they set foot once again into the world of brown.



Hajime aimed straight for the Ankaji (Ancadi) dukedom with the help of the magical powered four-wheeler while great heaps of dust rose from behind. Their original destination was the Sea of Trees, but they changed directions because they thought they might be able to repair the oasis if Koari used her reproduction magic.



The reproduction magic has the effect of literally returning anything back to its original form. So Hajime judged that he should be able to restore the polluted oasis, succeeding with reproduction where recovery magic’s purification failed.



Hajime had no reason to particularly object. They hadn’t had a chance to try the local specialty fruits last time, so he easily took Kaori’s suggestion to return.



Unlike last time, the entrance to Ankaji was full of people waiting in line. A lot of big wagons lined up, and judging from the atmosphere, it felt like a line of merchants.



“That’s a very large caravan.” Hajime stated flatly.



“…. Nn… will take time.” Yue added.



“They’re probably bringing in new supplies?” Kaori suggested.



Kaori’s guess seemed to be right. The reason behind the long line was from relief request from the Heilig Kingdom. Merchants were taking advantage of the troop’s movement and traveled with the relief corps. The Heilig relief corps seemed to accept the Ankaji merchants as long as they didn’t cause problems.



Anyway, because the oasis had been ruined, other than the stockpiled crops, it was necessary to destroy the tainted crops for safety reasons. This caused a large need for food as well as water. Ankaji couldn’t afford to be choosy who they got help from.



Hajime disregarded the caravan. Not wanting to wait under the desert heat, he drove the four wheeler up to the gate without waiting in line.



People of the caravan began to notice the black object and started to run, their hearts likely screaming out “Is that a demon they’re sitting in?” Towards the dangerous stares mixed with fear and wariness, Hajime brandished his weapon as the vehicle approached the gatekeeper in a cloud of dust.



As they drew near, the soldiers saw the 4 wheeler and suddenly became noisy. They moved to challenge Hajime, but colleagues who recognized the 4 wheeler convinced them to approach without their weapons. As they approach Hajime, they dispatch a messenger to run back to the city.



Hajime and his company left the 4 wheeler while ignoring the chaos their presence caused. As always, several people are enchanted by Yue’s good looks. As Hajime placed the 4 wheeler back into his treasure warehouse, their eyes turned to wonder.



“It’s like that. Has the God of the Apostles returned?” the gatekeeper asks as he watches the figure of Kaori.



The soldiers were relieved to see Kaori. Perhaps they recognized her from the time they had brought Randzi back or when they went to recover the serene stones from the Guryuu-en Great Volcano.



It appears like the 4 wheeler had become known as Kaori’s transport, and they named her the “God of the Apostles”. Hajime didn’t feel the need to correct them as they were not exactly wrong. Since they recognized Kaori the best, they put her out in front.



“Yes, we returned to try to purify the Oasis. Please pass this on to the lords…” Kaori began.



“Oasis! Is it true?” The gatekeeper responded.



“I’m only saying it’s possible…”



“Nevertheless, if it’s an apostle… and we apologize for the impoliteness in such a place. We’ve already sent a messenger. I cannot leave my post, but a lord should be coming immediately to escort you if you’d like to come to our waiting area.”



It seems they’ve gained recognition for previously rescuing the country. Hajime can see the respect in the eyes of the soldiers as they gaze at him. They were getting the VIP treatment. While cautiously watching the merchants that gave him curious looks, Hajime once again set foot into the Ankaji Dukedom.



_______________________________________________



The lord Randzi ran up breathlessly after about 15 minutes of waiting. It was pretty quick arrival. At least to Randzi, it looked like they were important.



“It’s been a while. I’m glad you’re all safe. I was worried when you did not come back after entrusting the serene stones to Tio-dono. It would have been troublesome if our savior had died before we could express our gratitude.”



“I’m just a mere adventurer. But well, I thank you. As you can see, your relief is safely received.”



“Oh, and we finished stockpiling the food with the assistance we received. Along with the reservoir that Yue made, you’ve bought us sufficient time. The people won’t go hungry thanks to you and the merchants.”



Randzi gently laughed with slightly hollow cheeks. It seemed he had been run ragged to save Ankaji. The fatigue seemed to ooze out in his expressions. He wasn’t getting enough time to rest.



“Lord. As for the purification of the oasis…” Kaori began.



“Apostle-dono… No, Kaori-dono. The Oasis is as usual. Thanks to the fresh groundwater, the purification is proceeding little by little. At least half a year and the oasis should be completely purified. One year before it soaks into the nearby soil and purifies it so that we can plant again.” Randzi responds a little depressed.



Kaori explains that she might be able to immediately purify it. Randzi’s response is dramatic. Taking a moment for it to sink in, “Seriously!?” Randzi spits out feverishly. Kaori shyly nods in verification while moving to hide behind Hajime, taken aback by his exuberance. The distraught Randzi corrects himself, then asks for the purification politely.



Since that was their intention anyway, Hajime nodded and Randzi led them to the oasis. The oasis is not very popular right now. In the past, it was a crowded place where people relaxed. Randzi was expressionless, but gave off a lonely atmosphere as he remembered the former oasis.



Kaori moves up to the shore of the oasis and begins to cast reproduction magic.



Although Hajime had obtained the reproduction magic, as usual his aptitude for it was virtually nothing. However, in the case of Shea, it seems there is an automatic recovery effect, but it had to be activated consciously. Also, her physical and mental strength seem to recover far faster. Steadily, Shea is becoming even more superhuman. Along with her proficiency levels, body weight manipulation, and body strengthening, she has come to be like a heavy tank with automatic recovery installed.



The one with the most aptitude was Kaori, followed by Teo, and finally Yue. In the case of Yue, as usual, as a consequence of her own special auto-regeneration, this magic seems to have a poor recovery in comparison. On the other hand, for the healing Kaori, her high aptitude for recovery magic seems to lead to her having a strong grasp on “reproduction”, allowing her to use it more comprehensively and efficiently than anyone else. It’s a bit sad that Yue won’t be able to use it to improve her combat prowess.



Kaori’s begins to chant. It’s a long cast. It initially took her 7 minutes but after practicing she was able to bring it down to 3. Since it only took her a week to learn it, it was practically a cheat. However, since Yue was present it was hard to truly call her a cheat in comparison. Compared to Yue’s abilities, this seemed easy.



“—-Stopping elephant” she extends a white staff while closing her eyes and murmuring the final words.



In the next moment, a pale light resembling a firefly appeared, and then fell into the middle of the oasis. The entire oasis started to shine, and pale light particles began to bubble up to the surface and float into the sky. It was a majestic scene that touched the heart. It truly felt like the corruption was being purged by heavenly light.



Everyone forgot to breathe as they admired the sight. Even after the mysterious glow covering the oasis floated away into the sky, Randzi stood without a word, immersing himself in the afterglow.



While supporting Kaori who was swaying a little from exhaustion, Hajime taps Randzi. Randzi snaps out of it and orders his men to survey the water quality. His subordinates hurry to examine the oasis with detection magic. After making a hard swallow, Randzi watches over his men, whom upon finishing their inspection report their results with expressions of disbelief.



“…. It’s recovered.” A subordinate mutters.



“Repeat that?” Randzi demands.



The subordinate adds words of confirmation and Randzi sucks in his breath, now knowing the truth.



“No abnormalities in the oasis! It is the original oasis! It has been completely cleaned!”



At that moment, Randzi and his subordinates cheered in unision. They threw whatever documents they had and abandoned whatever they were holding as they hugged each other and slapped their backs, expressing their joy. Randzi also looked up at the heavens, exhaling deeply and wondering if this was a bit too easy.



“After that, soil regeneration. Lord, where were the crops you discarded?”



“… Well, it is all collected in one place. Because of all the time and labor, it was regrettable that we had to toss them… wait, you don’t mean…?”



“If Yue and Tio join, it should be possible…”



“…. Nn, no problem.”



“They were grown with effort, it’d be a shame to throw them away.” Hajime added.



As Randzi realized they might be able to not only recover the soil, but the lost crops as well, his hand went to his chest and he lowered his head deeply without hesitation. It was not something a lord should do, but that was the extent of his appreciation for their actions. The love for them was deep in this country. It was the kind of thing that transforms your sense of appreciation.



After receiving Randzi’s bow, Hajime tried to move them towards the farmland. However, he suddenly stopped when he felt a disturbance. A frenzied group of people were approaching in the distance. The soldiers of the Anjaki Dukedom were coming towards them in a straight line with numerous soldiers of different attires. Using “far vision”, Hajime could see that the group was populated with Seikyo church officials and temple knights from this town.



As soon as they approached Hajime’s group, they immediately surrounded them in a semicircular shape. An elderly man in white regal robes of the temple knights stepped forward. The dangerous atmosphere between the man and Hajime was only divided by the presence of Randzi.



“See them, they are dangerous.”



“Foribin Bishop, what the hell is this? They are dangerous? This hero has saved out dukedom twice already. I will not ignore disrespect to them as a lord of Ankaji.”



“The elderly man who was called Forbin Bishop snorted a laugh at Randzi’s words.



“Hmph, hero? Hold your tongue. They are already accredited heretics. Careless words will come crashing down around you!” the Bishop snarled.



“They’re branded heretics? Ridiculous, I have not heard of this.”



Randzi was shocked at the word heretic being attached to Hajime. Randzi was a follower of the church though. He was aware of the weight of those words. Did they make a mistake? He met the Bishop with disbelief.



“Of course you wouldn’t know, the news just arrived this morning. And the heretic showing up right now, don’t you think that’s exquisite timing? Surely this was a message from God. Destroy the enemies of God… now on to Center…”



Hajime couldn’t hear the voices of the last lines, but apparently Hajime has been branded a heretic. Randzi and the Bishop eye him unintentionally.



Hajime seems neither shocked nor in any particular hurry, only offering a shrug as if to ask “What was I supposed to do?” to Randzi.



Randzi wrinkled his eyebrows after seeing Hajime’s response. However, the bishop opens his mouth and openly laughs.



“And now, I have to subdue the enemies of God. They say this man is quite brutal, but I have a hundred temple knights behind me. Come with us quietly so we don’t upset the public peace, and we won’t make things more difficult for you.



Randzi closes his eyes. Without any more information, he could guess why Hajime was branded a heretic considering his power and his personality. Hajime was a force the church couldn’t manage and thus couldn’t allow.



However, given the strength of Hajime’s companions, stopping them was a decision equal to suicide. Randzi doubted the sanity of picking a war with Hajime. He was wondering if they had their priorities straight.



It is a fact that Hajime saved Ankaji. He healed the people who were fallen by poison, prepared the water that was their lifeline, subdued the monster lurking in the oasis, and further purified the oasis back to how it was before.



To this huge debt, it was troubling considering what they could provide as an award. Randzi’s eyes grew wide at the realization that an opportunity just presented itself. And, with a serving lord’s dignity, Randzi broke the silence and provided the impatient Bishop an answer.



“Rejected.”



“… I’m sorry, what?”



To the totally unexpected words, the Forubin bishop provided an interesting goofy expression. The appearance of the bishop, inwardly, put a wry smile on Randzi. It should have been impossible for Randzi to go against the decision of the Seikyo church. Randzi repeated the words with unexpected determination.



“I said I refuse. These heros are our national salvation. If you would make them an enemy, then I cannot forgive the Seikyo church.”



“Are… you… insane? You cannot go against the church. Do you want to be branded as a heretic as well?”



In response to Randzi’s words, the bishop raised a startled cry clogged with anger. The temple knights also looked at each other with puzzled looks.



“Bishop, does Central not know their accomplishments? He saved the dukedom when we were attacked by a deadly poison. Your reports should also mention that he rescued Ur town, don’t they? I don’t understand the sanity of this heretic claim. Reconsider the heresy on account of these new facts.”



“Silence! The decision is final! This is God’s will! That is unforgivable. If you continue to protect this heretic, then Ankaji itself will be branded. Take heed!”



The bishop’s pupils had the light of mania in them. The way he was screaming gave an atmosphere that did not seem very clergy-like. Randzi stared at him with a cold eye. Hajime had come up beside him with an imperceptible motion and asked with a surprised look.



“Are you sure about this? Both the Kingdom and the Church are going to retaliate. As a lord, will you be alright?”



Randzi does not answer Hajime. Instead, he turns Hajime’s gaze to the surrounding men, who gave off an aura of preparedness and acceptance. Their eyes shown with death as if saying “to die killing is the way to go.” It was that kind of expression.



The bishop also seemed to read the change in mood and shouts out a last warning while his face reddened and became more frenzied.



“Is this your answer? Public, your way ends here. Well, your way is not. This is the end for anyone who gets in my way. You’ll receive God’s divine punishment and fall to ruin!”



“This is Ankaji, we’re not so shameless as to sell a hero who saved us. Divine? Like I’d believe God’s judgement would be so shameless. I guess my faith differs from the Bishop’s God.”



The Bishop’s word became expressionless afer the angry words from Randzi. He raised one hand to try to send a signal for the Temple Knights to attack.



At this time, there was a thump! Something flew at the knights and struck one of their helmets with a clang. At their feet was a pebble. It didn’t do any damage to the Knight, but why was it there? Such questions were fleeting as another stone was thrown, bumping noisily against the temple knight’s armor.



If you looked where the stone’s came from, many of the inhabitants of Ankaji had gathered in the intervening time, surrounding the Templar knights.



They had come in response to the mysterious lights that had previously come from the Oasis and came upon the scene of the temple knights surrounding their lord and Hajime.



They remembered the treatments they had the received from Kaori as “God of the Apostle”, the serene stones, and the magic bullet challenging the labyrinth to save them. They were indignant at the behavior of the church which turned into hostility as they began to throw stones.



“Stop! People of Ankaji! They are God’s enemy. Heretics! You are going against the will of God!”



Forubin is shouting loudly, trying to solve the excited inhabitant’s misunderstanding. They just didn’t know that Hajime was labeled a heretic and will relax once the bishop explains things to them, or so the bishop thought.



In fact, the words of Seikyo church bishop caused the inhabitants to stop throwing stones and look at each other in confusion.



This time, Randzi spoke out with dignity.



“My beloved people, Listen! I was just informed that the oasis was purified. Our oasis has been returned to us through Hajime’s efforts. As well as the contaminated land. And the crops. They used their purification to return our Ankaji back to the way it way. They also brought me back to Ankaji. Make your decision with your own mind. Keep our hero of national salvation, or turn on him. I decided to keep him!”



The Bishop tried to mock Randzi’s speech, “in such empty words, there is no reason to go against the majesty of the church,” however, his smile of ridicule slowly dropped.



The inhabitant’s intention is shown in the form of stoning.



“and I, a….” The bishops words were sounded out by the slams of stones hitting armor.



“You act playfully, this is a matter of life or death!”



“The church did not do anything. Yet your insanity makes you want to harm the apostle who helped us!”



“What’s a heretic anyway? You’re abusing the term!”



“It must have been heretics that authorized this!”



“Defend Kaori!”



“Long live the lord!”



“Kaori, I dedicate myself to you!”



“Let’s start a Kaori fan club!”



Apparently, the inhabitants seemed to have a sense of deep love and respect for Rindzi and Kaori. Pushing aside the faith, they defended Rindzi and Kaori with all of their spirit. No, it’s more like they changed their faith itself. However, it seems like they have a faith of their own, belief that no one will harm Kaori who saved them as the “God of the Apostles”. In short, it was a faith that exceeded the confidence of the bishop. It wasn’t known where that trust was to begin with.



Residents gathered one after another. The people’s forces are not at all inferior to the Temple Knights, but the bishop became a beacon of anger and hostility that raged endlessly. The Temple Knights started to back up in retreat.



“Bishop-dono, these are the intentions of Ankaji. What of your previous allegations?”



“It’s not as simple as you think…”



The Bishop turned his heel while grinding his teeth, a scowl leveled at Hajime. The knights rapidly move to follow after him. The bishop seemed to lose steam, giving off the last of his passion with loud footsteps as he headed back to the church.



“Is this really okay? Will they leave it at this?”



Hajime had a concerned look, having been left out of the loop until the end. Kaori’s direct involvement with the crisis with the church left a worried look on her face.



Despite this, Randzi replied with a cool look like it was no big deal.



“This is the choice of Ankaji. The people who live in this dukedom are grateful to you. It’s unthinkable to have you die in our territory that is why they would have killed to protect you. I don’t want such a coup in this country.”



“That aside, I wouldn’t be hurt by someone of their level…” Hajime responded scratching his cheek.



Randzi laughed at his words.



“If that’s so, then that means you guys are scarier than the church. Being the nation’s hero is only half the reason we protected you. We also don’t want to become your enemies. I can’t even imagine the amount of magic you possess to slaughter an unknown monster in a breeze and capture a large labyrinth in just a few days. You ignore the church and don’t respond to the threat of a hundred knights either. You’ve defeated an army of ten thousand and there are even rumors you defeated a demon instantly. No, it’s downright scary. There will be a time when I succeed after my father passes, but I’ll take pride in having made a wise decision between the two.”



So Randzi had no intention of catering to the church’s hostility towards Hajime. He put the church and Hajime on a scale of who was a stronger ally and chose the latter. Indeed, it could be said the country itself would act against the majesty of the church. To say this was a bold decision would not be an exaggeration.



Hajime smiled at the thought that his confrontation with the church was thwarted by the people themselves. As the people moved around them in a fluster with care for their safety, Kaori laughed happily. Hajime realized this was the path Aiko had hoped for him, one that was not a “lonely way of life.”



_________________



Three days after the turmoil from the church.



Hajime’s party had finished purifying the agricultural areas, and he was watching the oasis shine from a hilltop.



Hajime could see the sparkling surface of the water. People had gathered around the oasis once again with liveliness and smiles. Couples sat in the grass watching the kids frolic in the water. There were people pier fishing, and lovers in their own little worlds on boats. People had returned to the oasis, and they all had smiles.



This is how Hajime passed this day in Ankaji. He had intended to leave as soon as he had bought some of the specialty fruit, but he had been kept there by the lord and the inhabitants’ generosity and ended up staying a few extra days.



Hajime worried that with the current mood in the city, their departure from Akanji would be met with a parade. He had to make a request to Randzi to keep things modest. They were able to finish their send-off at the lord’s mansion, and finally Hajime made it to the gates, taking one last look at the oasis before they left.



“You stand out, perhaps you can wear something a little less conspicuous.”



Hajime mentions to Yue nearby as he turns to leave.



“It does…? Tired of?”



“What? Is that so? Hajime-kun.”



“Well, Yue, Kaori. From my view, you guys just stand out.”



“Well, I – it’s because this dress is not to pass through the gates…”



Shea had said these outfits where part of the so-called belly dance costume. Their navels were visible between a high top and short pants. It was very sensational, their tiny navels dazzling. It guaranteed that every eye would be on the one wearing it.



It seems like a common way of dressing in Ankaji. When Yue received the gift from a lady of the manor, she immediately began wearing it to show off. Upon seeing Yue in it, Hajime’s eyes became like a wild beasts. Apparently, Hajime seems to be weak to that kind of costume. His eyes were glued to Kaori once she started wearing it, prompting Shea and Tio to do the same.



Other than with Yue, they didn’t elicit enough response from Hajime. As a result, they started wearing the outfits all day. However, Yue’s outfit collapsed all reason in Hajime.



Even now as the set out, everyone remains in their erotic costumes. Finally, Hajime had reached his wits end and started to poke the point loudly and aggressively, despite being somewhat happy, to make them dress normal once again.



________________



It’s been two days since leaving Ankaji.



They were on the road leading to Horuado. Hajime’s four wheeler steadily approached a caravan that was being attacked by Rashiki thieves.



It was at this point that Hajime and Kaori would meet a surprising person.





Chapter 98




It was Shia who first noticed the commotion.



“Isn’t that someone being attacked ahead?”



As usual, Yue was pressed up against Hajime. Kaori tried to get between them, the aura of her dragon pressed up against Yue’s lightning aura. The result was that Hajime had to be careful driving and thus didn’t have his attention on what was in front of him.



As Shia said, there appeared to be a caravan ahead with two groups, one attacking the other. As their vehicle approached, Hajime’s “distance vision” allowed him to see two groups in the middle of a battle, one offending and the other defending. Shea’s usamimis picked up the roar of battle before Hajime could see them.



“They appear to be bandits. The bandits seem to outnumber the caravan guards over 40 to just 15. The difference in their combat potential is clear.” Hajime describes the situation to Yue and Kaori.



“… Nn, the guards are putting up a good fight,” Yue adds.



“They have a barrier spell surrounding the caravan, but it’s not going to hold out. The bandits are trying to break the wall with magic.”



“But their defense is holding for the moment.”



“Having a barrier cover the entire caravan stretches it pretty thin. It will not endure long. They’ve bought themselves some time, but it won’t hold.”



It appears like the caravan faced a surprise attack. Numerous people within the barrier were crouched down with injuries, or worse dead. They had managed to take out a few bandits, but the bandits were still proportionally more. They had managed to erect a barrier, but once it failed the people of the caravan would undoubtedly meet a gruesome end.



Hajime’s conversation was cut short as the barrier melted to nothingness. The bandits raised a shout and surged forward, breaking through the caravan’s remaining defenses with vicious grins on their faces. The escort squadron fought back desperately, but they were outgunned. One person after another fell to injuries from the bandits.



Kaori had a determined expression on her face, she turned to Hajime and requested he help rescue them in a tone that suggested she was agitated.



“Hajime-kun, please! Help them, if you can…”



Hajime didn’t respond, but accelerated his 4 wheeler instead. Since it was obvious the caravan would be wiped out if he didn’t help, he had already decided he wanted to know their story. He wanted to say that to Kaori, but didn’t.



The 4 wheeler chewed into the ground producing a “garri garri garri” sound as he accelerated with a vengeance, the car moving as if it was attached to a rocket engine.



“Hajime-kun, thank you…”



Kaori smiled happily as he began to take action. Hajime shrugged in response. Hajime was simply doing what he wanted to do. Yue tightened her seatbelt.



“Oh, that, Hajime-kun? Isn’t this a bit…”



The feeling seemed to be ruined as the four wheeler continued to accelerate moment by moment. Although she asked him to help, she knew how cars worked on earth, and the speed he was charging at them didn’t leave time to stop. Was he going to ram them with the 4 wheeler? Kaori could not help but think so.



With Haori concerned, Hajime responded clearly.



“Don’t they teach you to stomp the accelerator when you see a criminal in driving school?”



“Of course they wouldn’t teach that. Don’t twist the traffic laws to your discretion. Hey, Yue, don’t agree with him, stop nodding!”



While Kaori tsukkomi’d, Hajime ignored her, turning the vehicle towards the bandit sitting in the rear who appeared to be the leader. Hajime intended to kill the bandits by running them over without hesitation.



The bandit leader finally noticed the strange object approaching them leaving behind a cloud of dust. He issued instructions to nearby bandits, and they began to chant magic. To them, the 4 wheeler appeared to be some new kind of demon or monster. They would not have believed it was man-made, let alone operated by people.



Hajime poured magical power in to the four-wheeler, operating one of its many functions. A blade of approximately 1 meter protruded from the sides and roof. The bandits fired flame bullets at the vehicle, but they bounced harmlessly off the four-wheeler, so Hajime chose to ignore them and kept driving forward. Even though the flame bullets were striking the vehicle, its steadfast rush towards the bandits put sour expressions on their faces.



Dogoo! Baki! Squish!



Horror, despair, and embarrassment – those were the expressions on the bandit’s faces as they collided with the hood of the 4-wheeler.



As bandits flung over the roof, the blade on top ripped them to shreds. Some tried to jump to the sides to avoid the blades and were blown away instead. At 80 km/h, anyone who was lucky enough to miss the blades ended up with shattered bones and ruptured organs.



The rear group of bandits were wiped out in a moment, leaving seven dead.



After taking out the rear bandits, Hajime spins the car, putting it into a drift. The area becomes a slaughtering ground as the 4 wheelers cuts into the bandits, leaving the surviving members of the caravan staring with stunned looks. Bandits and caravan guards in close combat suddenly stop to stare at the scene.



As the bandits and caravan guards eye them cautiously, Hajime turns to Kaori as she leans forward eagerly.



“If they attack us without compassion, we must be willing to do the same. Do you understand?” Hajime explained to Kaori.



“… yes, I understand.”



Kaori understood that despite being kind, she wasn’t allowed to heal or protect the people she would call enemies. If she did, she wouldn’t be able to follow Hajime. She had made her resolve to be in his party. Hajime feared that Kaori would get in his way, but she gave him a resolute nod to alleviate his suspicions.



“I won’t get interfere. So do what you need to do.” Hajime sighed.



“Yes.” Kaori let out a smile, getting out of the four wheeler and racing to the closest injured person. She was surprised that it turned out to be a young woman. The bandits who had regained their resolved immediately approached Kaori aggressively, their faces twisted in anger over the bandits the 4 wheeler had killed.



“You whore! Die!” While raising an angry voice, one of the bandits brandished his long sword.



Kaori spared him a sideways glance and then brushed past while ignoring him. She continued at a full sprint towards the injured person while beginning her chant. A moment later there was a loud bang, and man’s head exploded, easily ending his life.



Dopan! Dopan! Dopan! Dopan! Dopan! Dopan!



The wind continuously carried the sounds of death with each crack of thunder. Each explosion resulted in the destruction of another head in a spectacle of blood. It was overwhelmingly harsh. The more than 40 bandits were reduced to half their number in a matter of seconds.



In a panic at the unbelievable sight, a few of the bandits tried to grab Shia and the other girls in an attempt to gain a hostage. One of the guards tried to shout out to the girls to give them a warning, but his worries were pointless. Shia’s superhuman growth was progressing quite nicely, and there were no openings in this combat rabbit!



Shia pulled out Doryukken from the treasure room, which appeared to the bandits like nothingness behind her. Passi! It made a satisfying sound as she swung it, the hammer stretching to size. As she swung, a circular white membrane formed on end. It was a wall of air which struck the upper bodies of three of the bandits, blowing them away in a single hit.



“Oops! Too much blood!”



Apparently, as they hadn’t fought any small fries in a while, Shia had forgotten to restrain herself when fighting a weaker enemy. She had intended to just toss the enemy back, but with her absent-minded spirit, she had sent their upper bodies flying without the lower. The sudden splattering of blood causes Shia to back up several steps in surprise.



Yue and Tio spared Shia amazed looks, even though they were in the middle of decimating the other bandits with a storm of magic.



The remaining 10 bandits were unceremoniously shot by Hajime, death immediately following without time to plead for their lives. It was pure destruction without any forgiveness.



Kaori used the recovery magic restoration to heal numerous people at once scattered across the caravan. Regrettably, many of the caravan guards who had fallen earlier had already breathed their last breath. Even reproduction magic could not help bring them back from the dead.



As Hajime approached Kaori, a person raced up to her quickly. The stranger was small-statured, their face hidden with a hood, causing them to appear suspicious. However, Hajime knew this was the person who had kept the barrier up to desperately protect the caravan. None of the caravan guards got in Hajime’s way as he approached them.



“Kaori!”



The hooded person threw out her hands and used her momentum to leap at Kaori while calling her name in a pretty voice. Kaori didn’t hide her astonishment, muttering the name of the person in the process.



“Lily (She’ll be called Riri or Ririana in the next chapter on)? After all, it is Lily? That barrier looked familiar. I didn’t think I’d find you in such a place, but I suspected…” It appeared Kaori recognized the hooded person as Lily.



—– Rather, Liliana S.B. Heilig (Hairihi), the third princess of the Heilig (Hairihi) Kingdom was the person in the hood.



Liliana hugged Kaori with relief, offering a glimpse of her big, blue eyes and apparent beauty hidden by the hood. Her eyes squeezed shut as she began to cry, speaking to Kaori quietly between sobs.



“I also did not think I’d find Kaori in this place. It is… good fortune. It seems that I haven’t exhausted my luck yet.”



“Lily? What’s wrong?”



Kaori didn’t quite get the meaning of Liliana’s words, but she noticed something was off and pulled back. Liliana put a finger on Kaori’s mouth, urging her not to use Liliana’s name.



Apparently Liliana was alone and had managed to slip into the caravan to get this far. Kaori gave a sympathetic look as she tried to emphasize with the struggle the princess must have faced.



“Kaori, are you guys done?” Hajime interrupted, oblivious to the mood.



Liliana gave Hajime a blank look. Suddenly, Liliana raised her voice and shouted “Hya!” Looking up at Hajime from within her hood, a light bulb seemed to go off in her head and she immediately began to greet Hajime.



“It’s Nagumo, isn’t it? Long time no see. We had heard about your survival after the fall. The strength and ability to survive is worthy of respect. It was good you survived. While you were missing, Kaori was a wreck.”



“Wait, Lily, we’re fine now.” Kaori spoke in a fluster.



“I heard about how Kaori confessed to Hajime from Shizuku, but you’ll have to tell me more about it later.”



Liliana was teasing Kaori in a fun tone, smiling from the back of her hood. Kaori turned bright red from embarrassment.



The princess’s smile must be very popular with the public. There was no doubt that if she aimed it at the young and old alike, they would fall for her. However, Hajime wasn’t particularly moved by her smile.



Without reading the atmosphere at all, he eyed her suspiciously and demands,”…And who exactly are you?”



“Heh?”



If Hajime didn’t interrupt them, Liliana and Kaori would undoubtedly keep talking about the status of all the other students in the kingdom. Hajime didn’t have the patience to be subtle. He wanted a direct answers.



Liliana was a princess with a great personality and who was loved by everyone she met. She was shocked to be addressed so improperly by a man who normally wouldn’t even be worthy of meeting the princess, thus she let out a goofy voice involuntarily.



The panicked Kaori immediately tried to smooth out the situation on behalf of the dazed Liliana. She spoke in a low voice so no one else could hear them.



“Hajime you… Princess! It’s the Princess! It’s the Heilig Kingdom Princess Leliana that you’re speaking to!”



“……………………………………….. Ah…”



“Gusu (sobbing), you’ve forgotten me, haven’t you? Gusu.” Leliana whined.



“Lily! Don’t cry because of that! Hajime-kun is kinda whatchamacallit. He’s special. No one normal would forget Lily. So you don’t need to cry!” Kaori attempted to smooth things out.



“Hey, can you not say those rude things so casually?” Hajime sighed.



Since Liliana’s watery eyes looked quite terrible, Kaori was desperate to comfort her. Hajime involuntarily tsukkomi’d, however Kaori gave him a dirt look that said “be quiet right now!” Meanwhile, Liliana was explaining “No, it’s okay Kaori, it just hurt my pride a little…” Across the board, the conclusion from the conversation seemed to be that Hajime was wrong for having completely forgotten who Liliana was.



With the atmosphere already delicate, a man from the caravan approached them.



“It’s been a long time…. It looks like you’re in good health…” the caravan leader stated.



“From health drinks…” Hajime responds



“Really? A health drink? A company that can make that must be a famous and wealthy company. Can you give me their name?”



“Oh-, no, nevermind. But how are you, Mottou?”



“Yeah, I’m glad you remember Mottou from the Yunker trading company. This is the second time you helped us out of a dangerous place. It looks like we were fated to meet again.” The man laughed and shook Hajime’s hand.



It seemed like the leader of the caravan was the man they escorted to Fhu-ren from Brook town some time ago.



Hajime also remembered when his commercial spirit got the better of him and Hajime had to put him in his place. Hajime had learned a bit about human nature from the man named Mottou. Although it seemed like Mottou’s commercial spirit hadn’t declined in the slightest. He casually touched Hajime’s ring of storage as he let go of his hand. His eye’s weren’t laughing, but seemed to ask “Are you sure you’re not going to sell that soon?” Maybe it was just Hajime’s imagination.



Shia explained to Kaori and Lily their relationship with Mottou.



“A random person you met only once you can remember, but a princess?” Lily became even more depressed and Kaori struggled to comfort her in spite of the story she just heard.



As Mottou told it, they were heading to the Ankaji dukedom via Horuado. The plight of Ankaji had already been known, and as a merchant he was ready to head out there to earn a profit. It seemed that he had already been out there once and this was his second journey after a stop in the Imperial City. From the look on his face, it was clear they were making big profits.



Hajime explained that they were heading for the Sea of Trees after a stop in Huruado. Mottou begged them for an escort until they reached Horuado.



However, before Hajime could answer, Liliana put it a stop to it.



“I’m sorry for interrupting you, Merchant. I must speak with you for a moment. Thank you for transporting me this far. I’m sorry for my selfish request, but I won’t be joining you the rest of the way to Horuado.”



“Oh, you’re not heading to Horuado anymore?”



“Yes, this point is fine. I will, of course, pay for the entire trip.”



It seemed that Liliana was taking advantage of the caravan to make it to Horuado. Having met Hajime on the way, she no longer felt it was necessary. At the point, Hajime received a tap on his shoulder and Kaori whispered in his ear.



“Don’t be cruel to Lily anymore!” she gave a silent plea with her eyes.



“Is that so? Well, it’s been a pleasure. Don’t worry about the money.” Mottou continued.



“Huh? No… why?”



Mottou had refused to receive money, which confused Liliana. The caravan had provided bed and food along with an escort. Coming from Mottou the merchant, those words seemed completely unexpected. Liliana gave Mottou a troubled smile.



“Don’t trouble yourself too much on it. But here’s some advice. Typically, a caravan will charge extra passengers before they depart. To not have to pay before you leave typically suggests they’re up to something, or don’t plan to charge you in the first place. This is the latter.”



“Is that so…”



“I don’t know what your circumstances are, but since you’re traveling alone I assumed it was serious. During a crisis, if a merchant such as myself helps, then in the future the people of this country may find confidence with this merchant.”



Liliana realized that Mottou knew her identity from the beginning. He pretended not to know her so he could help without drawing attention.



“Then at least I should offer a token of my appreciation. Without your help, I never would have made it out of the Imperial City.”



“Heh… the thing you want most is often the most difficult purchase for a merchant, you know?”



“Eh?…. No, I don’t know.” Liliana responded confused.



“It’s trust.” Mottou explained.



“Trust?”



“Yes, a business without trust can’t thrive and never will makea profit. However, to help a young lady out in a serious situation, the Yunker Trading Company might become known as a company you can trust. Your fare will be paid no matter.”



Liliana held a wry smile at the words he spoke. If you use money unreasonably, it’s synonymous with a lack of trust. There were some contrary feelings welling up in Liliana. Eventually, she gave up on them and took Mottou’s good will straight on.



“Your trading company is truly worthy of relying on. This Heilig princess will never forget your kindness and dedication. Thank you!”



“Your words are wasted on this one.” Mottou bowed deeply with respect.



Then Mottou turned, leaving Liliana and Hajime on the spot as his caravan headed down the planned route to Horuado. He left in a manner of knowing that he’d receive his own heretic certification for aiding the princess. He had already received the information that the Ankaji dukedom had recovered thanks to Hajime. Hajime could only guess why he chose to help in this manner. He supposed Mottou would say he did It to “Earn favor for a better tomorrow”, the slogan of a genuine merchant. (Translation note: It’s implied that he never had planned to go to Ankaji, and had done it purely to help the princess, in order to get in good with the royal family, so to speak)



After Mottou had left, the remaining party headed off in the magic four wheeler while Liliana began to explain her story. Liliana’s expression was full of tension and impatience which gave Hajime a foreboding feeling. Finally, she began to speak.



“Aiko was kidnapped…”



Hajime sensed that there was more to it than that.



To summarize Liliana’s story:



Recently, the mood inside the Royal Palace seemed more uncomfortable than Liliana remembered.



The King committed himself to the Seikyo church more fervently than he had ever done in the past. The Prime minister and the other leaders also seemed to get caught up in his fervor, their belief strengthening unreasonably.



If it was just that… but there was also the fact that one after another, everyone seemed to fall in line with the church. Their collaboration was enhanced like never before. Leliana kept telling herself it was her imagination.



The discomfort didn’t stop there. Everyone seemed oddly devoid of any ambition. She had attempted to talk with knights and soldier she knew, familiar faces, and they all responded properly, but their responses seemed mechanical. Maybe even something like an illness.



She even tried to consult with Meld, the one knight she had the most trust in, but he always was kept out of sight and busy. Liliana couldn’t manage to catch him even once to talk.



Meanwhile, Aiko finally returned to the Imperial City with details on Ur town. Liliana seemed to have been present at the time. Suddenly, an abnormal demand was made. It was the call to make Hajime a heretic. Credited with saving Ur, the objections and opinions of Aiko, who boasted great name recognition and popularity as the “fertility goddess”, were completely ignored.



The conclusion seemed unreasonable, and Liliana had been a fierce protestor, although her father didn’t budge no matter what she said. His stubbornness seemed to border on obsession. Instead, Liliana herself was accused of having a lack of faith, and her father started to see her as an enemy, rather than a daughter.



Liliana pretended that they had convinced her, and then immediately made plans to run away. She wanted to discuss what was going on with Aiko first. Liliana knew that Aiko was planning to meet the rest of the students to discuss the events around Hajime fall at dinner, so she wanted to meet her beforehand and discuss her fears.



She had been approaching Aiko’s room when she heard her arguing with another woman in the corridor. When she peeped around the corner, she saw Aiko unconscious and in the hands of a woman with silver hair wearing a church frock.



The woman made Liliana afraid, and she immediately dashed into a nearby hidden passage only known to the royal family.



Although the silver-haired woman had noticed and looked for her, she didn’t notice the hidden passage itself and left Liliana in peace. Liliana was convinced that the silver haired woman was the mastermind behind all of this. That everything was connected and that she needed to tell someone.



However, since Aiko was ambushed, it stood to reason that the students were being watched. She also didn’t know Meld’s whereabouts. Then she remembered that one of the students, a dependable friend, wasn’t in the capital. So she decided she had to find Kaori. She had heard the story that Kaori was with Nagumo Hajime. That means it wouldn’t be just the two of them she could rely on. She escaped in a hidden passage way with the plan to head to the Ankaji dukedom.



Based on the news that Ankaji was recovering after a public emergency, in seemed like there was a high probability the person responsible was Hajime and company.



“And after that, you know, I was allowed to travel with the caravan of the Yunker Trading Company. I did not think I’d get noticed, let alone find myself getting attacked by bandits, or that I’d be helped by Kaori… not even in my dreams… a little while ago did not… but… I… it was scary… the church… What is happening? The nun with that silver hair… my father…”



Liliana hugged her body, trembling with fear. Rather than the talented princess she usually was, she just looked like a scared girl. Although that was no wonder. All the people she knew were turned into strangers, and she was afraid she’d be next.



Kaori hugged her tightly, trying to ease the fear that dug into Liliana’s mind even a little.



While watching the scene, Hajime went through the events in his mind. Lilliana’s story reminded him of the Merujine underwater ruins and the scene they had been shown in the end. The people had been built into a fervor with their belief in god. This was very truly a dangerous situation.



He didn’t know if those visions were true. Could it be happening? No, rather they should get the god level magic quickly, and leave this world as soon as possible.



However, Hajime couldn’t make the decision immediately, as he had to consider Aiko-sensei. Most likely, what Aiko was going to tell the students was true about their being brought to this world to fight for the god’s amusement. They liked to use people as pawns, and her words would have put a wedge of suspicion that would have inconvenienced them. It seems Hajime’s theory was spot on.



For them to decide to kidnap Aiko, it must have been Hajime’s fault. They probably don’t want to kill her, but the people who take pleasure in manipulating everyone like a hand puppet might decide to eventually make use of her.



Hajime was indebted to Aiko for the advice that she gave him. It’s not as bad now that he is not alone.



For that reason…



“We’re going to help my teacher.”



Hajime chose to save, rather than abandon the one that needed him.



With those words, Liliana raised her face in hope. She wore an expression of relief over the fact that he’d come back with her to the city. She had heard that he was indifferent towards his classmates in this world and she had feared he would have abandoned them. She expected that convincing him to go would be difficult.



“You really will?”



Liliana asked for confirmation, but Hajime only shrugged.



“Please do not misunderstand. It’s not because of your kingdom. It’s for my teacher. She’s been kidnapped because of me. I have to take responsibility.”



“For Aiko…”



Liliana was a little discouraged when she realized that Hajime had no plans to lend his force to the kingdom, but she had some hope that he’d change his mind on the way. Despite his harsh words, she still broke into an involuntary smile.



“Well, in the process of helping my teacher, I might end up aiding the kingdom by accident.” He admitted.



“…. Fufu, I hope that is the case. I thank you, Nagumo.”



Since the woman who had kidnapped Aiko was wearing a frock of the church, and since the king was listening to the church to an abnormal degree, likely the church was the cause of all these problems. The church would likely get in Hajime’s way, and they’d end up as his enemy. Helping Aiko and the fixing the kingdom seemed to be one and the same. By helping Aiko, Hajime would help Liliana.



Liliana shared a smile with Kaori, causing Hajime’s mouth to distort a bit.



In addition to saving Aiko, Hajime had another purpose. It’s the Kojiri (Spirit) magic in Kamiyama. From what they had heard from Miledi (armor-possessed prankster who gave them gravity magic), Kamiyama is also one of the seven major labyrinths. However, whether there is a large labyrinth entrance hidden by the church, Hajime had no clue. It was still worth a check although the church officials would likely get in his way.



So even though he had originally planned on going to the Sea of Trees, he now had a good reason to go for Kamiyama. And, in the process he’d rescue Aiko, with the likelihood of a fight with church very high. If he attacked the head temple, maybe that’s all he’d need to get the Kojiro (Spirit) magic, or so he thought.



With regards to the silver-haired woman, Hajime mentioned that he thought he had seen a silver haired person in the visions given to them in the Meljeene Underwater Ruins. On the luxury liner, there was a woman in a hood who disappeared and they most certainly had silver hair. Hajime couldn’t guess if it was the same person, the age was too different. However, there was a feeling from the beginning. Something to do with this woman with silver hair.



Hajime’s fighting spirit burned. He would stop them, no matter who the other party was. He’ll kill anyone who gets in his way. He puts on a ferocious smile like that of a wild wolf.



“…. Hajime, nice.” Yue responded to his look.



“Hajime… your face looks a little tight…”



“Thank you for showing me such a vicious look. You’re making me wet!” Tio added.



The atmosphere between Hajime in the girls was anything but subtle, Liliana blushed at the sight.





